A great value!. I ordered this remote to replace the 4 different ones I had to fumble with when trying to do the TV/Cable/VCR/DVD fandango.  With minimal setup (basically about 3 keypresses, plus entering a code), I was able to use this One for All in place of all 4 remotes. One issue is that the "glow in the dark" numerals are passive, namely they only work after being exposed to light for awhile and are not internally illuminated.  But the main buttons are large enough to be used in the dark and for 10 bucks I am entirely satisfied that this remote does as advertised...
Good Investment for the Money. I had an iPod for about a year, and had a lot of problems with it, having to get it replaced twice before my warranty expired.  After the third time, I sold it to a friend and invested in the iAudio instead.  This is a great product, as it can record sound, play movies, radio, and play tons of file formats.I highly reccomend this product, especially over the iPod...they are crap compared to this.  The only minor downside is that you will have to download a program that converts m4p files (songs from iTunes if you purchase music from them) as the iAudio can't read m4a or m4p.  It's easy enough to get a converter, just might cost you a little more money.Outstanding use of my money though....thumbs up
A Winner !. The Philips SHP2500 Headphones sound great...period.  The $20.00 price tag make them even more of a stand-out.  When listening to familiar cd's, right away I noticed rich deep base that wasn't there with my mini phones.  And after about three hours of listening over several nights, the highs became noticeably extended, must be due to a break-in period.I wore these full size phones for about an hour per sitting and never had the urge to take them off to give my ears a rest, they are very comfortable; the earshells toggle up/down to match individual head shape, and the fabric covered earpads can rotate to match ear angle.  Assuming you have the volume down low enough, you can still hear the phone ringing or the door bell.  The line cord volume control is convenient. I gifted a pair of these to a rap music lover and the observation made was that the maxumum volume isn't as loud as the phones these replaced.  I noticed the same difference between these and my mini phones.  This is a good thing for anyone who cares about long term hearing loss.  I was researching expensive earbuds, now I can spend the $400.00 savings on something else.  Thanks Philips
excellent deal!. I got it at very reasonable price approx 4 bucks sells for 9-10 at retail stores. Works great and nothing can beat this deal!!!! only if its free...!! ha!ha
pretty good. The only problem i had with it was that the voice recorder would play the recordings back fast in some parts and real slow in others but san disk told me how to fix that. I like it, I think its great, its light and its small. I've had it for a couple of months now.
the tablet is great, the additional hardware gave us trouble. I bought this for my daughter as a birthday present.   She Loves it.  But she started having problems with the mouse that comes with it.  We replaced the batteries, but that didn't fix the problem.
Excellent Purchase. Excellent product. Cools my GPU 6 degrees. Replaced my old GeForce 6200 fan which failed. I think its worth the price, too. Especially when its almost impossible to find a replacement fan for something you need to be cooled
Works as advertised. I am using this battery with my Panasonic PV-GS300 camcorder.  It is thicker than the battery that came with the camcorder, but runs longer.  Uses same charger as original.  I have used it for a couple months now and have had no problems with it.  It works as advertised
Great Product. This is awesome, Love the programibilty of the item through the computer! Could only be better if the Software for this was Included and At NO Cost...  A+  I now own 2 of these
Receiver review. Works great for my 5.1 channel. As my first home theater investment in our new family, I'm very satisfied with the price and product.  The various audio features are great.  Especially like the Dialogue enhancement feature for movies that get a little quiet.  Most pleased with the receiver and look forward to hooking up the extra 2 channels soon.
Great Product. We use it with an ordinary "rabbit ears" antenna and gat all the local TV channels (HD and analog).  The HD reception is displayed with fantastic clarity and the analog reception is as good as on any regular TV set.  The built-in DVD player is convenient and easy to use.  Our new 32-inch HDTV fits right the same cabinet as the 25-year-old Toshiba analog TV that it replaced.
Tri Color inkjet print cartridge. I like this product because it is the best to use with my printer. Generic cartridges dont work as well
Works really well. I honestly didn't think this antenna would work as well as it does.  I bought it hoping I'd be able to watch local broadcast channels with only a few lines, instead of full-screen snow, and it actually gives me picture clarity equal to what I got with cable.  The UHF antenna is supposed to plug directly into your tv (I think this assumes your tv was made a long time ago), which wasn't an option with my set, but it turns out I don't need it anyway; channels in the 50s and 60s come in just as well as lower ones.  It's also a pretty small unit with a sort of retro 50s design, so it's not an eyesore.  Great antenna, especially for the price
BEL Vector 995 great!. I've had this for about a week, and it seems to be working very well. The "autoscan" feature is very nice since I seemed to forget to switch between "city" and "highway" with my older units.The voice prompts are very clear, and the automute keeps the annoying beeps to a comfortable level.I've had several radar detectors over the years, and this one certainly seems to be the best so far. It is also rated very highly in the amgazine articles I found
Product worked as advertised. Easy to setup. Shipment was timely and well packed. Easy to follow instructions. Would buy from them again
Great shape, good quality. I love this controller.  I have small hands for an adult, and the pad fits me well.  I like the shape better than even the now-standard Controller S shape.  I have no problems with delay or drift.  I haven't used the D-pad, but the thumbsticks and buttons work great, though I'm not a terribly heavy user.  This pad works better than either the Pelican Eclipse or Soul that I own.  My Madcatz Lynx is better, but way too big for my hands.  I like the feel of the plastic.  The only thing I would change would be making the thumbsticks a bit shorter and concave on top, though I've never had a problem with grip
Beautiful w/ Canon I-9900. The results are amazing when used with the Canon I-9900.  But, I suggest that you limit handling to avoid scratching
review Ipaq hx2795. excellent PDA, provide all the sales tools/ support I needed for my daily work - highly recommended
mother. I bought this shaver for my son for Christmas.  He had one just like it before and it worked great for him, so I was glad to find one again for him and at a lesser price.  He is very happy with it
good value. These ear buds provide a VERY good fit.  They block out a lot of external noise.  Much better than my previous ear buds.  The sound is clear with good bass.  Definitely worth the price
great flash card... I needed a high speed flash card and this one fit the bill, have been using it in my Canon Rebel for 3 months now and have been completly satisfied with it.This product also comes with a recovery disc that helps recover files from damaged cards...I used it on a card that was fried and it was unable to recover it.  I am guessing it is user error not the program.  I had reformatted the disc in effort to get rid of the fried fragments of my photos and so there was not much for the program to find.Over all, I love this product and would buy this again
Pretty Cool. I have it connected to my Onkyo shelf system (DR-UN7). I have it running through the line in on the stereo, I don't know if connection via some other method provides additional benefits. I wish I could use the single remote to change both ipod and stereo, but perhaps that's what I'm missing
Works better than I anticipated!. My setup:- Dell Latitude PP01L (Intel chip)- Win XP Pro- D-Link DI-624 Wireless Router (with two walls inbetween the laptop and the antenna)- Enabled the WEP featureI unplugged the old wireless card and simply plugged this in.  Windows found the new card and did its Plug-n-Play thing.  Not only was I was able to get on the Internet immediately, but the card picked up two other signals in the neighborhood that I couldn't 'see' with my 11MB/sec Cisco Aironet card.  This I sort of expected, but was still a bit surprised being that my closest neighbor is beyond the range of most wireless routers.The CD installed just fine, but when I went to the D-Link site to check for an updated driver it said I was up-to-date.  I ran Windows Update and it claimed I had an updated driver available for my new D-Link card. I've never had a problem with D-Link's website (or customer service, while we're on the subject), so I was a bit taken aback that Microsoft was ahead of D-Link's site.Either way...  install the card and get onto the internet, then have Windows Update check for possible updates.Be sure to enable the encryption feature.  If you are running a small network of computers where you are sharing folders then you want to be sure that your neighbors can't go snooping through your stuff.  Or worse, lift the signal, and ultimately your personal information.I've had no problems with my current set-up.  I HIGHLY recommend this card to bring your laptop/desktop up-to-date
Great keyboard for young enthusiasts. My nine year old daughter received this keyboard from "Santa", and was very happy with her present. The illuminating lights on the keyboard make it easy to see the proper keys to press with the songs, it is lightweight and easy for her to carry around,and it has nice sound quality for the relatively inexpensive price. My only complaint is that it doesn't come with a stand, but I would still recommend it for beginners.Brandon FairclothRio Rico, Az
The NuLOOQ Device is a must have!!!. I bought a NuLOOQ when it first came out for the Mac. I've been an Illustrator & Visualization Artist for 17 years now. I have an iMac at home and a PC at my full-time job. It takes a little while to break some old habbits, but once you do, and get used to the NuLOOQ device, you'll never go back! I love this smart toy! I got so hooked on it, I recently purchased one for my PC here at work. If there is anyone out there that thinks it's just for the Mac your wrong! The PC version is just as good! It's become part of my left hand and I still use my Wacom tablet all the time also! To me, this is a must have for any beginner or advanced artist using the computer; cross platform. Bravo to Logitech for making another great product! Get one...I'll guarantee you'll get hooked on it
Great item. This item works as advertised.  Out of the box charge it and go.  Very easy to operate
Very Satisfied with My Receiver. I am a novice at buying stereo equipment and I pretty much relied on the reviews of this receiver before making the purchase.  I also purchased the Bose Acoustimass speakers and the Sony HDMI DVD/CD player.  I waited awhile and researched and read all the reviews I could find on my purchases and after hooking it all up, I could not be happier with the sound.  I love all types of music from rock to classical and the sound is symphonic for sure.  I wish I had my whole house wired for sound because I'd like this kind of sound to be piped through the whole house using one system.  Installation was a breeze, and being a woman, I thought I would have to have a man do it, but I did it!  All things are still working smoothly without a hitch
Hard Case for Axim X51v. I bought my Axim with the Rhinoskin silicon rubber case; its a tight squeeze into many of my shirt pockets.  I will give this a try.  So far, so good.  The belt clip feels very secure and the quick release is very positive.  It has a nice click to it, you know when it when its engaged or released.  I won't know if it rates 5 stars until it reaches a year old without incident
Recommend this product. I was seeking a fairly inexpensive method of doing it all with video capture: getting cable televsion, VHS tape, and old DVD footage into the computer.  After some tweaking and playing, I've successfully accomplished all of the above using this products' HW and SW package.  Although DivX is the best format for recording off of cable TV, remember its 4 GB file-size limitation.  The biggest concern for most home video editors is the ability to edit your footage in the common editing software applications.  So far, I've not been able to edit my VHS-now-PC-(MPEG 2 & 4)footage in Pinnacle 7, but I'm hearing it might be possible in Adobe Premiere and Pinnacle 10.Nevetheless, the product works, and has proven itself reliable
perfect nano case. With all the reviews about how easy the Nano scratches, I left the protective film on until I found the right case the next day at CC (they had just received them that day), sorry Amazon but the Nano did come from you.  Anyway the case is certainly up to the standard of the Nano itself.  It comes with a peel off protective strip that fits over the screen itself.  I have noticed the click wheel was a little slow to respond with the shipping film on it, but since when this case is open the click wheel is directly accessible, it works great.  It fits snugly in this case, yet is easy to remove though removal is not necessary to charge or update. The case has a felt inner lining which seems protect it and may provide some shock protection in case of falls. I have used it daily for 2 weeks with no scratches at all.  The belt clip is sturdy and secure.  The magnetic snap for closing it works great. The case can be closed with headphones attached, but of course to make adjustments it has to be opened which is easily done while on the belt clip as it unfolds to allow easy access. This case is as cool as the Nano itself and I would very highly recommend it. I hope Belkin makes the same case for the new IPOD
Good Product with Poor Documentation. I bought this switch so that I could specifically connect my cable box, dvd and PS3 to my Sony television that only has one HDMI input.  I was on the verge of returning it when I saw the review below that said that the PS3 will only work on Port 5.  Had I not seen that I would have returned it.The performance of the unit plus the cost definitely puts it on a 5-star level but the lack of meaningful instructions I dropped it to a 4-star
I'm Impressed!. I am kind of a shortwave junkie, and have a few radios all over the place,I must admit that for the money spent, and the performance and endurance, this little bugger is probably my best buy!  I cannot believe the sound quality or the reception, its phenominal!  I can pick up shortwave inside the meat packing plant where I work!  (Big heavy steel freezers) It is a simple, small no frills, pocket size radio, but it blows away anything in its price range, trust me
Creative Sound quality with some HFE problems. I have used the Zen Micro (6GB) for about 4-5 months now and I am satisfied with the product. There is a lot of storage space to carry all the songs and most importantly the sound quality is excellent. Sound quality has as much to do with the earphones as with the player itself and I am more than satisfied with both. The interface on the player is easy to use and directory structure, etc. is clear. The interface (button) sensitivity is easily adjustable which helps, especially while travelling.On the negative side, the human factor engineering could use some development. I have consistantly found it difficult to access the storage (Data as opposed to music) difficult to access and retrive data from. However, the software controls for loading music on the player is simple and easy to use.All in all, given the excellent sound quality I declare myself a satisfied customer and I may consider another Creative product in the future.
Works Wonders. Diminishes volume for each set of headphones, but that is to be expected. Extremely easy to use. A great product
1GB Xd Picture Card Type H. I bought this for my granddaughter to use in the digital camera that I had given her for Christmas.  She was very happy to get this picture card
Great Sound, Great Unit, Great Value. I have this in the bedroom connected to a 13" TV (it plays DVDs as well as CDs).  The sound is great and it has a classy understated look.  I am thinking of buying one for my office and once for the garage.
Great TV, great price. The quality for the price can't be beat.  Looks great, no glare.  Recommended
Works Great Plug and Play with Mac Mini. No problems setting up, plugged into a new mac mini (intel) in mac OS and required no setup. Keystoke is great
GREAT product to listen to stuff to... at work. Good sound and the 4 USB ports work well als
No Complaints Yet. This machine has delivered everything it said it would.  I had a slight bit of difficulty getting it set up to print (according to my husband, it was all me).  Otherwise, the machine has been functioning wonderfully in my busy CPA office during tax season - my busiest time of year.
Great for DVD labeling. I needed a printer capable of printing directly onto DVDs because LightScribe can not create ADA-compliant labels, and DVDs with paper labels often "skip" and play incorrectly.Only Epson makes printers that can print directly onto DVDs, and the R-260 is their current lowest-end product with this capability.  Indeed, this printer is so low end that ink refill packages cost about three dollars more than the printer (which comes complete with ink).  Hence, this is probably the first high resolution "disposable" printer on the market.Speed - a couple of minutes per DVD.  Basically, it's about the same speed as any low-end high resolution printer printing a 5x7 photo.  This is about eight times faster than a LightScribe.Quality - great!  It blows away anything I could do with a felt tip pen or a LightScribe.Cost  - TBD.  I've printed seven full color disks with zero defects, and my ink refill icons indicate full reservoirs.  Don't use the "highest" quality print setting (there are only two settings).  It drinks more ink, and the normal setting produces great results.  These are DVD labels after all and not something I'm hanging on a wall.Setup - The multi-lingual instructions were clear, and setup was simple (Windows XP).  You'll need your own USB cable, so read the box to be sure you have (or buy) the right kind.Ease of use:  move a lever down, place DVD into DVD tray, place DVD tray into the printer and align arrows.  Print from label program (included with printer).Label program:  very simple to use compared to competing products.  I would not hesitate recommending it to an eight-year-old.  One happy surprise, I can paste screen shots directly onto the label template.  On the other hand, the software has no database merge capabilities.  As a result disk customization with customer names, serial numbers, or product keys becomes a manual task.  That is, you'll need to update the disk label yourself prior to printing each unique disk.  I never used that feature anyway
Wonderful phone. I've been wanting a phone like this for years and finally decided to splurge and buy it. I couldn't be more happy with it. It's a hefty, solid phone and the sound is clear as a bell. It's extremely attractive and I recommend it to anyone who likes retro items that work well.
A very easy connection. This product works very well in a number of situations. Like others, I had a cat5 cable running from my router to another computer across the ceiling, and for aesthetic reasons it had to change. Previous versions and similar products by other manufacturers were not reviewed well, but this unit worked like a charm. Installation took less than five minutes, and the speed, while not as fast as a direct connection is more than adequate, usually above 40 MBPS. While I miss the direct connection when I am grabbing large files, even for video tasks it works well.And what price can one put on no longer getting complaints about a cable looks hanging over the door
Much better!. This memory card  is so much better and more convenient than the internal memory which came with the camera... I am enjoying it a lot
A great buy!. I purchased this product 2 years back and it is still working without any problem. I use the batteries mostly for my digital camera and have no complaints so far. Highly recommend this product
Works great. I own a Sony DVD Camera and these work perfectly. I`ve had no problems so far and price is great
AT-PL120. Overall, the AT-PL120 performs quite well.  The flexibility and control this unit offers make it a good value for DJ's and avid music listeners alike.  It is easy to set up and performs respectfully.  The AT-PL120 has a built-in switchable power adapter for different AC voltages and has a built-in switchable pre-amp to make connections to the amp simple and easy.  Good speed adjustments and the AT-PL120 will play the 33 1/3, 45 and 78 rpm vinyl. I found the 78 speed nice since I use it to play some very old 78s.  The unit easily accepts both my mono 78 cartridge and my stereo cartridge. Two improvements I would like to have on this turntable are: 1) Auto reject at the end of the record (a reject button for operator control would be nice) and, 2) I would like to have had a higher quality cartridge included with the unit although the one supplied was adequate
A Good Little (Outdated) Chartplotter. I am happy with this chartplotter but right now I wouldn't recommend it. For one thing Garmin nickels and dimes you to death if you want to actually use this. The memory is very expensive and proprietary. You need to buy additional memory to download any charts into this device. And the charts are VERY expensive and come with all kinds of obnoxious copy protection. Also worth mentioning is that the screen is hard to read in broad daylight. But the deciding factor is that Garmin is just now rolling out their next generation units that will replace this one. I would wait the few weeks it will take to get one of the new ones which will use standard SD memory and provide bigger, brighter screens, etc.
Pocket-sized style. I own one in each color for my multiple pair of earbuds. I have to say that the only way to improve upon this product, other than offering more color combinations, would be to make it bulletproof, which it damn near is already. A wonderfully convenient and stylish accessory. Although $15 might come across as steep for such a small product, the cost becomes easier to justify as you begin purchasing more expensive earbuds. The $100+ Shure earphones are a sizable investment and must be protected. The Sendstation Earbuddy meets that demand better than any other product in it's category
Good for over 2 years. I bought this phone used, on eBay, about 2 1/2 years ago. I did a lot of reading before I bought it and found that there is a known issue with battery life of the handsets. For everyone that has mentioned battery life, there is a solution.When I bought the phone, the station with 2 handsets was $60 on eBay. I immediately ordered 2 Energizer ER-P511 NiMH batteries to replace the Panasonic throw aways. I had the battery life problem with my previous Panasonic phone set, but, this set never dies! My family has talked for hours on a single charge and left the handset in a few interesting places, only to be found again with the paging system and plenty of battery life. At 2 hours of talk time, it still shows two bars.The voice quality is not the best, but, it's not bad either. I use Vonage and no one can tell that I'm not on a traditional line. It's definately better than any of the 2.4 GHz phones out there.The range is more than I need so I can't complain about it. I can go to the corner of my back yard on the opposite side of the house from the base station and experience minimal static. I've gone so far as to walk to the end of our street (a cul de sac) and still had enough coverage to carry a conversation, although it was a weak signal at that point.Overall, I would have given the phone 5 stars if I didn't have to provide my own batteries to make it useable.
The best wireless router money can buy (if you ask me). The range on this thing is amazing. The ease of setup and use is great. The design is great. I wish I could be more detailed here, but it's just great all-around. Nothing more to say than that. If you have an Apple computer and need a wireless router, this should be the only one you buy. Worked perfectly and quickly right out of the box, and hasn't stopped for a even a moment in the few months I've had it
Nice touch. No two people had the same opinion about any of ipod's cases but if you're looking for distinguished,slick case this is the one to go for
Mind Blowing. Before buying this one I did a lot of research and narrowed down my options to either the 5th gen 30gb ipod or the creative zen vision,and i don't regret getting the zen vision at all.I've just compared the two belowZen vision:Resolution 640x480 with a huge 262k 3.7inch lcd screenipod video 30gb:320x240 with a 65k 2.5inch lcd screenZen vision:It's got a built in preview speaker which is great  if u have to get a preview of the songipod video 30gb:no previw speakerZen vision:Has a really good FM radio and an awesome microphoneipod video 30gb:Don't know of any feature of that sortZen vision:u can upload music from any site imaginableipod video 30gb:only the itunes crap which is 1.00$/song.....??Zen vision:can play almost every video format including DivXipod video 30gb:sorry mate look somewhere else!!Overall the vision is well worth the extra bucksIt might be heavy but the built quality is simply great....buy the vision if u follow ur heart,buy the ipod...if someone told u s
Great function !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. Buy it and you will not live home without it.  If I would rate this product, I will rated a 6 stars.
XM Radio Mount. Installed in minutes in my Suburban and my Chevy Avalache. It works great and is not in the way of my power seat movement. I will be buying another for my boat
Don't Be Fooled by it's Size or the Brand Name. When I started looking for an mp3 player my main concern was the ability to play songs at a very high quality level. The ipod was a consideration, as was another top rated Sony mp3 player. However, I  didn't want to get what everyone else had and after a bad experience with an unnamed sony game console, I thought I would try something new. If you asked ten people who Cowon was, I would say probably nine of the ten couldn't tell you. It is very sturdy and has the same general shape/dimensions as the ipod. Clearly designed to compete with Apple, the iAudio X5 has some very valuable aspects:-Superb sound quality, especially from something that weighs under 8 oz. (I am currently using full size stereo headphones because they are more comfortable)-Rugged all metal construction and overall great feel-Simple design and intuitive joystick/buttons (I found the joystick to be quite easy to use after about 10 minutes; converts from the iPod may take some getting used to)-A plethera of options: mach3 bass, surround sound, pan, wallpaper, 5 band equalizer, fm radio, voice recorder, surround sound and MP enhance-The ability to play video-A 14 hour battery with a 3 hour charge time-Very powerful, I normally listen at level 20 or less of the 40 volume levels on it-Priced about the same as equal or lesser mp3 players-Extremely easy program to use for transferring ANY type of file to the iAudio. It is a drag and drop system; it took me about seven minutes to transfer all of my 3.5 gigs of music.-Everything you need is included in the box - earphones, usb 2.0 transfer cable, another cable, a 4 port attachment for the bottom of the player, charger and jetshell software-Great storage space (20 GB) which can be used to store much more than mp3sThere are some negative attributes to the iAudio X5 however:-The most glaring problem I had was with the in-ear headphones; they did not fit all the way in and were more than uncomfortable. They also have an assymetrical length cord. I consider myself to have average size ear canals so I imagine this is a major problem for other users. I suggest Cowon completely redesigns these.-Because the brand is widely unknown, the price may scare some away even with all the features and reviews.-No place online to buy mp3s particulary for this player (however I read somewhere that there would soon be one just like iTunes.)This being my first mp3 player I am extremely happy with the purchase even for the price, because I would rather pay more for the quality. The iAudio X5 is an all around outstanding media player and I believe will start to make a name for itself once the word gets out. If I were to rate everything that came in the box I would give it a 9.5 out of 10 because of the earphones. Other than that this mp3 player is close to perfect.
watch out where you plug in your laptop. The one in our bedroom wouldn't always work, couldn't hear the kids calling.  I was unplugging my laptop charger at the same time someone was calling and discovered the charger was filtering the voice.  Both my Dell charger and Thinkpad charger had the same effect, even without the laptop plugged into the charger.  If your having problems, I would start with unplugging other things first.Overall, these have been a Godsend, wife no longer has to scream at the kids across the entire house.  Used to drive me crazy
OK. Looks good, sounds ok. The dynamic bass boost introduces hiss but makes the sound more bassy. 4 stars for looks and price. -1 for sound quality.
You can use the Shoe Pouch to hold the sensor in any type shoe. The Nike+iPod Sport Kit is an excellent addition to the iPod line.Unfortunately, it only works with Nike+ shoes. Which are hard to find anda number of us don't like how they fit or prefer other shoe types.You can still use the Nike+iPod with other shoes. There are a number of home brewed waysand retail products. We like the $5.99 Shoe Pouch.You can find the Shoe Pouch at [...]It will securely attach the sensor to any type shoe.Otherwise, way to go Nike and Apple, great product
Bravo Bravia. I bought this TV because it has a narrow bezel- every other 32 inch LCD I saw  (with the exception of a Walmart Ilo) was wider, and I was limited by a built in cabinet the device had to fit in.  I had doubts about ordering something like this online, but have had no trouble at all, and counting tax, saved $300 over the Best Buy advertised sale price.  The box came in less than a week, intact, and the TV hooked up easily and works great. Very good picture and much better sound than my last TV- I haven't hooked any external speakers
Great Product. I really like the lightscribe technology is awesome the only draw back is it takes so long to scribe on a disc and the discs are more expensive
raj. This TV was a pleasure to watch.  Really bright and good color resolution.  I use YPbPr inputs to achieve a 480p input.  Looked pretty good.I do not have 1080i or 1080p input to my TV yet.  Hence, am not able to rate it for that yet.One of my drivers for this TV has been that it supports PAL input too and hence it is compatible globally.Delivery from Amazon was great.  The people who deliverd it helped me assemble it and put it in the living room
Very Good Drive & Extremely quiet. So far, I've had a very good experience with this drive. A key characteristic that sets it apart from other drives is that it is virtually noiseless. It doesn't have a fan. I have it sitting on my desk and I can't tell that it's even on.  I have other drives and some emit more noise than a jet engine. To date, it has behaved flawlessly
Brother TN550. This cartridge is what I need to use my printer.  There are copies out there but I have not had any luck with them. The price I got at Amazon is about $25 cheaper than if I had bought it at Staples or Office Depot.  Thank you Amazon
best for this price. The Azden wireless mic system is good value for the the money.Out of the box and in operation in exactly 3 minutes.There was one thing that was a problem, but it wasn't the mic's problem, it was mine.  I didn't read carefully enough to notice that it was a mono input jack on the receiver unit.  My camcorder requires stereo input.  I needed to buy an adapter to convert mono to stereo input, so sound was pumped into both channels.  ($2 jack at RS)
Fantasic Deal. My son loves this guitar and amp.  He has practiced for hours and it is the only thing that has ever distracted him from his interest in computer games. This is his first musical instrument and he has taught himself how to play via internet tutorials. It is a great value for the money.  The only negative was that the cord from the amp to the guitar broke after a month, but we can replace it pretty inexpensively.  We're all very happy with the guitar and the amp sounds great too.  Great deal
Lexar 1GB SD Digital Card. This is a very nice card.  I get 358 5MP pictures and it is a lot faster than my previous card, so my video clips are no longer jerky as they were before
it does what it says!. about a week agoi bought this to clean my car cd player lens that was skipping every time i hit the smallest bump. then my dvd player was having problems reading disks and after contacting the manafacturer they said just  to use a cd cleaner in it, so i told them what i had and they said it would  do fine and it did! now my cd and dvd player ore both skip free and working  like new
Great phone (but the Vonage rebates are a scam). This is a really great phone.  The range is good and the sound quality is excellent.  We also really like the Vonage system, which has worked exceptionally well for us.  It works GREAT with broadband, and doesn't slow down even if you're downloading a lot of files, or playing online games.My only gripe is with the Vonage rebates, which are terrible.  Put simply, Vonage doesn't pay.  Once they've got you signed up what are you going to do?  It's too little money to switch, and so you won't... but you'll be out $50 or $100.  So buyer beware, I suppose.  On the vonage forums one poll indicated that 70%+ hadn't received rebates... so be careful here.In spite of the rebate ripoff, I do love the product.  So I guess that says something
Just "okay". The mouse isn't "bad" but I don't like the feel, being entirely used to the smaller Microsoft wireless optical mouses. I do like the added features and the on off function, but don't like that the USB sensor doesn't attach to the mouse when it is not in use for travel purposes. I probably will go with a different mouse next time
alma-de-angel. super excellent cd player with remote control/ im sewing machine operator and this cd player is excellent for mi i love remote control, thanks amazon estra super fast shipping
couldn't hope for better. i got the right decision when i brought it. it functionned instantly when i put it in my hp 720 camera. it is provided with a lifetime warranty and you recieve a plastic box to put the card in. it is also the cheapest 128 mb card in the market. beware the transfer speed is 2 mb/
Compact and works as advertised. May not work with all cases. One word of caution.  The connector on the iPod side is large so it may not be able to work with all cases, it did not with mine.  Been using it for about a month now and that is my only complaint
Don't follow the intructions!. For the first time I am telling you NOT to follow the instructions!!  They will lead you astray.  Simply go to the Logitech site, sign up and plug in your new remote (also have your old remotes nearby.)  DO NOT USE THE CD!!!At first, I put in the CD, followed the instructions...  and the next thing I know I am installing the software over a dozen times!  I was directed to install the new version, deleting and uninstalling the old ones, reinstalling the program and some desktop manager thing, and on and on.Finally I uninstalled everything and just went to the website, installed the ONE remote manager program and I was on my way to programming the remote.  Half an hour later I had almost all of the kinks worked out (still a couple buttons that need to be 'learned'.)I am running the following off of this remote:Syntax Olevia LT32HVM 32" LCD TV (haven't found the "source" or "enter" buttons yet, but will have to teach new remote)Sony STR-K740P A/V receiver (a few buttons needed to be 'learned')Philips DVP642 DVD Player (a couple buttons needed to be 'learned')Switching from "Watch TV" to "Watch DVD" is awesome and quite fluid.  Takes about 10 seconds to do all of the macros I have it performing, but with some tweaking I can get that down to just a few seconds.Button response time is very good.Agree with the other reviewers about the "activity" buttons at the top: you can't read them in the dark, even though they are backlit.  You'll have to memorize them or customize them to be on-screen functions.Good weight, good feel.  Most used button (Channel +-) is right by your thumb, along with the joystick-disc thing.You don't have to have it poited directly at the devices you are operating -- it can be pointed at the ceiling and still work.I knocked off a star for the nightmare I had with the CD programs and website not talking.  JUST SKIP THE CD and go directly to the website.Oh, and don't forget to install the changes you make -- it's a bit of a small, tricky button you have to press on the main menu of the program.  The data and macros are not sent to the remote live, you must create your activities and then the program will send it to the remote at one time.I recommend the remote, but I also feel that I could live without it.  The four remotes I had was a pain, but I haven't quite figured out if this is worth the money
Great product, terrible shipping. This Salamander Designs rack is very well made and looks great.  It takes a few hours to assemble, but the result is nicer than most home theater furniture out there.  Unfortunately, Amazon's shipping (via UPS) didn't go so well and the outer box arrived in very bad shape.  I was hoping that the inner box would protect the item, but, alas, one of the two doors was damaged.  I'm now trying to get Amazon to replace the door, but they can only exchange the whole unit.  The shipping box is completely destroyed, so I've been forced to contact the manufacturer directly.  Crossing my fingers..
very pleased. I was able to create a great gift with this product!  Item was exactly as described, and the software was very easy to install and use.  The only thing to be aware of is that the long printable cover for the 5x7 book is only able to be used in certain printers.  The 8x10 version of the long cover is only able to be printed with certain other printers (not the same ones as the 5x7).  I happen to have 2 printers, so was able to print it, but they do have a good single sheet option for the cover if you don't have the right printer.  I would definitely buy this product again
fully satisfied. i am satisfied with these headphones, the delivery was quick, as expected, it was the brand new piece
The PERFECT FM modulator. For the past several months I have been using a "plug in the cigarette lighter" modulator with fair results.  As expected, interferance from adjacent stations occurred frequently with hiss, and sometimes an overpowering audio signal. Enter the C.CRANE FM MODULATOR.With this device I am able to "transmit" a clean, clear, fully stereo signal 50' from wherever I place the modulator.  In the vehicle, the device has enough output to overcome fair to moderately stations!   In other words, the output signal is significant compared to cigarette lighter systems and the fidelity is superior to the cassette adapter systems I have tried as well.I can drive a distance of 100 miles without havung to tweek the frequencies...and that is in New Jersey, heavily populated with lots of RF sources.By the by the unit is much smaller than the picture seems to show. Figure 3 1/2" x 3 1/4"... easy to tuck out of sight.
Love the Brother P-Touch QL-500 Manual-Cut PC Label Printing System. I love the Brother P-Touch QL-500 Manual-Cut PC Label Printing System.  The price was super.  I couldn't be happier.  It has resulted in marked improvement in my filing and addressing work!L S in Dunde
Great product and cheap $$$. When I was looking for HDMI cables for my LCD, I thought the more expensive cables were the only way to go so I bought a $200 Monster cable.  Then I read about HDMI technology spiting out only 1's and 0's (digital) so I thought what the heck, go with the cheaper cables.  I returned the Monster and found this cable.  Twenty times less expensive than the first one I bought and it performs the same!  Boy, I'm sure glad I went this rout or else I'd be kicking myself.  Everyone should be doing the same too.  I have 2 more cables coming my way.  Only thing I wish they'd do was carry shorter cables, around 3 feet.
I wish all my corded items were this convenient. This little item is really convenient for easy storage and reducing clutter.  I keep it in my car.  I never have to wrap it up after use, and it never gets tangled up with other items in the storage bin.  Try this with conventional cords!  I will buy more items of this nature in the future.
Small Space Big Sound. If you seek a small radio for great sound in your bathroom, there is none better than this cleverly designed package of circuits and speaker.John T. McCabe
Monster Cable Gamelink 400. need to info customer that Optical sound cable is required for sound from PS2 console
Good Cable. Does what it's supposed to do.  I really don't have a good way to objectively rate this cable, but I don't notice any interference with the sub woofer it is used with
Solid construction. I was scepticle at first that something looking that flimsy could really hold the weight of 622 cds.  The assembly was easy though time consuming.  I would recommend that you use those plastic washers, otherwise if you decide to move the rods you get nasty marks on the wood.  I would recommend this unit  to anyone wanting all of their cds in one spot.  Very stable even on carpet
Targus Wireless Keyboard is great. This is a fantastic little item. You can attach your PDA, position the infrared wand and off you go. With this keyboard, you can type and also use a button on the keyboard as a mouse-which is a similar experience to using a laptop mouse. My only problem was with customer service which said the keyboard wasn't compatible with my PDA when in fact it was
U3 Rocks. I have to admit that I was hesitant to embrace the new U3 technology, but I'm sure glad I did.  My biggest thrill was to see how easily I can now synchronize my Outlook calendars between home and office.  My advice would be to download the latest U3 program after you plug-in the Cruzer.  Take about 10 minutes to explore what's possible, and then either delete it or use it.  The latest downloads make it easy enough to delete, but I'm keeping it.  Hey, people used to be afraid of microwave ovens too but they sort of caught on
Excellent printer -. I've been an Epson printer girl up until now.  I began with the 1270, which was a terrific printer, lasted forever, did a great job, etc.  It finally died of old age and I purchased the 1280.  It was temperamental, sucked up ink big time, and just was not as good as the 1270.  It died an early death, barely a year old.  I was tired of the ink problems with the Epsons, so I did a great deal of research on larger-format printers, and finally decided on the HP 8750.  I was influenced by the fact that the little HP PSC 750 I have owned for more than 6 years is just a terrific, sturdy, quality printer (and scanner and copier).  I've been working with the 8750 since end of December, and so far I'm very impressed with it.  The quality is excellent, operation is pretty straight-forward, it doesn't end up with dried ink supply like the Epson's are prone to do.  The 8750 produces beautiful 11X14 prints - I'm just delighted with it.  So far, I'm very, very pleased with this HP product, and I recommend it to anyone who wants to print larger-format color and/or b&w prints
Awesome!. Being a metalhead myself, I very much thought it might of overpowered the music (the phones that is.) I read very many reviews on these headphones, and thought it was right to buy these. They were compared to Shure, and Bose. but being a metal head, If you love metal, and/or rock, these headphones OWN especially the double bass and the heavy guitar riffs. If you love rap, I acquired some to see what these headphones could deliver, and it was amazing.5/5
love it love it. cannot believe how great a picture i get on this. very sharp and clear. great product for the money. thanks
Nice . . . Really Nice!. Ok, if you have two monitors side by side, or a single wide-screen format, this is the way to go!  I use this tablet with the Mac G5, with full functionality, and 1024 levels of pressure from the pen to the screen.  I have used the smaller tablets from Wacom, and they work very well, but this particular product is designed and constructed VERY WELL and makes the left right monitor design a breeze to use!Having the assignable "ExpressKeys" left and or right is really slick for repetitivetasks.This model stands 5/8" high/thick, 10 and 7/8" deep (front to back), and just under 16 and 1/2" wide.  Take two late model white Mac keyboards and set them one behind the other, and that is about the footprint this item covers, (width and depth).So, you will need some desk space, or I have found myself using this item on my lap with the pen.  Quite comfortable!In any scenario, this is by far one of the greatest products you could add to have the flexibility to be creative with whatever application you use.Thanks Wacom
Solid!. I already have two of these for my heavy rear bose speakers. The speakers are about are about 10 lbs each and are easily handled.The mounts are solid, and can be oriented in any direction easily. I am about to by three more for my center, and two fronts.I highly recommend
Well designed; not perfect, but very good. I bought the manual select FM transmitter for my brother and I liked it, so I bought this one for myself.  True, in heavy traffic congestion (I live in Chicago)the static is not cool, but I don't see how Monster could get around that.  I find that the  auto scanning feature works quite well, despite other reviews.  I'm happy with this product and was able to find it for about $70.
Good Quality Video. This component video cable(combined with progressive scan) produces a much better picture quality over S-video & Composit Video connections.The cable & the connecters are solid. I got a Monster THX 4 Ft compnent video cable and do not find any difference in picture quality comapared to this. Monster THX 4 Ft is priced almost double(29.99) in amazon. Though it did not show any difference, the connector of monster cable is more solid than this.
Griffin AirClick Remote Control for iPod. The Product works great. Instead of paying 300 to install an ipod controller in my car I used the DLO ipod car charger because it is small, with the iClick Leave it insidee the armrest between the front seats and the control is all I need or under 50 dollars. The only issue with the iclick I had is it arrived with a dead batttery. For some reason I had a spare in the house added it and it has worked great for 3 months no problems
Wonderful product. What a great product !!! Well designed , fast response times, all the items you need are included( bike & car mounts etc) A wider screen would be nice ,but this is their first generation motorcycle GPS(I  guess a Zumo 650 will be next) . Over all, a fantastic and usefull addition to my bike & car . It's kind of like a IPOD, very easy to use but very sophisticated.
excellent disks. I really liked the performace of this disks. I didnt find even one failed disks so far. Excellent product. Thanks to Verbatim
LOVE IT!. I have had this product now since mid 2006.  LOVE IT!  I have transferred nearly 100 VHS to DVD with no effort or trouble.  Once I converted our library, I discovered how easily it works with a new mini-dvd camcorder. I pop the mini dvd in a DVD player hooked to the product and can now combine several mini DVD's onto one large DVD, I can perform simple edit functions and add a music soundtrack from my iPod too!  I have an iPod and optional cord to show video / slideshow on TV -- instead, I run it to this product and make slideshows with music soundtract on DVD.  Sure I could do all this on a computer, but why fiddle with software and the like when this machine does it all!  DVD -- VHS -- iPod -- camcorder all run to this product fabulously and the DVDs it makes work in everyone's DVD player.  LOVE IT
for desktop. I bought these to attach to my laptop and sit on my desktop, small size was important. The fractional watt headphone amplifier in the laptop is enough to push these to reasonable volume. A visit to radio shack and some quick soldering produced a cable. Not exactly hi-fi, but better than the 1 1/2 inch speakers in the laptop. The real use is listening to radio web streams while I work, and playback of my ripped CD collection
Superb Bedroom HDTV. Just picked one up at the local B.B. tonight. PS3 games and blu-ray movies look amazing at 720p, via a cheapo hdmi to dvi cable. Would highly reccomend it to anybody looking for a good quality hdtv for their bedroom, kitchen, office, etc... Works great as a computer monitor as well. Great price and a great buy
POLK ATRIUM 45. These speakers are exactly what we needed to replace some older main front speakers for our "home theater". We already had a newer powered sub-woofer for the deep lows.   In addition to the audio paramters, we wanted these speakers to be a white color to blend in with the wall paint.  We have been very pleased with their performance and appearance.  To obtain the positioning we desired, I had to re-form the wall brackets so that the speaker would be aimed down towards our seating position (previous location was above ear level).  This was relatively easy to do with a vice and a hammer.  Aiming left and right is a built in feature of the mount.
Works Perfectly!. I would of spent at least $100 + more for this if I bought at Best Buy, Circuit City, etc.  And, it's a brand I heard of before
Best CD/DVD envelopes out there. I've tried more types of CD and DVD storage devices and techniques than I'd care to admit, and these envelopes are the best.  The capability of holding more than one disk is great, but the capper is the flap that holds a label (provided) with the disk title.When they're stored in a simple box such as Fellowes' own fake-leather "CD Box" (great, but very hard to find) you can store an INCREDIBLE number of disks in a small space and it's easy to riffle through the titles because you can flip the label flaps easily without removing the envelopes from the box.I challenge anyone to find a more compact method of storing disks
Excellent DVD+RW!!! Try it. Great speed, low errors and it works great in any DVD Playe
Cheap and works. Can't see spending tons of money to clean a product that has been out in the market for lots of years.  It works just fine, and cleans just as stated.
Good mics make good sense. Digital recordings are only as good as the quality of the end product. The use of this mic eliminated noise from handling the recorder or using the buttons. The only weakness is in how easy it to lose the tie clip and how hard it is to find a replacement. But I would not be without this mic ever again. I have purchased several now for my associates.Bill Word, CEOTri-Cord Group, LL
These are, by far, the best earbuds I have ever owned. If you are looking for a fairly inexpensive pair of earbuds to replace the crappy "stock" earbuds you have, buy these.The packaging says "surround sound," and boy, is it right. To test it, listen to a song that switches from front-rear and left-right a lot (I recommend The Beatles' "Revolution 9"), and you will be astounded by how amazing it sounds. It's like sitting in a spherical room surrounded by 360 degrees of speakers. It's amazing what that little external speaker can do... Cover it up with your finger, and it's like switching back to a cassette tape! That being said, I feel like if it's windy, you won't be able to hear your music at all because of wind blowing straight through into your ear. But, I haven't tested it in the wind yet.And the quality? It's the best quality that you will ever get from earbuds (for less than 40 dollars, at least). They sit comfortably in the ears, although I do have to put them in pretty hard. Also, if you have a monstrously large ear canal, a larger "tip" is included.There are a few oddities, however. The main one is, perhaps, that these earbuds are too powerful for their own good. On my iPod, I have to have the volume down at just a sliver to have it be at a reasonable level. I also had to turn my Wave volume way down on my computer. On the other hand, if you like blasting your eardrums out, these will be quite useful. Also, I've never been a fan of the different lengths of wire to the left and right earbud. I don't like the wire scraping on the back of my neck. But, I can definitely deal with it being in the front.I saw that many reviewers hated this because of the lack of bass. Come on, they are .25 inch speakers! You're not going to get subwoofer-like bass from them. I tried some Sublime ("Greatest-Hits") just to test it, and the bass sounds fine. I think a lot of these reviewers are just way too picky...BOTTOM LINE:This is a top-of-the-line pair of earbuds for 20 dollars and I highly recommend it. It won the CES Innovations award in 2004 for a reason
Everything except SACD. Ever since I discovered this player in the summer of 2005, I have been highly impressed with how much it met both my normal and oddball demands.  As a student of Musical Theatre, Opera, Classical vocal and choral literature, and Jazz and Classical piano, DVD-AUDIO capability is of great importance to me because there are a lot of titles especially in the Classical genre available in this format.  One thing that sets this player apart from the other manufacturers' players is Yamaha's CD UpSampling feature.  For those titles which are currently only available on CD and possibly will never be released on DVD-AUDIO and/or SACD, this option converts standard CDs to the quality of DVD-AUDIO.  On the Musical Theatre, Opera, and choral side of things, this player is capable of playing both NTSC (North American) and PAL (European) DVDs on corresponding as well as opposite TVs.  For certain titles in these genres, the North American editions are either four percent slower in tempo and picture movement and flatter in pitch than the European editions due to the method of PAL-to-NTSC conversion used by the distributors of such DVDs, or do not include as many bonus features as their original European counterparts.  Sometimes, it can be the other way around, except the European editions might be four percent faster and sharper and have less bonus material than their original North American counterparts.  On both ends of the spectrum, if the audio pitch is corrected without changing the audio speed to keep the picture and sound in synch, a subaudible breaking-up effect may be noticed as the result of slight artifacts from slightly bending or stretching the pitch in the conversion process.  However, because of this player's bicompatibility with both color systems, I have the freedom to choose and purchase whatever editions are the best.  Although it is not in the manual, this player can be made multi-region compatible including RCE DVDs.  Turn on the DVD player.  Make sure there are no discs loaded.  With the tray open, using its supplied remote control, slowly press 99990.  Wait for the 'Region 0' message to disappear.  Close the tray.  In conclusion, if you are looking for a DVD player with wide compatibility, you have come to the right place
very handy. I purchased this swivel stand for my TV in the bedroom.  It is nice when I need to turn my TV towards my Elliptical machine to watch my shows while I work out.  Very handy and I'm so glad i got it.  Saves the furniture from scratches when moving my TV back & forth
Muy buena calidad. Bueno esta Quemadora Dvd muy buena recomendable, para los usuarios que quieran vivir una experiencia unica, es la mejor que ha existido, gracias amazon por vender productos de vanguardi
What's not to like?. I've had the STR-DG600 receiver for more than a month, now, and it works great. The power is more than enough for my living room, and full volume is VERY loud on my Sony SA-FT1H flat panel speakers, and the sound is great. I especially like the Digital Cinema Sound for movies. It really does sound like there are multiple speakers down the sides, just like in a theater. Altogether a great receiver at a great price
Great piece of equipment. I am a teacher and use poerpoints often. The remote is great, I have had no problems with it yet. I love the mouse feature.
very good speaker. sound quality is very good. I am totally satisfied with this product. However, since the computer recognizes the speaker as a sound card, it would have been better if it also supports mic connection through the remote control just like the head phones.In this case, I would recommend you to change the settings of your sound recording software or chat software to use old sound card during the recording or video calls instead of the "Default Device". If you do it so, the software will automatically send and receive sound from your old sound card, in which I assume that a head set (microphone and headphone) is connected.
Good product, id recomend it. So far so good, its pretty comfortable, and keeps my laptop secure. Plenty of pockets for accesories and other stuff like pens, cd's, mp3 players etc.. For the price compared to others its a great buy. Go ahead and buy it, do it! lo
Compact Sync Solution. The thin USB sync adapter cable makes synchronizing on the road or when  using multiple computers a snap.  I've used the cable to sync with my  desktop at work, my laptop when on the road and with any other computer  when travelling.  Very light and simple to use I'd recommend it to anyone  who has more than one computer
Amazing... My house floorplan is extremely spunky. That also means that setting up my WiFi network was going to be extremely difficult.Up until the point that I bought this antenna, I spent a total of $400 trying to get all my signal strength bars up to max, but rather, ended up getting mediocre connectivity, with occasional connection drops.After installing the antenna, I get perfect signal, without the use of any repeaters in between. Hawkings is truly the best IMHO, especially when the quality of home/office networking gear is going to sh**. I just hope that the frequencies don't cause any long term health effects :
One sweet labeler. Some how I managed to find this for $42 and I didn't even know you could connect it to your pc till I received it.You can install the software and use it to put any font, font sizes,and pics you can imagine on the tape. Its nice that you see the tape on your pc so you can position anything you want, where you want before printing it.I ordered a hard case to store it in too.Very nice labeler
I have two words for you:  BUY THIS RADIO NOW!!!. This is the best radio in the world!  It sounds pretty good and looks even better.  If you don't turn it up too loud, you don't really notice the static.  It does take some fidgeting with the antenna to get rid of the phone conversations that it picks up.My only real complaint is my Chumbawamba CD caught fire (no damage to the radio).  I'll admit, I did have Tubthumping on repeat for three hours--what can I say, I love that stupid song!  But my eyebrows are back now and I have another CD on order. Anyway, if you're thinking of getting this radio, stop thinking.  Just do it!  I have to pee now.  Seacrest, out
For the price, it's good. I understand what the 1 star rater is saying about slipping, but I think it depends on your headshape, too.  For the price, this performs great as an open air headphone
I can't believe you can fill out a review for batteries. Wow.  A review.  For Batteries.  How funny is that.  Well I must say, I do support Rayovac batteries.  They're good.  Go buy some if you need batteries.  But...  do we REALLY need a REVIEW for them?!  Seriously... what will we review next?  Light bulbs
Great battery. I bought this to replace original Canon batteries that came with my Canon A280. This is really good and I am happy with battery life, charge time etc.The best features I like:- Short charge time- Compact cas
CB Radio. Works to my expections. Good every day radio. Received quickly and in good shape
Best by far at this price.  Huge bang-for-the-buck!. Brilliant images.  Highest quality.  You simply cannot beat this system for the price.  Also, this particular projection TV handles the non-HDTV channels very well - not all HDTV models do this.  The fact is that most channels are not available in HDTV yet, so it's nice to have a high quality TV that can deliver non-HDTV channels to you in a high quality rendering.  This TV does that very well.  Yes it's nothing like HDTV, but all the same they do a fine job with this model
The BEST Wireless Speaker ever??. I have to say....I bought 2 of these on a whim in a recent sale.......Suffice to say....I think these could be the MOST IMPRESSIVE Wireless Speakers I have ever owned.....and I've owned them all from 900mhz ones to fancy Sony 2.4ghz ones. All came with a downside of some sort whether it be Hiss, distortion, poor sound quality, low volume....etc. These have none of those problemsWhile 1st testing....I was blasting music on these.......1st in a bathroom.......Zero Hiss.........I was like "How loud can I make these baby go??" Suffice to say......very loud (you can definitely crank them up).....They have clear highs, and nice Bass and you can adjust the Treble and Bass.Also...very simple setup....literally plug and play and it supports up to 3 different inputs.I was absolutely amazed by the range of these.....as I was easily beyond 90+ Feet......I walked all over indoors with the remote speaker in my arm (it's not that heavy even with 6C Batteries).....I experienced Zero Distortion or dropouts with no Clicking (that I've experienced in other "wireless" speakers") and this was in fully obstructed 2-3 rooms away.Throw in that the environment contains a wide variety of 2.4Ghz Wireless Products including: 8 set 2.8Ghz phone system, 802.11g Network with a D-Link Range Extender and 2 bridged Routers, Wireless HP Printers, XBOX 360, PS3, Nintendo Wii, Wireless Bridge with VOIP Adapter.....etc.Impressive.....Verrry impressive product. Glad I bought 2.....one for use on my deck....and one for use on patio at beach house.I've seen wireless speakers almost 2 x the price that didn't perform nearly as well as these.The styling is great and the only downside is that they aren't waterproof/weatherproof....then they'd be THE perfect wireless outdoor speaker. I'm still gonna give them 5 STARS because they beat all the other models I've ever tried my entire life
Best Bang for the Buck. I was cautiously optimistic about this set of speakers after listening to SS-MF650H (a model behind this) at a local Bestbuy store. Listened to it side by side with JBL Venue series and Klipsch. Loved the Klipsch but couldn't justify or convince myself to spend over $800 on a pair and they are huge. Didn't think they sounded 4 times better. The JBL was a little better than the 650 but not that noticeable. So i decided to take a blind leap of faith based on so many positive reviews; remember I only listened to the 650...since that sounded good I figured a higher end will be even better. Man, was a pleasently suprised, it sounded amazing - wow; once again, I am enjoying music in stereo again :)These speakers are a little big, but I love them. I will highly recommend them to anyone looking for a good set of speaker...and you'll have enough left over cash for more additional toys to add to your home theater experience. I have since decided to upgrade my KenWood passive subwoofer to a powered Velodyne. It's like the more good toys you have the more you yearn for better ones.Quick disclaimer; I am not an audiophile, so I am just giving my average Joe "seat of the pants" review. I have had these for a little over a month and I am still loving them. Don't know if audiophiles will be settling for these speakers anyway...there are much better (of course expensive) ones out there. Whoever thought Sony only makes good TVs
Nice piece of Creative. Well, this beauty is GREAT... sound is very cool , i can hear every detail of games like guild wars
Lexar JDMC2GB-431 2 GB JumpDrive Mercury USB Flash Drive. I like this flash drive a lot.  It seems to operate quickly, displays the level of storage being used, and was a good value
Best radio for your money. I finally decided to buy the Grundig G4000A  I was really surprised for the excellent reception on Shortwave, AM and FM but especially for the powerfull sound of the speaker A++++++++  I can pick up stations on shortwave band from Los Angeles CA, South America, Mexico and from all over the world. Even on AM band at night I can pick up stations from 1500 miles away. This is the best radio for your money and size.
GREAT PRINTER. This is a great printer for making quick prints of your photos or other documents.  For what I use it for the speed is okay.  The only thing you might have to watch out for on this printer is the ink cartridges.  Since a few colors are in the same cartridge, if you run out of one color you will have to replace the whole cartridge.  Even if the other colors are still full.  Other than that, a great printer for quick prints
Great Cables!. I just got my first dvd player for Christmas, and got these cables to go along with it. I have been looking for good component cables for a while, and all I found were Monster Cables ..., and RCA brand cables (which a lot of people have complained about having problems with)... Then I finally found these ... Anyway Christmas day I hooked up my dvd player with these cables and at the same time through composite cables. The first movie I played was Primary Colors, and in the begining of the movie there are a lot of reds, (which as most people know reds especially bleed on the screen), but not when using component cables. But when you switch back and forth between component and composite cables you can really tell a difference. And you can also see a big difference between component and s-video, although most people say they can't tell any difference. In conclusion, if you're in the market for component cables go with Acoustic Research
Reviewers reviewing another product?. I don't understand all the negative reviews.  The only thing I can figure is they're talking about Table Mate I (which I've never tried) or some other brand completely.  I've had the Table Mate II for at least 2 years and use it daily for my laptop and occassionally for eating on.  It certainly can be set perfectly flat.  I wouldn't recommend leaning heavily on it but I rest my hands/arms on my laptop while I type all the time (like now) without a problem.  It has held up superbly to my abuse.  I'm extremely happy I purchased this and am planning on buying a couple more as gifts (one for my fiance who likes and really wants one like mine)
good but expensive. I can't say whether they are worth the money, becuase I haven't tried similar products.  However, they do work well, and they are built to survive a long time.  They are incredibly THICK for audio cables.  If you're imagining something the thickness of the typical headphone or PC-speaker wire, you're in the wrong ballpark:  This is closer to the thickness of a power-strip wire.  It's massive... nay, monstrous.  The wire is still very supple and easy to manipulate.  However, if you plan to run it across your living room floor, it will be extremely conspicuous.  Although you could certainly use it as a permanent connection, its massive construction suggests that the intended use is probably in a setting where you will be frequently connecting and disconnecting, packing and unpacking, and generally giving the cord heavy use.  It looks like it will take this kind of abuse fairly well.  The end
Excellent product, and I got it free!. This is a very good product, and you can get it, along with any other products on Amazon up to $500 Free! Participate in this special promotion and get a free $500 Amazon Gift Card at this web site:   awesomestufffree.com/amazo
No issues for me!. I was a little worried with all the negative reviews but I had no issues.  Sure it may wobble depending on the surface you place this on but it doesn't for me.  The price was right for me but maybe it isn't for everyone else.
Very nice keyboard for the price. The keyboard is great.  The kids like to practice more now than on the grand piano (mostly because they can use headphones so everyone isn't listening).  The speakers are a little weak--through headphones or an external amp it sounds much better.  I like the touch of the keys.  They are a little noisy, but not any different than other electronic keyboards with weighted keys I've tried.  I couldn't believe the price.  Very satisified with this purchase
Perfect for the designer. Whether or not you are a 2D or 3D artist, this tablet makes it all the more enjoyable. I had an Aiptek 12000U which died no less than 3 weeks from purchase date. This Wacom is so much better.I love the customisation of it. Its fantastic! Only one gripe with it, and it may be just me, but I would love it if you were able to customise the touch strip and buttons to each program - just as you can with the stylus.Throw your mouse away - this one's a keeper
Great Bang for your buck !!. I purchased SanDisk about 2 months ago and so far I am very satisfied with its performance. I was looking for a chepear alterantive to Ipod as I am not an avid music listner and SanDisk was the just the right product. Loading music on it is real simple using Windows media player. Battery life is excellent. I also use it to tune into FM channels while at gym or when I want to catch up with days news at work. The FM reception is quite good for something this small without an antenna. I even have dropped  it atleast on three occassion and so far it seems to work just fine. Touch wood !!Overall a great product for its price  !
MTX 10-inch 200 watt subwoofer. MTX 10 Inch SubwooferThis product is a 10-inch MTX dual coil subwoofer, which has a 200-watt RMS.  On the new style MTX road thunder subwoofers there is a black carbon fiber-look with a bright red color on the subwoofers cone.  It has a dual coil instead of a single coil, which makes it more durable and able to give the owner that extra sound that they are looking for.I have owned and listened to over twenty different brands of subwoofers, such as Polk Audio, Pioneer, Bazooka, Audiobahn, Sony Xplode, and Kenwood.  Of all those different brands of subwoofers, none compares to the MTX.  Not only do they sound great but they are made as if they are bulletproof.  My MTX has been put through a lot and they still sound like they are brand new.I have used two different amplifiers with my MTX.  The first amplifier I used was a cheap fifty-dollar 200-watt Optimus amplifier.  I did not like that amplifier because it did not give my subwoofers full power.  I next purchased a 250-watt MTX amplifier and I loved it.  The amplifier is  4-channels with maximum 250 watts.  My two 10-inch MTX with my 250-watt MTX amplifier sounds just like my friend's two 12-inch Bazooka's with a 300-watt Bazooka amplifier.  People have told me they could not tell the difference between my 10-inch and his 12-inch.I looked at the exact same subwoofer in Best Buy and at Circuit City.  At either store each subwoofer would have cost me $79.99.  I really did not want to pay that much so I started looking around and pricing out different brands, but I knew that I really wanted the MTX.  I looked on Ebay, and other audio sites on the Internet.  Finding the exact subwoofers I wanted on Amazon.com was just a fluke.  I am so glad I did because the price on Amazon.com was more then fifty percent cheaper.  I did not hesitate and bought them that day.  I received them the next day by overnight mail. I have had them now for about four months and have absolutely no complaints.  I will not hesitate to buy more car audio equipment on Amazon.com.I recommend the MTX 10-inch dual coil subwoofer, 200-watt RMS, to anyone who enjoys music and loves the extra sound quality from your car stereo.  I also recommend doing business with Amazon.com because it was easy and stress free, and I have absolutely no complaints about the product.
Worth every penny.  One of the best 17" out there. I attend a military college in Vermont and accordingly have an academic day full of marching, running, etc.  This case held up far better than any leather one that my buddies had, while providing amazing comfort.  Regardless of if using the shoulder strap of holding it by the handle (the two parts combine together very nicely) it is extremely comfortable.  The shape of the case molds to your walking stance better than all of the boxy ones from the other companies.Kensington did a very nice job in making sure the laptop is well protected as well.  My 2400$ 17" notebook is safely nestled inside in a "sub bag" that is paded by which fits nicely into the rest of the carrying case.  Very well made.  The "Sub-case" is nice in that it can be used seperatly to carry just the laptop and even allows you to put the shoulder strap on it.  The case is large enough to store my laptop, power supply, external mouse, several textbooks, notebooks, ti-89 calculator, pencils/pens, etc at the same time!  And the constuction is so good that this ~30 lb entourage shows no signs of wear.If you have a 17" laptop and value it, this is truly the best case out there
Great little power strip. This is a great little power strip that allows me to maximize the contents of my briefcase. One of the most useful things I have ever bought for business travelling. Very well made. I would give it 5 stars if it was a little less expensive
Plain and Simple, This Printer Rocks. There are already specs and such on this page. So I wont even get into that, you already read it up above.This printer is just amazing. Everyone always compliments the print quality. Colors are just amazing. I have yet to use the wide format capability, but I have no doubt it will be just as great.GOOD:just about darn near everything.colorspeedqualityconsistencyBAD:THIS THING EATS INKi've never seen a printer go through ink like this, but it is WELL WORTH IT!OVERALL:if the specs and price match what you are looking for, you will be pleased. Its just an awesome printe
Works GREAT. First off, I want to say that Amazon had the best price I could find, and this shipped right away and arrived 3 days after ordering, even with 3-5 day shipping.Second, I agree with some comments I have read on this. Sure does feel like you spent a lot of money when a thin piece of plastic arrives that cost you over $50. Unfortunately there is no alternative. To me though, the privacy is worth the price.I bought this so I could have stock charts up on my laptop at work without people being able to see what I was doing (so I wouldn't get in trouble for trading) when they would walk by down the aisle. This works perfect in that sense. I tilt my laptop so it faces me, and when people walk by, the laptop looks to them as though it is off. The screen is black for them except in the little thumb notch spot 3M made so that you can easily remove the screen.I used the plastic tabs that came with to hold it in place, they work well enough... however, I found that I cannot close my laptop with the privacy filter held in, as it flexes in the middle and thus falls out. I can't really imagine a better way for 3M to improve this, except perhaps to make it much more rigid.Some other notes that potential buyers may be wondering...1) It only filters and looks black from side to side, not up and down. If someone is standing over your shoulder, they will have no problem seeing it. It is only when they go to an angle to the side that it will block. So horizontal blocking, but not vertical.2) This thing smudges easily! Expect lots of dust, fingerprints, etc. It wipes off just as easily though with a dry Kleenex.3) 15.4W fits perfectly with my 15 inch widescreen. Perfect fit.4) The tabs that hold it in are small and transparent. They have very sticky material on part of them, and look like a half circle attached to a rectangle.5) This filter does not reduce glare in my opinion.Overall, this was well worth the cost of privacy for me. No one can tell my PC is on even though my screen is open
Good wireless repeater with caveats... The D-Link DWL-G800 works fine as a repeater once you get it figured out, it's the pathetic and inadequate D-Link documentation that's really the sticking point.This product is advertised as being compatible with the DI-624 AirPlus Xtreme G wireless router/AP and indeed it is...  EXCEPT that you cannot run the DI-624 in Xtreme G mode with the repeater, unless you enjoy dropped signal and having to hard-reset the repeater every five minutes.Here's the quick and dirty if you are using this repeater with the DI-624:1. Log onto the DI-624, go into the Advanced Options and enable the "Long Preamble", then disable the Xtreme G options.  Allow the router/AP to reboot.2. The DWL-G800 is then considerably more stable and can be configured with WEP or WPA.3. An aside, if you are using XP with either service pack, know that Microsoft in their infinite wisdom have now included something called "Wireless Zero Config" which, so far as I know, can't be disabled or turned off, unless you're using some sort of third party configuration utility.  Briefly, this means that you shouldn't disable the SSID broadcast on either AP if using this Wireless Zero config.  In fact, Microsoft advises against it since the Zero config doesn't allow you to statically enter your SSID.Open question to D-Link: why even purchase the DI-624 in connection with the DWL-G800 if you can't use the Xtreme G with it
Quality Case...a bit small to hold all!. I purchased this case along with the Coby DVD 8500 portable player...the player fits nicely...but after filling the accessory holder with the AC adapter, earphones and remote there is scant room for DVD's...better get a separate holder for your discs!
Good Product!!!. This TV is a good product, it has good display, good audio, and excellent reception
Works like it should. I believe that this is a superior product and it worked as it should
A Great LCD Monitor for Gaming!. I've always been a CRT user, thinking that no LCD monitor could give the brightness and clearity that CRT monitors offered, till I took the plung and bought the Samsung 214t, with 21.3 inches of veiwing area and I'm really blown away by this product. From the ease of just taking it out of the box and plugging it in and having it start working with no install problems, to haveing it automaticaly adjusting to the correct resolution for either normal surfing, to flying with the Microsoft Flight Combat Simulator 3, this monitor is everything I wanted and then some. It is very bright and clear and you notice the size of the display right away, not to mention all the desk top area you get back with this monitor's slim size and easy to use and adjust stand, not to repeat myself, it really is plug and play! The price is well worth it compared to monitors that are smaller and don't offer the 900:1 contrast this model does. If yu're just moving up or making the change over from CRT to LCD as I did, this is the one to pluck down your hard earned money for. Buy it, you won't be sorry
Perfect replacement to my blown expensive old speakers. My old expensive speakers were shot so I went out and bought what consumer reports said was a great speaker for the money. They were right. Technology has improved greatly, you can now buy a high quality budget speaker that is way better than the tech you could buy just a couple of years ago. I'am very pleased
Sherwood RD-6500 Surround Sound Receiver. I needed a replacement Receiver for a fairly modest home theater system. I wanted a bare bones 5.1 system (no 6.1, 7.1, 1kw audio power, satellite radio capable, etc.)  I only use the Receiver as an audio switch and let the TV handle video source selection.  Reviewers of the Sherwood RD-6500 liked the audio but thought the set-up a little confusing.  Being a retired electrical engineer that did not concern me.  The price was certainly right, about the cheapest thing around (at [...]).  I bought the unit and have been completely satisfied.  I would have given it five stars but heck, nobody's perfect.  I had no problem with the setup procedure and liked the audio quality (full disclosure:  my ears are 79 years old).  The unit has one optical digital, one coax digital and several A/V inputs.  The remote lets you pick Video 1-3, CD, Tuner and Aux inputs.  You tell the system which audio source to use for each of these, one time and it remembers.  I liked the way the front panel display tells you whether a full surround signal is present.  I was surprised to find how many premium HD movie channels do not always broadcast in full surround and not always in HD either.  I also liked the fact that one button on the remote cycles a test tone to all six speakers so you can quickly balance them.  On the negative side I, like other reviewers, bemoaned the lack of a switched power outlet since a powered sub-woofer is required
pixma mp450 photo printer. what a nice printer, i had the old canon mp F50, it had everything, only reason i replaced it cause the software wasnt even working on my computer anymore. it had an error, not reconized by some kinda of thing, i never could figure it out.. but this new one, it a saintnever so far had any problems.. just dont undo the cable. from ur computer, thats what i think i had problems with the first one...
Stereo earbud is perfect for my iPod!. I love my new white stereo headset for my iPod. The earbuds are comfortable and the sound is fantastic. Everybody should get one of these for their iPod. The price was great, too
Useful, but disposable... The short: Don't buy a pair of these expecting to use them for the next five years, they simply aren't engineered that well (details follow). Buy them if you want a cheap pair of headphones that are easy to carry around, comfortable, block outside noise, and sound great.The long: I've owned two pairs of these headphones over the past few years. My use consists of primarily listening to music. I'm not throwing them in a book bag every day, they usually stay at home by the computer, except for the occasional road trip.The second pair recently broke (to the point where it was not worth repairing), so I decided to take it apart to see if I should purchase a third pair.That said, here's how they fail:1. ) The volume control in the cord breaks, and as a result, one or both of the speakers cuts out intermittently. Eventually, there is no sound at all. This happens consistently.With the first pair, I tried soldering the wires back on--this lasted a few hours, until it broke again. The problem is that the weight of the cord pulls directly on the fragile solder joints--they will inevitably break off, no matter how gentle your daily headphone use is. The only solution is to cut the volume control out of the cord and tape the wires back together (I've done this once for each pair).Unlike the volume control, the cord is properly connected, and requires a great deal of force to remove it (accidentally or intentionally).2. ) The wiring in the headset breaks, and the right speaker works intermittently, then fails. This has not yet happened to my first pair, which I am still using (albeit, in a taped-together state) until I purchase a new set of headphones. I have stopped folding/collapsing it to try and prevent it from failing before I buy a new pair (NOT the same ones, I've decided).In the headband, a curved piece of springy metal is stuck between two pieces of a foam-like material. This metal piece has four holes drilled in it (very poorly), and the wire to the right speaker is woven through these holes. The result is that whenever you fold/collapse the headphones, the wire rubs against the sharp metal edges, and the insulation wears away. Eventually it cuts through the wire (which is actually *taught* at the headphone's extended-most position), and it is not possible to remove and replace the wire without cutting and re-sewing the headband. The wire I removed from the broken pair was worn down to the bare metal in all four locations where it was woven.Despite these engineering oversights (failures?), the headphones last for about a year before modifications/repairs will be required, and the sound is above average (bass is actually pretty decent). They are easy to carry and don't require very much power to get loud.Just don't expect miracles for &lt;$30
Good SD card case for the price. This memory card wallet consists of a stiff plastic outer shell that is stuffed with thick, heavy rubber holders.  The case is heavier than it looks and weighs a couple of ounces.  It will support a lot of weight on it without damaging the cards.There are tiny feet on the bottom that fit into tiny indentations on the top that will allow you to stack two or more cases and they won't slide off of each other as long as you don't bump them.The hinge and the latch strike me as very flimsy, but so far, I've had no major problems.One problem I did have is that the rubber slots grip the cards so tightly that if you're not careful when removing a card you can pop the "lock" slider out of the card.  That happened to me, but I was easily able to pop the slider back into the card.  You can quickly and easily develop the technique of handling the cards that will prevent this from happening.It's not high-end but does the job for the money.
Very Practical. Good quality.  Good price. It would be nice if they offered a version that was slimmer, but this standard size case really has little to complain about.
Great Choice!. I had a TI-86 for years and it died.  I know many of my friends who had the TI-83 but I did not like it so when I came across this it sparked my interest.  It does everything the TI-83 does and more.  I am a college student and it does everything that I need.  Great choice
great product. It's crazy to get an older, slower, cheaper CF card if you have a camera with 6 or 8 Megs
LOVE IT!. i am VERY satisfied with this product! perfect size even for my 14.1 in dell 1405 and the design is awesome. cant complain about the price either
Does what it should. Not a lot can be said about how good a sound card expansion is.  I find it a little annoying that it's shaped the way it is given how short the cable is.   It was packaged in a very OEM sort of way, which was unexpected given Creative's generally flashy packaging, but what do I care?  It works just fine though, and now I can use my monster cables for my PS2
Excellent product, very competitive value. This memory worked from power-on.   Makes my video rendering much faster now that I have 1.5G in my Dell 8300
Good boombox overall. The pro and cons described by other reviews are valid. I was specifically looking for a boombox that has cassette, mp3, cd and radio capability. So didn't have much of an option but to get this one. I am impressed with the sound quality but agree that there could have been improvements related to interface and some of the functionality. Overall I think its a good buy.
great product, great buy. The best!  I have been using add-on portable hard drives since back when they were on 10GB, huge and heavy.  The WD 160GB is almost everything I have always wanted and not yet found before -- they have huge 160B storage and are incredibly small -- three or four of them could fit in the space that other small drives claim.  I suppose the only tradeoff is that for this size and with USB self power, you can't yet get a 9600 drive this big (160GB) and a space so small, but the WD160 drives are as fast as my internal drives and they look fantastic.  I am now own 4 of these and now I can bring huge video libraries with me all in less than the space of a paperback book
DVD Space Saver. I really love the space savings of this storage system, although the 140 disc capacity can be misleading.  The 140 capacity includes 16 slots on the inside surface of the cover (billed for 'easy access' to favorite discs, but also handy for storing a multi-disc set or two). Each of the 31 pages of Pro-sleeve storage has two storage pockets on one side (easily holding a DVD case insert or 2, or with folding, a DVD box liner).  On the other side of each page, there are 4 slots to store discs.  The design works well for keeping a DVD and bonus disc together with its package insert on each half page, with capacity for 62 DVD 2-disc sets using this arrangement.The soft rubbery material of the pages hold the discs snugly.  The two slots on each half-page are of different depths, with one covering most of the disc's surface and the other covering about half. The shallower pockets allow some of the disc label to show, making it easier to see which disc is in which pocket.The binder system allows individual pages to be removed and re-inserted, but the design makes the process cumbersome.  Plastic straps pass through two slots in each page and lock into the binder.  Removal or insertion of a page involves unlocking the system (unsnapping a heavy snap - a potential breakdown area with repeated use) and withdrawing the straps from all of the pages between the lock and the desired page, then reinserting the straps through all of the other pages before locking the system again.  Extra pages are available for purchase in sets of 10, making it a little easier to re-organize contents.  Even though I have packed some of the pockets with layers of inserts, there seems to be room for several more pages in each case.An older version of this case had a space in the handle for a label (allowing multiple storage cases to be marked for range of contents, for example), but the current ones do not.All in all, the system allows for compression of DVDs and packaging in about one fifth of the space
Much better than a mouse with a ball. There are mice out there that apparently have more precise movement, and that have a tiltable scroll wheel.  But I just wanted to replace a mouse that had a ball that constantly gathered dust and had to be cleaned every few weeks just so it would work at all.  This mouse seems to do the job well, and doesn't have anything to get gummed up
Great replacement, great price from "grandtechoutlet". Ordered this through Amazon from "grandtechoutlet"...got here very quickly for a VERY good price compared to a new one from Apple.  Seems to work great so far, seems to be a very good quality cable (as you would expect from Griffin)
Great Case!!!!. This case is great! It fits the 2nd gen. nanos like a glove. I love the fact that it is clear and shows off my pink nano. The belt clip works great and all ports are easily accessable. This is a wonderful case, I highly recommend it
So many pockets, Loads of Space, Wide Straps (Too Wide). This bag has an excellent array of pockets with loads of space.  Highly robust construction along with well designed features make it an ideal tool for hauling the laptop or other electronics.  The stand up base is a great feature for travelling with the bag.The shoulder straps are very wide, I'm sure they'd accomodate someone who is quite large.  They are a little too wide to sit comfortable on my shoulders and end up sliding down lower than I'd like.  Otherwise a great bag
Great in the office.... First saw this and the snowman one in a magazine, and was glad to find them available on Amazon.com.  Between the two of them, it was a bit expensive for what you get, but they still look great.  I had one on each side of my computer at work.  During the actual holiday weekend, I just unplugged them, brought them home, and plugged them in to my cable box and sat them on top of the TV.  Quick and easy holiday decoration....just plug into any USB slo
Great Budget TV. I bought this TV for college, and it fits perfectly in my dorm. The picture quality is pretty decent, though compared to traditional TV, it is not as sharp.The audio quality is very good. I was able to play Final Fantasy 12 with this TV, and the audio lives well for my expectations.No lag while playing my Playstation 2 console...The only downside is that if you want to switch from AV mode back to TV mode, you need to press "SOURCE" on the remote or the TV 4 times...and it's annoying waiting for it...but besides that, it's a very nice budget TV for anyone that wants a TV that can save you some money and space
Works as advertised. Works great, no problems for me. I will buy another set soon from Amazon. I think dual layer DVD+R is a more common format than dual layer DVD-R. Check if your burner is compatible before purchasing dual layer discs. Not all burners are compatible, so the discs may not work on all computers. You will not go wrong with Ritek/Ridata if your burner is compatible
Well worth the price. Great headphones for running! They fit my ears perfectly and I don't have to worry about foam anymore.
weather radio. works great take it to bed when we are expecting bad weather, otherwise it is downstairs.
It really works!. I was skeptical at first before purchasing this cable for my Zen 30GB Vision M.  I took a trip to Radio Shack before buying, and they had several cables which did not work.  Thankfully, this cable does work!  The signal is crystal clear.  The video is a little offset on the tv screen, but I don't think that is due to the cable.  If only it were a little longer..
Great protection. The case provides great protection for my Palm TX.  It doesn't add much bulk or weight and keeps it safe during my active day.  I'm pretty tough on things and this case is just the extra protection I need
really nice cable, great price. this 50 ft cable gives me a great picture when connecting my xbox360 to my digital projector through a pelican system selector.  a seriously amazing deal.  monster cables are a rip-off
Stereo Turntable. Turntable was delivered promptly. All parts were there and the unit operated as promised. I would definitely buy from this source again
looks good, does its job, low cost. subj.well, the case is supposed to carry  the TomTom and protect it which it does.  Good product, low price. convenient..
Tons of storage with this media card!!. This is a super media card, perfect for storing and transfering lots of extra pictures
Nearly Perfect LP to MP3 Conversion Turntable. As just a plain ol' turntable, the Newmark TTUSB is completely average and certainly a decent value for the price.  However, if you're like me and you've been looking for a reasonably priced option to convert your LP collection to MP3 (or CD I suppose, but why bother with another dying technology???), I can't imagine a better option than this turntable.There is a small amount of assembly required, but once you finish that (2 minutes to assemble, another 2 minutes to calibrate...the belt was a little tricky because I didn't read the assembly directions until I ran into trouble with said belt) and install the Audacity software (and download an MP3 converter if you don't have one already), it's smooth sailing from there.  If your records are in good condition, it's truly as easy as playing the record, cutting the tracks and clicking the export command.If your some of your records are a little worn, though, not to worry...after downloading a few plug-ins for Audicity (HIGHLY RECOMMENDED) you will have an easy to use and wonderfully functioning noise reducer which will remove NEARLY ALL cracks, pops, etc without affecting any other aspects of the sound quality of the track you record.For me, this will be a time consuming process (5 down...500 to go), but if you're looking to convert a record collection, I can't imagine a better product.  The only thing that could have possibly improved this player would be a dust cover...a minor complaint for such a perfect little workhorse, though
Paper Manual. Basically I have nothing to add to the reviews except to say something to those who want a paper manual.  You can purchase the manual for the TI 92 plus on line from TI or eBay.  This is basically the same machine insofar as using the manual.  I have both machines and the 92+ manual works with this calculator just as well.
Good quality cables. These cables are very well built. There is only a problem. I purchased it to connect on my computer sound blaster, but they don't fit due to the large and wide connector. So, if you don't have much space between your connections, avoid these cables. Otherwise, they are very good
Kingston 512 MB Secure Digital Card (SD/512). Product has performed well and have experienced no problems with it. I am using it in an HP M425 5 megapixel digital camera. It will hold 248 pictures at best resolution or 26 miutes of video with sound
512 mb secure digital ultra II. I used it in Brasil and had it developed.  I was very happy with it.  It was the very first time I've used a digital camera
Great Calculator. It's great for chem, and math.  Great two line scroll display.  Functions are easy to read
Great Product. Like a few other buyers I've seen, I had problems with a Sony CD changer that I bought. Surprsing to me, because I generally really like Sony products. So I bit the bullet, gave the Sony to a thrift shop, went online and checked other reviews, and decided on this Onkyo CD changer. I could not be more satisfied. Simple enough, inexpensive enough, but works like a charm. I would highly recommend it
Good product, limited uses. The remote itself works very well with my new computer.  Range is great, and all the functions seem to work well.  I am still experimenting with it, but don't expect it to be able to completely control all your computer's functions.  It has 4 hotkeys (to open programs, etc.)as well as channel, volume, and play functions, so it is good for watching movies and listening to music.  The mouse control function is cumbersome, and navigating through song libraries and folders is very difficult.  Overall, a good product, if a bit limited
Cobra XRS 9330 radar detector. It is not bad, I use it on the highway mostly. It has one flaw...I noticed it goes off by Wallgreens when their automatic doors open. Other than that, it has alerted me to many of police and emergencey equipment
Works Great!. Sensitive enough to pick up your own voice clearly and record the voice coming over the phone too! I am very pleased
Well designed product. Somebody was thinking when they designed this adapter. The plug that works for either style cassete player, the one where the small end of the cassete goes in first, or the one where the wide side goes in first. Plus the curly cord that doesn't get in the way. The big bonus is the price, it's half the cost of the Monster adapter, and it works great. The reviews of the Monster adapter are very poor. I first bought a DLO Transpod 2 FM Transmitter, big mistake. The sound was about 80% static as there wasn't any line of sight between the Transpod and the car antenna. If you have a car where the antenna is molded into the rear window, it probably would work better. Anyway this adapter and my iPod sound great over my car stereo. There are a few car cassette players that won't work with a adapter, if one adapter doesn't work, none will
Better, but still a pain. This is my 3rd Canon scanner. The unit is nicely made, very slim and lite. Physically much better than previous Canon scanners.  However, the Canoscan software is only marginally better.  It took a while for me to get it installed correctly, actually two tries.
solid buy. I have been really pleased with the performance of the gps and the pocket pc.  I wasn't sure about garmins ability to make the pocket pc but everything seems to be great.  Some reviews say that the gps route recalculation takes too long....I'm just happy having something telling me when I'm getting lost, that's priceless...I no longer drive around lost for hours.  Thanks GarminFor the price, It can't be beat
Just as Good As My Ethernet. I got my first wireless router and switch, and this was it. I needed it to link up my Notebook. I took the Router out of the box looked very briefly at the instructions, and followed them. They were not hard at all. The configuration of the router is automatic, so complaints about the UI being difficult are a little weird. I had the thing up and going at 200 Mbps on my notebook in about 45 minutes, as well as my Lanier 5635 MFP and three other computers that I simply left alone, wired into another switch, which I hooked into the wireless router. The whole rig worked fine the first time out.
Worth the investment. Pros:Sturdy, held my 24" Dell LCD without any problems (needed to be adjusted to make it stiff).Very aesthetically pleasing.Cons:Not enough room for cables in the cable management channel.  It could have been that I was just trying to plug in too much, but my monitor has the inputs so I tried.Summary:I don't think I'll ever use a traditional LCD stand after using one of these.  Gives me more desk space and looks very cool.  Also gives me the flexibility of turning the screen without worry about knocking over everything on my desk.  Recommended
Works with MAC OSX. The PC system requirements did not address the compatibility with MAC OSX but I connected the player to my IMAC, ignored loading the supplied CD, and dragged music from ITUNES without any problem
Works as expected. I am new to this type of device, but it has performed as expected
Easy Installation. I can't believe how easy this was to install and add additional computers to the network.  I've struggled before with other brands, but this was so easy I thought I was doing something wrong
I highly recommend this product!!!. this product restored my iPod perfectly!!!  I had tried getting rid of some marks and scratches using tootpaste (don't ask why I tried this!!)  and it and it totally ruined the screen of my brand new iPod. After doing a bit of research online I found iCleaner on the Apple web site, I was not quite sure it would work, and was very happy that after a bit of work, it did what it said it would... it removed all the scratches and left my iPod in close to new condition! I guess if I polish it a few more times it will be like new.Thank you for a superb product!
Exactly what I wanted. These speakers have great sound and a small footprint that makes them easy to take anywhere.  I wanted some speakers that I could use to listen to my audio books.  These are perfect.  I am listening to music right now and could not be more pleased.
Garmin Forerunner 205. I love this device.  It tracks miles, pace and calories.  I save lots of time not driving around after my run to see how far I went
DVD +R/RW. I have had excellent results transferring my VHS Tapes(movies, etc.)to Memorex DVD+R/RW discs. I have a Philips DVDR985 DVD Recorder/Player and it will only record on DVD+R/RW discs. I have been through several other manufacturers +R/RW discs and none were as reliable as Memorex(and, of course Philips). I ran into a problem recording on the +R disc, however, that was due to a problem with the Recorder. I just bought another 50 DVD+RW Memorex discs(2-25 disc spindles) and when they run out I will still go for Memorex.Chuck A
Awesome CD Case!!. I couldn't believe how great this CD case is! I had a ton of loose CD's all over the place because I didn't have any cases. With this I could hold them all with a ton of room to spare!
great for the price. First, this device doesn't sound quite as good as an Audigy 2, which isn't that good in the first place.  However, unless you're listening to it on near-audiophile or better quality headphones or speakers, you probably won't be able to tell the difference between the two.And as another reviewer mentioned, you really are only getting 16-bit, 48 khz sound quality, though it handles 24-bit, 192 khz input/output.  It's a similar lie that creative labs marketed about their audigy(1)/extigy sound cards, which I suppose were this product's competition at the time it launched.  And for portability, it really is a bit big to carry around with your laptop.  But for the EAX limitations that reviewer mentioned, that's only going to make a few percentage points worth of difference in cpu load on 3d sound, so who cares ?However, it is well designed and it looks great.  All the jacks, knobs, and buttons are in the right place, and it's got nice blue LED meters in the front--download the product manual from the links above for specifics.  Using headphones with it is really convenient.  They've got usability nailed down with this product.If you use a laptop mostly in one location, this would be a good solution to the built-in sound.  It's also good if you use a desktop at work and want to listen to music without having to go in and open the box up.  For a home desktop, an Audigy 2 Value edition might be a better choice.It would have been nice if Philips designed this device for true 24-bit sound quality, but for the price, it's easy to look past that
Great buy!. I bought this phone for my elderly neighbor whose fingers are very distorted due to arthritis to the extent that she could not use the buttons on a regular cordless phone without pressing the wrong ones.  This phone has been perfect for her.  She has no difficulty using the large buttons.  We're both very pleased with it.  It also has clear and easy to use on/off buttons
Philips HTS3400 perfect for the price. Hi,I recently got this system from overstock.com and put it with the Philips 23" flat screen LCD TV I bought from Amazon.com.  Together these are great.  I have had no problem with the DVD play and I love having a radio tuner built in... one less appliance needed and with lovely sound.  Granted, I live in a small apartment and I doubt I would turn the sound up to really take advantage of the system (don't want the neighbors calling).  But for the price it is perfect and the two together look great in my home and perform very well
Works great!. I bought this to use in the NAV system of my 2007 Honda Civic.  It works perfectly with 1 and 2G SD cards - I put 1.77G of MP3s on the 2G card and was able to listen to all of them.  SD cards fit so that the end of the SD is flush with the end of the PCMCIA card.
Great antenna, probably best out there, but still not 100%. I don't have much basis for a comparison, as my only other HD antenna was the unamplified plastic & metal 8" triangle jobbie that came with my receiver. I researched heavily before settling on the Terk-SP. It works great, but not as perfect as I might of hoped. I live in a major city where every station has an HD version, and I've always been able to get them all, but the signal was typically so weak on some stations, they would constantly cut out on me. Having a strong outdoor antenna has solved that problem almost completely.The cheap indoor antenna I had before picked up all the same channels, but with sporadic connectivity. I was constantly moving it around to improve the weak signal. A real pain.When I got the Terk-SP, the first thing I noticed was that it was pretty light. A plastic cover with plastic backing that even has a pear-shaped picture-hook eyehole on the back for hanging the antenna on the wall. Pretty unique idea. It is an "amplified" antenna, but that refers to the design. It doesn't plug into a wall socket or anything or use any extra power.One thing I really like about this antenna is the way it looks... like a square satellite dish. I live in an apartment among a sea of dishes, so the unique Terk-SP really stands out (at 16", it's about the same size too). The package includes a mounting arm with adjustable bracket. It does NOT include a Grounding Rod or Grounding Block (get both at Radio Shack for $14 and $5 respectively). If you are mounting this antenna outdoors, you WILL need them. Static electricity builds up inside the coax cable (this is true of ALL antennas) and can fry your TV (I discovered this the hard way, accidentally touching the cable with my hand after a few days use and shocking the living daylights out of my thumb!) Your coax antenna cable needs to go from the Terk to a "mounting block" that you place on a Grounding Rod that you sink in the ground, then run a second wire from the other side of the block to your TV. This will protect your expensive equipment. If you keep the Terk indoors without mounting it, you probably don't need to ground it, so I don't blame AudioVox for not including them.Reception wise, as a quick test, I disconnected my cheapo antenna to the Terk as soon as it arrived and tuned in my worst station. I saw an immediate 30% signal boost than before on that one station! Great. Unfortunately, don't expect a 30% boost on *every* channel. More than likely, any station you could get before (even really badly), you'll get a good steady signal from with the Terk-SP. But any channel whose signal often drops to 0% for any reason, you're probably not going to get with the Terk because 0 times 30% is still 0. When I first installed the Terk-SP, I even (intermittently) picked up an entirely new (obscure out-of-town) station that I never got before, but for some reason, I haven't been able to pick it up again in weeks.Mounting time took about 45 minutes. Screw the mounting arm to a post or rooftop (brackets/clamps for mounting the Terk to a round post come with it), and the antenna to the arm. Then run your cable inside to your TV. That's it.Short answer: this is a great antenna that should work great as long as you can already receive a *steady* signal (for at least a minute or two) from your local stations. The Terk-SP's flat-face design works best in areas where it can pick up "reflected" signals off neighboring buildings and such. I suspect the benefits of the Terk-SP might be lost if you live in the middle of nowhere with no place for signals to bounce off of. Also, HD signals are VERY directional, so it helps not to live in a location where you are surrounded by stations coming at you from different directions. You need to point your antenna in a direction that is "generally" the right direction for all stations. It took two people to properly adjust my Terk for best possible reception ("A little to the left. No, the signal was stronger back to the right."). Positioning options are left/right, tilt and twist (low number stations have taller signals that like an antenna whose face is more *parallel* to the ground). The Terk-SP works great and I highly recommend it, but I don't really know how it compares to other antennas since I've never tried them, but I can tell you I am now getting strong steady signals from stations I received only intermittently before
Great Buy. I had been using the CD player for about a month and liked it so much I went back and bought the 3pak magazines so I could load more of myCDs. I works smoothly and quietly when switching tracks or CDs. I would recommend it highly unless they wanted a higher capacity unit, then try one of the other Pioneer units. They;ve got to be just as good except at a higher price
Easy to use and good quality. We had a similar model at our church which we have had for 10-15 years which finally gave up.  Though this one had fewer features than that one, it works well and is one of the best cartridge-style (and strangely enough, fewest) models on the market. Definitely recommend for the price
Linksys RV042. The perfect way to use a VPN for a small office environment. Easy to administer internally or remotely, and with the included software, I could send a cd home with a user and know that the setup on their pc would be correct.
Good equipment for small groups. I purchased this multimedia projector on behalf of a local non-profit organization after comparing its specifications with other projectors with similar prices. Several comparable projectors are available currently, and I chose this one because of good experience with its previous model (the X1) and slightly better specs.Our initial experiences with this unit have been completely satisfactory. The controls are easy to use, the output is bright and sharp for an audience of around 40 people. I was disappointed, however, to discover that it has only one adjustable leg toward the front of the projector. That leg is used in tilting the projected image upward, but  we had to use found materials to level the unit. Two legs would be better!
COULD USE MORE VOLUME ... BUT. I still rate it 4 stars because of the quality of the sound, the reliability of the cassette decks and the low price. Sony has been making this same product for several years with no changes, so that means it's great, right
i love it ......i ve heard a very bad comments ,for this item,but i dont know why....its excellentent.... excelente calidad de sonido, he escuchado muchos comentarios negativos , sobre los productos bose , pero la verdad es que la calidad de esas pequeas speakers ,es excelente muy nitida , tengo un  av receiver DENON  avr 2807, y es excelente la combinacion , de todo el DVD , X BOX  360 se oye estupendo , he escuchado otros equipos mas costosos y voluminosos ,de marcas reconocidas y no le piden nada a este estupendo equipo , yo lo adoro , i love it ..
It just works. Nothing special about it, except that it just works in my NEC laptop burner and in my Philips DVD. I am satisfied
Very Satisfied. I have been using the Sansa mp3 player now for almost a year. It's a great item, especially for the price. Was very easy to download my music and set up. I purchased a better brand of earphones, seeing I would be using mine mostly on an airplane. It holds more than enough songs.I am going to purchase one for my granddaughter for her Christmas present this year
bought to use with ReplayTV PC edition. This is a good tuner card but the picture quality is relatively poor.  There is no TV out jack.  Otherwise it works as advertised.  I messed up the ReplayTV installation and had to spend about half an hour on a toll call to ReplayTV tech support to get it right.  It works but not as well as a ReplayTV set top box
Thought I needed a new DVD player. My DVD player was ready to be thrown out, until I saw this product on amazon.  My DVD player wouldn't even load a DVD.  It kept saying "please check disc". After loading this disc, my DVD player has worked perfectly ever since.  Don't spent $30 on one of these "clean up discs". This one does the job
Good system for the price. This is an all inclusive Karaoke Midi based system that plugs into the RCA input of your Audio/visual equipment.Set up is easy.  Navigation through the music is easy and easier when you know which song you would like to select through its index that accompanies the system.Construction is solid.  The background visuals are nice but monotonous.  The text is clear; as well as prompting.  Lead vocals are lead by the prompts as well as the MIDI generated music. Quality of the music is good.The drawback of a system like this is the lack of 'actual vocals'.Songs are expanded by buying cartridges (which are limited to as few as 50 or as many as 200).The rating of your vocals is based upon how you hold the notes in conjunction of the prompts - not the quality of your singing.  A seasoned singer who doesn't follow the prompts can get a 40 whereas a singing hacker can get an 88.All in all, it's worth the time and money for a self contained system that is highly portable and easy to use
Very sturdy. After reading other reviews and noting the product specs, I wasn't expecting a very light bag. Indeed, this is a heavy bag, but the weight is worth it - it's very sturdy and will withstand the horrors I will put it through.The compartments are numerous. I wasn't expecting the number of pockets or zippers, but they've turned out to be an enormous help. Plus, the padding surrounding some of those pockets is very handy, since I tend to carry around a ton of gadgets.In all, it's very heavy but it's a useful bag.
Nice. Prints excellent color pictures with good photo quality that stands out with quality paper. I have been using Canon printers for their individual ink cartridges that are easy to refill. Completely satisfied. Good price on Amazon also. My other two Cannon printers were researched and purchased online, one through AMAZON, also
Volume Control Headphones. This product is exactly as described, but more than that, it is PERFECT for what we needed.  It is lightweight and comfortable to wear, and the volume control works to solve our particular problem.
Awesome Stuff!. This thing rocks! I have been looking in every store imaginable for a product where I could accomplish what I needed to do. You can find an optical splitter, but it only splits one digital audio signal into two receivers. I needed several digital audio signals going into one receiver. When I first found this product, I was a little skeptical since no one else locally seemed to carry one. However, after receiving it in a timely manner, I tried it out. The Digital sound quality didn't degrade one little bit! It's an awesome product!
Functional as it gets. It's not the prettiest case for my iPod, but who cares?  It's going to keep it from scratching/breaking when I eventually drop it!  The main selling point for me was that there's also a protective plastic layer over the screen that will protect the screen during collisions as well.  Not many (if any) other cases had that.  Plus, you can see the colors through the silicone.  I thought the pink/blue/green iPods were way too bright for my taste, but this case could easily blunt those colors
just as good as the original. Bought this one to replace the one I left in a rental car. It is identical and works great when you use the sticky pad to hold on dash.Mar
BUY IT!!. I am very happy with the Copperhead mouse. I bought it to play Battlefield 2. Great for when u need to move around quicker, such as in a tank. If you go as a sniper, and need to some accuracy, you simply slow it down. Would I do it all over again? Absolutely
Truth in advertising. I am delighted with the Kingston Compactflash Card Ultimate. However,I ordered the 133X version from J & R Music/Computer World which was shown on their website, but received a 100X.  It wasn't worth sending it back or making an issue of it, but I was unhappy that I didn't get what I ordered
Works perfect!. I'm not any expert in the computer world. But this product it is very easy to install. The range is very strong.I'm very hapy with this product!!!
A Solution That Works. I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.
Great product, mediocre software... I was nervous about getting any converter after reading reviews of quite a few of them here. I have never done any video conversion or editing before, and I had about 2 days to transfer an analog videotape and clean it up for a work project.The Plextor installed and ran perfectly under XP with absolutely no problems. Since I had the unit, I also took the opportunity to convert about 15 VHS tapes I had to DVD :) with no problems on any of them, even older ones. Specifically, I had no video or audio sync problems with anything, commercial or non-commercial origin. If I could give a separate rating to hardware, I'd give it a 5 and give the included software a 3.Intervideo's WinDVD comes with the product and is generally usable, but has installation issues, at least one persistant bug even with the current update, and a generally non-intuitive interface (YMMV). Please note that, contrary to common practice, the product serial number contains the letter "O" and alphas *must* be in upper case. I couldn't get font size changes on title screens to stick--they looked right on author playback, but reverted to the default (huge) size when the DVD was actually recorded. Otherwise, most basic stuff appears to be there if you click around, and the help isn't bad.Completely met my needs. Thanks to prior reviewers for the info I needed to make my decision
Love it!. I got this for my birthday and it is one of my favorite presents ever!  It is SUPER easy to mount, only took about 10 minutes, if that.  The sound is SO much better than I thought it would be from a little under-cabinet stereo. The radio reception is also much better than any other radio in my house as I can get stations on it that I can't on my other radios
Outstanding Range!. I did my research before purchasing this wireless card from Amazon to use in conjunction with my Belkin Pre-N wireless router.  According to every net review I'd read, this combination of Belkin Pre-N desktop card and router had the best range and throughput at that range than any other card/router in its class, and as my workstation is out in the middle of a farm an almost impossible distance from the router, 'range' is what I needed above all.After some configuration and finding the best spot to put the computer itself, I now regularly have connection qualities in the 77-90% range a good 200-300 ft. from my router which is in another building entirely (and both have a lot of metal cladding and what-not I had expected to cause a great deal of interference if not outright unworkability.)The odd thing about this 'Pre-N' combination from Belkin is that apparently the later Belkin N equipment is grossly inferior, and manages to pull off only about half the range of this model.These cards and the Pre-N router are becoming harder to find as they've been superseded by the newer (inferior) models currently in the stores, so if you have to operate wireless at great distances, I doubt you'll beat these Belkin models for at least the immediate future
Works Great; Not Audiophile Quality. Works as advertised.  Plugging the RCA jacks into my preamp put it into perspective; the wires connecting my CD player to my preamp cost more than this device! Oh well, it does work, but I think the other components of my system are offended by it.  The sound quality is decent.  The remote is very nice and works anywhere in my house.  I thought about building a high end HTPC, but this was a lot easier
Great Router. This router functions great in the household environment.  It is VERY easy to install and security is equally as easy to set.
I LOVE THESE -. I bought a ZEN 30G MP3 player and could not stand the earbuds they came with. They hurt so much that I used head phones until these V-MODA earbuds came in. They are awesome.  The fit is so comfortable and the sound it wonderful. I got them on sale for less than they are running right now on Amazon, so I feel pretty good about the purchase.  =
Comparable to ties with metal tabs... Typically, I buy tie-wraps that have the metal tab insert because they never slip after you ratchet them tight.  But, these ones by Belkin are just as good even though they do not use a metal insert.  Professional quality and no slipping.
Great Travel Alarm Clock. This product has a very good sound for its small size.  It also has a nice carrying case, works on batteries as well as ac current.  There are also adapters for the various ipod sizes.  We highly reccommend this item!
Finally - a way to capture the vinyl!. Been waiting for this for a while -- easy to set up and get going.
Great card & reader. Of course the card works, but it has fast read/write speed, great amount of storage, and the free reader is very handy.  The reader is small enough to just keep it along with the laptop
Finally a wheel with all the features!. I've had a few wheels before, but finally Logitech came out with a wheel thats simulation grade.  The 6 speed shifter works great, and as for the clutch, I've found that there are plenty of games that support it, including GTR2 and Need for Speed Carbon thats just coming out.  Besides the lengthy setup and steep price, this is a great wheel for a great racing experience
Keeping my old reliable printer alive. My HP LaserJet 1100 is reliable and inexpensive to run.  My computers no longer have the parallel port it requires.  This cable adapter was the perfect solution.  I simply plugged my printer cable into the adapter cable, and the adapter cable into my USB port - worked the first time  with no messing around.  Windows is a bit quirky, though.  You must plug the adapter cable consistently into the same USB for the printer to be recognized
Good sound quality. These entry level Sennheiser earbuds have excellent sound quality for the price.  I was a bit skeptical; I'm familiar with some of Sennheiser's higher end products, but thought I'd take a chance on these to use with my MP3 player.  I wasn't disappointed - these earbuds sound better than anything else in this price class.  Also, as other reviewers have noted, they are designed very well and stay in your ears.  Highly recommended.
Great product - Easy to intall. I bought this product to mount my Mitsubishi HD1000U 720p High Definition DLP Home Theater Projector. It comes with pre assembled and easy to mount.
Does Exactly what it says... I ordered this on the 26th of June and it wasn't supose to come til the 12 of July. It came early today.... big plus. The one i recieved isn't the same color as shown in the picture.... its silver but the handle and the place where all the knobs and stuff are is a dark grey color. Other then that this a very nice lil gadget just to have for emergencies or small outings.... something that is just nice to have. YOu don't have to handle it with baby hands... but nothing you should exspect to have for a long while either. I'm happy with it. =) just a lil tiffed about the color
Infinity " 12 sub. Awesome.  Matches my other speakers.  Got a great deal on it.  Shipping was fast and it was carefully packaged.  Thinking about getting another one for base in another part of the home theater
New to HP 33. This takes some getting use to since all I have ever used is TI calculators.  But I do like i
Alphabetizing Solution. I have hundreds of CDs in several albums. As things were added randomly, most of the CDs are out of order, and finding anything is a severe pain. This album solves that, and I'm about to replace all my existing albums with it. Each page can be removed and rearranged, so CDs can be added to appropriate pages and then the pages can be added to albums in appropriate order.I'm cautiously optimistic about the handle - it's been ok for me so far, and hopefully will be better than the handle on the album I just threw away (which was more rigidly attached and which ripped off after a few months).Like all cases of the sort, standard CD liner notes fit, but larger notes and the backs of the CD liner have to be folded or rotated and hang out of the pocket. However, the quick-access thingy at the front is removable, and larger items can be stuck behind it, treating it as a pocket
Great product; lacking directions. The product works perfectly.  The only problem is, the manual only includes directions for the most common setups.  To use one port as an "uplink" to a router, for example, you need to plug the uplink into the ethernet port labeled "1" and then leave port "2" open.  The directions do not state this, and I had to call Linksys to get it to work.Other than that, it is fast, reliable, and small.  Perfect
Best value in HDTV now. This is a great, great TV. Image quality is much higher than I thought (much better than any in-store demo on any model, with high-quality signal such as Discovery HD (on cable via HDMI)). Great set of inputs, and no tuner which you likely don't need. Great for cable, gaming, and hooking up your Mac to. I really shopped around and bought with some trepidation, but I have zero regrets. No dead pixels, no problems, and reasonably cheap. Go Westinghouse! (I can't believe I have an "American" TV, either; that's probably a first for me.
works great!. this keeps my room cool and has great options with the remote.  my annoying roommates tend to turn the AC on at 3am during their WOW binges so my room gets to 60 degrees.  if i goto sleep with my fan on i just set it to turn off at 74 degrees...no more frost bite!  and the oxygen fresh feature is nice too, the second you turn it you notice a clean smell coming out of it.  My only real complaint is its much louder than my gf's tower fan, this is due to the oxygen fresh grill and the excess grills on the back of the fan too.
iMac user. The product is a good value.   It performed well and was fairly easy to use. I only wish it would allow importing play lists from iTunes, all text had to be manually input.  Overall, I'm very satisfied with the product
Great shelf!. Just what we needed for our new LCD TV mounted on the wall
Super mouse. This is the second wireless optical mouse I have purchased. They are a great product, easy to setup and use. Will purchase more as needed
I love this product!  Everyone should own one. I work for a small business and we can't afford the risks of data theft.  Having this unit has put my mind to ease, especially since I work with very sensitive data.If you love gadgets, this is an extremely cool product to have.  Its sleek  and within seconds destroys your data.  Its very compact and heavy duty, so its durable and can easily fit in a home office, as well as any place at work. You just insert the disc and within seconds thousand of tiny imprints are made on both sides of the disc making the disc unreadable.This is a great product because it securely destroys the data without having to shred the disc and having shattered broken pieces of plastic everywhere.  For anyone who has owned or operated a disc shredder, they are very messy.  This is an excellent alternative.  Is so quick and easy to use, anyone can operate it.This should be a household requirement, as much as any other appliance in your home.I received my Norazza Data Destroyer within a couple days of placing my order which was very fast service.I strongly recommend this product for personal as well as for business use!!!
Very good all around. This is my second iAudio X5 product. I upgraded my old 30GB model for this 60GB. I have to say I really love it. It has almost everyting that you could ask for from an mp3 player. My main reason in leaning towards this product was the lack of necessity for a special software, and that comuters can read and write to X5 like a regular external hard drive. This, plus the folder/subfolder/file system -which is a much better cataloguing method than mp3 tags- makes finding and navigating tthrough your collection much easier. Especially if you primarily listen to classical music it is a big help, since you may have a folder system such as : Classical/Beethoven/String Quartets/Late Quartets/Op 132/the Lindays/xxx.mp3The sound is very good indeed, I  do not like to use any enhancers such as EQ's or the Jet effects still you hear a robust natural sound. My only complaint is the earphones that come with the X5 which are shaped weird, the ear piece is too large and the right earphone keeps falling off your ear both due to the weird shape and the curiously miscalculated cord.
Fantasic XM and MP3 Player. I bought this from Comp USA for $129.99 and it was worth it! I record my XM at home and listen to it on the go. I can even put my own MP3's on it
Great Range. I use my radio at the ski resorts and get great reception most of the way around the mountain.  Very please with the durability
great product works very well. If you have HDTV you need one of these cables, or two cables..
Compact & convenient. I wish Targus made the same bag just a few inches wider.  My Toshiba 2600 barely squeezes in the bag.  However, it does fit and I was able to mount it between the two seats of our 2004 Toyota Sienna with no problems.  There's also ample room for cords and DVDs.I like how this bag doubles as a storage case and a way to mount it in the car for viewing.All in all, a very nice product.
Meets Expectations. I checked previous reviews before purchasing this notebook case. What I received is what I expected. Lots of compartments to store needed accessories, sturdy construction, pleasant appearance. As with a previous review, my only citicism is the shoulder strap. While it is comfortable when used, it is also fixed and cannot be removed. I've already caught it once on an airline seat arm when boarding a crowded plane. Other than that, it was a good purchase for the price
FAST and reliable!. You get what you pay applies when it comes to secure digital SanDisk memory cards. You can pay less, but if your using the card for photography you could loose a shot if you're using a standard(speed) sd card with a high(10 megapixel)digital camera. So the combination of speed and reliability, SanDisk stands behind their product with a lifetime guarantee, is well worth the slight premium you'll pay. Think about it like this, back in the day when we would pay a premium for our favorite film, over and over and... Well with this card(film)you pay once and it keeps giving.
The Video Recorder. These DVDs worked quite well and I was pleased with the shipping
High quality storage solution. For anyone building a large collection of DVDs, this product is wonderful. It uses a fraction of the space of a regular case. I have tried a couple of off-brand slim cases and they were pretty poor. The Memorex has a high quality look and feel that is worth the extra pennies. I have found them to be rugged and reliable in use. Shop around for prices.
exactly what i was looking for... i've been looking for a way to measure my runs more accurately for awhile now, and this watch is the best i've found at a reasonable price.  my biggest worry about this watch was the size. i figured for it to do what it does it would have to take up most of lower forearm.  when i got it out of the package i was suprised at how small it was and how well it fit.  really not much bigger than the watch i was wearing but with tons more features.  feature-wise, it does a bunch.  the screen can hold from one item to four items, depending on what you want to see.  i have mine set to show time, distance, pace, and average pace. the training software is nice, even though i haven't got around to using it much.  it does allow you to set up different workouts and then download them to the watch.  as far as reception goes i have had no problems.  it takes my watch about a minute or so to locate the satilite and then it is ready to go.  this watch has many more features, some i find useful and others i haven't tried yet.  overall a great investment and i recommend it to anyone looking to measure their runs more accurately or are looking for a "coach" to help them through their training
Great projector. We use this projector in our basement for a large screen tv.  It has great clarity and the HD channels look as good as our LCD screen.  It was very reasonable cost and I would recommend a large pull down screen.  This as a great buY
Good labeling tape. The labeling tape works very well. My only complaint is that peeling off the back of the label is difficult because sometimes that back covering tears or does not come up easily
Right size. I was so glad to run across this product. I always have such trouble when I travel connecting all of my devices in hotel rooms. I can easy fit all 6 of my devices with their big AC plugs into it. Wish it came in black like the "Outlets to go power Strip 4" does...oh well.
Travel much? Get this and a 4 pack of Engergizer 2500mAh batteries. This charger is great; it slides together for easy storage and transportation. If you cannot fit this into your bag, you do not know how to pack and should not be leaving your living room. It charges AA or AAA batteries. The 2500mAh AA's take yes, an 8 full hours to charge. This does not bother me because the batteries last 10+ times longer. I use Energizers 2500mAh rechargables in my Kodak 4MP digital camera and I can take over 100 pictures before having to switch to the other set. So let us see, you can charge your 4 AA batteries overnight, take over 200 pictures, then recharge them, cannot see 1 problem with that! If you need to rush pick up Energizers 15-minute charger, but if not this is your best bet
Liked it so much, we bought a 2nd one!. I've had my pair since Christmas and use it everywhere!  We all know the earbuds that come with the ipods are CHEAP!!!  Sort of ridiculous considering you pay so much for the ipods, they could be just a little bit better.  My oem earbuds started giving me problems about 2 weeks into owning my ipod.  These earbuds eliminate white noise and static and rounds out the sound for a crisp, clear sound.  I can have my volume all the way up and my eardrums are not rattling.  I do listen to a lot of bass rich music.We just bought a 2nd one for my husband and felt it was well worth it.  You will always have someone that is unwilling to part with the money and feel that if they do, they are going to find something to complain about.  It's all a part of their vicious buyer's remorse cycle.I use mine at the gym and they play their music pretty loudly, not to mention the sounds from the various machines and weights.  It completely blocks out all of those other sounds so I can concentrate on MI-TUNES :O)The earbud covers do take some adjusting to.  Finding the one that best fits your particular ear is not too difficult considering they provide you with 3 different sizes.Bose Customer service, like the quality of their products, has always been top notch.  I see these on sale for under $80 on a regular basis.Buy it, you'll love it.  (As long as you are not a card carrying member of the 'Buyers Remorse Club'.)
Great product as advertised. I experienced the same problem some other people did when I used this card with my Canon 20D.  The firmware was 3.01 which is not compatible with firmware version 2.03 on the camera.  Seagate responded my email within a reasonable amount of time and I was sent a replacement with version 3.02.  Formating the older one took about 20 minutes; Formating the one with firmware 3.02 took a few seconds.  The speed of the drive is descent if your camera has a large buffer to keep up with the slower speed of the drive when taking multiple shots at the same time.  Before you buy this product know it's limitations and you will make a better choice.  A microdrive has mechanical, therefore moving parts and will eventually fail.  That is just the nature of the drive.  Also, 8GB is a lot of room for a lot of pictures.  If you cherish your pictures, be smart and backup as soon as possible, don't just let them sit in the drive.  I have nothing but good things to say about Seagate.  Follow the procedures and they will always accomodate you.  For their supprt and efforts give Seagate 5 stars.  In summary, 8GB of space for about 150 is a pretty darn good deal even if it breaks eventually.  Just determine the usage you are going to get out of it and decide if it is a cost effective solution for you.
Greatest Calculator Ever!!. I am not too happy that TI stopped releasing operating system updates since it's basically the same as the 89 and voyage 200. Other than that, its awesome. The QWERTY keyboard and function key layout is good. The large screen is good. It takes AA instead of AAA batteries so it lasts longer. Pretty print, symbolic manipulation, algebra, and calculus... just awesome. It also does a lot of stuff with units which has been very helpful in several of my enigneering courses
does the job while looking good!!. as someone else mentioned its not the sturdiest rack out there, but it has not tipped over on me so i really cant complain.it looks good, and its easily put together.as for the sturdy issue, i look at it like this. since when do you place cd racks in the middle of the room?? NEVER!!people will typically place them in the corner of a room which is fine and you will NEVER have an issue with the rack at all. i have mine set right near the entrance of the bedroom door and i have brushed up against it and bumped elbows with it, and it ever so slightly moved a little but nothing where i was worried about it falling. oh and i have carpet in my room which makes it for a less sturdy foundation.i have even thought about purchasing another one for dvd's.personally speaking i def recommmend this cd rack
Bang For Your Buck!. Well, I needed some new headphones. I tried the UR5 from Koss. The sound quality was alright, but they could BARELY be heard. I found these, thinking Sony, would make headphones with better and louder sound. I was right.The good news is that the sound quality is excellent. Sony headphones always seem to have more punch than other Koss, RCA, Panasonic, and other brands of headphones. The bass and treble are clear, and bass is pretty deep as other $6 headphones I've tried. I would have enjoyed the headphones that came with my player (SLSV570), but they were uncomfortable, and I mean VERY. These are pretty comfortable and lightweight, as the box explains.The bad news is the overall durability of these headphones, which is a big minus. I've been though two of these, yet the third ones haven't broken yet at all (keeping my fingers crossed).The price is very reasonable and very cheap, and I wouldn't have a problem buying another pair, because of their cheapness.Overall, these headphones add a punch to your music, and the volume is loud for those quiet CD players
Great way to add USB. I bought this card to add more USB ports to a Mac G4 AGP (Sawtooth).The two USB ports just aren't enough when you're running Pro Tools and add-ons like a Frontier AlphaTrack, which will not work off a hub -- it needs a dedicated port.The Allegro does the job perfectly and at a price that's comparable with a powered hub
you recive what you pay for!. Not so many words to talk about this item, but let me tell you that now I always use my rino turned on, in my car. baterie drain its no more cash pain!**Good things:-comes with a led(small light) that turns on with diferent colors(red green yellow) so you could know if your rino its turned on or of or disconected.-large cable(for a car, you could use youre rino in the back seat even conected in the front of the car)**bad thingsjust a bad ending quality, it looks like a adapter of 2.99bucks, but I had owned it for more than a year and cero problems.pvpaco@gmail.co
not bad. The main thing I like about this system is the small battery operated receiver that i can place right on my camcorder.  you get pretty much what you pay for.  if you need a wireless that sounds good 90% of the time, this system will do the trick.  if you need a wireless that gives you near 100% performance, you're simply going to have to spend a lot more money
hp f1905e 19" lcd monitor. Ordered directly from HP. Fast delivery,solid package. No dead pixel. Works perfec
Wacom Graphire 4 review. I love this tablet!  I get the functionality of a tablet computer on my little thin Sony.  I almost bought a tablet notebook, but it was so heavy.  I have the best of both worlds now!
Does everything excellently !!!. A top class printer for all tasks. Produces excellent digital images, prints quickly and clearly, copies reliably, faxes clearly excellent OCR and wireless function !! Best I've seen  either in a home or office !!
Great for the money!. You can't expect these speakers to sound like Bose speakers, but for the price they're darn good!!!! I bought them for my new Imac and I'm delighted with them
Decent radio, some marketing hype. First, a little about my background.  I am an amateur radio operator (ham radio), and an electrical engineer.  So, I know a little about radios.  I got another car, and decided to put a two-meter mobile and a CB in it.  Since the 2M mobile takes up all available space for mounting a radio, I decided to choose this model as my CB.  I have had it going for a few days now and it seems to work just fine.  The advantages of this model, besides the obvious one of being easier to mount, is that it also includes weather reception, a scan mode, and an actual frequency display (a rarity among normal legal CB's).  About the only bad points that I can see is that the unit itself is somewhat large and looks awkward on my dash, the speaker does not sound fantastic (but not too bad considering the size), the knobs are a little difficult to adjust while still attached to the dash, and the cable is coiled and flexible but it is so thick that you have to really tug on it to get it to extend.  The thing that amazes me is the marketing hype.  The "soundtracker" technology is close to useless.  If you power on the radio without and antenna, soundtracker sounds great.  However, if you turn it on with an antenna attached while truckers are talking all over the state, soundtracker does nothing for that type of noise.  The problem is that, with CB, you never really get quiet conditions.  If soundtracker is so great, why even include a button to turn it off?  Why not just leave it on all the time?  Soundtracker also claims to increase the transmission strength.  There is really only one way to transmit at full legal power.  If soundtracker does actually improve transmission, that means that they intentionally crippled transmit when soundtracker is turned off.  So, the whole soundtracker thing smells to me like a bunch of marketing hype.  This is still a good choice for a CB, though, if you cannot mount a regular-sized unit in your vehicle.  Just make sure to get a good antenna.  I chose a Larsen designed for 11-meter usage in an NMO mount.
Eton FR400 Hand Crank Radio and Power Generator (Red). This works fine - got it in the time promised.  The only difficulty is that there is not much of an instruction manual
Thrilled!. I purchased the Altec Lansing iMX2 Portable Speaker system for my XM2go satellite radio and I am so thrilled with it.  I was having trouble finding this system in stock with other vendors.  But when I shopped at Amazon.com not only did I find it, but the price was amazing and far less expensive than anywhere else
SHN5500--How to USE IT for GREAT RESULTS!. It looks like others who have reviewed this product "just don't get it."  And, that's great, because this is causing the price to drop on a VERY FINE product.  They think these are supposed to be BOSE or something.  No, they aren't $300-plus equivalents.  The noise suppression is not exactly the same, true.  But now going at just over $20, what does a rational person expect?  All the same, they have a real charm of their own....First, the comfort is fantastic!  Did the other reviewers use the ear loops right?  I don't think so.  The ear loops really support the unit on your head.  Rotating the entire unit in the ear loops allows for use even on a pillow (certainly enough for airplane useage).  I have BOSE Quiet Comfort II's.  They're great--but in other ways.  I can take these Philips SHN5500's where I wouldn't risk the Bose units...Second, the sound is very clear.  I've got thousands of tapes I recorded years ago from CDs and cassettes with special denoising (DNL) processing.  I don't have time to do all of that all over again, so I prefer (as old-fashioned as it sounds) to use cassettes on airplanes.  Ever fumble and "discus" a CD in a plane's tight quarters?  At any rate, my tapes are free of noise, dynamically processed as they are.  So, a decent cassette player introduces a BIT of hiss, yes, but on a PLANE, that's not much.  BUT, to the POINT:  These SHN5500's have a transient quality that is breathtakingly beautiful. They actually limit whatever hiss does come on the tape.  CLARITY.  They'll do great with MP3, but I'm a Classical junkie so I won't be there until a system comes along without the compression.  But, that's a whole other story....Third, I think you should consider snapping up a couple--like I have--before Philips redesigns them to meet the customer's MISCONCEPTIONS and (naturally) makes those people happier with a (then) misconceived product.Fourth, I ASSURE you I have no ties to Philips, etc.  I just think SOMEBODY needed to give credit where it is due.  BTW, I AM a "technical person" and have THREE (Research & Development) R&D 100 awards to my name.  I say that just to let you, the reader, know that my analysis is hardly that of an uninformed crank.  I also appreciate that there's at least one other reviewer, here, who gave great technical data and shares some of my thoughts about this really fine product.  $20 does not buy $300 Bose sound.  But on a plane, that $20 is well spent on the Philips SHN5500's.
Grandchild loved it!. I purchased the Casio keyboard for my Grand-daughter's 4th birthday.  She really enjoyed playing it.  As a matter of fact she was still interested in it the next day.  It is the perfect size for a small child.  She sits in her recliner and has the keyboard across the arms.  The only thing that wasn't perfect is that you can mute what the child is playing, but not the 10 songs that are prerecorded in it
It worked for me... I was able to install and use this product on an HP iPAQ hx2495 without difficulty.  I inserted the SD chip, the software installed and I was able to use it straightaway.  I have used TomTom's email customer service twice: once with a quick reply, once without.  After determining that I had a dodgy SD chip, I was able to back up the chip to a second one for safekeeping.  I use Mac's at home, so getting something I could install without finding a PC was a huge win...I've made two trips so far, and things have worked well.  I connect the iPAQ to the car's sound system (mp3 plug) so that it's more audible.  I've also used it hand-held while settting it up, and it tracked me walking along at 3-4 mph.  I can't address the problems mentioned in the first two reviews, but the product has delivered as promised for me
Amazing Sound!. I'm no audio expert, but do love my music. I like to dedicate at least three hours of my day just simply listening to music. So, I thought a hefty investment in high-end earphones would make for a great listening experience. Last year, I bought a pair of Bose Quiet Comfort Noise-Cancelling headphones. Again, I'm no audio expert, but I thought the sound was awesome. I especially loved the bass...deep, rich, and I personally like the fact that you were able to "feel" the bass' physical presence. I thought no other headphones/earphones would surpass these headphones' magical sound. WAS I EVER WRONG. I got tired of looking like some weirdo with those HUGE Bose headphones snuggled on my ears constantly. They're just too big! I needed something that was more portable, more aesthetically pleasing to the average on-looker, and that produced excellent sound. I heard of Shure from an old friend of mine. He swore by his pair. He's a DJ, so I took his opinion on Shure with great value. Needless to say, I decided to invest. I was marvelled by the sparkling reviews of the Shure E500PTH. 5 stars is absolutely amazing I thought. This has to be the holy grail of all earphones. I forked out $350 and bought it. Two days later, I received it in the mail. Plugged it into my Creative Zen Vision M...and I was in MUSIC HEAVEN. The sound is...PERFECT. Literally perfect. It isn't tinny, not muddy, not distorted...or anything that compromises one's music listening experience. It's a very balanced sound with ringing highs, rich lows, and CLEAR vocals. It picks up on a lot of pleasant details. I used to hate in-ear phones, but these are amazingly comfortable. You hardly know that they're even there. Again, I'm a bass junkie. While the physical presence (which I know a lot of people dislike) isn't as prominent (in comparison with the Bose), it's still deep, real, and rich. The clear, detailed sound these earphones deliver more than makes up for that physical bass I barely even miss now. I say invest in a pair. You'll LOVE them
Five star review of 2 GB  Mini disc. What can I say except that it works fine
NO JOKE. I also installed this unit as a second drive into a Mac G4 and had no problems. Well, I take that back. I had some trouble trying to release the ribbon cable clamp (Novice). After I figured that, it was easy going. Oh it also helps to use the Power Mac G4 Setup Guide that came along with the computer. Under "Installing Internal Storage Devices" is written, "Important: Use the original Apple cables that came with your Macintosh when you install additional ATA drives. Some non-Apple cables may not correctly support cable select mode". And the screws were long enough.Formatting the new drive for Mac OS took some time (40 min.). But the computer did all the work using a current Macintosh drive setup utility.The drive is up and running and it only took one and a half hours. That includes reopening the computer to secure the cable clamp. I forgot
Great value, great product!. Okay, considering this cable costs $1.50, it's an exceptional product. I set it up in a few minutes and can now play iPod movies, tv shows and slideshows through our home entertainment system. The ONE drawback is that the audio (of course) is limited to 2 channels, not 5.1 or 6.1. But I should have thought of that before... still, compared to other cables out there ($20 and up), you can't go wrong with this one - it's a great value
USB to Serial adapter. I needed to converted by serial adapter into a USB and it worked perfectly.  I couldn't be happier
Onkyo TX-SR304S 5.1 Channel Receiver. I was looking for a low-cost receiver with surround sound capability for a vacation home.  I have never purchased any components from Onkyo before, but a friend of mine more familiar with audio components recommended it.  The price was very reasonable, especially after Amazon recently reduced the price to just over $140.The receiver was shipped from J&R Music World.  The packaging was good, and everything arrived in good shape.  The directions weren't great, but having set up 5.1 systems before, this was not a tremendous hurdle.  Once the unit was turned on, though, the actual setup of the speakers and other features was much simpler and much more effective than the unit I have in my primary home.  It was really a snap to get the speakers configured and balanced.The sound quality is excellent.  I don't have a sub-woofer hooked up yet, but the compensation by the unit is excellent, and the sound quality is still top notch.  It does not have many of the bells and whistles of other units, and it is just a 5.1 system, but if you're looking for a basic unit that provides all of the necessities, good sound quality, and ease of installation, this unit would be an excellent choice
Great Headphones. My hubby had a pair of these that he just loved. Then the kids were using them and they didn't hold up so well. I would NOT consider them kid friendly, they are just a little too fragile. But if you are using them for an adult, they are great. Hubby likes the sound quality, he uses them at work all the time. He also likes the seperate volume control on the headphones themselves.
Awesome Sound...!. I love these speakers!  The sound quality is fantastic.  More balanced and much richer than either the Bose or Apple Hi-Fi.  Plus, you get an AM/FM radio for free.Highly recommended
Panasonic 37 Inch Plasma HDTV. This TV was the only plasma that would fit in my entertainment cabinet. The 42 inch displays were all about 1/2 - 1 inch too wide. I thought that I would be settling for a TV at this size but I was very wrong. It replaced a 36 inch CRT Mitsubishi that had a great picture, but even on standard definition the Panasonic is outstanding. On HD channels the picture is excellent. The only issue I have is the need to change the aspect ratio when watching HD to Zoom and then back to Full or Just on SD so that I can read the text info on the bottom of the screen. The set up was very easy and I only needed about 30 minutes of tweaking to set the picture exactly the way I wanted it. The best thing about this was the price that I got just before Christmas -only $999.77 with Free Shipping!! That was what pushed me over the top to buy this unit, and I certainly got my money's worth
Home run!. A genious product!Pros:Strong tunerfull sounddurableportableHenry Kloss designCons:The cost keeps me from having more than one :(Overall:very pleased with Tivolia little pricey, but you get what you pay fora solid performing, and extremely portable radi
excellent product. this is the 2nd time i have purchased this from Amazon. great product and quick delilvery.
Does a simple job, but does it well... I like the look of my MacBook Pro, and so I keep it (fairly) clean and am very careful with it.  However, the keyboard is one of those problem areas that is hard to clean, particularly on a notebook computer.I looked at several more intrusive (adhesive) scratch-resistant solutions, but I found the ProTouch to be the best option for me.  Because my main focus was keeping the system clean, I wanted to be able to remove it, clean it off, and put it back on, while knowing that whatever dust, gunk, etc., it was collecting wasn't getting into my keys.The ProTouch works fabulously for this purpose.  The silicone is not QUITE transparent, but does a pretty good job of letting the MacBook Pro's color shine through.  Some reviewers have complained that the MBP's keyboard is difficult to see with the cover on in some conditions.  I have no such problems, at least as far as the ProTouch is concerned.  The MBP's keyboard, because its keys are designed to allow light through, will be hard to see in low-light conditions -- this is unavoidable, and not really a fault of the cover.Remember to clean it regularly, though, or oils and such from the ProTouch CAN transfer to the screen.  It's reversible with a good cleaning for the monitor, but still disappointing
Works fine. No problems. I've had one of these for more than a year. And just bought another. I've had no problems using them with my canon cameras
Digital Recorder for your iPod. The Belkin TuneTalk is fabuous for using an iPod as a digital recorder. I have had very good results recording various music rehearsals (children's choir to big band) with and without an external powered microphone (Sony ECM-MS908C stereo mic) attached. Since I already had the mic, the total cost was very low compared to purchasing something like a Zoom digital recorder for this type of recording. I haven't plugged it into a mixing board yet. I suspect it would produce an even better recording with a decent pair of mics through a Mackie 1202 or better.I bought a USB power adaptor so I wouldn't have to worry about battery drain. It plugs into the TuneTalk and provides power to the iPod.No, it isn't as good as a high dollar recorder, dedicated mic-pre's and a pair of Neumann mics. Serious recording requires serious equipment. However, for all those other recordings, the Tunetalk Stereo is a great recording option for about $60 and your trusty iPod.
Flawless!. WOW!  Just got this through Amazon last week, along with a Sanus VMAA26 wall mount.  To sum up the tv, flawless!  HD programming is excellent, and I must say 75% of standard def is outstanding as well.  So far I have no complaints or problems.  Amazon shipped quickly and easy tracking through American Eagle shipping.  I am using the D* HR20 box to watch tv.  Finally a TV well worth the money!
Research worth the effort - GREAT shredder. When my first shredder finally bit the dust (a Fellowes), and I wanted to upgrade to a more commercial series to last longer, I spent 4-5 hours online researching shredders.  Fellowes kept coming to the top of the list with customer comments (and price).  I loved my earlier home office version (which lasted 6 years with moderate shredding until a large hidden paperclip did it in) so I'm partial to Fellowes anyway.  But I looked at everything out there.  I didn't want to spend a fortune, but I wanted high quality with metal parts.  I also wanted to move to a confetti type; the strip shredder filled up the trashcan too often.This SB-97C is it!  Love it!  Really grinds through everything - don't have to open up junk mail anymore.  And I can shred through old tax files quickly - top piece provides a "guide" so you know how much paper can go through the shredder at once.  It also has a guide for CDs and credit cards that I've found very handy.  And the slide out trashcan really holds a lot of paper.  It comes with some oil and a few bags - very nice of them to include these to get you started.  I've only had this about a month but I've shredded a good amount of paper and it's wonderful.  For the price I highly recommend it
Awsome product. I recived the product yesterday! It is a verry good item. but I read a review.."Its not a good product for moving music and videos" When you plug in the pendrive you have to swipe ur finger inorder to unlock the pendrive contents it is a verry good pendrive and it doesn't leave any trace on another computer. It is kinda bigger then the micro; But thats ok. I am also submitting some user photos so be shure to check them out
Great Radio. This is by far the best radio I've ever had for singing in the shower.  No more fumbling and messing with the dial while I've got soap in my eyes... 10 fm presets, 5 am presets and 5 tv presets + weather, I'm always able to find something good to listen to.  It works great for when I'm out in the yard doing some work as well.
GREAT Product. Fabulous product --- now I can store over 700 photos in the 8 mega pixel range.    Happy I purchased this one -- very trouble free
Item OK but unusable. The parallel USB adapter worked just like it was supposed to. My problem was that the printer I was using it with was no longer supported in Windows XP. So while the adapter turned out to be useless, I'm keeping it for possible future use
I Like White . . . But was hesitant ordering a white WR-2 when the classic wood grain version had been around longer with so many satisfied owners.  Reading one reviewer's post that the cabinet is not solid wood (instead wood veneer over particleboard) boosted my confidence but I still feared the possibility of ending up with a WR-2 with a white but cheesy finish.  Buying things over the internet without touching and handling in person can be risky.  Having recently unboxed my new WHITE WR-2, I am writing to say I am overwhelmingly pleased with my decision; you couldn't pay me to take the wood grain cabinet now.  You would never know the cabinet is wood other than the solid weight and feel of the radio; the finish appears to be a high grade white plastic (presumably with wood underneath).  Absolutely Beautiful!Originally I was shopping for the CC radio (made popular by advertising on Art Bell's program) but after reading reviews that identified problems with the display and memory buttons decided to review all radios I was able to find online (there are hundreds) and pick the best to meet my needs.  I chose the WR-2 because it is fairly unique not having any buttons or knobs on the top or sides and advertised as having decent AM reception (I mostly use my radio bedside and listen for about an hour as I fall asleep at night and only rarely as an alarm clock. I will post again after I have a chance to become more critical of it's features and possible shortcomings.  For now I'm still dazzled with the appearance and simple layout of controls/features that according to my extensive internet search are relatively unique to this particular handsome radio
Buena opcin para PDA a un excelente precio. Trabaja perfectamente con mi HP IPAQ rx1950 con Windows Mobile 5.0. Con otra SD, la batera se descargaba rpidamente an con el equipo apagado; una vez que actualic el rom en la pgina web de hp, se resolvi este problema y esta memoria puede permanecer dentro del pda sin problemas. Quizs puede resultar un poco lenta, pero estoy bastante satisfecho!!!
Shipped. I just got my email saying it shipped and am tracking it to receive it tomorrow, so look for similar ones
Excellent jewel cases. As your DVD/CD collections grow, these are ideal for protecting and storing your "treasures". Easy to open and take up little storage space. The center lock tab is secure but allows you to remove the discs from the case with ease.Just a great product
A rehearsal workhorse. This is an excellent, general purpose microphone at a reasonable price.  I'm a classically trained vocalist, and I use the SM58 for rehearsal and "scratch" recordings.  It delivers clear, true, and warm sound under all standard conditions and requires essentially no fine tuning or signal processing.  I still prefer the crisp detail of a condenser microphone for formal demo recordings (my favorite is the Studio Projects C1), but it's hard to beat the simplicity and reliability of the SM58 for everyday use
Spectacular image plus striking design. After reading tons of info, checking critics' recommendations and comparing monitors online, I went to check them out at a CompUSA store.  After seeing some of the monitors and brands the critics like, many of the monitors appeared similar with only vague differences.  Except this Sony.  It outshined all others by a wide margin.  There are two Sony models that have the same frame, so be sure you look at the one with the "XBrite" technology because it's very different.  I have never needed the height adjustment and wires are totally unobtrusive.  This was a plug and play unit, no adjustments were necessary (I changed the pre-sets, but went right back).  So far, after about a month living with this monitor I can't say too many good things about it
Extreme III 2.0 GB is All That!. Extreme III is All That, for me and the family.Switching from RAW, and back so far is flawless. Temperatures seem to have no ill effect as long as I am using freshly charged batteries in extreme cold 32deg. or colder, no delay in summer conditions.Since I purchased Extreme III 2.0 GB to use with my Canon Rebel XT camera, with 8MP this has been the best deal for my money.I could have bought cheaper CF cards; I believe you get what you paid for.I Purchased this CF Card after purchasing the SanDisk Ultra II 512MB. I only use the Ultra II as backup now, and likewise this still performs excellent.My opinion; Great Price, Good deal.
Monster Speaker Cable S16-50, 16 Gauge. Not a lot can be said about speaker cable.  It either performs as advertised, or doesn't.  This cable performs as advertised.  Order was processed rapidly, delivered in a timely manner, and packaging was appropriate for the merchandise.  Installation and operation was normal
Quality product. I brought this product for my Olympus E-500 Digital camera .It worked fine with camera .If sandisk can come with better firmware update I believe it can performe wonderful with camera .The tranfer speed of data is ok and Sandisk can think about improvement by updated firmware .Overall my experience with Product is satisfied.So far there is crash . Price difference between 2Gb and 1GB is too high ,otherwise I will go for 2GB in the sameproduct line.It come in sealed retail package.I upgraded my camera firmware to latest in order to use this product trouble free
Excellent cooling fan.....except for... This is a very well made cooling fan for your laptop. However, if you have a 15.4" screen your laptop will hang off of it about an inch on both sides, 17" is about an inch and a half on both sides. Is that a problem? No, not really. You want air circulation underneath to cool. The 3 fans are great. Most cooling boards have only 2. An earlier reviewer said he didnt like it because the back was "open". Well that reduces the weight and increases air circulation. It is well designed in my opinion. The on/off switch is nice. It will only work of course if the laptop is running. You will never forget to turn it off. It runs amazingly quiet. You cant hear it but you can feel it. It is really meant to keep the battery cool and help the heatsink fan. A cooler working battery will last longer. It has a good angle to work. I really havent found anything wrong with it. I highly recommend this item, however, if I was to make a suggestion to improve it, it would be to add a couple of usb ports to it.
there grrrreat. they are so good i bought 2! one for me and one for my friend. they sound good and they are very comfortable, and affortable
When electricity is not available. Great phone for the price.It's not meant to be the greatest full featured phone,but it  has good sound quality and the Caller ID works on batteries.I have had Caller ID in power failures and it is great in rooms where the phone jack is away from an electrical outlet
It really is a great product. I love the Sony company, and I love this product. It does everything that it says it does; it has a ton of storage and importing pictures is really fast
Value for money. Pros:Good FM receptiongood remote functionalityvalue for moneyCons:build qaulity seems to be fragile, it still intact for me.Eqaulizer button is too small to be usable.both ipod dock connector and head phone jack come from the bottom, it would have been better if headphone jack comes out of the to
GREAT LITTLE PRINTER. THIS PRINTER IS SO EASY TO OPERATE AND CREATE WITH.  THE COLOR ON THE PICTURES IS WONDERFUL
Brief reply to "  pinxet "pinxet" and some comments. I've had this keyboard for a little over a month. I'm a college student and purchased a PPC so that I can carry my notes and important dates, information, etc in my pocket.Typically, a keyboard was, with the intention of using the ppc as a notebook, necessary.The pro's are pretty much as pinxet mentioned, there's not much I can add.However his cons are somewhat... insulting to the intelligence of HP customers. The BT_KB comes with an off button. The same button you use to turn it on turns it off. To further experiment with this, if you press it once, and establish the connection with the Ipaq then press the button a second time a pop-up will appear informing you that the keyboard has been disconnected. Also, if you press the button twice and then have your ipaq search for it, it will not find it.The little lock to keep the keyboard flat is, as pinxet mentioned, useless.the "/" button (also "?") is curiously placed to the right of the shift (on a normal qwerty keyboard it is to the left of the shift). So if you use the forward-slash or question mark frequently you will have to adjust your writing to get used to the unusual position of the key. (where the "/" would normally be for you fingers to type is the up-arrow key. So what ultimately ends up happening, when you want to type a question mark, is you hold down shift, press up, highligh one line of text and continue typing removing that line of text. Fortunately the ipaq word processor comes with an undo function.)My only other concern is that I seem to be having problems connecting the keyboard to my cell phone. The phone identifies the keyboard and establishes a connection, but beyond that I can't seem to get the keyboard to type anything.For students and anyone intending to use the ppc as a PC (perhaps a pocket laptop), this keyboard is priceless. I use it four to five times a day.(and as such, I would highly recommend purchasing two pairs of rechargable batteries for it. Next time maybe HP will have a built in lithium battery, like all other accessories for electronics
100% Satisfied. I have used other brand name labels and find this one to be the best so far.  Good quality...perfect thickness, stick well, no smudges or smears.  They work well with my CD burning program.  I didn't have to buy another program in order to use these labels. (As someone else stated in another review.
Good play. The product arrived nicely packed and in perfect condition. We were very pleased with the product and it's performance
Shredder Oil. So far it seems to help by cuttig down some of the noise, and the shredding seems better to
Fun little GPS. I've been using GPS devices for nearly 15 years.  This device is very cool.  If you are planning on using it for Geocaching, consider getting the Magellan Mapsend DirectRoute in the US.  I also purchased the Mapsend TOPO thinking that is what would work best for Geocaching.Unfortunately, getting to the AREA of the cache is often difficult in urban environments.  The DirectRoute is MUCH better with this device as it will get you to the general area and then you can switch to direct arrow once you are out of the car
A Good Radio... I recently bought and installed this radio in my truck, and I have not had any problems yet!!!  A few minor details are the noise blanker seems really sesitive (sometimes when it is on I do not receive any traffic) but that is about it.  I enjoy Cobra products, this is my second radio (I just traded up from a 25NWXT), I have a Cobra HG2000 Antenna, and I am waiting on a Cobra Mic for my radio.  So far no problems with any of it and I hope to have none down the road!!!!
Pricey, but worth it. As I've posted elsewhere, these are my favorite choice for quality listening. They don't tire your ears out (like plugs) and they isolate you from all but hte most intrusive environmental distractions. Superb bass response. Older models have a defect in the headband design, Bose has been replacing them absolutely free for the newer, more resilient model (silver)
Great product!. I'm so glad I bought this, what a convenience to have one remote for the whole entertainment center!  The instructions for programming were so clear, even someone who has trouble programming his/her VCR like me, could follow the directions, and in a very short time, have the whole remote programmed.  I love it
Forget all those cables. I bought this card reader to use with my SD memory cards from my digital camera and Palm Tungsten E2. Transferring pictures and music via the cables supplied with the camera and Palm is a bit slow and who needs more cables?  This little device allows me to add, delete, copy and paste files using My Computer.  It takes up virtually no room, and I use it between both my desktop and laptop computers.  There was no installation issues - I have Windows XP on both machines and it recognized and installed the card reader immediately, without any interference from me. Last but not least, the price can't be beat
Excellent Mouse. This mouse is ergonomic, fast, and worth every penny! Not to mention it's color matches that of my laptop. GREAT BUY
Great buy!. Product was from a 2nd party vendor, delivered very quickly.  Am very pleased with the product and the service
Test your wiring as it's being installed with this unit. TRENDware CABLE TESTER 10/100 COAX & TP ( TC-NT2 )I bought one of these testers to verify coax and Cat5e wiring in a house where a structured wiring system was to be installed.  Two Cat5e and two RG6 (coax) cables were run to each room from a centrally located panel, so that's a lot of cable.  As Cat5e cable is fairly fragile (compared to non-metallic 110 volt house wiring), the time to make sure it works just after it's installed. Once the dry-wall is up, you'll have a real problem on your hands if a concealed cable fails.This thing tests for several things.  1) wiring is correct end to end [there's connectivity, the right wire is on each pin, there are no shorts, no wrong cross-overs, etc.), 2) the cable isn't damaged, 3) the connector isn't defective.  Leviton's Installation Manual for Residential Structured Wiring Version 3.0 emphasizes testing as being a fundamental part of a quality job.  The larger the job, the more important testing is.  Even smaller jobs should be tested though, if the wiring will be inaccessible later on.Here's an example of what not to do:  I recently toured a high-end new house featuring "structured wiring".  Unfortunately, the builder left many dozens of unterminated RG6 and Cat5e cables dangling about 4' down from the ceiling in the furnace room.  The individual cables had no labels on them and they was no panel to organize those wires.  Shame on him.  Since low-voltage wiring is not included in any county inspection, this builder got away with extremely sloppy practices, and the unwary buyer will be stuck.This tester works as follows.  After installing terminators on each end, plug one end of the cable into the sending unit and the other end into the receiving (remote) unit.  If either end the cable to be tested is terminated with a jack (versus a plug) plug a straight-through patch cable into that jack, and the other end of the patch cable into one of the tester units.  Turn the sending unit on and chose between testing one wire (pin or path) at a time, or set it to auto where it slowly cycles through 8 wires and a ground.  Testing is simplest when the remote unit is in your sight line.  If the remote can't be nearby, use the auto setting and then go to that other end to see what's happening, or have a helper yell back which lights come on.  I recently sent a helper to an attic with a walkie-talkie, with me in the basement, to check out Cat5e wiring.  You can also test multiple cables to/from the same location using a jumper.  E.g., at a bedroom wall plate location, attach the ends of two coax cables together using a double female jack, then concurrently test the two cables, from the Structured Panel end.The sending unit tests the wires in sequence (1 to 8, ground) and then starts over.  For each wire tested, a corresponding red LED on the sender lights.  The unit sends low-voltage current on that wire to light an LED on the remote.  If there is continuity, a red light on the remote comes on.  If you're testing wire 1 and it's received on wire 1 on the remote, the number 1 LED lights.  If it's received on another wire (e.g., wire 2), that LED comes on.  If it's received on multiple wires, they'll all light.  If it's not received at all, no LED's light up.  On auto mode, LED's 1 through 8 wil light at the remote at about one second intervals, assuming it's straight through cabling.This device easily paid for itself during the testing of one renovated house; with 29 RG6 runs and 42 Cat5e runs to various rooms from a Structured Wiring enclosure.  Even though all of the RG6 cables check out OK, there were several Cat5e issues, which I then fixed.  The Trendware tester found one defective Keystone jack, several plugs with crossed wires (my error), and one where a jack was wired correctly, but a wire didn't make contact.To test RG6 coax, you'll need two F Type Female to BNC Male adapters.  You can also purchase USB and Firewire adapters to test those cable types (see customer photos).Since many applications don't use all 8 wires, you could still use a cable successfully, even though some wires in that cable were mis-wired,  shorted, etc.The tester comes in a zipper case, with room for the optional adapters.  It uses one 9 volt battery.Excellent product
Awesome product. I have nothing extra special or unique to add... just want to say that this product does what it says, and it does it very well.  What I didn't expect to like most about this card was the recording options... but it really has a lot of great features in this regard.This card is useful if:You use your laptop as your main computer, and use seperate speakers (5.1 etc)You need better recording options when on the roadYou have a nice pair of headphones, and aren't happy with the output your laptop has.This card does exactly what it says, and flawlessly, for me
good value. good value. speakers don't resonate like they would if a subwoofer but if money is a constraint and can't afford a subwoofer these will compensate nicely
needs more info. bought it for an older computer. had done research on it. specifically looked for windows 98 compatible. when product arrived, it suggested 2000 and higher. good thing I have another computer that needed wireless connection and met the necessary criteria
Fits like a glove. Great product fits like a glove. I was getting fustrated with my laptop getting scrached up so I decided on this case. Neopren material is my favorite. Would be nice if item was offered in Red or Blue. Some padded protection,Very Good for the price! I can now travel with my laptop comfortably in my backpack
A useful product. I have noticed no problems with the selector. It has lived up to all my dreams and expectations. It is simple and easy to use. Couldn't ask for more
SATISFIED WITH THE PRODUCT. AFTER MONTHS OF CAREFUL COMPARISON WITH DIFFERENT MANUFACTURER SUCH AS DENON,ONKYO,YAMAHA,I ALSO PICKED THE HARMAN KARDON FOR COMPARISON.EACHMANUFACTURER HAS SOMETHING UNIQUE TO OFFER IN THEIR PRODUCT.BASE ON WHAT MY NEEDS ARE AND AFTER READING REVIEWS FROM EVERYONE WHO BOUGHT AND RATED THE PRODUCTS,I ENDED WITH THE HARMAN KARDON.IM VERY HAPPY WITH MY CHOICE.THIS MACHINE IS EASY TO USE,THE SOUND IS GREAT.WONDERFUL AS SURROUND SOUND FOR MOVIES,,EXCELLENT FOR MUSIC.BEST OF BOTH WORLDS.NOT TOO MANY SYSTEM CAN MAKE THAT CLAIM..USING MINE WITH INFINITY SPEAKERS THAT SEEM TO COMPLEMENT EACH OTHER..
Great sound. Dollar for Dollar Creative Labs has the finest sounding easy to download and use MP3 players and related equipment
It's not top of the line, but you get a great deal for your money. With electronic equipment prices running at the high hundreds, this product shows that you don't have to spend a fortune to get good stereo sound.  Now I have a home theater with the sound experience good enough for a regular home sized room.
Superb scanner!. Excellent scanner for the money. I purchased this scanner to scan our family's slides & photographs. It is very easy to use and has done an outstanding job. I would highly recommend
Solid well made radio- Improvement over old Grundig line. Hi , I'm Vince the radioman I've have a large collection of radios and I love to do compares and share my thoughts. The Eton E 10 ( along with the E1 and E100) is a vast improvement over to old Grundig line of radios. You can immediatly see and feel the difference in the quality of how the radio is made. It has a robust memory (500 presets) and complete functionality including wide/narrow band selection and an interference filter which seems to work well. The tuner sensativity and dynamic range are very good considering the price . It has an antenna trim feature which is a pleasure and not usually available on a radio of this price range.I enjoy AM DXing and have had good results, not quite as good as the SONY 7600 or the Sangean ATS909. The Sangean is priced way above the E 10 but the SONY 7600 is just a bit more but has SSB which the E 10 does not . The E 10s cosmetic design /sleekness is wonderful and as I've said earlier ...a well made radio!! The control buttons are a bit small and cause issues for those of us with large hands, but not a show stopper. My actual rating here is 4 and a half stars , I do really like this radio but its not a SONY , it does have some hiss and selectivity issues, but none the less a very good buy for the money .
Good Gift. I got this stuff as a gift for a friend of mine. He seems to be happy using it. So I am giving this a 5 star
I love it!!. I finally got rid of my CRT monitor, which took up most of my deskspace. I am really digging the integrated speakers. I am very satisfied with it
Great Value. I gave it five stars because I am rating on bang for the buck! If you are not a pro and are looking for value for your money, this is it. It has a very nice and crisp sound, I have a surround system and the moives sound great!Plus, Sony's reliability is something to consider in the long run. Just make sure you follow the directions when installin
Great Quality for the Price. Can't beat the sound for the price. Use mine for jogging. Used for over a year and still going strong
Definately worth it. I agree with Max.  Don't use those inferior cables that come with your DVD player.  I just bought a DVD player and immediately got these Monster cables to connect between the TV and DVD.  Image quality is the best I can get on my 20&quot; TV, really cool
Great Picture, Great Sound, An Excellent Value. I was very impressed with the quality of the picture and sound. The picture was clear and sharp. I was very surprised with the amount of channels that this little TV was able to receive. It was able to receive all of the channels that air locally and even a few that I am unable to pick up on my non-cable TV. The only problem that I did notice was that when used in a vehicle it did get some interference from the engine but it was not purchased to use in a car so I do not forsee any problems. I definitely recommend purchasing rechargable batteries as it is a battery eater. I purchased this as a gift but was so impressed I am considering purchasing one for my self
Great little clock radio. It is so hard to find a decent sounding clock radio.  This one fits the bill!  Full rich sound with a built in rear firing subwoofer port.  Easy controls to set the two alarm functions.  You can crank it up for any bedroom activities.  Much better sound than tinny sounding Tivoli.  Much cheaper than Bose with competitive quality.  You can't go wrong here
Perfect Monitor. I couldn't believe how lightweight this monitor is, and how easy it was to connect to my computer. It is one of the best investments I have made this year. What a difference the LCD screen makes for my vision. Its wonderful.  I highly recommend this monitor to anyone who is looking for something easy to connect and have excellent quality as well. It is the perfect monitor for me
I like these wall/ceiling bracket. it makes my speakers looking splendid on the wall.It is very easy to assemble and to adjust its angl
Great system for your office or living room. I needed a small system for my office.  I wanted removable speakers, good sound at all volumes and a sleek look.  This system filled that void.  I searched for about a month to get it, and there is nothing less than fantastic about this system, even the price.In terms of sound, I can understand music at all volume levels (many cheaper systems distort at low levels) and at high volumes it sounds great.  I can't use it at high volumes now that I've taken it to work, but I am thinking about buying another for my living room at home (run the output of my family room stereo and I'll have a system that sounds good in both places for parties).In terms of looks, this system is very cool.  I tried to downplay it by placing it behind my desk, on the shelf where I keep my food, so that people wouldn't question it (because small stereos are allowed but not everyone likes us having them).  Despite my attempts to blend it in, I've received several complements on the way that it looks.  Silver casing and a sleek design are just the basics, this system features a blue backlit display that looks great!I thought that the "DVD" option in the stereo meant that you could play MP3s on DVD (a great idea for someone who wants to never have to change CDs), but in fact it meant that the system is a DVD player, and it has a video output to connect to your tv.  That's a nice plus.  I haven't tried the MP3 idea yet, so it may or may not support them.The stock antenna is terrible, but so are most stereo antennas.  I'll buy a new one soon...  The other downside is that you can't switch between presets without the remote (you can change the station, but not using presets).  But with 30 FM presets, I'll never run out!  The only thing that wasn't obvious about the set-up is that the disk buttons (disk 1, disk 2, etc) on the stereo are the eject buttons, not the select buttons like most other stereos.  Overall, this is a great design for a great stereo.  I used to work at a radio station as the engineer and now I wish I had this back then because I could blast music in my office and really utilize the system the way it was meant to..
Great Printable Surface. This works very well on all devices I've used them with.  The printable surface is great for those printers that support them.  It would be great if more printers were available that utilized these media
Sony ECMMS907 is a decent mic. I bought the mic to use with a digital video camera that has an external mic jack.  You know how video cams get lousy audio because the mic is over with the camera and not out with the subjects?  When this mic is out in front the length at its cord (5 ft), it provides great audio.  When I add a 10ft extension, the mic loses quite a bit of its signal so that the audio level I get is about 60% of what it was with the shorter length cord.  Still much better than if I use the mic on the camera.  So maybe you will not try to use a longer cord - the main issue with the mic is that it would be nice if it produced a higher level of audio output so that you get a stronger signal into your recording device, but the sound it gets is nice and clear and it works well for amateur applications
Worth it. After reading a few reviews on the turntable, I decided to buy it anyway. This was more of a gift for my mom, since I would be transferring all her records to CD. After installing the software & hooking up the connections, I had a few problems getting audio from the turntable. I tinkered around with my audio settings & finally got it working. The software itself is pretty straight forward, although mastering it took a few hours. There are some cool options like graphic EQ & the audio restoration which I used on every record. The turntable is by far the best I've ever used. Audio-Technica has made a great package deal with this one. If you need to transfer records to CD, get this & save yourself some money
I am impressed. I had heard about goofy software problems with this printer, but went ahead and bought it anyway.  Set up was very easy.  I set it up for a wireless network with both PC and Mac.  It prints flawlessly from both computers as well as from my phone (bluetooth).  Print quality I think, is supurb. I haven't tried scanning from mine, but in the store the photo scan and the document scan were very, very good.  It was the ease of printing in the store a picture that was on my phone, that convinced me.  I did it with no one there and no manual.  I think HP has done a tremendous job with this printer and I have used Epson and Canon before this one (epson 2000P, 7600, Canon ip4000).  Great printer, easy setu
AWESOME bass, not comfortable... I struggled between this and the shure e2c. I decided on the e2c, after comparing also with the etymotics r6i and the ultimate ears superfi3. This one has the least clarity, but wonderful bass. If I don't listen to as much classical music, I'd definitely pick vmoda vibe. It makes even terrible pop songs sound cool.I had to reject it because wearing it was not comfortable for my left ear at all for some reason, and I had an extremely hard time putting it in, even with the help of my bf. The vmoda did not come with any foam, only the silicon ear pieces. I settled on the less bass but more clarity and more comfortable e2c
Works great. I'm using this hub with my MacBook Pro to connect my printer, flash drives, wireless keyboard and mouse, laptop fan cooler, and hard drive to it. Everything works flawlessly. The lights on the hub are useful to double check for proper connections, and the weighted base holds the hub in place relatively firmly. Highly recommended
buyer beware. PRO:nice deep darker color tone than the Sony KDL-46XBR2black level is darker than the Sony KDL-46XBR2got more input and output than the Sony KDL-46XBR2got picture-in-pictureCON:resolution is a bit less than the Sony KDL-46XBR2PROBLEM:The LCD picture quality looks perfect in the store because it plays on pre recorded disc. It will NOT look perfect on regular channels or SD, it's very grainy and the resolution is far more disappointment.  Please note the picture is kind of blur when the object is moving.  I believe this happen to all LCD, the Pioneer Elite model seems a bit less blur than the Sony and Samsung.ADVISE:If you decide to buy any LCD, please ask the store clerk to hook it up to a regular channels and in a well lid area to see how the picture quality will turn out, also turn up the white balance to see how the black level hold up. Before spending $3000 or more on the 1080P vs. $1500 on 768P ask yourself how much and how often you are watching HD and can you really tell the different between 1080p and 768p.  The 1080p look best when playing on Blueray disc player. Personally, I like the LG 42LC7D, 768P because it is less blurs while playing on the regular channel and it has a nice resolution and brightness.
Excellent aid to productivity. Not only is the LX7 handily svelte when compared to many mice with similar features, but it's an ergonomic dream. The side-to-side scroll wheel is a wonderful feature that quickly becomes indispensable. Back and forward buttons are placed sensibly to facilitate 2-fingered use instead of other models' more cumbersome thumb-buttons.On top of all this, the mouse is absolutely miserly when it comes to power use. So much so, in fact, that I've been using mine with only a single AA battery in place.My two niggling irritations? The fact that the battery sensor tells only when your batteries are dead or dying is one. But I'll give based on the aforementioned efficiency. Secondly, the Logitech SetPoint is pre-programmed button mappings take some retooling to get the mouse working with more than a few common applications. That's okay with me too; I like that they allow you the control to change them at least.All in all an excellent product.
Ipod 60 GBPhoto. Very Good !  As far as the owner, the ipod is well take care
Flawless 10 Key Input. I am currently running an online business.  The expandability that this piece of equipment provides for our laptops is a great asset.
Mobility means outside in clear view of sky. This will be a great addition for listening pleasure if you are at the beach or in open areas. Since it requires the ability to get satelite reception- if you are under tree cover or inside a structure, reception will be spotty. Pops in and out of case great and works as advertised
Best value, but a little inconsistent. I was going on a 3 week trip, and so I bought three Lexar 512MB digital cards (one per week).  On my trip I found that two of the cards were able to store 351 images, while the third only fit 280 images.  All three cards were identical, and I only saved photos on all three (no videos), so it seemed strange that one card would have a smaller capacity than the others.  That said, I still had some free memory at the end of my trip, so it's not like my trip was ruined from missing out on 70 photos.  It just seems that the number of photos should be consistent in identical products, and I did not find that to be the case.  Aside from that, they say that this particular card is the best value you can get, and I found it to be efficient, perfectly-sized, and very fast to upload, all at a reasonable price.  That's why I give it 4 stars, docking 1 for the inconsistency I observed
great phone!. This phone is so cute and works great.  I have had it for 3 years now and it still works great.  I have it by my bedside and always have the ringer turned off but the wings and her wand still light up, which I like, then I can see it ringing during the day without having it on and waking me up at night.  I love it!!!  I have been a huge HK fan all my life and still buy as much of her as my husband can stand to have around our house.
Breif Review. I ordered 3 APC Back-UPS ES 500s on the recommendation of an employee of mine who used to work at APC. I've had them for about a month now without any problems. They've functioned properly through a few unexpected power interruptions. I'll gladly order more if the need arises.Pros:- Large plug spacing, good for power adapters- Simple design- Long cordCons:- No line conditioning (usually an expensive option
Great Bag... Fantastic Price. I just recently purchased this Laptop case and it fits my 17 inch HP like a glove.  it has 2 pockets on the outside to store powercords and Cat 5 cables if you go somewhere that is still in the dark ages.  It would have been nice to have a small seperate phone pocket but I am not complaining. I will recommend this bag to everyone of my friends and relatives if they ever get a huge beast of a machine like I got
HDTV. All I can say it is great.I am very satisfied with this TV and the delivery date was made no problems. Also no problems setting TV up. Works like a champ
Perfect for SOHO remote access. The Linksys BEFVP41 is perfect for remotely accessing a small home network with a static IP address. The connections are secure and the setup is extremely easy. Using tools such as the LinSys IPSec Tool, accessing one's home network is extremely easy. I recommend this product to any small- or even medium-sized office that wishes to connect multiple locations or support remote/roaming users
Midland Helmet Headset is a great buy!. This helmet headset mounts very easily and worked great
Very Good. The instructions were a little hard to follow.  The product works fine
Belkin 3 Button Mouse USB. Very nice size and very functional. I usually use a cordless but keep this in my desk drawer for when my battery runs out. It's quick and handy.
Great Product But.... The new iSkin is a great improvement because the whole iPod is covered.  It would be very hard for moisture to leak through this case!!!  My only complaint is that the new iTrip does not stay in the dock connector when the iSkin is on.  It does have an opening but it is not big enough for the iTrip to click in securely.  I am disappointed that neither comapny thought of this because I have always loved and used both products
Good product but expensive. I bought this DS-2300 to replace my DS-330.  The 330 had internal memory and I had to download every night after my 3-hour lecture.  The 2300 has external memory so that I can separate items (personal, school, work, etc) and it stores much more than the limited amount of memory on the 330.It has a nice size that is thin and fits into your pocket.  The memory life also seems to be pretty good on this.  As I had read on other reviews, the placement of the buttons might be a tad tricky, but so far no problems.My one complaint is that this recorder did *not* come with a case/pouch like the 330.  I went to the Olympus site and they offer one to European customers, but not U.S.Other than this drawback and the price, I am pleased on upgrading to the 2300
Amazing Batteries!. I've used a number of types of rechargeable batteries from various companies in the past. I bought these batteries to power my Olympus FL50 flash for my DSLR camera. Other rechargeable AA batteries only last for 150-200 flashes, with a slower and slower recycle time in between flashes. These Sanyo batteries lasted me over 1500 shots on one charge, with less than a second of recycle time in between flashes; that is simply amazing.I highly recommend these batteries to anyone who has a power intensive device that requires a quick recycle time
My favorite storage solution. I would like to second Aaron's review.  I've also had a hard time finding these.  Maybe it's an East Coast thing.  I use them to organize my music CD's, my computer program CD's, and my hard drive back ups.  The comments regarding the lack of space for liner notes are true, but that's not an issue for me, personally.  I find them very flexible, cost effective, and space saving.  I'm pretty excited to see them here at Amazon.
Awasome!!. The screen works perfectly!  If you take your laptop everywhere, this is a must have... even going into meeting at work.It does get dusty rather quickly which just mean that you have to wipe it more.  Not something to stop you from buying it
Great TV. The Flat LCD has bright color, decent sound, and many input options. I was dissapointed in the DVI input - I plugged my macbook pro in and found the image quite grainy.  I was also dissapointed with the composite in - I pluged my video ipod in and the resulting image wasn't great either.  All aside however, my xbox 360 going through the component looks fantastic. Even with games that have fast moving action, there is very little ghosting - the TV really keeps up.  The graphics look very sharp.  I played a DVD through the xbox and it looked very good as well. When I stopped thinking of this TV as a monitor I came to terms that the TV part is great, but it isn't a monitor.  The DVI port is a bit missleading.  There really should just be an HDMI port.  Overall though - great TV for little money
TERK HDTV Antenna. I bought this antenna for use with a new Samsung 40" LCD tv.I have always used rabbit ears for reception of our local philly stations on our old analog set.The intention was to mount this unit in the attic, so we would no longer require rabbit ears on our new high tv.Product is much larger than I expected, with a width of more than 2 feet, so if you plan on putting the antenna near the TV, I would reccomend a smaller one.I feel the quality of the unit is a little low. High winds could collapse the "arms" (unit comes collapsed) I would hesitate to mount this outside, but because I was mounting in the attic, it was not a concern of mine.when I got the antenna, I held it in my hand and hooked it up to our old set. I was not reassured. picture was much worse in all direstions than with rabbit ears.When I got the new TV, I hooked up rabbit ears to test it immediately before signing for delivery. Reception with just rabbit ears was already much better than my old set. It made me an immediate fan of the digital broadcasts. I recieved some "blocking" and cutting out of sound on some stations. Once the TV was connected to the Terk unit in the attic however, all stations came in perfectly. A great antenna, that does what it says. I would recommend something more substantial for mounting outside, and I would reccomend trying rabbit ears before splurging on this, but it does what I wanted and hoped for for my area. (outside philly 15 miles from towers).As always, service from Amazon was great. (I avoid other merchants due to hidden shipping charges and return policies
Great portable/exercise phones. Convenient, tiny, secure-fitting, super-comfortable.  Very decent sound quality for this price-range, too.I recently changed to using Koss KSC-75 clip ons, which sound significantly better, but are a little fussy to get fitting properly and aren't as secure and comfortable.Ultimately, I prefer the Koss clip-ons for the better sound, but these are probably a better option for exercise or for long-term wearing
Fantastic. The ice works well the auto mode is real simple and the unit corects the file for laying it on the scanner at weird angles
Awesome mobile mouse!. Not only is this mouse stylish and for a cause, it is very easy to use and a high quality product!  I love that the USB connector resides inside the mouse, so you can't lose it.  This mouse is extremely easy to set up when you are on the go and need something mobile.  It's comfortable and works extremely well.  I use in during all of my meetings and all of my coworkers want one!  I highly recommend this product
Absolutely Fantastic. I have tried to do this over the years with other products....with limited success. This one works perfectly. Very well engineered and thought out. A breeze to install. Rather exensive, but worh every penny
Excellent Printer. This printer is wonderful and the picture quality is superb and they are so clear.  I have a Cybershot T-1 camera and the combination is nice.  The printer speed was quick too! I couldn't believe how easy it was to connect the printer to the TV and view the pictures that I had stored on my camera and edit the pictures using a remote control.  I would recommend this printer because of the easy setup, quick printing speed, and excellent quality of the pictures
Great Features and Performance. So far the APC Back-UPS RS1500VA has been working very well. It switches over to battery power instantly without so much as a flicker on my monitor. The features are excellent in my opinion, with adjustable settings for voltage and noise levels. The description of the unit does not say whether or not it is generator compatible, but the manual seems to hint that the unit can be adjusted to work with a generator.The unit has plenty of reserve power for multiple or prolongled outages, and the control program lets you specify how long to wait before shutting down your system. The-power out alarm can also be adjusted to not sound during certain times such as at night when people are sleeping, or can be turned off altogether.The build quality of the unit seems to be excellent and the case is quite sturdy. I've owned APC products before and they have been of excellent quality too, this one is no exception
Good Radio with that price. Pro-good reception. I used it in the bus.Con-Don't have pre-station saving feature. Don't have lock button function therefore buttons are easy touched.Delivery is fast as promised
Kingston 1GB Data traveler. Excellent product at a great price.  Shipping was quick.  Never had a problem with Amazon vendors
Best for the money...for a musician. The M-Audio Audiophile 2496 is probably the best all-around soundcard available today. I am a musician, so for me, recording in a high quality was very important, and the gsif support was the main reason I purchased this. For the non-musician though, this soundcard might be passed up for the simple reason of convenience.The Audiophile uses RCA jacks, not the common stereo jacks (1/8" or 1/4") found on the cheap soundcard most computers come with. So if you want this to work with a typical set of computer speakers, you'll need an RCA to stereo adapter.I recommend this heartily to any musician, but to the non-musician, a simpler, less powerful soundcard is definitely recommended
Doesn't like cold windshields. I have found that this suction cup tends to fall of when the windshield gets cold.  A little saliva on the suction cup prior to putting it up tends to help.  You can also mount the suction cup on the dashboard using the disk provided.  A good idea if you have a deep dashboard.
Beats Sony and Samsung by a long shot. No HDCP handshake issues as are often found on the Sony playersDetachable power cable, beats sony player.Upgradable firmware, beats sony player.Region coding, beats sony player.The overall look and design build is not quite as good as the sony player, however it FUNCTIONs much better.Basically if you are looking for a pretty DVD player w/ sub par functions get a sony.If you want a fully functional upscaling DVD player that is future proof thanks to firmware upgrades, you can not go wrong for this price
Happy linux gamer. I ordered this item because I only had a 64mb TNT Riva 2 card, which wasn't giving a great performance, and because I was able to find it cheap.  After installing it, there was minimal hassle getting it to work in Ubuntu 6.06, and it ran smoothly after that.  I've been able to crank up the details in the games I play and still get a decent FPS rate, but found that it might be underclocked, I plan on taking it to a friends to have him take a look
Sony headphones. Great crystal clear sounding lightweight headphones make my Ipod sound fantastic. I'm hearing parts of songs I was never quite able to hear clearly
Good sound quality, awkward microphone. Provides good sound quality and comfort.  The main drawback is the microphone is a clip on and has no good spot on the headphones or the wire that would make it easy to use.  Other than that great headphones
Brighter colors and more reliable!. Generic refills are cheaper but the colors aren't as vivid and consistent!  I never use generic!  Trust the name you trusted your printer with when you bought it-- HP!  Can't beat the quality
Fantastic, well-built Radio AND LED Light source. Very well built, right down to the battery compartment! This is a very sensitive receiver, with DEPENDABLE analog tuning. The LED light source is bright. The switches are logical in their placement. I own SIX of these radios. These are stored for emergency use. Think about this the next time you have a power outage at your house: A radio with a light source is not only useful for you as an adult to listen to the weather and news, it comforts children with that light! It also gives them something to do, 'learning' about radio and electricity in general. One radio for EACH child means that you will always have a working unit on hand--here redundancy counts! And GUESS WHAT! IF you break a whip antenna, ETON CARRIES REPLACEMENT PARTS that you can order right from their web site!!! Now, how many times have you seen a radio manufacturer that actually carries parts? I haven't had such parts availability since about the 1960's!
Great cooler, comact enough to travel with. This cooler works very well and gives on one extra USB port. It's light and compact enough to fit in a laptop bag or backpack
LNS-4696D Rocks. Gorgeous black laquer box with swivel stand hold a remarkable LCD screen.Image quality, color and contrast are outstanding.Just hooked my set up to the Tivo Series 3 DVR and am very happy with combination.  Only nit is that I don't think the TV support 480i over HDMI so I need to tell the Tivo to send 1080i to the TV. I was worried about what that would do to 720P it looks fine.Likes:Picture qualityHousing (real sharp modern look)Being able to set image settings for each inputSwivel StandNice remoteNits:No 480i support over HDMINo optical audio in (only out)Wiselink for image display from USB useless images are not display full screen in slide mode. (try the photos.[...]support on Tivo S3 for that!
Rockin labels. These labels are great.  I use them in my business with the Dymo 400 to make bar code labels and for sale stickers.  They are just the right size to put on my product for customers to see and for the employees to find the barcodes and scan.  Dymo has saved me alot of money with this product
Simply perfect for the money. As above, they simply sound great for the money.  And they have a volume thing in the wire, witch is great for when you have the ipod in the pocket or something.  When I got this thing I also got sony and Griffins "earphones" but I didn't like those fittings at all.  I only use this now
Peace of mind for the MacBook owners/lovers !!!. Hi there,I am writing this review after having used the product for almost 2 months now. From the moment I bought my MacBook, I was looking for a case that would protect my macbook without sacrificing it's look. The very reason many people buy a mac is for it's beautiful design and who in the world would want to spoil that look and how would you actually do that without hurting it by day to day use? Voila! I came across this product. The case is pretty hard plastic and has some nice cuts that gives good grip while holding/carrying the macbook. It covers the macbook completely at the top and at the bottom with openings on the sides for the different ports. There are fin like openings on the bottom case for heat to dissipate. That way you wouldn't have to worry about the macbook overheating.The only thing bothers me with this product is that once you put it in on your mac, it is difficult to remove it. I sometimes feel that I might damage the egdes when trying to open. This may also be because I am not doing it the right way ;-)But anyways, I would recommend this product for any macbook lover that wants to protect it from being scratched or damaged.Lok
Great Value and Impressive Features. I bought the Ebookman 901 without knowing anything about it, and I have been very pleasantly surprised at how versatile it is. Just add a 128 MB MMC card (which are now pretty reasonable on E-bay) and you can have 2 hours of music to go! I have another 64 MB MMC card in it on which I have all the books I have downloaded. A 64 MB card will hold almost 100 regular books! The MobiPocket Reader is great for casual reading, and the Franklin Reader has all the navigation features to make it great for references. I can read any book in HTML or TXT format, and there are thousands for free on the web. The Ebookman also has some nice accessories like a car stereo adaptor and an AC adaptor for home use. The PDA functions like Address Book and Memo Book and Date Book are very handy. There are some really fun games. I take this unit when I am traveling, and am never bored. I think if you read the manual and learn how to use it properly, you will love this device. And now you can find them on E-bay and Heartland America for less than 50 bucks. WOW
I think I made the right choice. I gave my son a Garmin 60C for Christmas last year. Tinkered with it for a couple of days before handing it over. It worked well. Of course I wanted one for myself, but cash is cash, so I've been putting it off. (Side note - I wanted to borrow it for a trip this past spring, and when they went to get it, it had been stolen from their car map-pocket. It seems these are high-theft items; keep'em on a short leash.) My wife hadn't gotten me any "big" Christmas gift, so I told her I knew what I wanted, and started shopping. I debated between the eXplorist 500 and 600. Chose the 600, with its altimeter and thermometer. Probably could have lived without them, but hey, it's Christmas!It came yesterday, so I charged it a bit, and then it had no trouble finding 4 satellites under my deciduous tree cover. I had to go out to the street for the Garmin to find satellites. Took it out for a spin today. Spot-on navigation as I ran errands. It tracked back almost to the exact spot I had marked for home, though it had me driving down the wrong side of the street on that portion of my route that was a duplicate - so it's off by a few feet. (Maybe it still thinks it's in Britain?)Now - why only 4 stars? 1) the USB connector can attach to the unit either way. There's no instructions anywhere to say which way it should go. I called the 800 # and spoke with someone (in New Delhi) who had heard this a lot. She told me what to do, and the PC immediately recognized the GPS file system - as a removable disk drive, as advertised. I really find their Website information near-zero. Something as elementary as this should be covered on a Website after the 3rd call, eh?2) I bought the Mapsend 3D Topo software. I am interested in elevations. And it has detailed street maps. BUT - they're not routable! If you want routable streets (where the unit will route you along streets and not just a crow's flight direct path) for following in a car, then either you have to get both map products, or choose. It's rather frustrating. And the sales information provided on Amazon and the Magellan sites does not make this critical lack very clear. It tells you what you can do, but not what you can't and there's no product comparison to see what the differences are. On the Mapsend Topo box, it says very clearly, "NAVTEQ roads and streets data - like that found in the most expensive car navigation systems (non-routable)". Er, excuse me, then it's not quite like that found in expensive car systems, is it? I concur with other reviewers who find the software selection verbiage (on Amazon and Magellan) more obfuscating than informative. Why can't someone create a simple comparison chart for all the various map packages
No more interference!. My old one was giving me nothing but problems. The D-Link works like a dream even on the other side of the apartment. No more dropped signals
You won't be disappointed. I was looking to up-grade my photographic printer and researched The Pro 9000. This printer does a fantastic job, consumes less ink than comparable Epsom printers, and has exceeded my expectations on print quality. Well worth the money if you are serious about your printed images and do not want to keep going to a lab to print your work
Beats the iPod by a longshot!. This is a great MP3 player. It sounds, looks, and feels better than an iPod. The storage capacity is huge. There are only 2 problems.1)The screen is really hard to see in the sun(this might only be with silver, I don't know).2)The software is great, if you're used to it, but, is a little slow compared to Windows Media Player of iTunes.Overall, it is worth more than you pay for. Just buy it
Surely, not just another run of the mill DVD player!. One of the best buys for a DVD player even at 2x the price. Too bad it's silver and has a 'thin' tray
Super Sticks!. I just received my Soundsticks yesterday and could not be happier with their performance. I am using them to listen to streaming audio on my PC from a radio station in Italy that plays jazz and the nuances of that style of music are well suited to the Sound Sticks. The sleekness of the design is superb as well. The nice price makes this purchase a home run
Love these!. I've been buying the same ones for over two years now and I've never had a complaint about them. I think I might have had two broken ones in over 700 I've ordered. I love the clear backs, as I insert the song list behind the CD so I can see what's on there without opening the case.A great buy IMHO.
Great media player. I'm not someone that is hardcore ipod or hardcore microsoft.  I just wanted a good media player that was simple to use and that had plenty of features.  The Zune fits what I wanted perfectly.  There are several pros and cons to the Zune.The screen is a great size.  The player appears to be a bit wide, but it's not that big of a deal and the weight is just about right.  I wish it came with some of the basic accessories, but it doesn't.  Instead you have to pay big bucks to buy a few extra necessary pieces (AC adapter for example).  You can use the included usb cable to charge it, but at some point you will want the AC adapter.  The battery life is good, but not perfect.  I would like to see some additional battery life out of it.  The controls are easy to use and the menu options are exactly what you need.  The menus aren't cluttered, but they provide just enough navigation.You should definitely let the device upgrade its firmware when you first plug it in.  There have been several major updates.  The Zune software works just fine.  Overall, the software and device are simple to use, quick, and deliver exactly the content I want without a hassle.  I have been very pleased with my purchase.  I considered waiting for a second release of the Zune, but I decided to give this one a shot.  I'm glad I did.
The Best Earphones Ever. I have to tell you that i've always hated earphones. They were always falling out of my ears and the sound was terrible. They never had the one thing I craved, BASS!!! I read most of the reviews about these earphones at Amazon and I was sold. My dreams have finally came true, these are the best earphones for my 80gb ipod that I ever had. The BASS IS OUTSTANDING and I only spent $119.99 + $9.99(s/h) at EBAY! I have small ears and these fit perfectly (it comes with 3 different size earplugs) I am very skeptical so I want to tell all my other fellow skeptics to buy these earphones a.s.a.p!!!!
Works well on my Mac. I needed a good mike to cut the echo when using Skype. This mike fills the bill. It is directional so the speakers don't feed back into it causing the people on the other end of Skype to hear themselves talk. Just what I needed
Good item. I have a svideo-rca cable but my Dell 700M doesn't reconize the TV input. So I tried this one and it works great! I will give it 5 stars if they can charge a more reasonable shipping. $11 bucks for a simple adaptor is too expensive in my opinion
Nice A/V receiver. A quality receiver for your home theater. Sounds and looks good at a great price
Canon printer ink. Excellent quality.  A bit more expensive than the "compatible" brands, but worth it for the reliability
Buy the extension cable for the antenna. If you plan to buy this and cannot mount the antenna outside, forget it. I tried it in two windows with no luck. I ended up having to run the wire throught the window and outside, it looks ugly for now but it works great. When I receive the extension I plan to run it alongside my TV cable wire and around the foundation of the house. Great sound when connected to my home stereo system. Between the car, the home dock, and the internet radio-I think I end up listening to Sirius about 6-8 hours a day. I don't think it will ever get old either
Exceptional High Capacity Zippered CD Wallet. I like accessories that are functional and really work as they were intended and designed. Such is the case with this product. It holds CDs securely and safely. There is also room for accompanying booklets, manuals and the like. This CD Wallet is well thought out, functional and very durable.
Great set. Great set.  Wonderful picture.  Lots of inputs - including a cablecard which I love.  Great 1080i.  Don't know how it handles 1080p since I don't have my PS3 - yet.  Not clear if it will do 1080p on the HDMI although the specs are clear it will do that on the components.Only some oddball things annoy me:* Very hard to set favorite channels.  Just gave up.* Labelling of the channels does not include channel logos (like my LG does; great feature)* Lack of a guide.  Kind of stupid to have a cablecard and have to switch to the Comcast STB to see what's on.* PIP seems to be restrictive on what can be in the main picture.  You can put the digital tuner in the PIP but you can't activate the PIP if the digital tuner is the main picture (not the PIP)* Menu system is slow.  Often you click the remote and the menu doesn't change.  Thought for a while the remote signal did not register but now think the menu is just slow and misses the signal
Good for the car too. I have a Kenwood Sirius setup in my car, but the antenna connection became loose so I tried this one out as a replacement and surprisingly it fits much better than the Kenwood one - even though all my gear is Kenwood branded. The snug fit and larger antenna size contribute to a more reliable signal with noticeably less dropouts than before
Cheap way to make editing movies a ton easier. I bought this little gadget thinking "Its cheap enough I  won't care if it doesn't work good."  Now, I can't imagine using iMovie or Final Cut Express without it.  The jog and shuttle controls make it very easy and quick to zip through video clips or to fine tune the position, frame by frame.  The keys across the top are all programmable to issue the keys you want.  You don't have to take the stock pre-programmed keys that come as defaults.If you tinker with editing videos the ShuttleXpress is a no-brainer
Neat!. Yeah... I like this one... it is so choice... if you have the means I highly recomend picking one u
Does everything it should. I use my USB hub every day and it works fine with every device I plug into it
Great Buy. This is the second case i have purchased for my iPod. The first had a flip top, and it was alright, but it started making permenant scuffs on the screen... i just got this case today, and i LOVE it! it protects the screen and the dial and it's so secure! this is definitly worth every penny!
Just enough. I bought this card because I was in a particular jam.  I had to tailor my video card purchase not to my bank account, but to my power supply.  The eVGA card was one of the few decent cards that would work with a 250w power supply, which is what my Dell box has. I know the eVGA box says 300w minimum, but their website says 250w.  The card works GREAT for Battlefield 2142, the reason I bought the card.  I even have the details cranked up to medium and am now seeing things that I didn't see at the low setting.  No lag induced by the eVGA video card and again, if you like Battlefield 2142, this is a GREAT, inexpensive way to get into the gam
Great Little Sub Woofer. I have this attached to my inMotion Treo 650 speaker/cradle at work and everybody says they can't believe the sound is coming from such a small system. For the price, you can't go wrong. It ROCKS!!
Sanus TV Turntable. This product does exactly what it's supposed to do.  I can easily swivel my tv around with one finger, and it doesn't damage the tabletop (don't forget to stick the rubber tips that come with the turntable on the bottom).  Yes, I'm very happy with this purchase
Very nice. This Sleeve is very good looking and smart. Only thing I don't like is that the 13" Macbook JUST fits in it. Therefore when zipping it up the zipper does catch slightly on the macbook.
Picture and sound are good, but setup is unnecessarily complicated. Olevia doesn't make setup of this TV as simple as it should be.  Not only is a printed manual not provided, but the on-screen setup menu is the least intuitive menu I've ever worked with.Our TV reception is satellite via Dishnetwork.  I also recently purchased a Sharp Aquos LCD TV, and setup for that was a breeze -- plug it in, attach coaxial cable, turn it on, and it does the rest iteself.  Easy and quick.But after connecting this set to the coaxial cable and plugging it in, I couldn't get a picture or sound.  I read through the manual-on-CD and tried the on-screen menu -- no help.  I finally searched through Olevia's website -- and found step-by-step instructions.  About 10 steps via the remote are required.  Very nice that the info was there, but it also should be in the manual!  The reason for this is, according to their website, that the TV as it is shipped is set for showrooms, NOT consumers.  Ergo all the extra 10 or so steps that ARE NOT DESCRIBED IN THE CD MANUAL.  If you get this set, do this:  bypass the manual and the on-screen menu during installation and go straight to their website instead.Okay, besides that, the TV is fine.  I've only had it a day and have no other complaints or problems.  However, it makes no sense to me why Olevia would prepare their TVs for showrooms and not consumers.Note:  I chose this item based on Consumer Reports ratings.  Also, I didn't purchase it from Amazon, but instead from another online vendor.  I'm curious if others who did purchase via Amazon had similar experiences with their Olevia LCD TVs.
A wonderful unit. I researched what was the best 5 disc changer and this has all the needed features. Continues to get high marks from various consumer groups. Sometimes I have trouble with the automatic play the next dics but I think that is due to a setting I have incorrect. This is the second one I have purchased. First one the power switch is bad we think and it was less money to purchase new than fix. Will probably fix first on the cheap and give to a friend. Then if second one does same thing we know how to fix it.Overall a great playe
Excellent Piece of Work !. Works like a charm, the Wi-Fi sniffer in the software is definitely a big plus ! You can get details of the connection i.e. connection strength, AP name and etc. Worth every penny
Lexar Multi Card Reader. Completely satisfied with the Lexar Media Multi Card Reader. Simple and easy to use
I love this radio - For it's AM reception. I've had several pocket radios and this one is the best I've had.  I use it mostly for AM.  This radio's reception often impresses me.  I can now pick up AM stations in places where other radios only gave me static.I like the placement of the buttons, they're good sized, well spaced, and easy to get to without having to remove the radio from my pocket.  The memory buttons are right on top so they're easy to get to as well.  Screen is good size and easy to read.  Unit also has a button to boost bass if needed.  It's a very easy to use radio.Some negatives to pass on:FM reception is decent, nothing spectacular, and TV reception is so-so.  I don't use it much for those two bands so it doesn't matter to me.  If your planning to buy it for FM you may want to do some more research before buying, I suspect there's better pocket radios for FM.Also, I wasn't too crazy about the earbuds that came with it.  The sound was so-so and the ones I already owned were better so they're the ones I use.Overall I'm glad I bought this radio.
Perfect first guitar. We bought this guitar for my 9 year old son.  He loves it.  It plays just like a full size guitar only smaller.  He is now taking lessons with this guitar.  The only problem I can see is that the finish scratches easily
Best buy. Shure is the always sure about its quality. Pay less money still the best product. Do not try anything else, just try shure
Rf Remote Front Row. It is easy to use and works great for me. It gives me more options with the Remote Body software
Awesome product. This stand was a perfect fit for my keyboard.  Instructions were easy to read and item was easy to put together.  Hightly recommend this product
Good deal for the price, if you are able to get a hold of this tuner... It was a bit of a wait in order to get the item, and in the end I ended up getting it through an outside seller via Amazon (meaning I had to pay shipping).  Regardless, Samsung made another great product at a low price point.  Works fantastically with my 32" Samsung LTP-326W LCD
Amazing Value, Amazing Quality. I bought this TV as a birthday present for a friend, somewhat skeptical of the price considering the size of the unit.  In reality, the TV turned out to be the best purchase I could have made - it works perfectly, it's unbelievably affordable, and it's got a great picture quality.  The specs are identical to pricer models with brand names.  I fully intend to get one for myself
xD M-512MB Memory Card. This definitely has expanded my picture taking ability and its fast. WORTH THE PRICE
Works well. The picture is great.  The audio is not as loud as I would like
Excellent product!. Delphi SA10103 SKYFi2 Home Adapter Kit was exactly what I needed with my new XM radio. Easy to assemble, installed it into my stereo and voila! Satellite radio
Nice, but a tie wrap is still needed. I bought this and had it hard mounted to my little seadoo jetboat.  It works nicely, but the bumping in and out of the water causes the locking mechanism to slide over to the unlocked position frequently (like within 2 minutes).  The product should have been designed to accommodate this problem.  I have put a little piece of plastic in the groove that the slider slides in and secured that piece of plastic by wrapping a tie wrap around the entire GPS and GPS holder.  Now it is secure, but looks a little stupid
Great Product but BE CAREFUL with the CLEAR FILM. I got this item for christmas. I wanted it because the Apple "Nano Tubes" are HORRIBLE. Anyway, the leather case is very attractive and the iSnug logo is barely visible on there. It fits in the travel case great. The clear overlay, though, was great but I took it off too much and had to throw it away. The 2 velcro strips that came with it, I have no idea what they are for but who cares, that is just me. This product is AWESOME overall. Bummer that I ruined the fil
Very Good Case. Very good case for my black iPod-NANO.While browsing to find the ideal Nano-Case, I read in a previous review for this product that some kind of plastic was included in the package for Nano-screen protection, and that it was a useless, cheap piece of plastic.In my opinion, this plastic protection, has turned out to be an EXCELLENT protection for my Nano-Screen.  This "plastic" sticks nicely to the screen, and has NO ADHESIVE whatsoever, so you can remove and reapply very easily, leaving not a single trace on your Nano-screen (no bubbles either while on the Nano-screen).The case itself is pretty rugged and offers excellent protection to my tiny iPod.  It does add some bulk (not much), but at least, I'm now having less trouble finding the Nano over my cluttered desktop !!All buttons and connections are easily accesible while wearing the case, so there's really no need to be taking the Nano out of its protection.Looks are great and high quality details.I give this product a 4-star rating only because no instructions were included in the box for the correct application of the Nano-screen protection.  Otherwise this product would be a 5+
It's called the Ultra Mini for a reason!. This review pertains specifically to the Targus PAUH217U 4 Port Ultra Mini USB 2.0 Hub.The cord is about 2.5 feet long - long enough to reach from my pc, which sits on the ground, to the top of the desk. It has a cable which is split into two USB plugs - one just to transmit data, the second to power the unit. The second plug does not need to be used unless you plan on using some heavy-duty hardware, and if so what are you buying a hub called the ultra mini for anyways? If you insist on trying to run a blow dryer off the thing, then it does have an input for a separate power source, which you will have to buy separately.In short, If you have an old school machine with USB ports which are inaccessible /inconvenient to use, this little hub will give you quick access while taking up minimal space on your desk
Excellent transaction. The product arrived in excellent condition and much earlier than I had expected it too.Cheers,
A wonderful addtion. My son is a Marine over in Iraq and this was something he brought to my attention as being GREAT to have to go with his Rhino.  He absolutely loved it
Best Label for the best line of label printers. Clear labels blend in well on any envelope.  DymoLabel writers deserve the best...buy'em clear label
Great DVD cases but another Blatant Example of Amazon.com Price Gouging. The thing that upsets me about Amazon.com and the reason I seldom buy anymore from them are their moving prices. Sometimes the prices move as often as hourly and in very large amounts. These are wonderful DVD cases that I bought from Amazon.com two days ago for the regular price of $5.95. These very same cases today have a regular price of $12.24. That is more then a 200% mark up and is absolutely ridiculous. I can buy these very same cases at my local Meijer today for $6.95. Shame on you Amazon.com for these pricing practices
great speed. the best on the market.make dvd and cd with no hassle.good product for good price.would recommend it any time
FX -115ES Calculator Review. For the price, I really liked this calculator, which I use for straight forward engineering calculations.  I have grown to like the natural display which reduces errors when multiplies and divides are used.  My one disappointment involved complex numbers.  While simple math can be done, one cannot take the sine or exponental of a complex variable
Can't go wrong with Intel 2.4. Just installed it in my machine.  Make sure you read the directions about installing the heat sink.  You can damage the plastic footings if not carefu
A beautiful display!. I've just replaced my ViewSonic VX924 gaming LCD with the Samsung 226BW. Wow, what an amazing display! It's 1000x1 contrast ratio is stellar. Blacks are extremely black and there is virtually no backlight bleed. (Backlight bleed tends to make black or dark colors look gray and it's common with LCDs.) The colors are amazingly bright and vivid.  In fact its default settings are almost too bright. Fortunately the 226BW comes preprogrammed with multiple screen modes such as Games, Internet, Movies, Sports, Custom, Default, etc. I prefer the Internet setting as the backlight is turned down to about 75% and it's a lot easier on my eyes in a darkly lit room. The default settings would work best if you are in a brightly lit room, or if you plan on using the display at a distance.The screen has an amazingly fast response time. Samsung claims 2ms gray to gray. I have no way to verify this, but I haven't seen any motion blur when I play video games. Viewing angles are also superior with this screen. I can be quite a ways off center and colors are still vivid and crisp. My old display would look washed out and gray at almost any angle other than directly in front.Keep in mind that this screen runs natively at 1650x1050. It's a rather high resolution for older video cards and if you have an old system then you may experience some stuttering. My 226BW is connected to an ATI Radeon X850XT video card with an AGP 8X interface.  I can play Elder Scrolls: Oblivion with most settings maxed using the screen's native resolution and it looks and plays beautifully. Remember to install the monitor drivers. They are available for both Windows Vista and XP. You can either use the included CD, download them directly from Samsung, or use Windows Update. (I used Windows Update since those drivers are signed.) The drivers aren't required, but it does make the monitor more compatible with the system.The Samsung 226BW has HDCP support through its DVI cable connection which gives it more future compatibility. Soon all monitors will need HDCP support in order to play HD video content. I don't need it now, but it's nice to know it's there.If you really want the best picture out of this display, be sure to use a DVI video cable. (A 3 foot DVI cable and 3 foot VGA cable is included with the display.) VGA is an old style analog connection which was best used with CRT (tube style) monitors. Since LCDs are digital not analog, a digital signal is the best. If you use the VGA connection your video card has to convert the digital signal to analog, then transmit it to the display and the display has to reconvert it back to digital. That's two unneeded video conversions which can result in a washed out picture. With the DVI connection, it's a digital signal directly from the video card to the display with no video conversion, so you get the best picture.I do have two very minor negatives. Both involve the stand. First, the stand does not pivot sideways for portrait style viewing. That's nothing I would use, but many monitors have this option. Second, a wall mounting bracket is not included even though the Samsung 226BW is wall mountable. If you need to wall mount the display, the bracket needs to be purchased separately.Bottom line: The Samsung 226BW is definitely worth the purchase and I know you won't be disappointed!
excellent HP Scanjet 7800 Document Scanner. HP Scanjet 7800 Document ScannerThis scanner worked flawlessly as described
i was dock skeptical at first. ...but then I bought one in a Zoom vending machine at an airport. Aside from the idea of being able to use it to hook my iPod up to a TV or stereo, I'm surprised at how much I like it.I bought this one and sent it to my mom, when she told me her arthritis, made it hard to unhook the iPod from the USB wire. I knew immediately that this dock would make her iPod life easier. She too, loves the dock as much as the iPod. It's great for her to be able to just slip the iPod on and off to be charged. For me, hearing from her, how easy it was, made the price well worth it
Dang good. Seemingly built solid, sound very good. Only complaint is that they appear to be built to be mounted using brackets that I have not been able to locate yet. Still, they sound better than other speakers I have heard for the money. PS - I don't give anything 5 stars unless it is perfect, which not much is
Works well BUT...... It is a very good product ,but the problem I had was that all of my antenna's connectors are 90deg. You can still use it like this but the rubber boot will not cover the connection. I purchased another antenna and still had to remove parts to get it to work.It was kind of a pain but wish I could have found more specifications before my purchase
Wow .... I got these speakers as a gift, then found them here on Amazon.  They are amazingly good for the price.  Mine even came with an AC adapter so I could save on the batteries!  However, it doesn't charge your ipod, thus only 4 stars.
Great Product. My daughter is very happy with the product. She not only got the MP3 player she wanted, she also got her favorite color "PINK". Thought we got a great deal and it has been working wonderfully. Infact, my son is now jealous that his younger sister has a better MP3 player than he has
Great Bench for the Price. For approximately $26 dollars, this is a great bench.  It doesn't take up a lot of room, it's sturdy and great for a portable keyboard
Love it! Love it Love it!. I most definately recommend this label maker!!!!!!  i love it!  I do a lot of labeling and the label tape has lasted a long time! I am so impressed for the price!!!
Neat, well made & surprisingly large amount of storage space. I bought this case for an HP Photosmart A516 printer and it's absolutely ideal for this printer and the other HP printers of the same dimensions. Although the case looks small and sleek when closed, it actually has space for a surprisingly large amount of 'stuff' - Obviously the main compartment holds the printer itself, but there are various other useful slots and spaces to pop your AC and USB cables, the battery, a pack of paper and a few other small items you might want to carry. The bag also has light padding throughout which adds a certain amount of protection from bumps, and a sturdy, quite comfortable shoulder strap. A well designed bag all round, IMHO.
Good price and quality. Terrible smell!. Can't beat the price. Quality is good. Smell stinks
Works Great. Does exactly what it was supposed to. Menu was a little hard to figure out, but that seems to be common with stereo recievers. Sound is fine and the remote is nice (only complaint would be that it would be nice if there was bass control on the controller so I wouldn't have to edit it via the actual reciever). Good for the price
At last --- a substantial shredder. After two other shredders that failed, this is a brute!It does not even slow down with a big load.  The rollers are a convenience and the use of a bag makes emptying very clean and easy
Very Cool & Convenient!. This is an AWESOME little device.Let me start with the pros:1) EASY: Incredibly easy setup (literally press one button - never believed it, but it's true. Plug in the usb transmitter, press the blue button & voila.)2) GOOD SOUND: For a small set of speakers, these things sound great. They are not going to compare to speakers hooked up to your rack stereo system, but sound very good and comparable to a $45 two-speaker set of monitor-side speakers. There's a built in sub-woofer that helps as well.3) WIRELESS RANGE: With 4 AA batteries, you can carry this little guy around your whole house - and outside your house. Reception is great. I am used to bluetooth headsets that don't really work much further than 10 feet from the phone - I had doubts about bluetooth speakers, but I am amazed with reception these guys have.4) CONTROLS: the Forward, Reverse & Pause buttons on the speaker work fine with both Media Player or Yahoo Music Engine running on the laptop(the only two I tried). Again, I was surprised, but they worked flawlessly.5) COOL: As far as cool factor, this little guy is definitely that.Cons:1) NO REMOTE: It would be nice if there was a remote control for the unit that would allow you to control the sound, FF, RW, Pause, Play controls.2) NO CONTROL FROM PC: You can't control the sound (or mute) from the laptop - only from the speakers.3) SOUND: Above I said the sound was good - and it is considering the size of this system. However, these are small speakers and a mini-sub and the sound is thus somewhat small too. It's good, but it's not going to compare to a quality set of speakers hooked up to your rack stereo system. There is base but not a great deal - you definitely won't feel the music with these speakers.4) VOLUME: Volume is limited - it's enough to fill a mid-sized room, but not much more.For $100, this is an outstanding little speaker system that does an amazing job with NO WIRES. Carry it to your kid's room. To the garage. To the basement. No wires, nothing.If convenience is and portability is important to you, and if medium sound quality is ok, then I would HIGHLY recommend this speaker system. It's great.Personally, I'm not sure if I'm going to keep them because I would really like fuller sound (this was an attempt at easy speakers for my living room) and more base - but they're so cool and convenient, that I doubt I'll be able to give them up!FOR OTHER BLUETOOTH IDEAS AND WI-FI NETWORK OPTIONS, see my post at the Hydrogen Audio forum: [...]
Good choice for the outdoors. Has much better range than the old 2 watt and works well in hilly terrain.  Headsets perform well and are fairly comfortable
Great especially for old CD-reader. I used several high speed CD-R disks to burn music CD for my 1998 car. However, they just cannot be readable. But this CD-R has multiple written speeds, so it can burn a great CD suitbale for the old CD in my car as well as new CD of course.
A Bargin And Worth Every Penny. My wife and I have owned this projector for 4 months and we couldn't be happier.  The 108" picture in our setup is bright and the colors true, even in room light that washed out our last projector's picture.  It can't compete with sunlight (what affordable projector can?) but when the sun goes down or the curtains are closed, the picture rocks.Since HD isn't availble in our area, I can't report how HDTV looks, but the 1080i picture from my XBox and my upconversion DVD player's 720p picture looks flawless.I would have liked to see more connection options - at least 2 HDMI ports would have been welcome.  I also experienced an error that I gather from my research is fairly common: I shutdown the projector, but the fan wouldn't stop running.  It happened only once and it was solved by unplugging the unit from the wall, but it was a black mark in an otherwise flawless performance.Highly recommended.  We couldn't be happier
Funky Keyboard. I'm with the first reviewer for this product. This keyboard brings my mood up just looking at it. The mouse runs nice and smooth. The keyboard itself runs great too. The mouse lights up and is clear on the bottom. Very weird to see the chip, but cool
Great Product that works!. I was contemplating all sorts of $$$$ home theater controllers, and decided to give this thing a shot. I was fully prepared to have to call technical support and go through brian surgery to figure this thing out.Well, to my pleasant surprise, the PC software installed on my laptop without a hitch, it was immeidately detected by the PC through the provided USB cable, and the software wizard walked me through everything very intuitively and the controller was managing all of my equipment (Adcom, Sony, Cable Box with DVR, 10 year old Laser Disc player, brand new TV, Sanyo Projector...etc.) without fault in less than 30 minutes from box opening to deployment.The ability to name the buttons is great and its size and display are perfect with a very kool blue glow for the buttons that is activated when it detects being picked up.  Comes with a nice charger so you never have to replace batteries either.Best money spent, great value, and it WORKS. I cannot imagine running my gear without it.  Very easy to use by all genders of all ages.I have no idea why anyone would want to spend $3,000 and have custom programming done for some of the larger controllers - unless you have really bad eyes and need the larger LCD display those controllers offer or if you have a burning need to put your hometheater installers kids through college.
Great Mouse. I love this Trackball mouse. I have an IMAC G5 and just couldn't get used to the mouse that came with it. I have limited space for a mouse. Before getting the Kensington Trackball, I was constantly moving my keyboard over so I could use the mouse then moving it back so I could type.  The Kensington Trackball works great for me because it stays in one place, so now my keyboard can stay put also.I'm very satisfied with it.
Its the best for me. When I ordered this webcam I never know it would be so easy to install and use, plus the clear images, pictures and videos are great, now I'm enjoying my PC more than before, The Mic and headphone are so great and helpful too..Awsome!!
Computer lock. My daughter that is serving in the military in Africa asked for this item so she could try and keep her laptop a little more secure.  She said it was easy to understand to use and like it
Great TV. As with other reviewers, I also researched LCD TVs before purchasing the Panasonic TH-42PX600U plasma.  I currently use cable with the cable card ($120 to purchase through cable company) due to limited satellite reception.I strongly considered purchasing a Samsung 40" LCD or Sony 40" LCD, but found the Panasonic Plasma better at handling faster movements (sports, action movies, etc.).  I also have a 32 inch LNS3241D Samsung LCD which is a great TV.  I recommend the Panasonic if your considering a large flat screen TV.I would highly recommend this Panasonic Plasma TV.  I would also recommend looking at the Samsung for smaller rooms.  The Panasonic Plasma beats the larger Samsung LCDs for overall sound and picture.  Great TV for the price ($1400 shipped)
Works fine, as promised, but power adapter noisy. The adapter that powers this thing makes an annoyingly loud buzzing sound.  Since this is a product for (presumably) home audio, it's actually somewhat annoying.  You won't really notice it when the sound is on, as long as you're listening above a whisper; you can also replace the adapter with a different one if it gets to aggravating (like I did.)  The conversion itself works great.  For the money, it's a great buy
We love it!. We bought this TV 3 months ago and don't regret it one bit.  It was delivered right to our door in a timely manner and in perfect condition.  We do not have satellite or cable (only reg. antenna) and were very pleased to find that we get so many more channels now and much much clearer reception now that we are picking up the "digital" signals.  Again, we love it and would reccomend it to anyone wanting to move up to HD
Excellent Privacy Filter. This product definitley lives up to the name.  An individual must be directly behind you and at eye level in order to see your screen (pretty much on your back).  Very easy to attach/detach for every situation
Labeling tape. I use this 1/2" tape on all types of surfaces, it sticks well and is easy to read
Feng Shui for your Digital Audio Workstation. After 15 years using a Roland U-20 as a midi controller I began to wonder if upgrading would ever be needed. I figured all I needed was something that could trigger midi notes, and my old keyboard did that just fine. Then one day recently I saw a live band using a little 25 note controller to trigger Combinator patches out of Reason, connected only by a USB cable. The little dials on the keyboard were being used musically to change various parameters of the sound. It then occurred to me that maybe I should take a hard look at what has happened in the last 15 years with Midi controllers.Escaping from my local retailer with M-Audio Oxygen 8 v2 in hand, I rushed home to see if these bells and whistles really mattered. Skipping the dated CD-ROM that came in the package, I downloaded the current M-Audio drivers using the World Wide Web. Driver installation was painless, and then I connected the hardware. After windows carefully chewed on three different hardware wizards it was all done. Not bad, although I have some sympathy for anyone who is not familiar with the Windows "Found New Hardware" wizard. Fortunately the documentation describes the procedure in detail. The creative session that unfolded over the next few hours is what prompted me to write this review. Long ago it was very difficult to pass "special" information over Midi. Users were forced to map out keyboards, sift through menus, and spend hours on configuration. Those days are over! With this current technology, mapping a function to a dial or button is a simple matter. Software like Cubase and Reason just ask for you to touch the dial you want to use. After you give the dial a little twist the software detects it and maps it to the function of your choice. I could not be more pleased with how well this works.The Oxygen 8 V2, which can be powered from USB, has 8 dials, 2 wheels, an LCD readout, and a number of buttons. Some of the included buttons are transport controls, so you can use the keyboard to play, stop, fast forward, rewind, loop, and record. This makes the midi recording functionality feel more like a Motif or Triton, allowing the user to take their eyes off the computer monitor. By the end of the evening I realized my old Roland U-20 simply cannot take advantage of the latest features being offered by today's software. While this little 25 note keyboard is a lot smaller, it's incredibly functional, and takes up a very small footprint on my desk. With the octave button I can live without more keys. This installation has improved the Feng Shui of my workstation area, giving more features in a smaller space. When you first experience what its like to tweak a Reason or VST instrument with a physical dial, and have the software record you doing it, you will wonder why you waited so long to upgrade your giant old midi keyboard. It is truly frightening what can now be achieved with a laptop, a software program such as Reason 3, and an Oxygen 8 V2. You could sit in a coffee shop and be the next Aphex Twin. I recommend caffeinated
Great Audio. I really like the sound of the system that I installed in my car.
Not compatible with Windows XP x64 bit. For the few using this 64 bit version of Windows XP the supplied printer drivers do not work and there are no updated drivers available from HP. Also, there is no Vista 64 bit driver yet. The printer itself is great
Excellent SD card. I use this card in my Palm TX pda and have it filled with mp3 music and in almost two months have had no problems with it.  Very good memory
Pretty good for the price. I've been using this phone for about a month now, and overall it's pretty good.Pros: Sound quality is good on handset/speakerphone/headset, the controls feel nice, and the unit has a nice clean look. It deals well with the two lines: indicator lights, separate voice mail access codes, hold and conferencing are very easy. Setting up and using the speed dials is very easy (but you only get a few of them, which is fine with me).  You can use the speed dials when you're on the phone, which can be useful for access codes and the like. Caller ID does nothing special, but it works as you'd expect, including with Call Waiting calls.Cons: As others have mentioned, there is no mute button; the voice mail indicator is an LCD instead of a blinking light (really dumb idea).  The LCD display is not backlit and not easily viewed at an angle, and the unit sits flat on a desk, so you have to view it at an angle (I put a piece of wood under it to tilt it up, which helps, but is not a great tribute to Panasonic engineering). Also, plugging in a headset disconnects the handset; with a headset plugged in you can't pick up the handset and talk.Contrary to what another reviewer said, I did find that I could use the first line when there is no power, as the manual claims you can.Overall, I'm happy enough with the unit.  I did plug in a freestanding voice mail indicator light because the "envelope" indicator is pretty much useless, but the other problems are not significant in the way I use it
GREAT ITEM. I BOUGHT THIS FOR SAMMY, MY NEPHEW AS A GIFT....AND HE LOVED THEM!! I WAS A GOOD BUY FOR THE MONEY
My Geek Loved It... I'm married to a guy who has been a Geek since before Geeks were cool. Although he is very difficult to buy for (the best gift for him is a gift certificate to Fryes Electronics), he LOVED this little Christmas tree. I, on the other hand, am NOT a Geek, and *I* loved it as well!The tree is cute, compact, and colorful (when plugged in.) The continual color changes are really cool, making this a much better gift (for the price) than expected.This is not a gift that will be relegated to the Good Will Donation Box any time soon (as so many of my purchases of this nature are...)  In fact, I'll be getting my Geek the Snowman for next Christmas, and hope that Compucable will come out with additional products of this nature.Kimberly Stocke
Easy... Purchased this mount in large part due to the positive comments by others before me. I can add nothing more. It's simple and quick to install. I used it for a 50" plasma and was concerned about that amount of weight being held by simply (4) lags - not an issue whatsoever
Does the job. It's a simple device, so there's not to say about it other than it does the job. You should note that the LEDs on the device remain lit as long as the device is plugged into your PC and the PC is powered (they glow a bright blue).
Pretty good for price. These are a good buy for the price. Obviously there are higher quality headphones, but these do the job and are good for traveling around because of their price.
Great sound, easy set up. I love my Samsung home theater system. Very aesthetically pleasing, very easy setup and excellent sound. The fact that it plays almost any media format, has a 5 disk changer and a USB port is such a huge bonus. The tall boy speakers mean that you do not have to mount anything on the walls if you don't want to. It's my first home theater system, and I couldn't have asked for more.Cons: The advanced sound setup can be challenging (the basic setup works just fine, though) and I didn't really like how the instruction booklet was organized.
Site maintained by crazed monkeys!. I'd also love to buy one of these gems at this price, but alas no buy button.  They'll sell me a used tape, however at two times the price.  Grrrrrrr.  I give this item 5 stars out of a posible Carl Sagan Billions and Billions
Sound is great. Very pleased w/item.  Compact.  Easy to move from place to place
Works like it should. I believe that this is a superior product and it worked as it should
Love it, Love it, Love it!. The iRiver T10/2Gb is perfect for someone who doesn't want to carry around 40-80Gb worth of music they'll never listen to and even more importantly, its truly portable!When I first went to a store asking to buy an mp3 player which ran on batteries, they couldn't understand why anyone would want something so archaic. I had to find somewhere else with an mp3 player with a battery and that is when I came across the T10. I travel a LOT and to a lot of places where taking my computer and/or power plugs along is (a) inconvenient, (b) heavy and (c) useless as there is no power. I can't begin to describe the relief that all I have to do is throw in a couple of spare AA batteries and I've probably got at least a month's worth of playing time there. Why on earth would anyone want an mp3 player that has a rechargeable battery that at best, can provide about 20 odd hours of music? Each time I've put a battery into my iRiver, I have managed to get about a month's worth of listening out of it - and usually it only runs down because I forget to lock it when I turn it off and the on button gets bumped in my bag. So I have yet to test the battery to see if it is actually about 45 hours play time - all I know is it lasts a long, long, long time! Even the other day, with only 1 bar left on the 'how much charge does my battery have" icon, I still got an extra 6 hours out of it.As to its other features, the sound quality is superb. I have previously owned an iRiver H10 and thought possibly the sound on the T10 was a little tinny in comparison, but I browsed my way into the custom SRS settings and added a little base and believe me, the sound coming out of my headphones now rivals the subwoofer-enforced base coming out of any souped up ghettomobile. I have nooooo complaints about the sound quality!I should also add I am pleased that iRiver use a gold plated tip to their headphones - don't ask me why, but that always seems to reproduce sound quality better.I long gave up on using the iRiver software to transfer music to my T10. The fact is even through the 2Gb works fine for me around town and travelling, I have more than 2Gb of music on my computer. The iRiver software tried to synchronise between your 2Gb T10 and the stuff in "My Music" on your Windows-based computer. Not feasible! So I just transfer songs across using Windows Explorer - much greater control and an awful lot quicker! Blow off the software people. However, if you have an older computer, you may need to at least install the driver to recognise the T10 on your computer, but once that is installed, it is very easy to transfer music just using the UBS cable and Windows Explorer.I have used the FM radio (once) when trying to find out some news. It works fine, but is defintely fiddly if you don't use it regularly. Reception was as good as any other portable device broadcasting over the airways though.I find the buttons are very well placed for 'blind pushing' - because the headphone cord sticks out a bit and the device is triangular shaped, its quite easy to put your hand in a bag, feel the jack, feel the flat face and push the buttons to advance songs or change volume without actually having to see the device.And lets not forget the price - substantially cheaper than that "in unit" with its white headphones yet more functionality - you not only get an mp3 player with comparable sound quality, but you get a voice recorder and an FM radio as well. For less.My only quibbles (and they are defintely small things) are:- The clip is awkward. It's nice that the device clips onto your belt hook, but juts out and because of the triangular shape due to emplacement of the battery, the controls all end up facing your body and its awkward to twist the device to see the buttons to change songs.-How easily the unit can turn itself on (or off) if you don't use the (very easy to use) lock button.I'd recommend this to anyone who travels, doesn't want to carry a ton of plugs and cords to recharge, and prefers to carry only their really favourite tunes - there is plenty of space for the best of's
Works wonders. Works perfect with my Kodak Easyshare camera and for half the price of the Kodak brand memory card.  Would highly recommend.
Eforcity is a good replacement last longer then original battery. I didn't want to keep plugging in my zen micro at the office just so there's juice on the ride home.  After a while I guess all rechargable batteries start to loose charge.  Eforcity ship to me quickly, zen replacement batteries are more expensive than ipod but eforcity has the best price.  After replacing my Mp3 player plays longer then when it was brand new on a single charge.  Manufactures should just make electronic devices take standard AAA batteries.  Anyway its all good
Nice for the Price!. I purchased the Sansa (512MB) player for a hinking trip and I have to say it works GREAT. The only complaint that I would have is that the unit is a bit bulk for todays standards, but not to bad.If you are looking for a no-frills MP3 player than this unit is a great value! Plus it comes in larger memory sizes and a built in radio to boot! The single AAA battery that the unit takes goes a long way too
Music to my ears. I bought these from FRYS hence paid a bit more - but beleive me its worth every cent and now at less than $250, its a steal. I have paired the Infinity speaker system with the ONKYO TX-SR603X receiver and together they produce incredible sound. And is great for CDs too, i use the "unplugged" setting on the receiver to get clear, crisp sound for music. Get this pair and treat your ears to sound
Quality low-priced power amplifier. Amplifier is well-matched to my bookshelf speakers and produces a clear, clean, highly-detailed sound
A "MUST HAVE" accessory for your Epson. This battery will transform your Epson PictureMate Deluxe Viewer Edition from a nifty little photo printer into an absolute Must Have item ! I take it with me when ever I'm doing an off-site photo shoot, or even when I'm out for a weekend shooting candids. The portability you get by adding this battery to the printer is priceless. I have printed as many as 40 photos on one charge.
Wonderful bag!. In the past I have used a backpack to transport my laptop along with my work (I teach college).  Perhaps it's age, but the backpack has seemed very cumbersome and heavy so I was on the lookout for a nice rollerbag.  This one really fit the bill.  Like a previous reviewer, I have looked at a ton of bags and being very petite (5'1") size and weight was a tremendous consideration.  I was leaning toward the Swiss Gear Patriot and another Kensington bag and even went so far as to purchase them from an online vendor with local in-store pickup.  I arrived at the store before the order was ready and thought I'd look to see what other bags the store had to offer.  That's when I got a look at this bag (saw it online, but couldn't find pictures of the inside of the bag so I was hesitant).  It was exactly what I needed with a few nice surprises.  First, the other reviewers are spot on with their reviews. This bag is super lightweight, easy to roll and easy to pick up (with either the handle or shoulder strap) when you need to (I pick it up when I climb the stairs to my classes).  I love that it is more of a feminine looking bag.  The inside of the pockets and main compartment (though not the rear compartment) has a really pretty chocolate brown pinstripe liner (okay, I like pretty things).  The zipper for the main compartment opens almost to the bottom sides of the bag, which makes accessing your things very simple.  It has a padded compartment for your computer at the rear of the bag with an elastic strap to keep the computer from moving around too much.  I can easily access my 12" Powerbook, but it's a slightly tighter fit with my 15.4" MacBook Pro.  Also, the top 2 inches of the MBP are not protected by the padding so I use a neoprene sleeve for added protection.  This makes a bit more effortful to remove the laptop, but not annoyingly so.  Another nice touch is that the laptop compartment allows the computer to suspend slightly within the bag so that the computer never touches the bottom of the bag.  The main compartment also holds all of my files for class, as well as my textbook (paperback) and a small notebook.  In contrast to a backpack, I can easily identify which files belong to which class so I don't have to pull all of my folders out everytime.  There's also room for my power adapter and my presentation remote case.  The rear compartment is handy for other computer accessories like cables, a power adapter, an umbrella.  You can see the telescoping part of the handle in this section as it is exposed.  This didn't bother me at first until I realized that when I am rolling the bag I can actually see into this compartment when the handle is extended (when stored there is a zipper that covers the handle).  Not much is exposed, but if it's raining I'll most likely carry the bag or just make sure things in that compartment won't be bothered by a little wetness (don't let this distract you, the bag it otherwise water resistant and I don't see it as a huge problem).  The smaller zippered section has lots of little compartments for pens, a flash drive, iPod, and other computer accessories.  I also keep two glasses cases, my Palm Pilot and wallet in this section.  I like that this section opens up real wide and has some material on the sides so things don't fall out when you open it completely.  The smaller zippered compartment on this outside of this section is great for flat things like tissues, post-it notes, etc.  The top easy access zipper pocket is super convenient too!  I keep my keys there (though wish there was a key clip) along with things like my phone, chapstick, lipstick and a small bottle of lotion.  It is also great for storing a boarding pass and a bit of cash when I travel.  As previously mentioned, this bag fits very easily under airline seats.  The strap at the back of the bag that is intended to allow you to place it over the telescoping handle of another roller bag.  The strap does not cover the width of the bag and might not fit over some handles.  It works with most standard ones, but the Hartmann bag I have has an EXTRA wide handle and the strap wasn't wide enough to handle it.  I have to use the piggy-back system to take these two on trips together (which makes for easier rolling anyway).All in all, this is a fabulous bag for my needs.  The price here is also excellent.  I was happy that I paid $70 as it was listed on Amazon for $92 though now it is listed for $57.89!  You can't beat that price!  I would not hesitate to buy this bag again
APC Backup works as designed. This product shipped on schedule, was received in good condition, works as designed and does not contribute to the stress level in my life! What else could you want
An Excellent Little Player. I've had my Sansa (the white one, with a pink silicone case... very cute) for about a month now and I couldn't be more pleased. I've had several players -- an Archos, an iaudio 'u2' -- and though both had their quirks, especially the Archos, ultimately the problem with both was the same -- their rechargeable internal (non-CHANGEable) batteries wore out and wouldn't hold a charge anymore. In contrast, the Sansa takes one AAA battery. Such a simple thing, but what a joy, I'll have the player long enough to see if it wears out normally from use! It comes with a battery, and I haven't had to change mine yet.Radio reception seems rather good. It doesn't have line-in recording, as the iaudio did, but I didn't use that very much and haven't missed it. Has voice recording, which I haven't tried. Mounts right up on WinXP without any need for extra software. I've never wanted an ipod, because of the nightmarish software required to negotiate with them.The Sansa's supplied ear buds sound very good, but are a trifle large (which is probably why they sound so good to me), noticeably larger than ipod ear buds; but are a little too large for my ears.One more thing, I am pleased with the Sansa's interface -- there are enough buttons to comfortably handle all functions. The 'u2' had only a few buttons, a tiny display and no manual to speak of, and was a little frustrating to use. The Sansa is much clearer, has a very readable display, and very straightforward function selection and settings. Cleverness and simplicity is all well and good in a gadget, but take it from someone whose vision is not terribly good, if you can't see it, you can't use it. I'm glad I got this one
Journalist's Ideal Tool. This is pretty much the perfect tape recorder for interviews, whether live or phone -- sturdy but light for carrying, with plenty of bells and whistles but a snap to learn to use. (However, inserting tapes is  slightly harder than in some other machines.) You can choose slow-speed recording to double the length of your tape (e.g., get two hours of talk on a 60-minute tape), which minimizes interrupting the flow of the interview to change sides or tapes. On playback, a speed-control dial lets you control speed and tone of speech -- you can slow down a fast jabberer to transcribe, or speed up to chipmonk-voices past the less useful chatter without missing anything. Plugging in the adapter spares the batteries when transcribing, i.e. when hitting the "pause" button instead of "stop" for interruptions that last longer than anticipated. Sound quality is fine for talk. Not much machine-hiss, and even less on slow speed than on regular speed. Much easier to change batteries than on my previous tape recorder(another Sony which finally died after 25 years of service). Haven't tried this machine for music.
2-Year Replacement. Always something that might come in handy my last remote quit working after a year
Perfect PDA case. I love this case.  It protects my Palm and also allows me a space to carry my sync cable.  I sync between the Palm, my computer at home and my computer at work.  The cable is always where I need it.  The case looks nice and does exactly what you want it to do.  Only irritation is that a wireless Palm keyboard will NOT fit into the second compartment if you want to zip it all the way up
Great!. Great product at a great price, arrived in a timely manner!  Good Job
Loud, Crystal Clear, And quiet for the others!!!. Greatest Headphones I have ever had, works great with Television, or Ipods. Highly Recommended!! Worth Your money
SONY STEREO CONDENSER MIC ROCKS!. I have taken this mic from the tropics of Puerto Rico to the London Underground and it has worked superbly. Once I figured out the sensitivity adjustment, I got louder recording levels. Remember to set it to max if you are recording ambient sounds outdoors. Super sensitive mic. Remember to hold it still and don't let the cable rub against clothing. Also, watch your breathing. It all gets picked up! I was trying to record nature sounds and picked up the cars on the road and dogs barking 1/2 mile or more away. I like the capsule adjustment as I can record sounds above me without turning the mic. Doesn't need phantom power which is nice
So cooool!. It's cool to look at AND functional -- how often does that happen?It's the size of a credit card, and weights only 2.5 oz (71 grams.)Things I noticed:- I simply plugged it into the USB port; Windows found it and it worked instantly and flawlessly!- The wheel has good grip on it (unlike my last Targus mouse.)- When it is just sitting there, the 7 colours fade in and out.  Now, I was thinking this would be distracting and too bright, but I found that they are actually soft and subtle.  It so "Mac" (I have no other way to describe it.)- In the design traditon of the new Mac products, this mouse is a nice steel grey with a very slick, polished surface that feels nice.  The buttons are nice, too.- The sensitivity seems to be higher/better than my previous mouse.  But, I would rather have to turn down the sensitivity than have to turn it up (only to find it's at the max already.)- As the colours rotate through, they stop rotating when you use the mouse, and resume when you stop.- The retractable cord-thing WORKS!  And quite well.  I was worried about it when I purchased it, but I now think it's one of the best features.If you are looking for a travel mouse, or one that will make other coworkers jealous, this mouse is for you
Atende ao que preciso. Estou usando essa memria com uma mquina de 4 megapixels e permite gravar mais de 100 fotos.Pode parecer pouco para a capacidade de memria dos cartes atuais, mas o preo justifica.
Fantastic. I really love these speakers.  The fidelity of the bass is terrific (as per "Come on Closer" by Jem, say).  My regular system has Magnaplanar speakers with a subwoofer, and this system gives me much the same effect as the maggies--that the music isn't coming from a single point.  More like being in a concert setting than hearing sound from a box.Quibbles?  The volume controls are nearly impossible to find, but that makes them inconspicuous once you've found them!  The subwoofer is not tiny in terms of fitting under a desk (12" diameter).  If you can't imagine yourself fidgeting with the fishbowl in stockinged feet you might pass on this item.  If you think you can handle that, however, you're going to love these speakers
Great product. This HP toner works as stated in the HP Laser Jet 3330. Copies are clean and crisp without blurring, smudging, or fading.
In its day...it was on top. I have had my Handspring Visor Deluxe for 5...yes, FIVE years (actually longer).  While I take decent care of it, it has taken care of me.  My doctor has one too...exactly like mine and we often talk about how perhaps they should be replaced, but the darn thing is still working great and does everything we need it to.  I finally ordered a new PDA with all the capabilities of my laptop and am passing this one on to someone else who needs it. (I'm not selling it...good karma)Down to business - the Handspring Visor Deluxe is not the creme de la creme anymore.  But in its day it was.  Great product and if you don't need the bells and whistles (or color display)...go for this.  Totally flawless.  People often complain about the styli of other PDAs.  No complaints here.  Not only is it relatively comfortable, it is stainless tipped with plastic on both ends (doesn't break) and it stays securely in place when you store it in the device.  I literally lost my ORIGINAL stylus just a few days ago.The display is not as easy to read as the new super crisp glossy screens that are out now, but if you need a basic device with a few bells and whistles that are thrown in for fun (heck, a good deal of the new ones don't have IR)... go for it.  And for the price I just saw it listed for on Amazon ($85) it's a total steal.  Great product
GREAT MACHINE AT A GREAT PRICE. We've been very pleased with Brother in the past and this builds on the deserved reputation they have with us. Great value for a comb unit that does everything
My Zune is much better than my two malfunctioning iPods. I have two iPods that don't work.  I bought a shuffle first and that has an error that I can't fix and Apple can't fix.  So, I thought I'd buy 1GB iPod a year later and that broke down even with a new computer.  So, this time I made the right decision and bought the 30 GB Zune.  Wow!  The Zune is so much better!  It has such a better feel to it and the controls react nicely, instead of making you frustrated like the iPod.  The screen is perfect.  Sound quality is excellent.  5 Stars for the Zune.
Works w/Mac but serious design flaw!. The included security software works as advertised with both my iBookG4 and iMacG5 (OSX10.4.7). BUT there is a serious design flaw...the little hole in the device, to include a ring to attach it to your keyring, is in the removable cap, not the device itself...so, imagine...at a hotel in Bankok, you insert the flash drive in the hotel computer and put your keys back in your pocket before you login...finish your work and logout, departing the hotel for the airport...forgetting the device in the computer....do you want to trust this security software THAT MUCH? With earlier PNY flash drives the hole is in the device, not the removable cap
Good Inexpensive Monitors. I've had these for a couple months now and I can't really complain.  The volume is slightly limited but the range is nice and I feel like they do give you an accurate feel for the sound mix.  Seeing as they are some of the most inexpensive monitors available I expected less and was impressed.It seems like most of the reviewers here are using them as speakers, which I personally think is a waste.  If you are just looking to find good speakers to watch movies and listen to music on your computer you'd probably be much better off looking for a good set of computer speakers, which will cost the same if not less.  I mean at that point your definately not going to be taking advantage of the 1/4 inch inputs and that's one of the reason that these cost more than computer speakers.
Well worth the money. I am extremely happy with this case.  The ipod fits into the case and stays there securely.  It also has a strap around the front to stop it from moving around.  It has plastic that protects the screen of your ipod and prevents scratches.A huge plus that comes with this case is that you can get a hold off all connection areas without taking off the case.  I can charge it and use my itrip without ever taking it off.  That makes it a lot better than any of the other cases i've tried because i don't have to hassle with getting it on and off.I absolutly love this, and I am extremely happy with it.  It is well worth the low cost of $15
Best Memory Yet. I have been struggling with the constraints of memory of smaller size. This size of memory and speed is amazing. The price is also very reasonable. I have to laugh at the many shoppers who bid on this memory on ebay. How foolish many of them are...the price they pay is far more than is available on Amazon. Best of all the price for this memory on Amazon is for a brand new item guaranteed.
I love this TV. I have had this tv for 6 months. I hace had no problems with it at all. I was worried about buyingit online but it was delivered right away and everythign is great.I noticed today it is 20% off - BUY IT NOW!!!At best buy htey want $1,850 plus tax and delivery.For the $1,100 they have it at is a steal.
Greate MS mouse, my wrist feels better. MOUSE ERGONOMICSI'm on the computer 12 hours a day and my wrist has been bothering me. When using most mice, your wrist is on the table, and hand is cranked up at an angle over the mouse. This completely changes your mouse posture. It is a massively tall mouse that completely angles your hand when using it.Here's what the mouse instructions recommends:The pinky edge of your hand is on the table, and your hand wraps the side of the 2.5" tall mouse, so your hand is almost sideways the whole time. Takes some getting use to, but at least all presure is off your wrist.Here's what I prefer:I use a mouse pad with a thickly padded wrist rest. The part of my forearm right before the wrist is on the wrist rest, and the hand is on the tall, (right-hand) slanted mouse, so my wrist is hanging in mid-air. This feels pretty natural for me and no more wrist pains.MOUSE PERFORMANCEIt performs very well, as well as any other MS laser mouse. Laser works on most surfaces, but not on glass or glossy surfaces. It's been 2 months and I haven't had to change the batteries yet.Pros:All of the above.Cons:Sometimes I do get inconsistent velocity when I move the mouse at constant speed but the cursor does'nt. Smoother table surfaces seem to help. This is not for gaming
Mixed Feelings After Four Years. There is still a lot to love about the S350, big full sound, incredible FM reception, generally strong AM reception, good rugged looks. But the drift is a minor annoyance. Worse, two AM stations here in Los Angeles, 1150 and 980 (Dodgers baseball), get overcrowding, meaning two stations are playing at once, and no matter how narrow the filter I get this overcrowding. My 40-dollar GE Superradio III doesn't have this problem. But the GE doesn't have digital readout and I hate finding the sweet spot. So is there a big digital radio that doesn't have these flaws? I hear there is. Soon there will be a radio available called the Redsun 3000, designed by the same maker of the Grundig S350 (called the Tecsun BCL 2000 in China), which is supposed to blow away all the competition. Already the Redsun 2100 is said to be superior to the 350 but has ergonomic problems. As of 9-22-06, the Redsun 3000 is supposed to be only a few months away. Until the Redsun 3000 arrives, you may want to look at the $99 Sonido (made by Sangean). It boasts presets, digital tuning, and adds to its FM/AM a TV band, but has no shortwave.Final Point: If you're buying a radio for your office and you use a computer, I suggest you get a good table radio with a remote control, like the Sangean WR-2 or its big brother the Sangean HDR-1, a high-definition radio. I point this out because any radio I've used within five feet of my computer suffers from horrible interference. Place the WR-2 ($159) or the HDR-1 ($199 after rebate) on a shelf or cabinet six feet away or so and use your remote to toggle between preset stations. In my experience these remote-control-operated radios are well suited for computer environments.Update 12-31-06: I've been able to get rid of overcrowding on AM station 980 by turning down the AM/SW RF Gain knob. So I have to give a fifth star to the S350
Lexar Compact Flash Reader. Outstanding little product.  Good human interface.  Able to use it immediately and much faster than cameral software
very good recorder. works very good  for the money. Am very pleased with the product
strong case. This case can put up with a beating.  I am a metal sculptor and have beat this case pretty badly.  It has a plastic screen cover which I haven't tested the strength of.  Bottom line is-it has done a wonderful job of protecting my i-pod.  The only downside is that if you let it get cold the i-pod will not function properly without a direct power source-or maybe that's just a glitch in my machine
Good value. A very sturdy piece of equipment. Solid. Good sensitivity and response. The sweet spot is nicely placed. Picks up the sound of your fingers on the grip when handling but that's pretty minor. Professional feel at an low cost
This one finally worked. I have several Linksys wireless adapters, usb, pci, etc that I could never configure with a Linksys wireless cable modem/router. This one worked fine. Go figure. I had to reinstall once when it stopped working by (1) removing software, (2) removing the card, (3) reinstalling software, (4) reinstalling the card. Installing software 1st seems to be an important step
Earphones Top of the Line. 1st quality, first rate service awesome.  Gift for my very picky son. Awesome!!!! A+++++.  Definately will order from them agai
Reliable. This is the second BEFSR81 I've owned. My previous one was taken out by an electrical storm. (Although the router was plugged into a Belkin Surgemaster Surge Protector, it still got zapped.We're thinking it came in through the cable although Comcast denies it's even possible - right!Our network is both hardwired and wireless - and this router/switch allows all of the stuff to be controlled from one small box. Other than being zapped by lightning we've never had any problem with it
iPod Nano Holder is Great!. This case for the iPod Nano is awesome! Its rubberized so absorbs any shocks from accidental drops. It also amkes the Nano "bigger" which is great for me because I always thought the Nano was a little too small. I love the Nano, but its size created an easy to lose/damage item. Now with this case, I have no worries
Fast and reliable. I've used many brands of CF card, and some others are slow and sketchy--seem to need reformatting way too often. These SanDisk Ultra cards, however, are blazingly quick when storing images or transferring data and have never given me any trouble at all with data loss or corruption
Excellent for gaming and general computing. Well constructed and worked right out of the box.  We are anxious for more gaming templates.How about templates for MS Flight Simulator and the different planes?
execellent. fits perfectly, low profile, black doesn't stand out. No noise when turning.  Just what i wanted
AWESOME! htp from 313DET. functions exactly as stated in product description. i searched extensively online for similar cases and chose this one based on other reviews and price. no major complaints; however it can slide across smooth surfaces. i placed some sticky pads (available at most hardware stores) to prevent accidental slipping. otherwise, this case is highly recommended
Very easy to use!. This was very easy to use. All you have to do is plug it in and play. I had no issues using this at all
No need to spend hundreds. This little turntable does it all. It's advertised for TVs around 20 inches, but please note that is TUBE TVs, the old CRTs your parents have. If you use this for LCDs and plasmas, it will work up to 40-50" TVs as long as the weight does not exceed the allowed specifications. I use it with my Westinghouse 37" LVM-37w3 1080p monitor and never a problem
An essential piece of the puzzle. This number 93 tri-color ink cartridge by Hewlett Packard is an essential for those of us who use the HP Deskjet 5440 printer--or any other printer that accepts this cartridge.The three colors of yellow, red and green can be combined by the printer to produce a wide array of other colors very effectively. The cartridge takes up little space if you care to stock up on them and it comes well packaged so that it won't break during shipment. Moreover, the installation and removal of the cartridge is very easy so when changing the ink cartridge you will rarely have any difficulty.My only complaint is that the ink goes rather quickly and thus the cost of this ink over the long run can be expensive. I rarely print and nevertheless just about every two months I still have to buy another cartridge. I will take off one star for that to make this a four star review.The price is absolutely right compared to what stores in my area charge for this product. If you care to save some money you can buy this ink cartridge in the same package as a black ink HP 92; this would be even more cost-efficient.Overall, the quality of the ink is rather good despite my one complaint that the ink goes faster than I would like it to go. The cartridge provides you with the ability to print a multitude of colors on your paper and replacement is easy.SMILE
Very good at the one thing it does. It's not as good as the Windows tablet native recognition, that's clear to me. But it has multilanguage support right out of the box. It also increases the DigiMemo's value tremendously.Do note that it's not so precise figuring out my cursive handwriting but you should get better results if you write clearly. My handwriting is not as bad as a doctor's but I'm certainly no model of caligraphy
very nice  for the price. it's very useful and works well. Too soon to judge battery usage. I would recommend this Radio/Tv combo/
This thing is amazing. I'm a cow and like most cows I use Photoshop heavily. All I can say is that I can not believe that I went as long as I did without this tool. Other reviews are not exaggerating about the night and day difference this thing makes.One thing about the widescreen tablet is that it works great in portrait mode. I use a 24" Dell widescreen monitor in portrait mode and I was a little worried that the tablet might not work in that configuration. Wacom definitely did their homework.To be honest I found it to not be that useful in 3D Max, but in Photoshop it's a WMD
Kensington 33374 Wireless Presenter with Laser Pointer. The device was purchased for personal teaching and seminars needs but now it is often used for Departmental seminars.  It works flawlessly with any computer and powerpoint program.  The pointer is powerful and is designed for larger rooms, if used in a small room, very close to the screen the point may be small.  It is a must for programs that invite speakers who are not familiar with the remote control of powerpoint presentations
Great notebook case. I purchased this for my wife who wanted a case for herHP Pavilion Notebook PC (DV5139US), screen size 15.4", ht 1.8", wdth 14.1", depth 10.4 ". The bag is for personal use, not business, and use will be moderate. She did want some extra compartments for organization.This case has met all her needs, it is light weight, constructed of durable material, well organized. Her notebook fits in this top loading case with ease. She is satisfied with this purchase. We would recommend purchasing this case.
awesome deal. I see a lot of negative reviews here, but I've been using these discs for a couple months now with my PowerBook G4's Superdrive, and I've had no problems, at least none that I would attribute to the discs themselves.  One review laments Toast Titanium 7, which in my experience is a very finnicky, buggy program.  I too had a number of failed burns with that program, but I was able to remedy the situation by saving my dvd projects as disc images, and then burning them later with disc utility after I had a chance to mount them and check them out.  For the price I payed for these discs, if I remember right, almost half the price of a 25 pack from other companies for a 50 pack from memorex, I am very very pleased.  If you're looking to play around with dvd burning, and I guarantee you you will make a few mistakes and have to throw away a few discs before you get it right, this is the best deal you'll find anywhere
just got this in an office pollyanna. I just won this item at an office holiday party. After reading the packaging for about 30 minutes, I figured out what it was supposed to be. At this point, I should have been disappointed, but I was surprised and pleased by the quality radio reception it gets. Perfect for "emergencies" (ie drowning out annoying office banter).At our party, my coworkers got cool stuff like top-shelf liquor and bathing liquids. But I am satisfied with this, I guess.
Transcend 1GB MultiMedia Card. I'm very happy with this product and for the price also
Great phone, no complaints. Works great, good sound.  I wanted a 5.8 phone to avoid interference problems.  I wanted a phone without an answering system because my phone provider (Vonage) does answering.  This phone fit my needs perfectly.  A nice feature is the local name/number database, which the phone uses before it uses caller ID, so you can put your own names on inbound callers.  I think it lets you assign ring tones too, but I don't use that feature.  It also interprets the "you have voicemail" codes from your service provider so it can display "new voice mail" when your provider has new voice mail messages
Great Headphones for the runner. Sennheiser got it right. These are simple. They are comfortable, even on long runs. They have great sound. They stay put while I am running. Gravity is the enemy on other headphones I've used, always making them slip out of the ear or away from the position of optimal sound. Because of the design of these earpieces and conecting band, gravity actually holds them in place. I never have to fidget with them. Also, since there is only one lead wire, it stays out of the way without trying to engineer a solution. These are the best I've tried
Handy Way to Use Roady2. First of all - I really enjoy listening to XM radio, which is what made me consider buying this extension device for the receiver. It is truly a good way to further utilize the Roady2, allowing you to listen either to XM, or to tune in local FM stations (why anyone would want to do this, I don't know - maybe an emergency or something).The unit is fairly simple to set up. You first need to charge the battery by putting it into place and plugging in the included AC adapter. It takes about 2 hours to charge and then you are ready to use the unit. You slide the Roady2 into the device until it plugs in. (If you have set up the Roady2 for a Home adapter or auto adapter - you must first remove the backing plate on the Roady2 - it will snap off with a little leverage (light) with a straight edge screwdriver.) After you have installed the Roady2 unit, you are good to go.At first, the volume and tuning controls on the side of the unit can be a little vexing to use, but some practice helps you to readily raise or lower the volume or tune FM radio stations. As an additional help, there is a small wheel volume control on the right ear section of the headphones. The headphone acts as your antenna for the unit and the whole thing then works very well.I am pleased with this unit, but I would advise shopping for price, as it can vary by as much as $100.00 from low to high.All in all, a nice addition to further utilize the Roady2
Excellent!. The Logitech Presenter does everything it claims it will do - easily and flawlessly.  No software to install, virtually no learning curve at all - you just plug it in and it works.From other reviews I had read, I was a little concerned that the laser pointer would not remain sharp over a long distance.  But I gave a presentation in an auditorium last week, and, from about 75 feet away, it was fine.Since the Presenter has no remote mouse function, I did have to go over to my laptop to right-click on the screen in order to go directly to a slide that was 10 slides back from where I was in my presentation.  (I did not want to step sequentially back through 10 slides on the screen, which I could have done with the Presenter.)  So, next time I would put more importance on buying a presenter with remote mouse function; but, I'd also want it to have the compactness and ease of use of this one.Overall, an excellent, high-quality product
Excellent, Versatile, Good Price. The nice, light lustre finish makes a good compromise between glossy, without annoying reflections, and matte, offering some extra saturation and snap.  This is very good paper, at an affordable price.  They feel like drugstore prints from 35mm negatives, but look much better.I used a Canon Pixma iP4000, and the results greatly exceeded my expectations, printing shots from a Canon 350D with good glass.  My previous experience was with an Epson Stylus Photo 870 and various Epson, Pictorico, or International "freephotopaper.com" papers.This is my first choice for any 4x6 photos I print.  I would use a good matte paper as a second choice, especially for 8x10s that may be framed under glass.You can't miss with this paper.  It's one of the very best I have used over nine years of printing images at home
Merry Christmas!!. I thought it would take me weeks to find anything like this, and then I figured I'd have to spend WAY too much money.  NO!  Hooray!!  These DVD cases made quite a fantastic Christmas season for me
Great, great Mic !!!. I have this microphone since march 2006 and I use it every day  from Monday to Friday and it works Great !!! The first test I made when I bought it was to  whisper and it was able to get the voice, that was amazing... It is super sensitive. I think that is one of the features that I love the most... Long lasting great idea.You can use it anywhere you can plug it in.Make sure you buy it from the seller that the TOTAL amount (price + shipping) is the lowest..
Great multi-function car charger. I use this to charge my ETEN M700 cellphone with GPS while driving (GPS eats up the battery very fast). It is powerful enough to keep it well-charged throughout the trip. The retractable cord is very convenient because there is less wire mess (spouse friendly) and you can use it to charge electronics in the back seat also without the fear of snagging the wire.It can charge many sorts of devices- camera/camcorders, cellphones/blackberries, MP3 players that use a USB or firewire (small port) charging. The charger is very portable. Great build quality and functionality.
Targus Wireless Keyboard is great. This is a fantastic little item. You can attach your PDA, position the infrared wand and off you go. With this keyboard, you can type and also use a button on the keyboard as a mouse-which is a similar experience to using a laptop mouse. My only problem was with customer service which said the keyboard wasn't compatible with my PDA when in fact it was
Great for cameras. I bought this for my digital camera because my other batteries didn't last very long. These work great and last for a long time.
It works. The only problem is that it doesn't come with the adapter that snaps to the rhino.  It plugs into the one that came with the wall charger
Fine product. But then, it's from Olympus!. A good product with a trusted name. When the time comes to add xD Picture Cards to my inventory, I'll gladly come back for more
Good price  and Good service. Shipping took awhile - but considering the weight of this item I still think it was excellent quick shipping service. The price was excellent - especially since I knew the model I needed beforehand and had priced it on other web sites too. When I need to buy something - I generally loook at Amazon first now.... and seldom need to go any further.
Perfect. I have this as my picture printer and its the best one yet. With a great price!!
Good HTPC processor. Great processor for a HTPC, (my use).  Especially with the Cool n' Quiet technology
Not perfect, but pretty damn good. So far, I love it! I wanted something that wouldn't add bulk to my purse yet could act as a flash drive and I found it in this SD card.  (I used to have a T5 and it had a flash drive component that I missed dearly) Only gripes that I may foresee is that it is a relatively delicate product. There is potential for breakage if you are not a detailed oriented and careful person. It is definitely not a tough and sturdy product. I own a Palm TX and it is compatible and have not any problems with it.  Good product. Good price
CD Burning Tips. These brush cleaner CD's do work, believe it or not.  Perhaps not quite the same as having your system professionally serviced, but why waste more money than you may have to.  This is a worthy investment to look into first - because these do work most of the time (and it's always a good idea to have one for continued preventative maintenance anyway).  If you're getting play errors or severe skipping of your CD's, you might be amazed at how much one of these can help.But here's a few tips for those of you making audio CD's on their home computers and having trouble playing them on some machines... It may not be a defective or dirty player at all.First, it may be best to turn off any other programs you may have running in the background.  This will give your CD burner full resources to do its burning job.  Also, make sure your screensaver is turned off.  If it starts up in the middle of a job, the laser burn may be interrupted and cause errors.  So shut down all other programs and the screensaver too.Second, it may do you well to defrag your hard drive before starting a burn.  If you have a pretty fast PC, this may not be a big problem, but it may adversely affect the read data process if your computer has to search all over the hard drive to find pieces of the media files before burning them on the disk.  I personally have an auto defrag program installed on my computer that runs constantly keeping my system running at its optimum.Third, I recommend NOT copying CD's "on the fly" (in other words, directly from disk to disk).  Copy the audio files to your hard drive first.  Most CD burning software have a "create image" option - use that and then burn the image to a blank CD.  If your using Nero, just turn off the "on the fly" option and the music files will copy to the hard disk first and then to the CD automatically.  By-the-way, you may want to read my review on Amazon about Nero.  It is, in my opinion, the best burning software available!  Since I started using Nero, I do not know the meaning of the word "coaster" or "frisbee."Fourth, ALWAYS burn CD's in DAO mode (Disc At Once).  This will insure there is no gap between songs(TAO - Track At Once - usually leaves a 2 second gap between songs and causes the laser to have to stop burning momentarily between songs), but more importantly, using DAO will insure that the laser continues to burn constantly throughout the whole CD copying process.Finally, and most importantly (in my opinion), make sure you don't burn CD's at anything faster than 12x!  In fact, if you're playing CD's on an older system, burn the CD at 8x or even slower.  If you still have trouble, take the speed all the way down to 1 or 2x.  It can make a big difference.  Yes, I know it means you won't be using the full potential of your zippy 52x burner, but you just have to figure out what is more important - fast burning or being able to actually listen to what your burning?Most newer CD players have very little or no problem at all playing CD's burned on a computer at the highest speed; however, this is not often the case with much older units.  As a general rule it is always better to burn audio disks slower.You may also want to make sure you're using Audio CD certified media.  That may help a little bit too.  The brand of media may be a factor also.  Sometimes the cheaper CD's may have a higher failure rate.  I've heard this from some people.  Personally, I have not had too much trouble with cheaper CD's...  Usually, if the steps I have already mentioned are followed, cheap media will work fine.  That has been my experience anyway.  But different burners may be a factor as well and you may want to try some different brands of media until you find one that seems to work best for you.  Using quality name brand media is probably a safe bet and may be your best course of action.Good luck! :
Works like a charm. The mount is very nicely designed.  It holds the Treo securely yet allows the phone to pivot.  Easy to remove from the windshield so no one knows it is in the car
verrry goood. the microsoft zune....such a contrivertial productwell let me start with thisi like it better than the ipod don't get riled up it's my opinioni think the actuall device is damn near perfectthe navigation is great not to mention simpleit feels at home in your handand it(like so many others have said) doesn't attract finger prints.the screen is great i really like what they did with ithowever there are some negetive things i'd like to point outthe software for the zunehas got to be one of the worst i've ever usedquite aggrivating in fact, no i didn't have a problem installing itbut it's got so many elementsyou would not expect in a music managing program post itunes.....i really hope they fix itbut all in allthe zune is a worthwhile purchaceand i'm glad i bought it=]
Cable's here. .Bought the printer. Bought the cable. Connected cable to printer and computer. Printer works so I guess the cable is 'good'.Nothing more need be said..
Excellent High Capacity SDIO SD Card. I just loaded this into my Treo 680 and it works great. Of course this is the only palm device that currently supports 8gb SDIO (Secure Digital Input/Output) Cards. It works just like the 2gb 1gb and 512 I've used in the past. It will not work in every Secure Digital friendly device. Check to see if your device is SDIO compliant. I can confidently recommend this card.TadMt. Pleasant, South Carolin
12 year old and family love it. The gift was given at Xmas time to my 12 year old daughter and as it ended up the whole family had a great time with it.  Easy to handle, portable and fun to use no expensive special CD's to buy.  Love it!!
Easy to install. Hard to beat for the price. I installed this in 5 minutes. Works fine. Bought another for my husband and several for gifts.Don't try to use this with the nano. I don't think it would fit
Excellent hardware but has some issues. Moving up to the DiNovo line of keyboard is quite a financial commitment for most users. With that you expect certain things to be flawless and from a hardware design standpoint that is what you get. The software is another story.On initial installation the SetPoint software came up after the mandatory reboot and was stuck on attempting to connect to the devices. After a forced shutdown and reboot it was able to continue the setup process and found the devices. To make a long story short, the SetPoint software became such a headache that I removed it entirely and used the keyboard and mouse without it and lost some of the features of the keyboard because of it, volume adjusment, media center control, etc.Some issues occurred with the media pad in games that only allowed it to be in numlock mode, but the game required the number pad to be used for navigation. I actually had to buy a seperate numpad device to resolve thiss problem.Overall the design and feel of this keyboard/media pad/mouse is amazing, but the software issues make it a headache to use at times. If you enjoy the feel of laptop keyboards then this is a great option for a desktop keyboard.Pros: Slim keyboard, sturdy feel, looks great, small footprint, once configured correctly it is near flawless.Cons: Software issues, frequent battery changes, mouse needs to be fussed with in the charging cradle, bluetooth connection issues, advanced BIOS knowledge needed for control of BIOS system menus (normal for wireless/usb keyboards and mice)
Nice Drive. I gave this as a gift to my wife and she absolutely loves it.  The ease of use (no power cord, just USB connection) and the compact size are truly great
Second pair of these!. I loved the black ones so much that I had to buy a set of white ones for my wife.  She kept borrowing mine for days at a time, so I figured that it would be a good investment.  I love my black pair, now she loves her white pair
WELL BUILT, NICE SOUNDING RADIO BOOMBOX. Well built, great sounding radio. Sony got smart and left out the ancient tapedeck, and saved buyers extra cash. I did not buy this radio boombox for the radio only for cd-mp3cd-mp3 capabilities. I have had no problem with ZS-H10s radio tuner. The sony zs-H10CP has a storage compartment in the back to store its large ac cord or even an ipod. This boombox has an outlet for ipods. This boombox plays mp3 cds and has mp3 cd tagging. The hc-H10cp reads mp3 cds with ease,Sony has probably worked out the id tagging kinks with mp3 cds in this boombox. The large ac power cord can be an eyesore, but is needed to power this boombox up. Large volume control and easy to use buttons on the zs-H10cp console make this boombox a pleasure to use. I just wish Sony included a remote. The zs-H10CP has a nice heavy basey sound, that sounds larger and heavier than other boomboxes. This radio was meant to be used at a worksite, not really to carry around, but you could if you like. I had the jvc kaboombox back in 1998, it was a nice sounding radio but a monster at 27 pounds to carry around. Clearly  for all its weight and size the jvc kaboombox should have more volume for all its 27 pounds. The sony zs-H10CP at much less weight is a nice sounding simple boombox
A Great Sub At a Great Price. If you're looking for bang for your buck this is the sub for you.  I have a pretty open living area and when the sub hits you can feel it in the whole room...Nice sound with music too
Worked great for me. OK - here's what you get:1 power supply brick1 iPod dock1 3-foot cable to connect power supply brick and dock1 3-foot cable to connect dock and stereoThis version of the kit is compatible with 3rd and 4th generation iPods (those with a dock connector on the bottom) and with the iPod mini. Although the dock connector is electronically the same for all these iPods, the dimensions of the iPod itself differ by model. Thus, the dock comes with different plastic tops for the different sizes of iPods and you snap on the right-sized top for your iPod (check the size carefully before snapping on the cover - it goes on easily, but it doesn't come off easily).The cable that connects the power supply brick and the dock is a special Apple firewire-to-iPod-dock cable, but the cable that connects the iPod and the stereo system is nothing special, just a standard stereo minijack plug on one end and two rca phono plugs on the other. You can get a compatible cable from many different vendors and in many different lengths; which in my case was a good thing because the 3-foot length in the kit was too short.Is the kit a good buy? Well, it depends. If you price all of the components in the kit separately, you will find that the kit is cheaper than the individual parts, even if you have to replace the stereo cable as I did. But, the question is, do you need to buy all the parts. Let's assume for the moment that you do in fact want to attach your iPod to your stereo and consider what you might be able to do without:(1) Power supply brick. Your iPod and dock will in fact work fine without being plugged into the power supply. The trade-off is that without it you will drain the battery of the iPod while it is plugged into your stereo. You can get a dock and a stereo cable for substantially less than this kit, so if you're OK with the battery issue, you can save money by not getting the kit.(2) iPod dock. You can plug the iPod into the stereo without the dock. The same stereo cable that connects the dock to the stero will also connect the iPod to the stereo. There are two disadvantages to this: first, the dock gives a true line-out, meaning that the volume control on the iPod doesn't affect the volume coming out of the dock, so you just use the stereo's volume control to control the playback volume. The audio-out jack on the iPod, however, is affected by the iPod's volume control, so if you connect it to the stereo, you have to be careful about the fact that there are two volume controls in the system, which is annoying at best, and there might be some risk to your stereo if the iPod's volume is too high. It is also worth noting if you have a power supply brick, you do not need the dock to recharge your iPod - the brick can plug into the iPod directly. If you are OK with the audio-out thing (and whether and how to keep your iPod upright without it) you can save money by not getting the kit and doing without the dock.(3) Power-supply brick to dock cable. If you don't have the brick, you don't need the cable; if you do have the brick, you need the cable or the brick isn't going to do you any good. If you have decided you can do without recharging the iPod while it is connected to your stereo, you can skip the brick and this cable both.(4) Dock-to-Stereo cable. This is the thing you can't do without if you want to connect your iPod and your stereo, but you have a lot of choices on vendors if this is all you're getting. Even if you aren't getting a dock, the cable that would connect the dock to the stereo is the same one that would connect the iPod to the stereo directly.One more thing to consider is that your iPod might have already come with one or more of these pieces, and if you aren't using them elsewhere, you could use them as part of your stereo set-up and just buy any other pieces you need and not get the whole kit.For me, I didn't have any extra pieces and I wanted the works - to recharge  the iPod and not have to worry about a double volume control, so I got the kit. I also got the NaviPod IR Remote (which you can get right here at Amazon) so that I could control it remotely like the rest of my stereo gear.To make your decision, just figure out what you want to have, what pieces you have already, and what you might be willing to live without and then make your decision. Hope this was helpful
Great Design, Powerful Learning Function. This remote has outstanding ergonomics!!!  It has a nice compact shape that is comfortable and balanced to hold.  When held naturally, the volume buttons and channel buttons are in the ideal location. (which is important since they are so freqently used)  However, the menu select button is a bit too small and the play/ff/rev buttons could have had a slightly better layout.  Despite this the rubber buttons have a comfortable and grippy feel, and the labelling of the numbers buttons are very legible.The programmable learning function is very simple to use, and worked great for me, even with the very rare asian brand DVD player I had.  I use it to control my TV, DVD Player, VCR, and Stereo surround system with no hassles at all.If you want a great, inexpensive compact programmable remote, this is it.  It is very powerful for the price! I think it allows you to string combinations of commands together, but I have not used this function.It doesn't have dedicated buttons for eject, next chapter, or slow motion, so if you want lots of dedicated buttons, look for a larger remote, but I easily programmed these functions onto some of the other available buttons, so this remote does everything I want it to.I am afraid it will be discontinued, and I like it so much I am buying another one.
Greatest iPod Accessory Ever!!!. I bought this monster link about a month ago.  I can honestly say that I haven't watched a bit of regular cable tv ever since.  Because of my work schedule, I'm constantly missing my favorite shows and I'm almost always out of town.  I hook this bad boy up to the televisions in my hotel rooms and I have a spare one for my apartment when I'm home.  There's an optional RCA video extension incase your tv doesn't have an S-Video input and there's also a usb connection for charging while viewing.  The image quality is standard and honestly, I wasn't expecting HD images here.  I was actually shocked at certain tv shows like 30 Rock and Heroes where the quality seemed almost equal to standard tv viewing.  Overall, I can't say anything negative about this monster link.  I've bought one for almost every room in my apartment and I've purchased about 4 of them for Christmas presents this year
Wonderful. Yet another review saying this dictionary is GREAT, buy it! My only tiny complaint is that it's not backlit. It's so easy/fun to use though, I would never use my old bookmark dictionary again
An outstanding DVD player with an outstanding price tag!. The Sony DVPNC80V was purchased to replace my aging DVD/receiver unit that was beginning to fuss. I ordered this new DVD player from Amazon and had it in less then a week. From first glance, the unit seemed of very sturdy construction and was surprisingly light for its size and features. Setup was very straight forward and easy to comprehend. Once completely setup, I popped in a DVD and although it took a couple seconds longer then other DVD players, playback was immediate and flawless. The unit can also be controlled by my SONY STR-DE598 remote with NO programming right out of the box!! So now I can control both with one remote, much to my wife's delight. All in all, this is an excellent unit for its price, especially being able to utilize 5 discs in the carousel and MP3 playback. I have not found one movie that has been backed up that will not play. I would reccommend this unit to anyone
Nice Radio. I really enjoy it.  The menu buttons are a little confusing trying to figure the "enter" button.  Lots of features and the display is cool.  Good luck
Samsung YA-CD100 Helix Home Docking Kit. My only drawback with this is that it should have been a part of the package. It is a bit price
1st impression: Highly pleased; 2nd impression; hate it!  PS: I rate it only 1 star; not 4!. I had a succession of ultrasonic humidifiers from Sharper Image over the years which were fabulous for conditioning a dry room for a singer.  However, there were always two big drawbacks: (1) they'd leave white dust everywhere unless you used distilled water in them; and (2) if you let them run after the water emptied, it'd burn out the fan and then the unit would have to be replaced.However, ultrasonics are so much better for the voice than standard cool or warm humidifiers, so when Sharper Image recently stopped making this, I looked elsewhere and found the model above from Vicks.  Since I know to use only distilled water, the dust thing isn't an issue.  My initial impression was one of being very impressed by the significantly greater volume of cool mist it pushed out, and it did so essentially silently.  Also it has a far greater storage capacity than the old Sharper Image model, so it needn't be refilled as often.That idyllic image lasted for my first two hours of use.  Then I turned it off to go to lunch.  When I turned it back on an hour later, surprise, surprise, no mist would come out.  It just plain DIED!  I then called the 800 number (which was staffed by some people who had absolutely no - I mean ZERO - prior familiarity with the product), and the only tip I got was from their voice mail which said to unplug the unit for one hour so it could "re-set" itself.  I did so, but after replugging it, still no luck.Can't ANYONE make one of these that is reliable?  Vicks sure hasn't
Great earbud alternative at an ultra-low price!. I purchased these earphones as a replacement for my ipod's lost earbuds. I'd use them seven days a week and twice on Sundays for several reasons. They're inexpensive; never fall out of your ear because of the earhook, and they sound teriffic. I'd highly recommend these over several higher priced models
It's great. This printer is great!  Spits out 4x6 color photos in about 25 seconds that are top notch. The color screen makes it a snap to choose photos to print out without having to connect to a computer. Of course it's WAY cheaper to have your prints done at the store than at home but this makes pictures just as good as the store.  Really like the 2 paper tray system that you can put in 8.5x11 and 4x6 photo paper and not have to switch.Works with my powerbook great and I have it hooked up through my wireless router so I can print from anywhere in the house.  I gave it 4 stars instead of 5 because I wish it had a fax built in. It would be a 5 easily then. On a side note, it's a pretty big printer so have lots of desk space available
Excellent Radio for the price. I was looking for a high quality portable that I could use at work and that was light enough that I could carry around with me while walking.I have had the E10 for about two weeks and am very pleased with it thus far. FM reception is very good -- it matches my Sangean ATS 818 easily. AM reception is also good (altough reception is compromised at work- but this is true of any radio). Shortwave is not quite to the same level as my Sangean but it still very good especially for the price and size. Sound is surprisingly good for the size of the speaker.My biggest complaint with the radio is the small size of the buttons and controls. Even as small as the radio is, it is clear that they could have designed it with larger and more well spaced buttons.The E10 comes with rechargeable NIMH batteries, the only drawback is that they only charge when the radio is OFF. The radio will work with standard AA batteries as well. An AC adaptor/charger is included. It also comes with ear buds (For FM Stereo) and a windup shortwave antenna. A carrying case is included (I use mine everyday).If you like memory presets, you will love this radio. It has 500! (so far I have used only about 25 of them!)
so far so good. I haven't used it much yet, but when I have, it's worked fast
Problems with DVD player?. I rarely write reviews but I could not believe what I saw with the "24 DVD" players and it doesn't work.  All I ever use are Verbatim DVD's and I burn on both a Mac and a Windows-based unit.  The Windows DVD's play fine in my Mac and vice-versa.  Also, I have two Sony DVD players, a PS2, and my roomies Zenith DVD player, none of which have a problem playing the discs.  If you "truly" had problems with 24 DVD players, I am wondering if you just got a bad disc.  I have been burning copies of my older DVD's, this weekend alone having done 7, with not a coaster.  On my 2nd 50 pack in under a month, and only have had one problem (which was my fault anyhow).  Verbatim's, in my opinion, are the best media available, in both DVD-R and DVD DL
Good Service; Excellent Trustworthy. Item arrived on time as expected; Good customer service; All in all, 5 stars
Vonage For Convenience. I've heard the horror stories about Vonage, but it is a very good service for someone like me who travels regularly. I signed up for Vonage while stationed here in Iraq and I have not had any problems at all.  I even purchased a "virtual" number to use between locations that I can access without a router/adapter.  My family can call me no matter where I am in the world as a local call to them. I tried Skype and was very disappointed, but Vonage is worth it to keep in touch with my family.  And being able to have a regular phone like the V-Tech is great because I don't have to wrestle with a headset or earpiece.  For me it makes being on the road or deployed like being at home
Nothing but compliments. I am using this system instead of component audio to do with my new hi def TV. i can't believe the quality of sound that comes out. I would have paid 3x what this system cost to buy it in pieces and the sound would be roughly the same.I would recommend these for whatever use you have. They rock. Literally
Have Drive will Travel!  Memorex 512MB. I love my USB. I wear it close to my heart. (on the neckchain) It's easy to use. No installation necessary. And it's easier than carrying around a laptop
A good product. I used this mount to hang a 42" panasonic TV.  The product was shipped in a good package.  It is a solid piece and it holds my TV up securely (I was initially apprehensive of hanging it but the moment I felt the solid stainless steel bar my mind was at ease).  It is deceptively heavy so it is critical to mount it on 2 studs.  However, the tv does slide a bit on the bar so you can sift it to the right/left by a few inches.The only area that I felt was lacking was a bit of clarity in the instructions.  You have to read a few sections a couple of times to ensure that you have interpreted the instructions correctly
PRETTY GOOD. THIS IS ONE OF THE BEST AND FIRST MP3 I OWN. IT IS PRETTY LILGHT AND PORTABLE. THE SOUND IS GOOD DEPENDS ON THE HEADPHONES YOU USE.  IT IS A PRETTY GOOD MP3 FOR MUSIC AND PICTURES. GOOD RADIO NOT COMPLAINTS
GET RID OF THOSE COVERS!!!. My wife came up with the idea of placing all my DVDs in binders...I rejected the idea at first, but then saw her point about how our family room started to look like a video store.Now our shelves have more space and doesn't look so awkwardly colorful--the binders actually match the color scheme of our house!I know the other review mentions that the binder doesn't stay closed, but that's only if you fill each page with two DVD discs--meaning every DVD the other reviewer has is a two-disc set.  If you fill the binder up to its capacity, I can see that happening--but if you just have your average stack of DVDs, this is the product for you!The best thing about these binders:  It's highly unlikely anyone will ask to borrow a DVD--especially those "never-bring-them-back" friends!  Without the covers, they can't!Five Star product...all the way
So far - so good. Service: Ordered the sticks on Thursday, recieved them on Monday!Performance: Used these to boost my RAM to 1.5 Gig (previously had KVR400X64C3AK2/512 in my system, which is the little brother to this set).  All were recognized at boot-up and has markedly increased my performance (some apps boot up in half the time previously!).  Need to test further, but so far, so good!
Great TV/Monitor. I did some extensive research on TVs, and after several months of comparisons between Sharp and Samsung, I finally decided to purchase this set. After owning the set for a few days, I don't have a single regret.The brightness of the screen is more than sufficient, and I actually have to dim the screen a bit for comfortable viewing. The contrast is better than any other 32" television I've seen in stores - in fact, because this set is a new model, I had actually never even seen one in a store before purchasing it from Amazon, but I bought it based on the specs, and it more than surpassed my expectations. There are multiple quick picture settings to choose from (including one user pre-set), so it's easy to change the brightness or contrast depending on what you're watching, which is extremely convenient for anyone who plans on connecting this to a computer, as I made my custom pre-set a much lower brightness so that I can quickly dim the screen when I switch from watching TV to using the computer.This set makes for a fantastic computer monitor (as long as you're not too close). The resolution is more than adequate to read small text, watch video clips, or look at/edit photos. There are also several buttons on the top of the unit which the pictures on Amazon do not show, making it very easy to select which input you want without having to use the remote. I couldn't get my computer to display wide-screen without stretching the image, but I'm not sure whether that's because of the TV or my graphics card. However, when I change the TV's screen ratio to 4:3 from 16:9, it still leaves me with a 26" standard screen, which is more than sufficient.I use this set with an A/V receiver with surround sound, so I could care less about the TV's built-in speakers, but when I tested them, I was very surprised at the quality, especially given their size and wattage. If you plan on using the sound from the TV, I doubt you'll be disappointed, but I think it's almost shameful to own a television this nice and not invest on some sort of sound system.Overall, this TV is amazing and worth every penny, especially when you look at the price of older models and those from different manufacturers
This thing is amazing. I'm a cow and like most cows I use Photoshop heavily. All I can say is that I can not believe that I went as long as I did without this tool. Other reviews are not exaggerating about the night and day difference this thing makes.One thing about the widescreen tablet is that it works great in portrait mode. I use a 24" Dell widescreen monitor in portrait mode and I was a little worried that the tablet might not work in that configuration. Wacom definitely did their homework.To be honest I found it to not be that useful in 3D Max, but in Photoshop it's a WMD
Nothing too special, but serves its purpose. We didn't expect this item to revolutionize the way we us our iPod minis, but it does what it should - protects the unit from getting too beat up. The main things you look for on these is access to ports (which is pretty good, but not great); ability to use your controls (which is fine); protection of the unit - especially the screen - from damage (pretty good). Though the screen isn't fully covered, the added depth of the area around it makes it a bit tougher to damage (the screen isn't flat along the same plane as the rest of the unit, as it would be without this extra "skin" layer).The biggest negatives in my view are that you cannot use the standard "clip" to attach your iPod to a pocket or belt with this - it has a lanyard attachment instead. The access to ports for connecting accessories isn't perfect, so keep in mind the different attachments you'll want to be connecting and consider how this might get in the way of their connecting. But like I said, it serves the "protection" purpose pretty well, but you shouldn't expect it to be super-special and accomodate everything you may want to do with your iPod
SONY replacing a SONY. After about 20 years of service, during which time I never needed service, my SONY gave out, so I bought this one, hoping for continued good luck. My new SONY is not as simple to operate, which is not a negative aspect; considering my age, 76, and the changes occurring in the electronic field, I'm happy that I was able to master most of the refinements SONY has put in this new player and can enjoy my music again
Outstanding Performance & Monitoring. The Forerunner 305 w/ Heart Rate Monitor is outstanding I must say.  Compared to many other wrist GPS devices, this one is the most accurate I have found and it has not lost GPS signal once in my two months of using it almost every day.  I ran the same course 11 times and it gave identical distance readouts each time, regardless of weather conditions and the fact that I live in a densely housed area.The Heart Rate Monitor is extremely accurate, and the options for viewing data on the screen are practically endless.  With the ease of viewing what you want, the reliability of the GPS, the hundreds of options for data to record and monitor, the training partner and training features, the heart rate monitor - and all the other options I must give this 5 stars.  I wouldn't want anything else now that I have used this Garmin device.Very well done, Garmin
Excelent Typewriter. Great typewriter.Easy to use, clear instructions.Compact and good desig
Great quality at reasonable price!. The 100 2-sided CD/DVD sleeves were a great buy.  They are fairly durable and make carrying/storing CDs/DVDs easier
great product, pretty low price!. no kidding, it's a really useful little thing, and pretty girly, too! ;
Sony LCD TV is the Best Ever. My wife and I bought this tv for Christmas, and we are extremely pleased with it. We have it hooked up to a Cox Cable HDTV set-top box, which includes a PVR feature, and our sound system. It's probably got the best tv picture we have ever seen. The HDTV channels look like a picture postcard, almost 3-D. The standard definition digital tv channels are very good. Even the standard definition analog tv channels are nice and sharp, except for one obscure PBS station. I definitely think the extra money for the top-of-the-line Sony was a good investment. Bryan
TI-84 graphing calculator. This product was a gift to my Granddaughter, who is a high school Soph.,for use in her math and chemistry classes. She has used the calculator quite extensively with no problems and likes it very much. The only problem being that other students want to borrow it all the time
Great shape, good quality. I love this controller.  I have small hands for an adult, and the pad fits me well.  I like the shape better than even the now-standard Controller S shape.  I have no problems with delay or drift.  I haven't used the D-pad, but the thumbsticks and buttons work great, though I'm not a terribly heavy user.  This pad works better than either the Pelican Eclipse or Soul that I own.  My Madcatz Lynx is better, but way too big for my hands.  I like the feel of the plastic.  The only thing I would change would be making the thumbsticks a bit shorter and concave on top, though I've never had a problem with grip
Good Product but refills are way overpriced. These things are a great way to organize your DVD's and save storage space.  I can't figure out why the refills are so expensive however..
clarification of other person review. the reson it would not send a video signal may be because you didnt go into settings and turn "TV Out" on. If you do that it should work just fine
Weird instalation... The cable works very well, I now can use the printer I had forgotten due to the lack of parallel port in my computer. Installation manual, however, goes only up to windows 2000, which leads me to think that the product is rather old, or that Plug'N'Play usually takes care of this. I had a little puzzle to solve before I managed to make it work, but in the end I realized that the "Printer Spooler" service was disabled from within windows. Once enabled, everything worked perfectly
Device lets me listen to Radio. My grandmother bought me this item (in color black) for Christmas and I am listening to it right now.  I have tuned it to a radio station here in Oregon where I am on vacation visiting all of my family and they are playing various piano music.  Thank you!  It is small and the neck strap is handy for riding buses.  The strap is conveniently not a band (Width bigger than depth) so it does not cut into/scar your neck.  My previous ipod's strap created a red mark unless I wore high-collared shirts
Beware: Don't order this for the iPod Photo. This system worked great for my 40 GB iPod. The carrying case and interchangable plug-ins are nifty for international travellers. A word of warning -- the 60 GB iPod Photo does not fit in the docking station. Altrec insisted that it does at the time I purchased it in July 2005. Be sure to order the "Altec IM3 for iPod and iPod Photo" that is now available if you have the Photo iPod.
Great for the office. I got these stress balls for the guys on my (IT) team and they ALL LOVE IT! Even my managers asked for them.  If you know someone that likes to play with silly things then this is perfect! They have a great 'feel' to them.. they're not like the regular 'globe' stress relief balls that we're so used to getting... these balls turn color and expand out of your hand as your squeeze them. Watching them turn different colors is lots of fun. (It seems that each ball has two colors - You see the main color when it's not being squeezed and the second color when you squeeze it) The balls are great as stocking stuffers too - but you might have to take them out of the packaging to fit it in the stocking. Happy Squeezing
Great for teachers on the go!. Currently, I am a student teacher at a high school that is not equipped with much in the way of high technology. I have struggled with the fact that the most advanced permanent piece of technology in the classroom was a slide projector (yes, SLIDES) that I had to dig out of my parents' garage. Coming right out of the university, I was used to making presentations utilizing the Internet and Powerpoint. It had been my hope that with my first teacher paycheck (a year later, that is) I would be able to purchase a multimedia projector for classroom use. To my great surprise, my parents were able to pick up the PowerLite S4 at an Office Depot for a very good price, and gave it to me as a gift for Christmas. Being a student teacher, I am forced to move around from class to class. This is where I have found the S4 to be very able. The S4 is, as the name implies, very light. If my hands were a big larger, I would easily be able to pick it up with one hand and have no problems. While it is certainly not the highest powered projector on the market today, it certainly throws out quite a bright image. The color is vibrant and can be seen when all the light banks are on in the classroom. I prefer to have the lights off, obviously, but lights on does not destroy the image. The S4 offers many different inputs, but the projector supplies only one with the product. Another feature that I enjoy is the time it takes for cool down. As a teacher on the go, I need to be packed up and ready to move on in about 5 minutes. The S4 cools down fast, which is definitely attractive. The sliding door for the lens is very nice as well. One of the only negative experiences I've had with this projector is that I have found that the projector must be hooked up to the computer before the computer is turned on. Once I figured that out, I have not had any trouble. For teachers and presenters on the go, I highly recommend this projector
Exccellent Audio qualtiy. First thing I noticed with this item is the great audio quality although i was using the same old speakers in my car. I originally got his item so I can connect it to iPod's adapter which works flawlessly although I would have loved to see a search feature added.Overall, this is a great model and I recommend it highly.
Reliable Affordable QoS router. This is a great router for the price. It's easy to configure and the documentation is pretty good. It explains the routing pretty well. What sets this router apart from others is the quality of service settings (QoS) that allow you to prioritize ports for bandwidth usage. You can set your streaming music or game ports to use a high priority and thus never get cut off by maxing out your bandwidth. This alone makes it worth the price.One thing to note: if you're on a Mac and try to configure this router through safari (It's web page configuration) it won't work because of a bug in safari. Use Firefox and you'll be golden.(Yes it works on Macs.
Does the job. I have an older laptop that really gets hot when holding it on my lap, bought the Chill Pad and was surprise how the two little fans work in keeping the heat factor down. It would be worth 5 stars if it was adjustable
Protects your investment. Manufactured of a soft gray felt like material, a tough leather bottom, and draw string closure at the top, this lens pouch helps protect your lens from dust and the elements.  I store my lenses in a camera bag, and these cases fit nicely around the lens taking up little precious space.This case is meant for use with the Canon 16-35mm f/2.8L USM, 17-40mm f/4L USM, 10-22mm f/3.5-4.5 EF/EFS lenses. These L lenses normally come with the case when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.  However if your case is worn, replacing it to protect your lens is recommended.PROS:Protects your glass investmentCONS:I cannot think of an
Stereo Headphones. Sennheiser MX55V is outstanding. For the price, it delivers incredible clarity in sound. My son who is a rock music freak will use nothing but premium noise-cancelling headsets was stunned to listen through the MX55V. I am buying another one now..
Use standard keyboard w/laptop. This little thing, always in my bag, works great to use a standard keyboard with my XP Pro laptop. Good quality item
Great Hardware!!. This Portable Color LCD TV, is too flexible, I mean Water and Shock Resistant. It's LCD resolution is good enough as well
worth the price. Very sturdy, Very good features although there is rooom for improvement, quite heavy, but I suppose that should be expected for the sturdiness, and overall worth it, especially at only (...
No need to spend hundreds. This little turntable does it all. It's advertised for TVs around 20 inches, but please note that is TUBE TVs, the old CRTs your parents have. If you use this for LCDs and plasmas, it will work up to 40-50" TVs as long as the weight does not exceed the allowed specifications. I use it with my Westinghouse 37" LVM-37w3 1080p monitor and never a problem
Superior value. Although HP LaserJet 13X (Q2613X) costs about 20% more than LaserJet 13A (Q2613A), it is a superior buy for a number of reasons. Topping the list is lower cost per page. 13X can print 4000 pages at 5% page coverage (ISO/IEC 19752 standard) whereas 13A can print 2500 pages. That's 37.5% difference in page yield. Divide up the toner price against 4000 (e.g., 91.99 / 4000 = 2.3 cents) to get cost per page.Secondly, laser toners last a long time whether you print few times a month or dozens of pages a day (they don't dry out). And finally, higher page yield means fewer toner replacement.My only complaint with 13X (and that goes to 13A as well) is that page yield cost with some competing printers and higher-end HP LaserJets is even less
no problems so far... I was a little hesitant to try this product even with the low pricetage because of some of the reviews, but I have had it on my 5g 60gb pod for about 3 months and it works perfectly. It protects the screen and the surface without distorting the picture or messing with the click wheel at all. I haven't had any problems with the dirt or the corners peeling or anything at all (just make sure you clean it well before applying). Also it comes with directions on how to wash and reapply if dirt does become a problem. Fingerprints do show up on it a lot, but they do on the ipod too. I highly recommend this product, especially for the price
Seems designed specifically for jogging. This case is made of nice material.  Unfortunately the Ipod fits rather loosely in the case.  Also, one of the Velcro flaps on the top of the case covers the hold button on the Ipod.  The case takes away from the Ipod's good looks and slightly hinders usage of the buttons.  It doesn't do what I wanted it to do - stay out of the way and simply protect the MP3 player.  However, the case would be great to use just for jogging as it comes with a belt and clip that hold the Ipod firmly.
Great Accessory for Any Vehicle. We purchased the Case Logic Portable DVD Player Case, Model APDV-3, for use on a recent road trip with two young children.  It worked very well; easy to hang from front seats, would fit any size portable CD player and has storage for CD's.  However, the best thing is probably the adaptor for two headsets.  No fighting over who got to listen
So far so good....... Just finished connecting the Seagate 750Gb drive to my system.  I had my doubts, but it is working fine with my network.  It is connected via USB hub into the USB port on an Apple AirPort Base Station.  The Seagate drive is recognized and functioning in a Windows XP and a Mac OS.  I also have a USB printer connected to the same USB hub and there aren't any conflicts with the hard drive.
takes a licking...and keeps on ticking. just the like the reviewer below, i accidentally put my cruzer through the washer...AND the dryer.  i pulled it out after my clothes finished drying a i was SURE i had firstly waterlogged it, and secondly fried it.when i got to work and plugged it into my computer it started right up. no problems whatsoever.  i don't know whether or not it would survive it i did it again, but for this one time, it performed brilliantly. thanks, cruzer!
What a great little bean!!!. This is the greatest little MP3 player!!! The sound is great (good bass), the size is very convenient and everybody who see it, wants one. It fits in a pocket, has an armband option or a key ring option, even little speakers as an option. I've taken it on so many trips. There is a caution though, even though the software is good for Windows Plus or better, you can not download from the web unless you have Windows XP
A recorder I can easily use. Finally, I found a small pocket sized recorder that I can use without reading a lot of the manual.  It's small, but the buttons are big enough to find and push easily.I was using it all throughout Christmas time to record my grandchildren's voices.  They grow up so fast... but I digress.I took it down to the beach yesterday on a trip with my wife.  As we passed billboards along the route, I recorded the phone numbers and descriptions of properties for sale and rent.  As we inspected a few vacation rental places for this summer's potential vacation spot, I recorded our first impressions as we walked throughout the beach houses and condo/apartments. That made it easy when we had questions after we got back into the car about what rooms had KingSize beds and which had smaller bads, etc. It would have been too much trouble to write all hse comments down on paper.Not much to say about the recorder other than it works as advertised and you can use it out of the box without reading a lot of instructions.  That's the part that I like.  Battery life is very good, too.  I'm still on the original batteries
Not All Of That... but it is Most Of That. If this card came with a mini antenna and picked up FM radio broadcasts it would be perfect. It's easy to set up and use. It works well with my Dell 6000 laptop. I don't have a cable connection but I imagine the picture would be gorgeous if I did. I've backed up videos from my VCR and DVD to my PC with excellant video quality. It comes with RCA and S-video jacks for easy recording and can be connected coaxially for cable. I've travelled and viewed local tv with reception that varied according to the location (understandably). I had to buy an external mini antenna seperately to realize good reception while travelling. PIP only works with one LIVE broadcast and a STORED video that's already on your PC. It's a PCMCIA card and only laptops come with that slot so it should be assumed that the user would be utilizing the product while travelling or away from home so an antenna and FM radio reception should be standard with the product. I love it and my friends love it. For $75 it beats the $200 that I spent on the Pinnacle MovieBox two years ago for recording to my PC and this has a built in TV and needs no connection to AC power
good for the money. it was what i expected for the money i paid. the 2 gen nano fits in nicely. there is a cord that attaches from the bottom of the case so using ure nano is easy.
Great little calculator. The Casio fx Solar fraction calculator is used in teaching my math class of young , primarily Mexican mothers to prepare them for GED tests. Some calculators have been in use for years without failure. The solar feature is remarkable ,works in very dim light, and is inexpensive
This cassette adapter is great!!!. I recently bought an '06 Mazda6 and with a newly installed tape deck, I wanted a high quality cassette adapter that would not give me any problems while I was driving. I previously owned a Sony and Monster cassette adapter. The Sony always was and still is reliable but being how old it is, the sound quality isn't perfect. The Monster was a piece of crap that constantly would be ejected from my old tape deck so I went with the AVB. I'm glad I did. The sound is great, it spins extremely quietly, and the retractable cord is very nifty. I've only had it for maybe 2 weeks but if it keeps working as it has, then I am very satisfied with this product.
Best CREATIVE software and materials out there. I've been using NEATO and the 'MediaFace' software for years.  I LOVE the ability to calibrate the output so I can create 2 sided CD booklets that line up perfectly!  Sure you have to do a little test printing but that's what gives YOU the control.  This is definitely not for the Dumb and Dumber set.  If you want software and label materials that are 'designed with your mind in mind' and don't want creative control, then this is not for you.  I use it for CD booklets, CD labels, and jewel case inserts all on glossy paper and folks think the results are professionally done.  If you don't want to put in the effort, the get something else.  But if you like the freedom to express your creativity, this will give you the room you need
Pretty useful product. You will appreciate this product only if you don't have enough USB ports. In my case, I had plenty of ports, but needed an extension cable, which would help me in plugging the flash drives, whithout bending down and plunging into the cave of wires(I keep my CPU, under the table).The only complaint I have is the the wire lenght is not long enough.Overall good value for price
Does exactly what it says. I've been quite pleased with this case. Contrary to another reviewer, I find that it fits my new 15.4" screen laptop perfectly.  It's an HP Pavilion dv series laptop.  The outside dimension of this laptop from corner to corner diagonally is 17.25", and it fits very snugly in this case.  Note that the 15.4" screen size could result in an outside laptop dimension that is greater than 17.25", which could then make the laptop too large for the case.  This is one you would tuck under your arm, or into another bag. Perfect for short trips that don't involve a long carrying distance. There's also room in here for a folder or two and some pens. Does just what it says it will, providing good level of protection for the laptop. Friends have admired it for the simplicity and utilitarian appearance
Great Printer. I am very impressed with this printer. I used to own an Epson C60,and this printer just blew that printer away. it's fast and the colors are very vivid. I would highly recommend this product. This is a inexpensive printer with a lot of bang for the money
WOW!. This is an awesome graphics cards. Currently, I am playing NWN2 and have every effect activated. This card is not even being tested. I can't wait to see how it tackles such games as Dark Messiah and other FPS games
Great Product. I have had a 32mb jumpdrive for over 3 years now and I have never needed anything bigger. That was until I got this one. 4GB!! Now I carry it everywhere. Im a computer Tech and this is the best way I can carry my software with me. You can boot from the thing if you want. It has enough space to run Windows XP. Very fast and easy!Buy this Drive!! You need it
Great remote, fantastic support. Being a gadget freak, I was looking for something to replace my Harmony remote. That's when I found the Monster MCC AV100. I have the new MacBook Pro intel dual core. When I got the remote and  installed the software, it wouldn't work. I notified support via email. It turns out that there was a problem with the software with the new intel macs. It took them about two days to fix the software, and they sent the new software via fedex next day air. The new software works perfectly. It takes a little time to "tweak" the remote to set it up the way you want it. But it's all self-explanitory. And the best part. No more buying batteries. The chargeable battery is worth it's weight in gold. This is by far the best remote I've ever own. The only complant is that some of the buttons on the bottom of the remote are quite small and tough to reach. Especially the "page up" and "page down" buttons. But that's easily taken care of by re-assigning the buttons. It's kind of pricey, but if you have a decent home theater set-up, why not spend some extra money on a decent remote
nice and cheap. This is a great little disposable armband. I say disposable because its so cheap you can toss it if you want and get a new one.  Nice adjustable band, although I can see this wearing out in the future as the band loses elasticity.  Great for the gym.  It even comes with a little custom fit LCD screen protector which is a nice touch.  The arm band is removable, so even if you are just looking for a skin...this is a stea
Highly Recommended for FCP. If you're a Final Cut Pro, Avid, or iMovie editor, then you're really gonna love this device! Its especially useful for cataloguing a footage ---- on mine, I have set the buttons to mark 'ins' and 'outs', as well as 'markers'Most importantly, I have found this wheel to make my editing much more productive and time efficient, as so many controls are now at finger tips, instead of having to have my mouse be dragged over everywhereFor serious FCP/Avid editors, I really recommend this device! After using it, the price just can't be beat
Great product, but may not be the most durable. This is going to be light on details, as Amazon's stock description seems to cover just about everything technical you might want to know.Mine came with my Alienware computer, it was the best surround-sound headphone option without going into extreme price ranges (there was a $500+ option from Europe that came in a lavish handcrafted wood box with velvet lining, no joke). I have to say, they really have been a fantastic product in the 15 months or so that I've owned them. Due to unforeseen circumstances I've had my PC set up in a temporary situation, and haven't gotten around to using actual speakers, so I used these exclusively.Therein lies the problem, my set just wore out recently, and while the time of ownership seems short, I have to be fair and acknowledge that it may be due to the exceptionally high level of usage mine saw. Still, Caveat Emptor, eh? I'd strongly reccomend them, especially at Amazon's prices, but you might want to consider how much you'll use them, and for how long
Quality Receiver. I am completely satisfied with this product.  I found the same product for less cost
Great radio, Fantastic price!. This review is for the silver model @ $35.00. I could not belive the price & had to get one & see what was up. I think mine is a floor demo as the tape sealing the box had been broken.The radio is in perfect condition, all functions work fine, all origonal packaging. I recommend this buy for as long as it will last, it is a great price. I enjoy this radio more than my other portables as the sound is much better & I like twisting knobs.
Good all around headphones. PROS:* Modern, simplistic design* Great sound, unexpected from $ 20 headphones* Snug fit, doesn't fall off of head, great for joggers* Neodymnium magnets deliver powerful bass* Cord is just the perfect length, unlike other Sony headphones [*cough* MDR-Q55SL *cough*]CONS:* Fit may be tight for people with a taller build* Tends to pinch ears* Neckband gets in the way when you turn your headThese are very good headphones for bargain hunters or people who are active.  People with taller builds or bigger heads may want to look elsewhere.  But, I feel that the pros far outweigh the cons, especially at this price point
Great Cable. This cable does exactly what it is supposed to do.  I previously had a Boston Acoustic PV1000 sub hooked up with a cheap cable but always had problems with the bass sounding "boomy".  I just replaced the cable w/ this one from monster and regret that I didn't do it earlier.  My sub finally sounds the way it should.  I actually had the floor rattling until my wife came down from upstairs because she couldn't hear the tv up there.  If you have a decent home theatre system spend $30 for this cable, you won't be disappointed
Excellent product. I've owned this item for almost a full year and I am extremely pleased with it. It's so nice being able to carry around my laptop and my books in the same bag. The side pockets are kind of useless for them being so small, but I guess I'll be able to find a purpose for them.
GREAT PRODUCT!. I own a recording studio in my home and wanted to unclutter my space.  This monitor mount was the perfect complement to my situation.  Sturdy and easy, sraight forward install are words I would use to describe my experience.  I would highly recomend this product.
Easy to Setup & Good Signal Strength. The router was easy to setup and the signal strength was good.
Good choice - Does not require included CD on newer Win 2000 or XP. From appearances and description, this appears to be identical to my SDDR-92 (no A15) except for the shape of the button.This SanDisk is an excellent unit - compact and reasonably slim, with a detachable USB cord.  It is perfect for carrying in a pocket of your laptop case (unlike my Dazzle which is fine for a desk top, but awkwardly shaped for compact storage).The unit is reliable and fast, and, unlike the 8-in-1 or 12-in-1 units which use up four hard-drive letters, this unit only uses one hard-drive letter.  It supports reading, writing, deleting, etc., and works with either USB 2.0 or USB 1.1.If you do not care about the button software, this unit installs plug-n-play, without needing a driver CD (at least on Win 2000 and XP).  It simply appears as a removable hard-drive letter in Explorer.I did not install the button software because I am not a fan having extra transfer mechanisms and photo organizers on my computer.  I would rather be in full, manual control of how and when things happen, and where files are put.I think that this is a 5-star unit, but I downgrade my own unit to 4 1/2 stars because of its overzealous packaging and arrogant installation instructions.  In both the instructions, and on a sticky label on the unit (which I still have not been able to fully remove), it proclaims that you MUST install the button software before connecting the unit.  I ignored that warning, and the unit worked fine without any installation needed.One of the important requirements in a card reader is portability.  Since not everyone takes kindly to your installing software on their computer, the card must be able to work just by plugging it into the USB port.  The SanDisk SDDR-92 meets this requirement, although it proclaims not to.This is a good choice for a CompactFlash Reader/Writer.
Perfectly reliable, perfectly priced. Needing a quick &amp; dirty home network solution, I quickly decided on the Netgear switch.  All five ports are switched 10/100, half or full duplex, auto-negotiate.  After several months of use, I'm happy to say my Netgear switch has never burped once, and blazes as fast as I can ask
Sounds Great!!!. Simply fantastic sound for two channel audio from a computer. This card is best suited for playing music from your computer over your stereo / home theater system. Most 2-channel computer speakers will require an adapter or new cable to use the RCA output jacks. Worth the trouble for the sound you'll get out of a decent pair of computer speakers.Has a very high quality D/A converter built in for making digital recordings from vinyl or tape. Recordings sound excellent. Output sounds excellent through either the coaxial digital or analog outputs. Dolby Digital can be automatically passed through the digital output to be decoded by your A/V receiver.Had no problems with the installation or functioning of this card in Windows XP Pro.Completely destroys the Audigy 2 it replaced for music. 128 KB MP3 internet radio even sounds awesome through this card. Clean, dynamic and smooth sound. Very pleased with this purchase!!
A Traveller's Review. I travel overseas a lot for my job. This little power strip is compact and enables you to keep ONE adapter on the end of it to plug into the funky wall plug and then use your "normal" plugs for operating four devices. Most Monster products are terribly overpriced and not worth the money (wires, cables, etc.) but this gizmo rocks
2 gb Olympus xd memory card. Received exactly what I ordered at a fair price
Excellent Radar/Lazer Detector. The Cobra XRS-9930 lives up to the Name of Quality.  The X and R bands activate when needed.  The only negative is the LED Screen.  Somewhat difficult to view in daylight.  Have to have place in full center view.   The Voice alert is what one has to count on in daylight hours.  Overall Excellent product
Great product. The Macally PHR-100AF FireWire External Enclosure is a great product, very easy to assemble, plugs-in via firewire and appearson your desktop just as any external hard drive would.I bought two this product as a way of salvaging a couple of internal hard drives that I had previously installed as upgrades in my Mac that I was replacing. They have both worked flawlessly now for two months and I would unhesitatingly reccommend them to others as a great solution for this kind of situation.
Needs to be packaged better, but a great value. Positives:  Parts all labeled clearly; the little pieces were all in individual bags and labeled with the letter matching the instructions (instructions say use a "K" screw, then open the "K" baggie); predrilled holes were all spot on and everything fit correctly upon completion; quick and easy to construct; spins solidly and smoothly; instructions were clear and simple; I think it looks good.Negatives:  Due to inadequate protection, all four of the vertical side panels had a scratch of some nature on them; one of the shelves had a chip in the corner, even though those boards were wrapped; had to wipe down all the boards to clean off this grayish residue off them here and there.Overview:  It's not furniture grade, it's just laminated pressboard (1/2 in. for the sides, top and bottom plates; 3/8 in. for the middle shelves and dividers).  But in context of the price (something like $35 delivered), it's an outstanding value.  The marks, other than the chip in the shelf, are not visible from the couch, and it looks good otherwise.  The color is a brown, but a dark brown.  Sits on my black shelving fine.FYI:  each of the eight shelf spaces are 10 3/4 inch wide by 8 1/4 inch tall.Bottomline:  If I had to redo my purchase, I'd buy this product again
number of pages per ink cartridge. Hi..I am happy with the quick result for HP15 ink cartridge printing 495 pages. I would appreciate if the comparative list of all HP and other brands number of pages per cartridge can be achieved at a glance.Thanks.
Perfectly fits all DVDs in little space. I was at first hesitant to buy this because I have shelves full of DVDs, but my sister has one and told me I would fall in love with this case and its true. I bought two. If you want to watch a good movie and dont want to carry 10 DVDs in your hand to show your friends/family, this case is easier, because you just carry this and you have all your DVDs available.Its heavy, but come on, who said DVDs are light! Its absolutely perfect.I highly recommend this product to anyone that wants to downsize their walls of DVD...At first its hard to part with the cases, but in the end, if you end up moving, you dont have to box up over 50 boxes, only a big book.It takes little space and is very sturdy. Even has extra space for more DVDs if you have extras to place.I only bought two cases, but plan on buying more for more movies that I end up buying.Enjoy your new DVD case, you will love it
MX 518 unleashed. It's cool to own one.. ;) .. i'm a die hard gamer.. though i've not had time to serioulsy exploit its high resolution.. just using it in with default settings is kickass.. Buy it only for games and all... for desktop use there are better looking less expensive options.
Pricey, but for a Good Reason. This is a great card to use for your 8 megapixel digital camera. I have the OLYMPUS C8080, and at the highest-quality camera settings, I can get 254 color shots from this card. SimpleTech is my favorite brand, because I've never had any of their cards fail on me, even after repeated washings. Oops.This CF Card is totally dependable. SimpleTech is pricey, but you're paying for quality, which is cheaper in the long run.
Great Screen. It works great and we have had no problems with it. I would recommend it for anyone who wants a pull-down projector screen.
Good product at great price. The USB cable looks and feels very similar to the apple one, but the chargers have a somewhat cheesy feel. Then again, that's totally to be expected when you buy a whole set for less than half the price of a cable or either charger alone from Apple or one of the name brand companies.I also should note that the AC adapter is 100-240v compatible, so it can work worldwide. I was wondering about that when I bought it because none of the tech info mentioned it. In fact, the casing itself was designed to be used with the EU style plugs, and that's why it protrudes from the body of the case.Also, the items I received look like the submitted picture, and not the MFG's picture, for what it's worth... Doesn't matter much because in any case the items aren't very aesthetically pleasing anyways.Bottom line, from reading the other reviews it looks like they have QC issues, but I wound up with a perfectly functional set at a great price
Good buy for excellent protection of my Garmin c320. I usually just store the GPS unit without windshield mount and cables so that the unit is not visible when my car is parked on city streets (Boston).  But I have taken this with me on trips and everything(GPS on the mount + cables)fits smartly and snugly in the case.Also, I have dropped the GPS a couple times while in the case (mostly waist-height to shoulder-height), and I'm sure it hit the ground not too gently (hard enough to expect damage) but GPS still works like a charm!
Toshiba Numeric Keypad. Does exactly what it says, perfectly. Nothing to install, just plug it in.
The ultimate running companion. As an aspiring triathlete and self-admitted gadget freak, I'm always looking for something new to track my progress.  This little device is fantastic.  I was contemplating upgrading my Polar HRM to the one with the "footpod" that tracks speed/distance - but I'm glad I bought this instead.  Pro's and con's:Pro's:1.  INCREDIBLY easy to use, program, and manipulate.  My overriding thought since I got it has been that Polar could learn alot from Garmin.  I've had my Polar S450 for 3 years and still can't get it to do everything it's supposed to.2.  Lightweight, wristwatch style configuration is imperceptible while wearing it.  In fact, it's lighter than my Polar HRM, which I wear on the other wrist.3.  Incredibly accurate.  Used it while biking the other day...distance and other measurements were right on with my cyclocomputer.4.  Very user-friendly software interface, and uploading a run takes seconds, without any additional user involvement other than plugging it into the computer.5.  Price - very, very reasonable.Con's:Only one, and it's a stretch...can't use it while swimming.  As a triathlete, I would have liked to be able to accurately measure my distance & speed during open water swims.Now I kinda wish I'd bought the 405 (with built in HR monitor).  Maybe when the Polar wears out!  A great tool and terrific value
Duracell batteries DO have energy!. Its true these battery do have energy inside them, its another marvel of modern science. Personally I noticed that the flow of electrons were very strong, a nice change after years of dealing with batteries that only had strong to moderately strong electron flow. You mainly notice this when you bridge the terminals with your mouth (dont try this at home, well, actually if you do try it, it will probably be at home. But dont try it at WORK you will look like an idiot)I did notice however that the longer I left the battery bridged in my mouth the less painfull it became, this was over a period of like 3 days straight though which was promising. At first I didn't know if it was just my nerve endings getting fried off or if this behemoth of a battery was actually losing power. But after a couple more days I started to regain feeling in my lower lip and I knew the ride was almost over and the battery was indeed growing weeker. Overall this was the longest lasting battery I have personally experienced. I would recommend it to anyone with a taste for adventure
Works fine. It does have a short cord, but long enough to reach the front of an older desktop computer with USB 1.1 connections only on the back.  Short cord could be a plus for laptops: Less tangling
The only product worth my time for writing a review. This is the best mouse EVER by FAR . I owned the original one and it worked flawlessly for over 5 years(and if someone hadn't cut the cord I would still be using it today). As a responce to the users that are less than absolutly satisfied; I will agree looking at their perspective. Smaller hands may find that pressing the two side buttons by accident is as easy as pressing them intentionally, and the scroll wheel is notched deeper than most. Both of these features are intentional. This is not by any means a particularly big mouse but it may be a good idea to go into a local retail store just to make sure that you are comfortable holding it. If your thumb does not naturally rest on the side buttons then don't think and buy this absolutely superior mouse
Adequate Case; Could be a little better. Used with iPod 20g Color 4g: For the money this case provides adequate protection and a very little outer zipper pouch for earBuds that shipped with your iPod. I leave my Skin on my iPod and it fits very snugly. With two zippers to access the iPod storage area you'll have the ability to plug-in your earbuds and close with just stem and cord exposed. Unfortunately you must remove the iPod to adjust playing features. Has a built in belt-loop (no snaps) to securely attach to belt. Enjoy!
Great Printer and Scanner Combo. This printer has excellent photo quality and the side benefit I never anticipated was the incredible ease of use to scan and print documents. The menu wheel feature is too easy! I can scan and print in less then a minute. Canon printers come with great monitoring and application software. That's one reason I switched from years of HP printers
It looked different on the picture. Excellent service, but I expected to see another model of the handbag. It looked different on the picture
Audio Technica Turntable. Excellent turntable for the price. Very accurate and the best answer for a basic turntable for recording to CDs or just listening. No need to spend more money for a basic turntable
great product. The product came in a timely fashion and was exactly what I wanted.  I have not yet been able to fill up the memory with my camera, but will try to soon
The Best Case available for the video iPod. I just received this case from amazon through amazon marketplace with iskin inc. I absolutely love the case. The case covers every part of the ipod, including the docking port on the bottom. The actual silicon on the ipod is extremely durable, and has holes on the back of the iPod to keep the ipod from being overheated. On the front of the case, a scratch resistant VISOR which does not shift in place. This sllows protection of the front of the ipod, including the screen and the click wheel. The click wheel is protected by a thin membrane, but its a little rough so it might time to get used to.My only complaint is the cover on the docking port. The docking port is covered by a piece of silicon which is attached to the rest of the case. This makes it really difficult to insert the iPod onto the universal dock, seeing how the dock connector cover isn't really removable. I have emailed iskin about this problem.I believe the iskin is THE case to get for the ipod. Its durable, stylish, pretty, and is definately worth the $35
Photos that truly look and feel professional. This printer produces 4X6 prints on postcard paper that look like they came from a photo lab.  The quality is fantastic, and the relatives were in awe.  I am very very happy with the printer and the Canon S400 camera I use it with.  I now have a portable print studio.  Do not confuse this printer with ink jet printers.  It uses dye sublimation, a completely different printing process.  The result is something that looks and feels like a glossy photo postcard, not a piece of paper.  You don't put ink in it, so there is no ink to jam your print nozzles since neither exist in this printer.  You buy the equivalent of ink and paper in kits made from Canon.  (KP-36IP, for example
coolest product. I used these as thank you cards, and they were a huge hit! I just sent thank you postcards to everyone, with a picture of us and our new house and everyone thought they were the best idea!!!  (plus the stamps for postcards are cheaper!!)  I give it an A++++++++++
worked out of the box. hardest part was getting it out of the packaging.  after that it was smooth sailin
Good for Windows Media Center PC owners. I've had my PMC-120 for a little over 1 month and am pretty happy with it.  There are a few features Microsoft could have improved:  user customizeable EQ, more than one playlist that can be created on the device, last playlist recall when returning to music (from video or TV).  Overall the unit functions well and is great for taking all my media on the road with me.  Once Windows Media Player is configured on my PC, all my synchronized recorded TV content is converted in the background before I wake up in the morning.  Before I leave, I just plug in and sync for a minute or so and I'm good to go.  The only other nit-pick I would have is that the processor or I/O performance seems to be an issue when loading the album cover for tracks.  For example, if I change to the next track and increase the volume, the volume response can take 2 - 3 seconds while the album cover is loaded.  This can be a little irritating sometimes when I want to skip through several tracks.  In spite this, I like the unit and I'm happy to have it.  Maybe MS/iRiver will provide a firmware update to address the lack of features above
It's a porsche,, sleek and fast,, with some extra's.. I bought this external unit for the lightscribe technology, and it works great.  Very nice appearance and runs quiet.  I like to make custom CD's for "traveling" music, with the selection of songs I want to hear.  AND, the software included with this unit makes that so easy, gathering songs from whatever location they are stored and putting them in the order I want.  Then, it goes directly to some very nice templates for printing a cover, or booklet, for the CD case.  And that's just one program.  There's also a program for seting up the label to burn directly on the lightscribe disc's.  It's a little harder to learn, but it also has some great features.  I can select an image from my documents and use that as a background for the face of the CD.  I wish the image would burn a little darker on the CD, but that's the technology and not the fault of the  LaCie burner.  I HAVE tried burning it twice, same image, Yep it will work, and makes it a little darker.  Takes over 30 minutes to burn at the "best" image, and about 12 minutes at the "medium" setting.  I'm happy with the purchase from Amazon, both price, service, and delivery.
Does the job. It's a simple device, so there's not to say about it other than it does the job. You should note that the LEDs on the device remain lit as long as the device is plugged into your PC and the PC is powered (they glow a bright blue).
Great Case for the Price. It is an amazing case. The pictures on this site do not do the case justice; it looks amazing and it is surprisingly durable. And it shipped pretty fast for me too, even with the free shipping(only took 2 days including the day I ordered it.) It is a great bag and I recommend it to anyone with a fairly large laptop (In my case the Toshiba G25-AV513, a pretty big lappy)
It's as easy as plug and play. We currently have the Linksys BEFSR41 4-port router/switch for our home network.  It's been working great for about 4 years now, but we've now run out of ports.  I did some research on the 8 port router/switch product from Linksys, but the reviews were mixed.  The reviews were mixed for similar competing products also.  So I took the route of getting the EZXS55W to expand our existing home network.  I just plugged it into the network and it just worked out of the box.  No configuration needed.  It's also very tiny.  I highly recommend the product
5 minute setup, works great. I bought a Netgear and spent 5+ very frustrating hours trying to get it to work, and then it worked poorly only some of the time.  Belkin includes a cd which does it all in just a few minutes.
MP3 Player with Speakers. This MP3 player is excellent for my purposes because it has a built in speaker and I can use it to listen to quiet music whenever I want to, even to help me sleep
Very Impressive!. I came in contact with the Bose speakers when my brother and I ran a movie on dvd for a group of young people at our church meeting house. My brother brought his new Sharp projector and we set up a 10 foot beaded screen. BUT there was a short in the church's sound system and we were in big trouble. Nice picture but poor sound. My brother brought out his Bose speakers and I shook my head. Too small and not enough power for the cultural hall that we were using. Turned out they worked marvelously well! I have now purchased a pair for myself to use with my computer and to take with me when teaching classes require the use of a projected dvd. I am very pleased with them and would highly recommend them
Awesome labels. Nothing is worse than poorly applied CD labels or hand written text with a Sharpie.  Lightscribe is an awesome technology to "label" CDs.  It provides a very clear and detailed black&white/gray scale image.  It does a great job on photos and text, and anything in between.  Highly recommend it if you are looking for a new computer or a separate burner.
Love the GPS!. I got this for my birthday from my dear husband.  It works like a charm!  I love the way once you find your destination, you can also look up nearby resturants, shopping centers etc.
AWESOME photo printer!. I had previously owned a Canon printer that at the time was rated high and it served well but was old and photo quality was getting worse to the point where the wife was getting our photos developed elsewhere. After reading up on the newer printers I took our flash card to a store and tried it using the HP printer. To say that I was amazed would be an understatement. I went home and immediately ordered the printer and Amazon blew away the competition on price. When I got it I printed a photo that my wife had previously had developed at a shop and side by side she did guess which was which but it was close and she was just as amazed.I don't know all the technical stuff but I know if you are looking for a great photo printer for your home you'll have a hard time beating this one. Since we use the computer to fix and print photos I opted for the 7160 instead of the 7360, the screen on the printer was not a big deal to me since they are the same printer otherwise.If there is anything negative to say it would be that the advertised printing speed is not exactly accurate (at least not with the quality of photo I was printing) but then I don't think any printers are as advertised. Nevertheless, this is a winner
Excellent product. I try this memory card and is amazing read and write fast and nothing negative to sa
Dependable and CHEAP!. So you must be in the market for a microphone if you are reading this. Depending on what you want out of a mic, this might be a great bargain choice. I recently tested 30+ of these Sony F-V100 Mics and every single one worked--nice and clean sounding in a streamlined lightweight package.Pros:Price (Under $10)Dependable--very durableGood audio qualityNo on/off switch (less to break)Lightweight (easy for kids to hold)9.8 foot cordCons:No on/off switchLow volume for some usesMostly plastic build instead of metalSo if you are looking for an easy to use and durable mic on a budget, this should be exactly what you need. If you have requirements that do not amp the mic much, then you will need a more expensive mic
Brand new packages. Great seller.  Packaged safe and received in a fast manner.  Thank yo
Works Great!!. Not much to say about the item other than it works as expected without any issues whatsoever
Perfect. It got to me quickly, even before the estimated arrival date, in perfect condition. It blows away my last MP3 player. And best of all, Microsoft and/or Apple don't have their hands in this device. No playsforsure. No i-tunes. That's the best part. I pity all of you with i-pods and playsforsure mp3 players. You'll never know what it's like to not be a corporate lacky unless you get an MP3 player like this one.It's worth the price
Review WD 80GB SATA drive. Item was shipped promptyly.  Received before date specified.  Item currently working well
good card. so far it is just as good as my other cards.  transfer rates dont seem to be any slower or faster in my experience.  with a card this big though, i just start the uploading and leave
Perfect addition for my Nikon D70. Formatted card using camera menu and have had no problems with the card in camera or in my Averatec XP-Home laptop.  The D70's image buffering is very good so card feels just as fast as all of my other various CF cards in my D70.I suspect I will be ordering a couple more 4GB CF cards soon!
Good Sound Quality. I bought this sound device due to poor sound quality on my laptop audio device (Realtek AC97).  It has good audio performance for listening to music and such.  It has one stereo output, so it is not a full-range sound device.    If you need a low-priced and good stereo sound solution, this is what I recommend
Belkin TuneDok for iPod. This is perfect for my iPod and keeps it totally secure while driving.  Great price and you get different sizes to match your car perfectly.
Great product and excellent support staff. The first unit I received must have been defective as I could barely make it from one floor to the next (10-15 ft), even with the VR2 cranked.  I contacted C Cranes tech support, who immediately sent out a second unit and a prepaid return label for the first. Plugged it in and WOW what a difference!  I can receive on every radio in the house and , with my car radio, down to the end of my driveway (about 75 yds.).  If your first unit doesn't seem to be working as well as you would like I highly recommend trying a second unit.  I'm sure glad I did.
Monster Solution. I am the envy of my road warrior coworkers. This power strip is great due to the little room it takes in the carry on and the luxury of having an extra four power outlets available in the hotel room. Keeping all the "wall wart" plugged into the power strip is also a reminder not to leave any of the chargers plugged into a hidden receptacle behind the night stand. This is a great organizing tool
EXCELLENT PRODUCT. I HAVE BOUGHT 200 OF THESE JEWEL CASES AND NOT ONE OF THEM HAS FAILED. THEY SHIP QUITE RAPIDLY EVEN WITH FREE SHIPPING. THIS IS A GOOD PRODUCT AND IF YOU READ MY REVIEWS YOU KNOW THAT I TELL THE TRUTH AND DO NOT HOLD BACK WHEN A PRODUCT IN MY OPINION IS BAD. I HAVE HAD POOR RESULTS WITH DUEL JEWEL CASES IN THE PAST. NOW I CREATE MY OWN USING THESE JEWEL CASES AND COUPLING TWO OF THEM BACK TO BACK USING SCOTCH MOUNTING TAPE. TRY IT AND YOU WILL APPRECIATE THIS ADVICE I'M GIVING YOU RREE OF CHARGE..
A great buy. The intuos3 6x11 tablet is nice because its like having a giant mouse pad. The mouse itself has five buttons that can be programed to do different tasks, opening programs is one of them. It also has a scroll wheel. On the pad there are more buttons that can open programs among other things. Also there are touch sensitive strips on the tablet that can be used for scrolling. I use the pen inside of art progams and it is a real joy to work with. The pressure sensitivity is is a very nice feature alowing you to go from a thin line to a thick line and vice versa. Its main high point for me is the ability it gives to draw curved lines and detailed lines. It fits nicely in hand and has comfortable rubber grip. Also you can flip the pen over and use that side as an eraser. The only complaint I have is that on the pen there are two buttons and one of them (the lower one) is placed in a spot where when I'm drawing my finger frequently hits it, because of this I simply had to make the button inactive. Over all I feel that Wacom has done a very good job of developing this product. I feel that it is of high quality and well worth the price. I would definetly save up the extra few dollars to get this larger tablet, it is nice to have if you have the desk space. I've heard Wacom is the best in the pen tablet industry and now that I own one I believe it
Memory. Good value for the money; I haven't had any problems with the card and it and my Nikon seem to get along
Excellent buy. This is an amazing webcam... I love it. It has excellent quality of image. No manual adjustments for focusing. The software controls for zoom, tilt, and pan are cool. It is giving excellent quaility in low light also.Make me look good (in the cam ;)) to my freinds and family.The driver software got along with the cam did not work on Vista, but then it was not difficult to get it online.I would defnitly recommend this. It is also good if you are using Business confrencing.It fits on the laptop like a part of it. The clip at the back is adjustable (expands) about 1/2 an inch, but if your minitor is really thin, it may not fit tight. But my guess is that it should be good for 99% of the laptops out there.I would not recommend this for Desktops unless you want to fix (glue) them on top of your monitor.
Excellent AGP Card. If you have a System that requires AGP, this card is for you.  A bit pricey but well worth it!!
I LOVE THESE -. I bought a ZEN 30G MP3 player and could not stand the earbuds they came with. They hurt so much that I used head phones until these V-MODA earbuds came in. They are awesome.  The fit is so comfortable and the sound it wonderful. I got them on sale for less than they are running right now on Amazon, so I feel pretty good about the purchase.  =
Highly recomended!. I recently purchased this item here, and I was so very impressed. It drastically improved the quality of my dvd player.  You know the difference in quality when you switch from watching regular tapes (vhs) to dvd?   Well, it is the same "step" when you watch dvds with s-video, as watching dvds with s-video.  My son said his Playstation 2 looked 10 times better with this s-video cord.  It is definatetly worth the money!  Highly recomended
Slow Writing, but fast reading. Bought this card for my XDA I PDA. Worked fine right out of the box. However, this only showed up as 118mb card !!! not sure if this is the SD card itself or the PDA causing the loss of some 10mb worth of space.Also it is slow to write to the card, but quite fast when reading from the card.
Great Cables with Easy To Use Fittings - But Expensive !!!. These are great cables.  They look and feel great and are easy to connect.  They eliminate fuzzy pictures caused by local stations signals leaking into your cable system.  They are fully shielded, but are still quite flexible.The quality is great, but you will pay for it
Good performance at a good price. I bought this as a replacement for a Sony WM-FX788 AM/FM cassette player and recorder. When the 788 stopped working, I looked for a replacement and did not find one that would both play and record cassettes. I have since become much more satisfied with the 290 than I was with the 788 for several reasons: (1) The 290 uses direct mechanical actuation of the tape drive, rather than the electronic actuation of the 788. I regard this as an advantage, since the ultrasensitive switch that controlled the cassette drive in the 788 often resulted in it taking off at high speed in some unintended direction when all I wanted to do was stop it. The direct mechanical actuation of the tape drive means that I am never in doubt about what the machine is going to do when I press a button. I regard this as a desirable trade-off for the lack of an auto-reverse feature. (2) The AM and FM sensitivity is much better in the 290 - almost as good as my table radios. Its weather and TV band reception is adequate and is an occasionally useful feature. (3) The 290 uses a single AA cell, rather than the rechargeable, expensive, and hard to find proprietary battery in the 290. (4) The 290 is much cheaper - I paid about $180 for the 788. (4) The 290 is slightly larger than the 788, but is still a handy size for slipping in a pocket while exercising (my primary use). [To answer a point raised in the discussions: going from the tape to a previously tuned-in radio station takes only two button presses - one to stop the tape and one to turn on the radio.] I have other ways of making recordings, so not having this function in a radio and cassette player is no great loss. Overall, I rate the FX-290 as an excellent value
Exactly what I was looking for. Very good quality sound, loud ring, substantial weight (not all cheap plastic with no heft).Only con is that even on "low" the ringer is very loud
Good but noisy. Incredible sound quality- however, it has very little outward noise canceling, so everyone around you will be able to hear your music rather clearly if you're playing it on the iPod's maximum volume.However, this means that it can double as a speaker, which is a plus
Monster Cable THX V100. I've been using these cables for a couple of months now.  Picture quality is excellent, although this is my back-up DVD player.  My primary is being utilized with HDMI cables.  HDMI is the way to go!
you need a spare!. I got the second battery for my Zaurus and it was one of the best investments I made.  The Zaurus uses quite a bit of power, so it's great to have a spare on hand.  I also got the battery charger, so when I'm done with one battery, I just pop it in the recharger and go on
great product. thanks for shipping it so fast.  it holds the portable dvd i bought for my daughter perfectly.  it holds more dvds than we own.  great product, thanks agai
High Quality CD-R Media! (duh). I bought these after buying TDK for the past 5 years and now only being able to get Memorex at a low price (I've had very bad experiences with Memorex CDRs in the past). These were surprisingly cheap as Verbatim is one of the highest quality blank media brands. Not surprisingly, the discs lived up to expectations on my Plextor-716A drive. I haven't tested a whole lot yet, but the ones I did test, burn flawlessly and when disc scans were run, there were no errors. You really can't go wrong with Verbatim. Just buy them
Pretty Great. I recently bought this stereo for my living room. I'm very very satisfied. It was pretty easy to set up. The sound is also very wonderful. The bass and treble features are great too. 5 disc changer is a plus. I recommend this product to anyone who's looking for a good stereo.*note- iPod users need to buy a line-in in order to plug their iPod into themusic port.
Cooler Master NotePal Laptop Cooler (R9-NBC-ADAS / ADAK). I have 15.4" widescreen LCD,Sony 80GB,1GB of RAM.(beginning) the notebook doesnt overheat, but 30 - 45 minutes fans (variable RPM) which kicks indrastically two or three minutes (freeze laptop) for cools down enough normal use.I bought Tornado Notebook Chill Mat solved my problem;  it is not on/off button.It too small & made from plastic (it is cheap&flimsy).What I thing Master NotePal Laptop Cooler; whole  differed It has an on/off button.Metal aluminum material absorbs heat quite well; nice design and material (not lightweight cheap plastic);fans are quiet; solidly constructed, sturdy and is basically indestructable.The notebook doesnt heat up, helps in keeping the laptop cool.Summary: I would recommend this unit.I am more then 95% totally satisfied (5% it's not 15". or 17 ". It is 15.4" widescreen
Make sure this is the right one!. This adaptor will connect a VGA projector or monitor to an intel iMac or MacBook, but the older flat panel iMac and iBook have a port which looks nearly identical, but is actually miini-VGA, and this adaptor will not fit.  I also do not think the comment about a higher price at the Apple store is correct, at least the online store
From a Musician. This is great way to get your vinyl on to a CD. You have to use 'music'labeled CD-R's though. Some of my jazz collection has not been reissued on CD, and I made CD copies for my car and golf cart.The CD quality is pretty good considering that you're not running it through an editing/pro-tools system. The record player itself does 33, 45 and 78' RPM's. It sounds as good, or bad, as any 1970's record player did. The recording is quite good and sounds even better when played back.This is a great gift for a parent or grand-parent who wants to convert their vinyl to CD.You must 'finalize' the CD before it will playback, so there's a small learning curve to using it. The auto tracks feature is nice, but doesn't work from live recordings at all. The tracks play sequentially and it doesn't affect the playback whether one song has 3 tracks or 1; It plays back just like the record did. The auto track mode just senses a dip in the volume, and encodes another track on the counter.It's worth the price for the convienence of it, and no computers are required to make it work.If you're a critical 'high-end audio-file type person', who spends $15K+ on playback equipment, you won't like it....wait to buy the remastered CD from the record comapany.
Great Parallel Adapter -USB cables!. These cables rock!  No problem whatsoever with installation and they work like a charm!  My 12 year old laser printer works great with my new computer.  I would higly recommend this product!
Why does Bose induce so many  contradictory  opinions?. I am not an audiophyle, just a music lover. My main system consists of Proac 140 speakers, MF x 150 amp and XRay cd coupled with PSU and MF DAC. I have a Michell Giro turntable. Whats this to do with Bose? may you ask. Well just intended to say that I am used to a middle range audio equipment with pedigree. It hapens that I spend many hours in a private office home, crowded with shelves, books and papers, so that I have no space to position box speakers. Recently I decided to purchase a Bose kit. My amp is a old Pioneer A 400, and a Marantz CD 76 MkII is my source.My previous speakers were a Solid Ovale set built by B&W. It produced a boxy sound without live or body. Then the Bose kitt was seted up. WOW...WOW. Now my office is full of a rich and involving sound, realistic and detailed. I cant undestand why are people saying there is no bass.... Well I have ears, and years of music listening experience. The results are amaizing. The most impressive is that  I have the sensation of presence of musicians performing in the room. Probably stereo image is a bit confusing as is the sound stage in the classical sense of  stereo speakers. However is what we got when listening music live. Can someone in a concert hall define the exact posittion of musicians while closing the eyes????. This one is a great speaker set. I cant talk about buid qualities or engineering. Honestly I do not care if this set is based on cheap componets as some argue, since I am much more concerned about its sound, and it sounds lovel
Phone works fine. I have been happy with these phones.  I find no problem with the sound - no static at all.  The only small thing I have noticed is that occasionally the sound echoes a little.  I do not understand the terrible reviews - this phone is very usable
Great Fan. I purchased this fan because my sister got one first.  It was great!  The fan is extremely quiet and pushed plenty of air.  Best of all is the tallness of the fan.  It circulates a greater amount of air, keeping our living room much cooler.  I have not used the ionizer, but if you are looking for a great quality fan, look no further.
perform well on what it is supposed to do. I am not sure what's the problem with the previous reviewer, but I found this protection pack works pretty well for me (I owned the one with 3 pieces including the exterior protection sleeve in addition to the keyboard cover and hand rest sticker). The hand rest sticker sheet fits the hand rest area very well so one can hardly noticed htere is a cover if not paid special attention to it which is good because I was worried the beauty of the MBP will be ruined by 3rd party protection sheet but obviously not in this case. The hand-rest protection sheet is also reversible (easy to peel off) and I was wondering why someone can't even stick something well and complained the bubble forming. It certainly won't be a issue if you try to stick it careful. (Imaging it as a big piece of sticker, if you are not careful, of course some bubbles might be formed, however, since this sheet can be peel off easily, if bubbles occur, you can just simply re-stick it.)The keyboard cover is nice too and work as a nice wipe to the screen, more over, it's washable, so if you found out the cover is dirty and starts transfering dirt to your screen (which is never the case for me, I don't know why somebody will be that careless to leave all kinds of dirt on your $$$ laptop???), you can simply wash it and it will be as clean again.Overall, I highly recommend this product if you are looking for some elegant MBP protection-ware.
Excelent little gem!!!!. I have bought several SD cards before and this one is a fast writer and reader device, I own an Ipaq ppc and it transfers files in a breeze, also I use it in my Cannon Powershot SD110 and video recording in 640 resolution is very faaaaaaast, Sandisk is s l o w very s l o w and unreliable, buy this card you wont regret it!!
Great laptop bag for an overnight trip. I've had this bag for almost a year now and I couldn't be happier with it. I don't use it for college as it is a little too big for me for everyday use(but then, I'm about 5 feet tall). This is a great bag if you're planning on an overnight trip (or a week long trip) and don't want to be bothered with a lot of luggage. I like to take my laptop everywhere I go and this is the bag I take on my weekend trips. It keeps the laptop secure and there's plenty of room for a few sets clothes and other odds and ends. It does not have the plastic supporters that's shown in the picture. But it does have a small partition in the main compartment, which can hold a big book(you can push this partition back if don't want to use it). It takes the weight off your shoulders.Pros:Great designHolds just about anythingFeels light on your shouldersHas a waist strap (if ever you want one)Can double up as a laptop-cum-overnight-bagCons:This is the only things I can think of - it's a little too big for everyday college use (it might work if you're tall and like to carry all your books with you)Overall, I give it 5 stars because the only con that it has doesn't really bother me
Excellent all around all in one. Excellent photo printing, with the 7 colors the prints are outstanding.Very simple to operate, and its scanning capabilities far surpass any others I have used at home.I would highly recommend this printer to anyone who is serious about quality and detail in their print
Weather Alert Radio. I was very impressed. The radio took no time to setup and worked as promised.  You do need internet access to setup the channels used in your area or a list ahead of time
A very good way to play music from computer. The discussion below relates only to audio, not to connecting a printer, and working with a router cum wireless access port.Pro:1. This really works, and works well, from my PC computers.2. The control over what music is played, volume, etc. resides in your computer, not in the computer and the Airport.  This can make life simpler, much simpler, especially if anything does go wrong.Cons:1. Pricey, especially when you factor in the cable kit which you are going to need if you want to run sound from the Airport into your sound system via a digital (optical) cable (this requires a proprietary cable), or will probably want if you don't want to (1) scrounge for your own cables, or (2) plug directly into a wall outlet and run stereo (L and R only) into your amplifier.2. They don't tell you this in the manual, but you'll be better off assigning the Airport(s) to static IP addresses, and selecting improved robustness against interference
Man, this is the BEST TOY I've bought myself in a long time !!. YOUR FAVORITE MOVIES ... IN YOUR POCKET ...WIDESCREEN PLEASURE .....  4" SIZEI just purchased this babe ... not even 48 hours ago!I LOVE IT ....I'm a hypnotist by trade. Always watching updates,following my peers DVDs and since I run a full-timehypnosis practice, I have a lot of training videos(running a business .. taxes ... computer trainingprograms)I have to keep up on.Well, life catches up on you ... and I just don'thave the time to watch them or even to be in a locationwhere I am near to a computer where I can view them ...and  carrying a bulky laptop is out of the question.I was upstate NY last week, being driven by a friendto teach a class. He had his apple ipod in the frontseat and said, I was watching your training videojust before you got here .....I said, "At Home?"He said, "No .. here .. and lifted up his ipod."I was pretty amazed.I said, "The picture's so small.'He replied, "One plug ... into my wide screen tvat home .. and this little unit carries 250 hoursof video."I was blown away.Went to J and R music ... consulted Amazon reviews ..I saw the Creative Unit but owned the Creative ZenSleek ... and although it is a great, durable, almostunbreakable unit (MP3 Player) ... it had the worstfiling system. It dumped all your files on the harddrive and then it was a nightmare, despite Creative'sbest efforts at writing a piece of software to competewith Apple.The J And R Salesman, a very old Lithuanian immigrantwith an immense knowledge of electronics .. told mehands down .. the Zen was the best ... it had morecodecs ... could play more videos ... music files ..without the hassle of fumbling through the applepriority operating system and a mass of conversions.Well, more research ... Amazon .. I bit the bullet.Close to 400 big ones for the 60 gig ... andI love it.... The quality is excellent ...the tinny speaker is perfect for me .... thebuild in radio ... wonderful organizer andrecorder ... are all wonderful extras thatApple charges a fortune as add ons ....And Creative products that I have ownedare solid, feisty little devils.I plugged this unit into my 32 inchSony TV this morning and was blown awaywith the quality ... playing a videothrough it. This feature alone makesit worth the price ... for showingfilm clips when I do hypnosis trainings.Check this out .... If you have toview a lot of videos ... for pleasureor business .. would like to keep a messof fun photos (a whole lifetime worth) ..in your bag ... a radio ... an organizerwhose screen blows away my Palm Pilot Treo..This unit may fit all your needs ...So ... don't thank me all at once ...P.S. Buy the skin for the extra 20.You'll be glad because it will keepyour new baby .. nick free.regardsJohn PetrocelliThe NYC Hypnosis Center LLC[...]
Now we're talking.... I read the reviews on Amazon and checked out the Olympus and other recorders...nothing touches this one for usability.  Therein lies some of the problem.  I'm a techie and still can't  use it in the dark when driving. As a master's student, it has proved invaluable in lecture.  On the (CONF-Hi) setting, it easily picks up even the whiniest professor's voice at a 15 foot range.  The main reason I purchased the ICD-BM1 was it's 5 Dragon award from Dragon Natually Speaking(DNS).  I use DNS v7.3 and have found it trained easily and has around 95% accuracy (down a few points from another reviewer) probably because I impatiently read the 1 hr training script in 40 minutes. It's very small and extremely light.  The case has two velcro'd places for additional memory sticks.  However, since it can use 128mb (not pro)I rarely swap sticks.  I use the 128 for class related info and the others for personal life - maybe that's why I rarely swap - I have no personal life.  One more thing, it's fabulous with DNS for dictating emails while driving.  This allows emailing to family friends that would otherwise not hear from me as often.  Great product!!!!PART TWO - 4 MONTHS AFTER PURCHASEWhen first setting up the unit I found the battery door was very difficult to get open - but dismissed it figuring how often would I be replacing batteries? It turns out the door has now become unstable and sits in a slightly open position, popping open at will. When the batteries come out unnoticed, I have to reset the date/time etc.After contacting Sony I learned that IF they determine it is a manufacturing defect versus user abuse, they will exchange the unit. The problem is... the unit received in exchange will not be new, rather it will be used (refurbished).A warranty should repair or replace with a new unit - especially manufacturing defects. I'm disappointed in Sony.Rather than do without the unit only to receive a used unit, I've decided to tape the door shut.
good wireless mouse. Range is good.  Extension cable included increases that if necessary.  Solid and no problems
Pretty nice. Nice and small. I haven't had any surge so cant say much about that. It hopefully (and should) work though.The holes for plugging in stuff is kind of in a weird position, but that doesn't bother me
THE Ink for the EPSON Stylus Photo R1800. If you own the EPSON Stylus Photo R1800, this is the ink for you.
TIVo nearly all I expected. Just like a computer is useless without the programing, the TIVo DVR is useless without the TIVo Service and your programing source. TIVo allows a person to save programs you might want to view and lets you view them when you want.Negatives:Used with Dish Network requires a signal from the Dishnet control after its daily update and TIVo doesn't give this signal.TIVo works with IR controlled Dish/cable boxes, and Dish Network has dual tuner box with one tuner IR and the other radio controlled, TIVo will only control the IR controlled tuner
Great Phone!. I've only had this phone for a week, but so far it's been great!  Much easier than our old Uniden phones and more convenient.  With this machine you can check your messages from any compatible phone, which I like.  It also has a pretty blue light, caller id (with call waiting id - which our old one did not have), an easy to follow prompt system for ans. machine and phonebook, an easy ring and the phone is not echo-y - it's very clear.  I only wanted a good strong phone, reliable, easy to use and not confusing - and I got it
belkin 6-outlet 550VA usb battery backup. outlets are on top of case.  easy to plug in and change plug ins.  narrow case width allows backup unit to fit in the space available in my roll around computer cart.  Switch is recessed and on front with lightup controls.  No bumping switch and shuting off accidentally.
Tried every other product..Booq, Tamrac, Lowepro, Tumi, etc. This is the best.  Here's why:. I've been a long-time user of Brenthaven products.  But I was a little unhappy with the Brenthaven Professional 17 because the laptop compartment was not as easy to use as other manufacturers.  It has a dual-flap system: unzip, then open the velcro flap.  So I began to try other manufacturers.  I tried pretty much everything, from Kensington, to Tumi, Lowepro, etc.  I liked the Kensington Contour line, but seemed a little bulky and not as rugged.  I was really happy with the Booq Python XL, until I started using it.  The zippers jammed and broke on the very first day of use!  Booq's customer service is deplorable, requiring the customer prove ownership by submitting pictures of the defective product (why couldn't I just send it in for replacement?)  So I decided to go back to Brenthaven.  I liked how this model had a new-style laptop compartment.  Well, I've been using it for a while.  It's by far the best, don't waste your time and money elsewhere.  The zippers are large coil-type and are easy to use and will not jam.  The laptop compartment is a cinch to use, just unzip and slip in the laptop.  It's well-protected by hard panels and soft foam.  The shoulder straps are contoured and comfortable.  There are even cell phone connector nubs on the straps (an undocumented feature!)  The material and construction is flawless, dependable, and well, the best!  If you do decide to get this one, I recommend you get it through Amazon, and not one of the other sellers here.  It's a little more expensive, but the shipping is so much better.  I have received many shipments from other sellers through Amazon, and they truly suck!  Sometimes I get stuff in a torn-up padded envelople, sometimes the item is crushed beyond belief, often the shipper takes a long time to get on the ball and ship!  With Amazon, my shipments are always very prompt, and the quality of packing is so much better.  This bag came double-boxed with padding and in excellent condition
great for scrapbooking. This is a great printer for those who want to print on 12x12 scrapbook pages. It works well with heavier(cardstock) paper. It also prints great photos. I have a MAC i-book. I also use The Print Shop 2 program with it. It gives me great versatility with my pages & photos
USB Desktop cradle for Palm TX. This device is slick and I highly recommend as it's more convenient to use rather than untangling the separate power and synch cables.  The synch button is tiny and located on the back but no problem as one simply taps synch on the Palm unit
Excellent Product. This is an excellent cd burner. I have purchased so many and all of them are great. I have no complaints and I feel that this product is of the best quality, long lasting and very durable. When I build computers for my customers I always purchase this burner.
SanDisk c150 MP3 player review. Nice product, but the forward/reverse/pause button is more difficult to use than the SanDiskm240 I previously was using
Above The Rest!!. I was looking for more power and I found it!The IAudio6 is the best sounding most powerful MP3 for the buck.It take's a little getting used too,but it's worth the time and effort.If you want a MP3 that can blow you away with power,clarity, plenty of memory and FM to boot!This is it
YYYAYYY!. It's very convenient and simple to use - gets job done & makes the car ride so much smoother. Maybe it seemed a little quiet, but that depends on the volume adjustings... I might buy another for the other car. And, its value definitely exceeds the price that I paid. :
Excellent service. I received excellent service and the product was very reasonably priced.James Clendeni
very useful. A very useful tool with a great capacity andeasy to carry wherever you go
Great space saver!. I like keeping all my stuff in one place, but don't like CD folders, so these slim cases are great.  I accidentaly sat on one of them and although it did crack, the case didn't break, and the cd was fine.  All in all, a great product
Short term reliability. For the time being as I am in the process of purchasing a new computer, the USB device will work for my laptop, taking into consideration the fact that I don't have powered up devices attached to it that would draw from the laptop.
iPod Armband. I have used this item frequently on solo marathon training runs.  Works fantastic. A better buy than the Apple brand armband by far
Games come to life with this kit!. This kit has greatly improved my gaming experience.  Monster Cable is such a quality product.  The picture is much clearer and crisp and the audio sounds awesome, especially hooked up to surround sound.  I wish the cables were a little shorter.  But if you're someone that has to have the unit right by your feet, you will enjoy the amount of cable that is supplied.  I will be looking to use Monster Cable for all my future gaming needs
Good Product. I ordered the product in order to be able to receive a wireless signal on my laptop from my home network in an outlying craft room in our house, where previously I had only been able to get an weak intermittant signal. The product installed easily, using the installation CD. I have not used the accompanying Network Finder software. The antenna boosted the signal two or times from what it had been and I was able to receive signals from other networks that I hadn't been able to previously. The only shortfall, is that the dish antenna seems fragile, cannot rotate 360 degrees, and it does not fold down, so transportation without of the original box might be risky. I am generally vary satisified with the product.
MINIDISC IS FOREVER!!. This disc can hold up to 40 discs on one mini.  The sound quality is perfect.  These discs can be hard to find in the stores,but they are available at www.minidisco.com.  They even are available in 10 and 20 packs.  I would also suggest buying the sony MZ-NH1.  It's a little pricey,but the sound quality is excellent.  It's almost as small as a minidisc and you can do everything from the remote.  You can even download to and from your computer.
Great product for the price. At a little over $400 the Toshiba 32DF46 is hard to beat. I was seriously considering a Flat panel or Plasma TV until I started reading the reviews and seeing the prices. It won't be long before the flat panel and plasma TV's far exceed the old technology and come down in price but for now I think the Toshiba is a great deal.
GREAT ITEMS STILL!!!. Compared to the technology and color screen palm pilots and handsprings of today, THis is truley a classic and lasted long!  IT's a great item for anyone who loves to be organized (school, business...).  And Great Customer Service.
Great service. Thanks for the quick turn around on sending me the charger. You ROCK!  :
Worked without too much trouble in setup. I just bought an eMachines for a cheapie PC to work alongside my trusty G5.  I had virtual PC but it rna like molasses.  With Vista preinstalled on the eMachines, I'm a little worried about the speed, too.At first the switch didn't work, because I still had my Mac mouse attached to the keyboard instead of in the right port on the switch, after i changed that, it all worked smoothly.  I agree that the audio is really poor.  so I removed the speakers from the jack on the switch.  But, overall so far so good.   I hope it lasts. ;
Great Deal! Lightning Fast Shipping!. Ordered the bench on a Saturday evening and it was delivered to my door on Tuesday afternoon.I am using it with a Casio WK3000 keyboard on a Yamaha X-Style keyboard stand.3 height adjustments.Only wish it were longer because my kids love sitting with me while I'm trying to play
This calculator is a small miracle. Look at that price up there.This calculator is a sophisticated number-crunching gizmo that will handle 99% of standard calculator use.  Need a feature that's not available?  Good news, this fella's programmable.  It powers itself with freely available light, but yet has a battery for when lighting conditions are paltry.  Its interface is lovely and thoughtfully conceived, it weighs less than your checkbook, and it's surprisingly durable:  throw it around, let your Aunt Marge step on it, rub it with beef and give it to the dog for a while ... at the end it'll still work.All of that, and it costs less than a pizza.Back in 1972, Hewlett Packard released their HP-35 calculator (with the four standard arithmetic functions and twelve transcendental functions), and it cost $395.  Don't forget inflation, because that translates to roughly $2100 in 2007.  That calculator changed the world, and now here's a calculator that leaves the HP-35 in the dust -- in terms of speed and functionality -- and at less than 1/100th the cost.Sure, there are lots of feature-rich calculators that you can buy in the check-out line at Walgreen's for only a few bucks, so you're probably wondering what makes this calculator so special.  If you consider (a) its price, (b) its feature set, and (c) its overall utility, this calculator is currently at the apex, folks.  By a *long* way.  And its been there for several years.  Speaking as a calculator snob, I'm usually unimpressed by anything less than a classic HP, but as far as the complete package goes, this calculator is surprisingly beautiful.  I own two of them; one to keep in my bookbag, and another one "just in case".With this guy, you're getting a lot of bang for very few bucks.  It might not graph, it might not perform symbolic math, it might not use RPN or have a precision-engineered keypad with double-injection-molded keys -- and above all it's certainly not a computer -- but it's currently the best value out there in utility scientific calculators and nothing else comes close.
Explorist Mounting Bracket. Does what it is supposed to do. Can't complain till it quits doing what it is supposed to do
I went through Atlanta without hitting traffic!. It's really great to get info on traffic conditions ahead and have the ability to route around it, It's the logical extension to using GPS to get around, especially in unfamiliar cities
great Little IPOD. I now own an IPOD nano and this IPOD shuffle both are awesome.  The Shuffle is great for jogs and long trips when you have to move around and such, the clip desin is great. 10/1
great off air picture. I was really surprised with the off air reception.  One of the reasons I have not bought an HDTV is that the picture tends to appear less than impressive from most broadcast sources.  Imagine my surprise when, hooked up to an antenna, I get crystal clear pictures, without artifacting.  The picture off of a progressive scan dvd are excellent as well though slightly softer.  Overall, I would say that this is one of those purchases where I got a lot more than I expected
The only blank DVD's I'll use!. These DVD's burn well and play in all the DVD players I've tried them in (even a very finicky one).  I don't use a printer, but the plain white surface looks so much nicer than the typical logos.  Makes titles stand out nicely with just a sharpie
Altec Lansing Speaker System. I bought this for my Sandisk MP3 and it is terrific.  The sound is excellent.  I do think I will buy the subwoofer.  Music with a lot of bass can sound a bit tinny
Good product - with two exceptions. I have had three of these watches in the past few years.  They function well, do what they'e supposed to do, and are very helpful.  However, the printed alphabetic characters underneath each button will wear off in about 18 months, after which you haved to memorize which button corresponds to which alpahbet character.  Not as hard as you might think, but irritating.  Secondly, the watch case pin holes where the watch band pin attaches the band to the case will tend to erode or pull out over time.  I've had to replace one perfectly good watch because I couldn't get a replacement band to attach
It works!. I bought this to read my Smartmedia cards and it worked very well. As an added bonus it is also a nice looking product. It is sky blue and has a clear USB cord - sort of Reminds me of an IMac. Good little inexpensive card reader Note: I did't use it for any card type other than Smartmedia
Sweet little phone set. We have had these phones for a few weeks now, and have had no problems.  I really like the smaller size of the handset, and the beltclip allows my wife to plug in a hands-free headset.  The phonebook is accessable on both phones (no need for entering it twice) and the speakerphone works great.  We can set it on the counter and talk in a normal voice from several feet away and be heard easily.One handset has a very faint background "static-noise" but the other does not...could be the location of the phone in the kitchen with the base, or the outlet it is plugged in to.  We haven't bothered to switch it as it is hardly noticeable unless you are consciously listening for it
Good product. For the price these are excellent mounts. They come with mounting hardware for tons of different speakers. I used them to mount my Bose Acoustimass cube speakers to the ceiling. I think they're great.
Franklin Speaking 11th Collegiate Dictionary. I like everything about this product, just wish its speaking was louder.
Kitchen TV. I bought this to replace a 13" tube tv in my kitchen. What I gained was a larger screen plus relcaiming the counter space. The picture is good, and the internal DVD player is a bonus. All in all, a good purchase
Patience during setup really pays off. This remote does its job well. I had eight remotes to control the gear in my living room, and this thing took the place of all of them. I no longer lose them in the couch or forget where I put them last...and it no longer takes me five minutes to set up just to watch a movie or listen to music. Macros allow one button press to turn on (or off) all required equipment and set them to the correct mode. The backlight is pleasant, I like the audio feedback of button presses, and the sheer size of the thing feels good in my hands and prevents misplacement.That being said, this thing was a royal pain to get working properly right out of the box. This may be because I have some less mainstream A/V equipment, but the previous reviews do not exaggerate the PC program interface with its endless mouse clicking. Even the so-called "wizard" has multiple mouse clicks for one simple button, which can get very tedious if you have a remote with 40 buttons on it, like for a reciever.Here's a recommendation: skip through the initial wizard as fast as you can, then make a new profile and start out in advanced mode. Even if you go through the wizard, most of your time will probably be spent in advanced mode anyway, because you have to tweak alot buttons to get them working. This may save you much time and headache. This is also where you program macros, the shining star of this remote.Software installation is straightforward. The interface, aside from the points mentioned above, is relatively simple. You can drag and drop components to pick the order you want them to show up on the screen. Everything is clearly labelled and easy to read. Macros are simple too, but only after you get the buttons working properly.It took me a couple of hours to get it to do all Dish Network remote commands. After manually programming each button for the DVR, I had to make a macro to get to "My Recordings" with one button press, and it took a few tries to get it to do page up and page down when browsing the guide.The remote itself has a nice finish, and weighs about like a largish paperback book in your hands. The touchscreen is large enough to poke at it without worrying about hitting the wrong button. The physical buttons are responsive and do not feel cheap or "clicky". After some use, fingerprints show up on the touchscreen, especially when eating popcorn. However, the display is bright enough when backlit that they aren't really a distraction. The menu tree is easy to learn and get used to as well.This remote would get five stars if it weren't for the subpar PC interface and sparse documentation. The actual remote is fantastic however, and well worth the time and effort it takes to get it up and running. Just make sure you burn a CD with a copy of your profile once you get it going!
Ray's Review. The media was recorded at a high rate of speed and the qualite of the video was great.
Insten Black Folding speakers. These speakers are GREAT.  I use them with my Zune.  They are convenient and sound quality is awesome.  They were shipped to me in record time.  Hats off to INSTEN.  Steven Rodrigue
Not bad for the price. I have used various other KVM's in the past ranging from home use to commercial applications, and this KVM for the price is quite good.  Switches between computers quickly and easily, audio sounds good (good enough for me), and it was a snap to hook up.  I love the built in cables and size of this unit. Its size makes it easy to hide on the already cluttered desk.  I just slapped a piece of Velcro to it and hung it on the back side of the desk.  My complaints are that the PS2 connecters seem to come loose from the unit quite easily, and that they are so close to the monitor connector that if you have a USB to PS2 converter you need to get a small pig tail extender.  One PC's video was a little off, but it has always done that no matter what KVM I have used (two different Belkin models in the past).  I use this between two desktop PC's.  One is dual booted with WinXP and Fedora, and the other PC is dual booted between Ubuntu and Fedora.  I have had no problems with any of the OS's picking up the mouse or keyboard.  Well worth the price I paid
MP3 player evaluation. It's a product will give you what you have paid for, but remember it's not an ipod
Great Device - Confounding Instructions. I just got this iPod dock for my RX-V659. Popped it open. Plugged it in. And spent the next hour trying to figure out how to make it work! The instructions that come with it are really terse.  All they say is to plug it in and put your iPod in it. Perhaps I'm the only on who struggled with this set up. . but in the event that there are others, I thought I'd give some additional instructons.  Here are a few things you should know (that could save you an hour!).1. You have to program your Yamaha receiver's remote with a code in order to control the iPod. Instructions for this operation are in the way-back of your receiver's owner's manual.  Which has 3 separate sections on how to use an iPod. The first section for me was on p.24. The second somewhere around p. 100 and the third p. on 108. You need all three section to make it work!2. After you program the code. . .here's the tricky part.  .and I didn't see this in either the YDS-10 manual or the RX-V659 manual. . .here goes: The receiver's remote has a little switch on the right side that switches between "Amp", "Source" and "TV". If you just got your receiver, you may not even notice this switch.  But here's the tricky part.  The receiver won't control the iPod at all if this switch is in it's default position ("Amp"). You have to switch it to "Source". . and then low and behold. . .the amp says "Loading". . the iPod screen changes to a Yamaha logo. . .and you can see your song list on the TV screen!The sound quality is top notch! Hope this helps someone else!
Nice Case!. I've been carrying my h4155 around in this case for the past month. The case works very well. The flap on the case is held down by velcro and the form fits the pda pretty well. I carry the case on my belt all the time and it seems to function as advertised. It could have a softer interior, but I haven't noticed any issues yet
Great System. This was the third phone I purchased as part of the SD7500 System. Amazon had an excellent price on the phone. Similar to the other two, including the base set, this system is excellent. The phones hold a charge for a long period and have numerous options to set your phones to do just about anything you want.The smallest problem I can complain about is installing the battery and trying to slide the cover back on without damaging the wire. The fit is extremely tight.Over all, Five Stars. Great Phone System and Additional Handsets
Works only with powerful antenna. I tried six different antenna's and nothing worked until getting the C.Crane FM reflect from the NPR store.  Now, crisp, clean, clear reception of all weak stations.Dual speakers and dual alarms make this (lower) cost HD radio a real value. So, spend the extra $30 to make this purchase really worthwhile
"better than keeping the MD player in your pocket". This case worked out great, get the music going and forget that its even on your arm, good travel case as well.
Great price on a great HP burner/player. Same HP burner/player that is $30 or more in the local stores.Installation was fast and easy.Nero software installed fast, very little info on the Nero products,to play dvd you need to install the Cyber DVD player on the Nero disk.
Good cam with reasonable price. This is my 3rd web cam, and at last I can say I made a good choice this time. The frame rate is quite good and voice quality over the cam mic is amezing. It works "ok" in low light but not that amezing as they promise, which made me to give 4 stars.
It Works. It works. It doesn't do anything more than it was made to do. Can't say much else about it. Delphi makes good radios but the accessories are cheaply made and they don't last long. I should have bought two of these. I'll be needing another one eventually
Matte paper review. Great paper-The Epson printer worked just fine and the images on this paper were just like the photograph-Only thing is the price!!!!Should be lower-other than that this is GREAT pape
Great economy phone. If you're looking for fancy features and digital displays, please look elsewhere.  But if you want a good strong basic no-nonsense cordless phone, you have found it.  Over the years I've used three different cordless phones in my house, and this GE phone is the clearest and easiest to use of the three.  Sometimes less fancy is best
Dlink access point. Plugged it in, configured it and it worked. That is the best you can get. Almost did it all itself
DVD-RAM review. These DVD-RAM disks are the only ones that record in my Panasonic TV, and are difficult to find in stores.  Buying through amazon.com is fast, economical...and the disks work perfectly, especially when I recorded the Super Bowl to review after the game, which I attended
Sony MDR-V150 Monitor Series Headphones. I wanted headphones with a substantial connecting cord of a decent length. These headphones fill that bill easily. The cord is over 6 feet in length has a connector that will mesh with a devices from audio equipment to IPods with the micro-plug. I liked the versatility.For audiophiles, the sound is rich in bass and has crisp tones. The ear cups cover the ear blocking any outside sounds from intruding into your music or audiobook.The price is right for a real bargain in headphones
I'm using it right now. My laptop has a 15" screen, and has great resolution.  My company was going to give me a CRT as the monitor with the docking station.  Now my laptop screen is at the right height to see, and I won't get eye strain from a CRT.  One unexpected benefit is that now, the laptop keyboard is at the perfect height when I'm standing, showing something on the puter to a coworker.  It also pivots quite well. Save the money on an extra LCD and get this
FOR GROWN UPS AND KIDS!!. This cuttie pink mouse its not only for little girls, no no, im a 24 year old who LOVES hello kitty and htis mouse is so girly and so cute that i couldn't resist.. it has the little wheel to go up and down the page and its really goo
A fabulous piece of technological perfection!. The TI graph link has become an invaluable tool for superheroes and non-superheroes alike.  It easy to use, large, and convenient for the super-nerd on the go, plus chicks love it!  You can even pretend that it's a tricorder and scan for alien life forms.  Now how many graph-links on the market can do that?  If you are a highly dweeby college student who enjoys science fiction, this is the graph-link for you
quality prouct & quality retailer. After reviewing several buyer's feedback on purchases of 15" LCD televisions, I was guided by the comments (both negative & positive) about several manufacturers and sellers of HDTV LCD televisions, I shied away from lower priced products because of the negative feedbacks detailing picture quality (or lack of) product operational failures,poor customer support on complaints, etc. The Sharp LCD TV is a quality product, and I'm glad I decided to buy Sharp. The retailer (Fry's electronics) provided excellent delivery service and accurate billing. I woul strongly recommnd to potential future buyers of LCD tv,s to stay with a quality maker such as Sony, Toshiba, Sharp or Samsung, etc. even though you may pay a little more than the cheap prducts on the market, because in the long run they won't regret it ! The bottom line is; Research thoroughly allproducts before buying. A bargain is not a bargain if in the long run you end up with more grief. Buying on the internet has greater risk factors versus walking into a retail store where the product can be returned if unsatisfactory. Amazon & Ebay, I've learned have reputable vendors on the Internet and some vendors mot very reputable
Great Power Inverter. We have not had any problem with this unit. It has a fan which comes on as soon as it is turned on. However, it does not seem to bother us at all. Great and worth the money
Helping people live the highlife; a tasty speaker at a tasty price!. The Phoenix Gold ATi6 in-wall speakers are an outstanding value at Amazon's price.  The quality of materials and construction are far above what I expected at this price point.  The sound quality is appropriate for this type of speaker, and is clearly a step up from other speakers in the sub $100 arena.  I drive them with an Adcom 545II, and power handling is on the upper end of what I expected from a single 6.5 inch driver.  Installation could not have been simpler, and the beefy push terminals were a pleasant surprise.
Good Item-Should be included, though. When I bought my 3G 20GB iPod, this part was included.  Fortunately when I sold the iPod, I forgot to include it, because we are getting a Video today, and now I learn this item is not included.  Way to go Apple...I believe it is called fleecing your customers.  At least there is an alternative way to charge these...Very useful item, I agree, as much as I hate paying more, I also hate burning out a high dollar piece of electronics (iPod/Cell Phone/PDA/Laptop) because some company had monkeys putting them together in a remote jungle in Indonesia or something.I have had too many friends lose cells in particular because of the $5 charger they found online or at the flea market
A fine level of sound quality from "tiny". First, let me confirm the other reviewers comments that the color isn't as shown.  It's not, but it only matters if you're truly attempting to match to a specific pink shade.  They're pink, but it's a dark pink.What matters is that these tiny speakers sound reasonably powerful and accurate.  In general, larger speakers can move more air than small ones, so smaller ones have to work harder especially in the bass range.  These speakers are absolutely tiny, so to simply avoid sounding tinny, overstressed and distorted at moderate sound levels would be a victory.  The Vivid 60 does this quite well, producing low to moderate sound levels with reasonably wide range to be satisfying.  You can't expect a miracle with something this small, but look, these things actually have a hint of bass, and the mid and upper ranges are fairly smoothly reproduced.  Vocals are clean, and I haven't found any nasty resonances as I have with other plastic encased systems.  I doubt you'll do any better than these without going to a larger size, they are simply well optimized.  Treble dispersion is not great, so you'll want these close to you for best sound, within 3 or 4 feet and pointing directly toward you.  I bought them for my wife to use while she gets ready in the morning, and she's delighted, uses 'em everyday.  They fit easily on a small bathroom wall shelf among the many toiletries and perfumes, blending in as though they belong there.  They are usually driven by an iPod.  If you must have the smallest, this is definitely a good choice in a very small powered speaker.  Just pick your color
Scotch brand Laser Lens Cleaner. I only purchase this brand now. I have tried other brands of laser lens cleaners and this is by far the best one. It is also one of the least expensive. It works in my DVD burners (unlike the Memorex brand) and my DVD players as well as all my CD players. It has ceased errors on all of them whenever needed
Excellent Microphone for the price. We've been using the microphone that you plug in to the computer jacks, and we hated the noises, recetly upgraded to this Logitech USB microphone and we thoroughly enjoy our conversations over the internet.Highly recommend this cheap and best USB microphone.
Great value. This package of paper and film produces outstanding quality prints. It is easy to load the new film cartridge. Good choice for this Cannon printer
Purchased for 78 year old mother. Automatic duplexing!. The machine is a good value, seems well built so far, and fairly easy to use if you don't mind learning how the menus work. Has lots of setting options and features. My mother can't change the settings but she can use it fine anyway.The automatic duplexing feature should be standard on all multifunction machines built today but unfortunately you have to look hard to find this in a SOHO machine. Automatic duplexing saves paper, postage, storage space, and of course is good for the environment.Note: Canon replaced the first one we received because after a few weeks it developed the habit of turning out only all-gray pages after waking from power save mode. Canon service was easy to work with and fair
Put it in your camera... Just got this card for my Canon Digital Rebel XT.  It works great!  I have purchased many SanDisk products over the last few years and have never had a problem with any of them.
Works for me. This product is awesome for people who cant afford a bigger battery for your psp.. It gives me 2 extra hours, 4 hours normal, when i charge it up with the product attached it gives me 2 more hours, plus the grip makes it easy to play games without cramping..
Was looking for OXFORD english dictionary.... This is very slim and can be slipped into a book like a bookmark.It is lightweight and it has most of the stuff that paper dictionary has. No complaints so far. price was good too
Purchase of Monster Cable Component Video Cable. Satisfied with the product. The cable is currently being used to connect a Philips Digital Audio/Video Surround Receiver to a Toshiba TheaterWide HD TV. The quality of the picture while playing a DVD has improved considerably.
Worth It. Even if your radio (head) has an audio jack, get this adapter if you are interested in:1. iPod control from radio and/or radio remote2. clearer and louder musi
Huge storage and good r/w speed. I have an EOS Digital Rebel and was looking for a memory upgrade, at first I thought to buy a 1Gb Sandisk memory, but due to the price fall of memory cards I decided to buy the 2Gb card instead. When I inserted the card into the camera, it recognized the card right away reporting a whopping 575 photos in Large/Fine format or 262 in RAW format, that's more than I need even for a one week vacation trip, but if I upgrade my camera on christmas it may come just right for JPEG+RAW storage.I may not be very technical about this but the read and write speed was noticeable faster than my previous two year old 128Mb memory card, about twice as fast either for browsing or saving pictures.I have always trusted in SanDisk products and this card is no exception, quality and performance is as good as I expected
Great looks and sound. I have this radio for two weeks now.  I am very satisfied with the reception of AM, FM and Short Wave -- very sensitive.  Has great sound.  The only negative is the lack of being able to preset the stations.  Would buy the radio again - worth the money
Selphy 730. This printer does an excellent job. The colors are vivid and the clarity isvery crisp. The only negative is you are restricted to the canon paper with end tabs. Good value for a compact snap shot printer
Just made for Macbook 13". This product is really convenient for someone that wants to protect the laptop while carrying in a backpack with lot of other things. It doesn't add weight. Its pocket is really convenient because it allows to put the charger and other accessories and keep everything together. The only draw back is that you can't use it on its own because it doesn't have a handle. But I am content because I wanted it to carry my computer in my backpack
Excellent value, great picture & sound. This TV is an incredible value!  I've owned it for over 6 months and never one problem.  Initially, I installed my subwoofer to it, but the sound from the speakers that come with the set is so good I rarely turn on the subwoofer.  Picture is excellent from all angles.  People who see this always assume I paid much more for it.  Yes, you'd probably get better by paying 5 times this price ... but the technology improves so quickly (and this one can be upgraded with downloads), why pay more.  I have mine in living room since I sit closer to the TV there.  For my bedroom, which is larger and I'm further from TV, I'd probably go up to next largest size.  I love that this one is lightweight enough to move with ease ... by myself.  And it is a world of improvement if you are still watching TV on one of those large square box, heavy weight TVs.  Price low enough that when new technology requires me to replace it, I'll feel as if I've gotten great value for the money spent and move to the next upgrade
this thing rocks!   it does what it is supposed to do... easy to hook up.  you just need to charge the transmitter completely before doing anything else. btw, i did not get this for an ipod.  i don't own one but i do have a different brand mp3 player and it works fine.  it also works using the headphone jacks on my laptop.  i figure anything with a headphone jack will work.  and it sounds great.  i use it right now to play music in the background while i work.  definitely worth the purchase
great. Great batteries for cameras. They charge quickly, and it's handy to keep the extra 2 spare in the charger and with me all the time "just in case"
Great sound but a little difficult to fit over the ears. The headphones are great.  The sound is great and I love the color.  Only slight problem is the way the earpiece sits into your ear.  It takes a bit to get them to sit in place.  But maybe they will get better over time with all that extra sweat they will be subjected too.
im716 headphone review. I purchased these headphones because I needed isolation from noise and these did the trick. The sound quality is great and the quality of the headphones themselves is first rate. The noise isolation is good for work, planes, anywhere the noise level is too high. Irecommend them for the price
Great Functionality, Cheap price. I bought this around 9 months ago for a very cheap price , and it has worked perfectly ever since. Don't pay too much for barnded cassette adapters
Epson R380 Printer. Great buy. Epson Co. selling the same printer for $ 20.00 more then Amazon sells it for. It works great  and picture perfict
THESE ARE EXCELLENT DVD BLANKS.VERY GOOD QUALITY. I FIND THE VERBATIM MEDIA BLANKS TO BE AN EXCELLENT PRODUCT.THEY ARE COMPATIBLE WITH A LARGE NUMBER OF COMPUTER BURNERS,AND HOME DVD RECORDERS,THAT USE THESE BLANKS.WHEN YOU BURN YOUR HOME MOVIES OR DATA FILES,THEY ARE THERE TO STAY. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED,AND INEXPENSIVE
Fantastic case!. After trying several different cases, including armband cases, easel cases, etc., and subsequently leaving scratches on the back of my iPod, I was pleasantly surprised by this one.My new 80GB black iPod fits perfectly in the case, and the black looks great with the brushed pink metal.  I love the plastic cover over the click wheel; the easel case I had left one long scratch when I tried to remove it once, and it's nice to have the wheel actually covered.The only downfall is that I can't seem to get my iTrip to work with the case on.  I've found this with all of my cases, so I'm not too surprised.  The fit just isn't snug enough to get a good connection.Other than that, however, I highly recommend this case.  It's fantastic! :
Quite pleased. Great sound, easy installation.  Only negative is Mic and audio in share the same port
Great Card.  Bulk Packaging. As described at the top of this page, this is a "bulk package" card, meaning it doesn't come in a pretty package.  All you get is the carrying case with the Micro SD card and SD adapter inside.   Who need the packaging anyway?  You're just going to throw it away as soon as you get your card out ;)  Rest assured, it is in fact a brand new, official card (well... at least the one I got from the seller "a-depot" was).FWIW, I chose the seller "a-depot" because, if you include shipping costs, they were the cheapest seller period.  2gb transflash for $30.39 shipped.  Just wow.Use:I plugged in into my card reader and it mounted instantly.  Actual usable space on the card showed up as 1.89 GB.  I did a couple tests with a 30MB file and found that the transfer rates over USB2 (on my system at least) are consistently 1mb/s for both read AND write.After copying over a few MP3's, I moved the card into my  Verizon Motorola Krzr.  Everything showed up right away.  Not much more to say.
Space... the final frontier. Well, I have many of these discs and they are very useful.  The quality is perfect.What makes them even better is that on some Sony mini disc players you can use long play recording modes to record for 160 or 320 minutes.  My model is mzn 707 so I am sure all the newer models have this feature.This is handy because if you record a lot you run out of space very quickly. If you record live material onto your computer you use tons of space (about 20 mb a minute), which is a problem.Because the files are huge it is necessary to convert to mp3s. For this, I use Cool Edit 2000 available at www.syntrillium.com.If you do record a lot may I recommend you also check out the new 1gb minidisc for newer model players.With the new 1 gb 45 hour disc HI-MD mini disc it is now possible to get on one disc what I previously had to spread over 34 standard 80 minute discs. If I want, I can store about 900 songs, or 70 cd's, or save a whole year of voice lessons.For $6.99 for 45 hours, this is $0.15 per hour compared to about $1.50 per disc for the standard 80 minute discs, so the value is incredible.I highly recommend this. If you find this review helpful please click yes.
good product. The sound from this card is definitely better thanwhat my IBM T41 laptop can put out.   The T41 haspretty decent sound, but it cannot process soundin the sophisticated way this card can do.   So it'sreally a significant step up.The only issue is a headphone cannot produce the soundeffects of 4, 5, 6 or 7 speakers, which this card can do!And it's unlike that I will ever hook up my laptop toa full sound system.So it's a great product but somewhat unwieldy to harnessits full capability in normal daily use with my laptop beingmoved around so often
needed item. What can you say, if you have the cannon printer you have to have to have the cartridge. and original manufacturer product is the sure way to g
Slick Slick Slick ;-). For this review, bottom line, it is a reasonable cost and does what it supposed to do ... it works. Works perfectly with my Yamaha XM Ready receiver. Techno gadgets are cool - tuning in XM stations on my receiver rates up there in "cool category". It is fun. ;-
Good Product. I just installed the Brother TN-580 toner cartridge. It was simple to install and prints like new
Great box,but... Great boom box, but very heavy and BIG. If you intend to tote it back and forth from inside to out, I wouldget a smaller, lighter box. It is very well built and I like the big buttons which are useful when you haveon gloves
All's well. This product contained the part I needed, was delivered w/in a few days, and was a new product as discribed
Great Product!. I don't bother charging my Zune from the computer any more. This is the only way to go
burn them... without turning back. thats right .. not even a single coaster (as many others said) ... I did have one. but that was 'coz of some other reason ... there was no problem with these discs. I have burnt about 80 of these .. no probs so far ...cheer
It does all I wanted...and more. I needed a very basic palm around a $100. My main requirement was to keep my appointments and have something handy to write notes/ideas and sometimes verse since I write poetry.Zire 31 is very affordable and does all the above things very well. Apart from that, I did the following very easily:1. Installed new applications.2. Installed a new 1 GB memory card3. Installed Real Player and copied MP3 songs (sound quality is surprisingly tremendous!)4. Installed Adobe Acrobat Reader and a few E-BooksIt is extremely user friendly and easy to use. So far I have had no problems (it's been over a year now I think).Some peeves I have with it are:1. Doesn't have a 'vibrate' mode for alarms.2. The buttons on top can be used as short-cuts to specific places only, the calendar or preferences etc. I can't program them to go to some other application (at least I haven't found a way to).Apart from that, if you are looking for something simple and extremely useful, BUY THIS!-Sid
Quick Cam works great for price. This is a great inexpensive option as far as webcams go. I have purchased others with more features and a higher price tag, but find myself seldom using the extras. This product does the basics, and I think that's all that most people really need. Zero problems
The MZ-RH910 Works Great. The Sony  MZ-RH910 comes with -PC Sonic Stage  MD burning program-           Stereo head phones-AC Power  Adaptor-USB cable -1 Rechargable Battery-1Dry Battery Case-1GB Blank Disk .     I use the MZ-R910 to record my music group,I use the High Quality sony ECM-DS70P stereo microphone,it's  small and made for High Quality  recording for useing HI-MD  recorders or D.A.T.'s  .This MZ-RH910 is great for downloading Mp3's  .After recording from  a microphone , Connect the  supplied  USB cable to your Hi-Md and Connect the other end to a port on your PC.(when your PC is on, you will not need your  AC/DC or battery).Then you can record your music  from the MZ-RH910  to your PC , useing the sonic stage and save the music file as a Mp3 or WAV file for best quality,save it as a WAV file .If you have another program  you like to use to burn with or split the music files into tracks  ,save your music then close sonic stage and open it up  in another program. I think the Sony MZ-RH910 is very good and at a great price.
Solid Quality - Simple, Easy to Install. Excellent construction, solid and stable - just as described. Nice and thin - close to wall. I'm not much of a DIY-er and had no trouble - good instructions, comprehensive hardware, and system matching documentation included
Great batteries. This was the best deal I found on rechargable NiHM batteries and that too these are made in Japan by Sony. It has a capacity of 2300mAh. I do not think it gets any better than this.I would suggest anyone looking out for good NiMH batteries to go ahead and buy these
My new Cruzer Profile. I just recieved my Profile in the mail, and I couldn't be more happy. It reads your finger print with a swipe of your finger, and it often errs on the side of caution: if your finger is close, but not quite right, it denies you access. I don't have enough time to write a full review, but basically, I like it, alot
Great product, great service. Not much more to say. Like the brand, liked the service
Buy the Apple USB Power Adapter. Yes, Apple should include this thing -- with the higher end iPods, at least.  But they don't.The point of this post is to remind prospective USB-Power-Adapter buyers this:  with electronics, you tend to get what you pay for.So, you're tempted by those three-dollar, off-brand USB adapters?  Stay away from them.  You have, probably, a couple hundred bucks tied up in your iPod(s); it doesn't make sense to cheap-out now and take a risk with shoddy, fly-by-night electronics for your iPod....the same iPod that you scrupulously protect from scratches and such.  Apple designed their USB Power Adapter to work with their iPods.  And they do work.  Very well.Shame on Apple for fleecing us, though.  But, shame on you if you damage the electronics of your iPod by using some third-rate, flea market power adapter.Just buy Apple's
Fantastic Tuner but Audiophiles beware. I had been researching HD Radio for some time and was eager to hear it but since no retail store seems to be able to actually demo the technology, I decided to purchase the HDT-1 from Amazon.  Great price.First off Amazon delivered the tuner in two business days - great job.  The HDT-1 is easy to set up, simple to use and nice to look at.  The remote works well.  I have not noticed the problem with the display being too bright although I have noticed the clock lagging behind.  Not a big deal.As for the technology, the tuner tunes beautifully.  I live outside of Washington DC in the Maryland suburbs and have had no trouble picking up all of the area radio stations and all with the strongest signal and in HD.  There are lots of HD channels and secondary channels and virtually all of them come in with the strongest signal using the supplied antenna.  As a comparison, the smooth jazz channel was inaudible on my regular stereo tuner but was crystal clear on the Sangean.  This is a great piece of technology.  But,As for sound quality, I was concerned about the compression codecs used in this technology.  I had read that HD radio encodes at 96kps and frankly this is what it sounds like.  While crystal clear, the music is a bit dull and lacking in energy.  It certainly is not "CD quality."  In my opinion, 96kps is too much compression for someone who is into sound quality.  I typically download my music at 256kps if not 320kps and there simply is no comparison in the quality of the mp3's streaming from ITunes wirelessly to the stereo and the HD radio direct connection.  The mp3's encoded at 256 or above are far superior in sound quality to the songs encoded for HD radio.  This is the unfortunate truth about HD Radio.  At this point, while it is superior to satellite radio in sound quality, it is not ready for prime time audiophiles.So, the Sangean HDT-1, while a great tuner, can only reproduce the quality of the radio source that goes into it.  Thus, Audiophiles beware.
Great product but... This is a awesome product to use with the mentioned applications such as Google Earth, i bought mine specifically to use with Maya but... only reason im giving this 4 stars is because you cannot map this to any key configuration yourself, if you want this to work with any other apps then forget it. Either 3dconnexions will have to write a driver for it or you can email the company of the software you want supported and have them deal with it via an SDK. shame..
Great product for a scholar. Very good tool to have if you do a lot of reading
Backup of my computors. This appears to be a good piece of equipment. I hav'nt had any major outages as of yet but a minor fluctuation was handled very well.
Best Mother Board ever.. Wow. this motherboard is awesome... you can do everything with it.. of course you need to have a good processor with this mother board because it deserves it... Overclocking... raeelly easy with a software(forget about steping into the BIOS) , (network ports) for a better and faster internet conection...If you buy it.. make sure you enjoy i
Showcase Video 60. I got this for my 80gb ipod, and I really like it. I've dropped my ipod a few times, and nothing happened to it. It protects the screen nicely, and the case closures seem to be holding up fine (its been about 4months since I got it).I would recommend this product to other people. I didn't give it 5 stars because unless the thing makes me breakfast, it can't be worth 5 stars ;)
Great for Crusing. I picked this up to use on a Mediterranean cruise since the outlets in cruise ship cabins are scarce and usually located right at the edge of a vanity.  It worked great for charging 2 digital camera batteries which wouldn't fit in the normal outlet at the same time.  It's small, rugged and light so it's easy to pack
Inexpensive and Works Well. I wanted an inexpensive cordless phone that would work well and I got it.  Very satisfied
Arrived as promised. Happy with product copier is very busy now I like to keep plenty of ink on hand
It's not too bad. If you have previous experience in setting up VPN between two FVS318, this VPN software setup is piece of cake. It works fine for me espsecially for small office like mine, I can control all my servers when I am on a business trip even using dial up. It is awesome.To prevent dropping of VPN connection, you need to adjust the MTU size to 1492 or other numbers. This is the information I got from Netgear technical support and it worked.The only 2 complaints are:1. I need to purchase it and doesn't come with the router.2. The other guy was right, it doesn't work with Cisco VPN client
Excellent purchace. Great size for home viewing.  Easy to use, easy to store.  Excellent picture quality
Good but imperfect. Overall I was pleasantly surprised with this item. It is well-packaged, Targus have a section on their website that let you check if the tips will work for your equipment, and the supplied tips included ones that were correct for ours. The cords and connectors leave little doubt how to get the thing working. Except, it took me a minute to be sure there was an Empower connector (for some airplanes), but once I hunted I found it under the cigarette lighter connector. It all comes with a carrying bag.Two oddities. One is that the power supply unit has a very bright blue light shining when it is working. I don't mind this. The other is that, after unhooking the tip from my equipment, the power supply shuts off and I can't work out how to turn it back on again. It does come on if I unplug it from the wall and then replug it. Still, right now that aspect feels more like a bug than a feature, and cost this unit a star
HDTV Review - Sony KDL-32S2400. Overall I am very satisfied with this HDTV set.  I am very pleased with it's ability to receive over-air HDTV broadcasts.  Every local station is strong with only an old-fashioned set-top rabbit ears (with UHF loop) that I have set on the floor behind a chair near the set.  I think the sound is a little flat, and I don't like the glare off the screen and the gloss black band across the lower part of the set.  However, brightness is very good and dimensional depth of the picture is outstanding.  Some shows, like the PBS HD broadcasts have a 3-D look to them.  This is the main reason I bought Sony.  Another surprise was how good DVD movies looked in widescreen format.  The progressive scan feature of the DVD player produces an image that is excellent on this screen.  If I could ask Sony for one thing it would be to provide some way to adjust the set controls for Normal, Zoom, Wide, and Wide Zoom.  Films shown in widescreen format over regular cable (I have DISH) cannot normally be adjusted larger without cropping more of the image than I would like.  This might be a problem with most sets, but Sony could provide some tweaking here
AWESOME bass, not comfortable... I struggled between this and the shure e2c. I decided on the e2c, after comparing also with the etymotics r6i and the ultimate ears superfi3. This one has the least clarity, but wonderful bass. If I don't listen to as much classical music, I'd definitely pick vmoda vibe. It makes even terrible pop songs sound cool.I had to reject it because wearing it was not comfortable for my left ear at all for some reason, and I had an extremely hard time putting it in, even with the help of my bf. The vmoda did not come with any foam, only the silicon ear pieces. I settled on the less bass but more clarity and more comfortable e2c
PMX 60. +:* Its the cheap and best phones with all good sound engineering.* Love the 'around the neck' design.-:* Cord could be lengthy like Sennhiser HD202.
Great wireless card. The main reason I got this card is because it working in Linux (It has an atheros chipset), and it delivers.  It works great, and the range is awesome.For Windows users, it works great in XP as well.Overall, I am very satisfied with this wireless card
Excellent option to avoid camera cables. I bought this reader because I wanted to avoid having my camera and all its cable attached to my pc to download the pictures; and with this reader I could leave my camera (and its cables) in its case and just download the picture with the memory card, I recomend this product....
great look, solid performance. fast, easy to use (I'm using Toast, instead of Nero that comes with the drive). Quite fast with Firewire connection. I see many users are happy with Nero, but I still don't feel comfortable using Sony softwares beacuse of their track record of secretly installing a spyware. Works great with Toast on my OSX. looks almost custom made for Macs. It could have been a 5 star product if the price was competitive
As Advertised. The other reviews have it pretty much right.  The product is what it is.  It is a nice way to hook your zune up to your speaker system rather than buy a very expensive boombox.  Very easy to set up and gives you the added bonus of a wall charging feature.  Good sound and not so good picture, which is to be expected from a 3 inch screen translating itself onto a much bigger one.  The remote is small and functional, with a good setup, and I love that it is a magnet.  The base is sturdy and the whole package in general is pretty slick looking.  Overall, very functional, and a good companion to your zune if you plan on doing a lot of listening at home.
Power UPS! Everything you need to know. First of all why do you want a power UPS? There are some very good reasons. (1) You never want your machine to go down incorrectly because of a blackout. (2) You want to work with clean power only. (3) You want to monitor your PC power. (4) You want to prevent your PC from being damaged due to a power problem like a lighting strike and want surge protection. The first rule about UPS is to never trust the insurance claim. Get your PC insured elsewhere. These companies have a tendency not to support their insurance claims. I have a PC running some very high specifications with over six USB devices, LCD monitor, printer and Ethernet equipment, with everything on at the same time. I have never gone above 325W of usage and average between 250W and 300W when managing a high spec game and doing lots of background tasks. Even though I have a 400W Power Supply Unit (PSU) I will be upgrading to a 500W PSU because it is better quality model. The way I can monitor how many Watts I use is with UPS software and hardware. So the question you need to ask is how many watts you will be using. The short answer to this is you don't know until you install the UPS and software that tells you how many watts you use because that appears to be the only way you can monitor your wattage at this time. You need to estimate what it is. I would say a high-end domestic PC (not a server) would use 300W max if it has one of every device you can think off turned on. As soon as we add things like another PC, or several printers, or several monitors, then we can start to overload a 325W UPS. This brings us to the first thing we need to learn about any UPS - Overloading and balancing. The overload feature is a warning system that turns on when you have overloaded the UPS capacity. Overloading does two things. It can in theory eventually damage the UPS and it voids the warranty. Most UPS are 325W but there are 800W - 1000W and even greater models out there for home networks that use more than one PC setup but to be honest you are probably going to get a UPS per PC setup rather than expensive bigger UPS for a network. So check the UPS rating. What UPS you choose depends on how much you want to load on it. Next thing you need to check with the UPS is if it comes with a USB connection. If it does this is a big plus because it means you can control it from your PC and the UPS comes with software. Now if the UPS has this feature then you can do loads of stuff like turning off UPS sound alarms, controlling how your UPS handles a blackout, how long it uses the battery before shutdown or hibernation, if it sounds an alarm or not, if it run self tests, data collection and monitoring, notifications and sensitivity settings. If the UPS does not come with a USB connection and software then you probably should be looking for an UPS designed for computer use rather than a UPS for non-computer equipment. Most UPS have LED indicators that tell you the status of the unit. The next thing to understand is that testing your UPS is not done by breaking it out of the box, connecting it to the mains, plugging your PC in and then turning off the house's power with the circuit breaker. You must charge the UPS first! So read the instructions. Usually you must attach the battery to the UPS (plug it in firmly!) and wait before using it. Then perform the test using the software first! Then you can consider trying to simulate a blackout in your home to see if the PC stays up. Usually a UPS is programmed to shutdown your PC if the blackout lasts for a few seconds. Nearly all UPS models with a USB connection can be customized for the shutdown event or how long the PC should hold for on the UPS battery. Most UPS devices allow you to connect a modem phone line into the device and then run a phone line into your modem. This is important because power surges on a UPS that do not have this protection can damage a PC through the unprotected phone line running into the modem that usually runs to the PC somehow. This is nasty problem with the degree of security that a UPS can provide. If it doesn't have this function then it is not going to provide 100% surge protection with a PC that is on-line. Networking a UPS PC to another PC without UPS can also increase the risk of surge protection problems. It is not recommend that you network a UPS PC to a non-UPS PC unless surge protection and the warranty are not an issue. One last thing is that some UPS have input regions on the UPS for surge protection and other input regions are not surge protected. Also with some models the batteries need to be replaced after a few years if you end up using them a lot. This is everything you need to know about an UPS before you choose one. It is basically now about downloading the technical specs of the UPS and making sure it provides you with what you need. The two top brands are APC and Belkin
Impressive. When I saw this component stereo system in a "Good Guys" store I was immediately impressed with the overall look of the thing. As I started toying with the floor model, I realized how versatile it was, and decided that it was something I wanted to own. Sadly, the floor model was the only unit left in the store, and there wouldn't be anymore coming since "Good Guys" was going out of business. That was not acceptable to me. So, I went elsewhere to find the same system.When I found the item on-line, for a much better price, I was sold.Getting it only took a few days, and it was delivered right to my place of work, for my convienence.What impressed me the most about the unit was the sheer depth of sound it produced. When playing a movie with grand scenes and lots of special effects, the little system did not disappoint in giving a theatrical experience in sound.Other features were also pretty cool to me, such as the LCD light. While it gave off a nice blue glow, it could be dimmed, which was a nice touch.All in all, with all the features this device has, I am certain I will have many years of enjoyment. It is a great system for the right price and truly impressive
Solved my issue. Lightning blew the ethernet port on my IMAC. I couldn't track down an old airport card, so I thought I'd give this a shot. The Belkin stick connects my old mac to internet for $36. The connection is pretty slow but liveable. You'll need to find the drivers on the net. My kids are happy, so that's all that counts
BUY IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I graduated from a 4 year old In-Focus projector,which served me very well, but this is an incredible jump up in quality. The old projector cost $5k!!! I know there are projectors for big bucks,but why would anyone need anything more. Unless the more expensive units can provide x-ray vision for Jennifer Aniston movies, I don't get it.This unit was rated #1 by Consumer Reports- that is how I found it (after settling on a new In-focus IN76). This unit, which had a net cost after rebates of $1450.00, is a joy to the eyes and the pocketbook.Only minor drawback is lack of digital focus from the remote.Buy it!
Great Burner and very easy to use. This burner is so great and doesn't take too much space.  we purchased it and never had any problems with it.  It is very easy to use, you just connect it to the computer with the USB cord and the rest is just a piece of cake.  Good software as well.  I definately recommend i
needs more detail. You will need to buy Map-source maps ($100+) to make this thing worth the purchase. I needed GPS for boating but the base maps are rudimentary, ie; no inlets, rivers, shoreline detail or lakes. It is although very accurate and easy to use, nice big screen and good reception. If you need GPS now this unit is an excellent value. I payed $199 a month ago and now its $169 but that's my problem.
increase the antenna height and the signal gets through. My Wireless network had some major dead spots, by relocating the antennas I was able to improve the coverage. This product gives an alternative to moving the wireless router around and gives you the ability to put the router where you want it without concern of blocking the signa
Excelente Bolso. Caracteristicas que lo hacen excelente:- Espacioso.- Ligero- Protege el laptop- Duradero.Tal y como siempre se han categorizado los productos de TARGUS.EXCELENT
GREAT VALUE. This cleaner/rewinder has helped many of our videos last longer.  I love being able to clean AND rewind them at the same time.  Sometimes the mechanism sticks when you close the device, but in all, I am very happy with the product
Best DVD Case/Refills on the market and LEAST EXPENSIVE!. After much research I settled on the Case Logic DVD Wallet (140 Capacity) and refill pages to add to the capacity.  The price was way less expensive then any others on the market and I am thrilled with the quality and ease of use (it even stands up to my 2 year old's flipping through)...I highly recommend this line for anyone looking to organize and/or save space with their DVD collection
Hear The Difference. I've read some different opinions of these 'phones and people have said they don't fit your head (this is ridiculous since they're adjustable) or that they are very easy to break, which in my experience it has been the exact opposite. I've caught the cord on things numerous times, had somebody knock them off of my desk, somebody even sat on them and they still remain the same as when I first purchased them. No scratches, cracks, disconnections or breaks of any kind. I would actually inform people that these are quite sturdy and durable instead of making it seem as though they will snap with the first wrong move.The sound quality is just amazing for the price and as others have noted, they're much better all-around headphones than the Sony brand in the same price range. I tested both for long periods of time and gave them each a fair amount of burn-in. In the end the Sennheisers are a much bigger bang for your buck. As for them sounding like tin cans or even more laughable: sounding better when they're cupped by your hands, those statements are just entirely false as another reviewer has already pointed out. The sound becomes much worse when this is done because it takes away from the sonic accuracy and spatial experience. Maybe the reviewer who said this needs some new equipment or a better understanding of the way these headphones are supposed to work. When you buy open headphones (which, by the way, reproduce better sound than a closed pair) you should know what you're getting and the fact that people will be able to hear what you're listening to if they're close enough. The quality is much better, that's the difference and it's the reason they are made this way. If you're looking for privacy, grab the Sony V6.All in all these are well worth the price tag and will definitely bring a smile to your face if they're your first, second, or even third dip into audiophile territory. However, you must keep moving up the line if your expectations become too high. Headphones in this range can only do so much and these most certainly get the job done for the tag attached to them. Be sure to give them a fair chance and a lot of burn-in before you judge them
JetAudio products are great. The A2 not only plays mp3's but also ogg, wav, wma and frac formats (way to go), but I belieave they can do a lot better. I mean if they wanted they could crush Ipod if only they get out all the potential of their products (like more functions) and make an effort to go multi OS compatible at software level. Also they should do something about their poor manuals and support page. I admit it's easy to follow in practice but it would be nice to have all the in and outs of the A2 on the website (to avoid killing trees). Maybe a forum?I bought the A2 cause it was recommended by RedHat as being a great multi-format media player and at this JetAudio delivers, as well as having a friendly Graphical User Interface. I did have some problems with recording from the TV (picture freeze) but still can't say if this was a TV problem or an A2 problem and I haven't had time to play more with it.So my summary on the Cowon A2 is:Do I recommend it? Yes.Can JetAudio do better? Absolutely.Oh, BTW. Thumbs up on the communication compatibility with their other players
Overall good product. This product is a good choice for a reasonable price. My cons for this product are: Its as wide as a dvd player.  I have seen other products out there that are smaller if you are looking for a compact design. The other issue I encountered is every great while a song will skip.  This could be due to the fact that there are five wireless networks in range. I have not spent too much time investigating this issue b/c its not that big of a deal.  Over I am happy with this purchase
Excellent Value -- Wide range of functionality. This DVD player is a great, mid-range player that encompasses a wide variety of disc formats. One of the best features is that it can store the exact position of playback for 5 discs so that if you stop watching one movie and move on to another, you can go back the next day and pick right up where you left off.I have tried playing DVDs, DVD+R and CD-R (with JPG images) and all have worked successfully
Great Value and Impressive Features. I bought the Ebookman 901 without knowing anything about it, and I have been very pleasantly surprised at how versatile it is. Just add a 128 MB MMC card (which are now pretty reasonable on E-bay) and you can have 2 hours of music to go! I have another 64 MB MMC card in it on which I have all the books I have downloaded. A 64 MB card will hold almost 100 regular books! The MobiPocket Reader is great for casual reading, and the Franklin Reader has all the navigation features to make it great for references. I can read any book in HTML or TXT format, and there are thousands for free on the web. The Ebookman also has some nice accessories like a car stereo adaptor and an AC adaptor for home use. The PDA functions like Address Book and Memo Book and Date Book are very handy. There are some really fun games. I take this unit when I am traveling, and am never bored. I think if you read the manual and learn how to use it properly, you will love this device. And now you can find them on E-bay and Heartland America for less than 50 bucks. WOW
sound ok to me. these are just fine when used in conjunction with a separate subwoofer.  they replaced a very fine set of ads monitors that I had for years and I haven't noticed any loss of sound.  plus they are priced very well and take up so little room.  definitely would buy again
Satellite radio indoors. The kit arrived complete and it does what it says it will do. I had a little trouble finding a window with good reception, and I'm not really happy with the black wires snaking across the floor, but I can use my satellite radio indoors. I run it through a stereo system, and the sound is really good. It would be great if this could be done wirelessly
Product desciption could be more specific. I,ve seen complaints about the ac adapter you "must" plug in. Hey guys, try it without an outside energy source, I just hope I,m not gonna fry something but it seems to work fine just plugged into a powered USB port. I have a VERY high end system though with wattage to sprare, but no more PCI slots, Damn 7900 512 gtx graphics cards, why do 2 of em have to take up so much room. Oh well, trade offs are a bi---, but a reality and 7 extra USB slots are awfully nice
utility printer. Good printer,does a good job on printed matter,our daily download of comics,maps,etc. It also does suprisingly well on photos,although we also have a dedicated photo printer for large prints
Worked well. This product worked very well, and was easy to hook up. For my use I had 3 video game systems using component video & optical audio, and the switching was very quick. I replaced separate manual switchers for toslink & component, and am happy with this product
Nice Product. Easy set up.  Admin page is simple to navigate and set up your network.  Encryption is easy and fast.  High speed good range.  I recommend.  I have owned Belkin, Linksys and D-Link, they have all failed over time.
Works well with Linux. The WG311T that I recieved worked out of the box with Ubuntu Linux 6.06 LTS (provided I had network-manager-gnome installed). This card consistently receives a good signal and operates at 108mbps very far away from the gateway.The only reason I am giving this wireless card four stars is because many Windows XP users have had trouble with it
Nap feature and extendable snooze make this a winner. One thing I don't like about this clock radio is that it doesn't have a backup battery.  Currently I usually do not need to rely on the radio waking me up in the morning, but when I do I make sure my Palm PDA is beside the bed to wake me if there was a power outage.I tried the weather channels once, and it didn't pick up very well.  I have an older Sony clock radio (that loses time) that I can use for weather that picks up weather just fine.What makes this a winner for me is the extendable snooze and nap timers.  Now if I want to take a nap I don't have to mess with setting one of the alarms.  I just push one button several times and it's all set.  I would buy the alarm clock for that feature alone.I use the extendable snooze occasionally, but I don't know if there is a point at which it no longer works -- some alarm clocks for some unknown reason limit the number of times you can press the snooze -- this makes it unusable for me because I don't trust myself knowing that when I am half asleep!Sound quality is great, I like how you can set the track of the CD and how loud it should be.  All in all a pretty good clock radio, but if you rely on it and don't have a backup, the lack of battery backup is a serious problem
Excellent quality!. Excellent sound - I just think that sometimes it could be easier to download movies
Great Idea. This was not hard to setup, the only thing you need to remember is that it uses it's own file system. If you are intending on using an existing hard drive, please take all info off, before using it in this storage device, then after setup, copy all of your data back to it and then you're good to go.
Excellent kit, but not for everyone. Normally, I would never have bought this.  However, I recently moved things around in my office and noticed that the AirPort Express input on my receiver was getting some interference in the right speaker (other inputs were not, however).  I had been using a $5 Radio Shack 1/8"-to-dual RCA plugs cable.Rather than debug the interference, I decided to buy an optical cable.  It's convenient that Apple makes this kit--no stress over whether I had bought the right cable.I'm using the optical cable to connect the AirPort Express to the receiver; the interference is gone--mission accomplished.  The power extension cable is useful not only for the AirPort Express but also for the power bricks Apple ships with the iBook and PowerBooks--which is how I intend to use it (keeping it in my laptop bag so I have less cable churn when I travel).I agree the kit is expensive, but it's also convenient.  For those with the money, the kit is perfect... and the white cables match the AirPort (whereas black Radio Shack cables do not)
Work on my MotorolaMpx220. I buy it just for use whit my cellphone, and works perfectly
Almost Perfect - Slot in Bottom Too Narrow for Some Earphones. Very nice hard case with removable belt clip that inverts Nano so earphone jack is on top.  Great for running or other exercise - just clip it to your pants or shorts.  Nano fits perfectly in the clear case. Protects screen and remainder of surface (but not wheel) while adding very little bulk.   Only problem was that the plug for my Shure E3c earphones was too thick to push all the way through the narrow bottom slot.  Careful filing on the case widened the slot around the earphone jack another 1/8 inch and all works fine now.   The manufacturer should widen the slot to at least accomodate earphone plugs that are no thicker than the Nano.   Otherwise, 5 Stars.
Does What it Should. I own this case and have been very satisfied with it. it DOES have a belt loop, which is a piece of fabric about 1 inch wide that spans vertically from the top to bottom of the back side of the case. i keep my iPod in it (3rd generation, 10gb) with plenty of room to spare. there is a zippered pocket on the other side for earphones or memory cards.  zipper is high quality, and the zipper handle is made out of rubber. the mesh part of it stretches to hold your mp3 player.  note: the color is less copper looking than in the picture. it is more of a champange color. and if you want a mini disc player case, look at the case logic mini disc player case
Great case if you want to put your laptop inside another bag. This is a great case if you want to put your laptop inside another bag when you travel. I do a lot of traveling for business and need to fit my personal laptop into the same bag as my business laptop. It is a little big for my 14.1-inch machine, but that was expected. You can't beat the price around ten dollars.There seems to be some controversy around the metal logo on the bag. I was able to pry off the outer logo easily but the metal clasp on the inside of the bag is a little tricky to get at. I actually had to cut a small hole in the inner liner (not the neoprene) with scissors to get it out, after this I just sealed the cut with white glue to keep it from fraying- still not a big deal. I would never have bothered with this if I hadn't read the other reviews on Amazon.
Intel Core 2 Duo E6600 2.4 GHz Processor (LGA775). What can I say? It is state of the art and runs literally cool! 27-30 C.on a ASUS P5W DH
The Most Advanced PC programmable Remote for the $$$. I have an elaborate Home Theater setup with high end & pro audio equip. Plasma HDTV, Digital Cable Box, DVD, MP3 Player, CD Changer, DVD Recorder,VHS Recorder & Media Center PC + The Bedroom TV, Music & DVD setups. I ended up w/ 12 remotes & was going crazy fumbling for the right one.(12 is the max for this model) ... Anyway, I shopped around & found this to be the best bang for the Buck. Software & USB cable made programming Devices very easy. An activity button allows you to add commands to perform a 1 touch function (quite nice) ex. Watch DVD. My monitor, Amps, DVD player, all turn on to the correct inputs, effects & defaults to the DVD remote controller for DVD & amps volume controls.  Pretty much all of the original remote's unique buttons & controls forward over. You can also hold the original to this gadget & add buttons, via command learning for those unfound controls that the software may have missed, very important to me. You can change text display tags for devices & activities simply. You can add default inputs & auto play functionality or remove it. The unit's  backlight allows full darkness visuals for night time use. The software found all my devices, by model # entry, no prob.(some of my stuff is very new & some is a few years old. Overall programming worked well) The time consuming part, was to get the activities to all default properly, based on your wiring setup(pretty common). Requires you to play around for a while before your content. Higher $$$ remotes are pretty much, the same to get right. Overall, nice to have a "one for all" finally. Unit quality is nice,buttons are labelled & spaced decently. The screen is nicely readable,as well as, the buttons. The Buttons are hard buttons, meaning they have a click feel, nice when in the dark. light is in the center ( thumb action ) easy to remember. As with any elaborate device, be prepared to spend some setup time. No highend gadgets are for the lack of patience type. Read (your PC screen) & understand as you go, like any PC application & It will eventually make sense. Higher models will allow more devices to be added & a couple features of ease. Use your needs as a guideline, they all are of the same basic design quality.  Good Unit, Great Price, Sleek feel & good time consumption activity for the detailed enthusiast. You'll be thrilled when your done & it works ! You need to know the wiring setup & be educated on your components. More of an older Teen to Adult level of knowledge required. The PC USB made sense & no user manual reading was required. . Younger may get lost, programming this. After all your efforts are done, a young child or guest should be able to use it simply.If you have a need for something like this than Get one !!! & have it's power all in one hand !!! I give it (*****) 5 Stars for what it's  worth!!!
2 gb Olympus xd memory card. Received exactly what I ordered at a fair price
Great!. Great to have handy in the car.  It charges the Gizmo (Zen M 60 GB) super fast!  And it's pretty, too, if you care.  Snow white
Great Price on Amazon. Even better LCD TV!. I was a little skeptical about purchasing a big ticket item like a 46" LCD online however all my fears were relieved after delivery and the HUGE price savings were realized! I saved nearly $800 by purchasing my Samsung TV on Amazon.com. That price savings included shipping as well. Not only did I save lots of money, but they also delivered it and took it out of its box in my livingroom. I didn't have to borrow a truck or try and cram it in my car. GREAT picture, even though I don't have a 1080p signal to it, just the 720 with limited HD digital cable channels. This Samsung LCD is Alot cheaper than the SONY Bravadia and I personally couldn't tell the difference in picture quality when looking at them in the store. I highly recommend it!
Great Boombox. Hey, this is a very good box.  good price, good delivery.  Amazon does it again
Very pleased with Sony flash memory card!. This product works great. Very happy with the flash memory card and would recommend it to others
Wojnderfully Comfortable Earbuds. Omigod!The reviews from CNET and others are spot on!The buds that came with my Samsa e260 were far too big and hurt to wear.These are perfect!Deep Velvet Bass, Sparkling Highs and above all.Comfortable!!!!!Yes!!!
Great little travel speaker system for the iPod!. I bought my iPAL two years ago to take with me when I travel (particularly airplane travel).  I can throw this in my suitcase without it taking up very much room, and then, when I am in a hotel room, I have great sounding audio from my iPod or from my MacBook Pro laptop.  I researched and tested many other portable units to use with the iPod and this one by far had the best sound.  Sure it doesn't fill a concert hall with sound, but it sure sounds better that any of the other portable units I tried.  Even though it isn't stereo it's sound is still crisper and more even.  With most portable stereo units I tried you really couldn't tell you were getting stereo once you got a few feet away from it anyway.  As far as volume, this unit is great for what it is meant for.  If you want a lot of volume you should buy one of the Bose or Logitek systems (both much larger and more expensive).  For both portability and quality of sound this one gets my vote
Very Useful Video Adaptor for the iBook. I have used this Apple video adaptor with my iBook about a dozen times with two different televisions and it has worked flawlessly.  For both DVD playback and presenting slide shows (from pictures in iPhoto) it has produce clear and crisp video.  With both of the TVs I only had the opportunity to use composite video rather than the s-video connector so the results may differ when using that interface.  The only negative for me was the form factor.  While it is of a convenient size for packing with a laptop for travel, the relatively large weight at the and of a short cable made positioning of the adaptor awkward without using additional video cable between the television and the computer
Use your imagination and the price can't be beat. This product is a great deal.  The problem with its shakiness can be easily solved with a little imagination.  Get two standard sized bricks and place them at the bottom of each of the two metal spires (they fit perfectly). Friends will compliment you on your post-modern taste and sense of design as well!  They will use up about 10 CD's worth of space but then you still have storage for about 100 standard cd-cases or 200 thin ones.
I like it a lot!!!. it's stable and when you plug your earphone in it won't come out easily which is good and the sound come from the ipod is really good~~ just prefect !! I can share my music with my friend when ever I wan
takes a licking...and keeps on ticking. just the like the reviewer below, i accidentally put my cruzer through the washer...AND the dryer.  i pulled it out after my clothes finished drying a i was SURE i had firstly waterlogged it, and secondly fried it.when i got to work and plugged it into my computer it started right up. no problems whatsoever.  i don't know whether or not it would survive it i did it again, but for this one time, it performed brilliantly. thanks, cruzer!
toughskin really tough. It works well to protect my ipod and it is light weight. It feels a bit rubbery so that the ipod does not slip in my hands
They all work!!. This is the second time I got a 100-disc spindle of the memorex 16x DVD+R.  It's been very reliable.  Every single disc in the previous spindle worked like a charm.  And for the price, this is an unbeatable product
Good corded headset. I have a couple of these, one I bought about two years ago, the other last month.What can I say? It works for me. It is comfortable, it stays in my ear, I can hear my callers, and they can hear me. Sony made one design change: the first one has an L-shaped plug because it was only intended to work with cell or wireless phones. The newer one has a straight plug and comes with an adapter/extension cable for use on a PC. Since I only use them with phones, I'd have preferred that they stayed with the original plug.If you need a corded headset (either because your phone does not support Bluetooth or you're waiting for them to make Bluetooth headsets that look a little less dorky), this is a good choice
Well worth the money. One thing you will read in reviews when people first use the IM716 headphones is a complaint about how they hurt the listeners ears while running.  Had this customer read the manual they would read a passage explicitly stating how they are NOT reccomended to use while running, bycycling or driving a car.I use them for long airplane flights, long walks between classes and relaxing at home, and these headphones are fantastic.  Once you get it situated in your ear correctly, it takes a few tries to figure it out, you won't want to take them off.  They are comfortable and the sound quality is incredible; this is assuming that you have your music encoded in a higher quality format.  If all of your music is encoded in .mp3 at 128kbs you arn't doing yourself justice.  I have some songs in apple losses and some in ACC 192kbs (w/ vbr) and I am very happy with the sound quality.The clip, located about 6-8 inches below the actually earphones lets you manually adjust volume and select two different types of pla, Bass and High Definition.  The Bass will boost the lower range and that volume quite significantly (for those who complain that the earphones aren't loud enough) and the High Definition gives the listener a crisp tone that is a little bit more flat.Overall, I am very satisfied with the product and would advise anyone who loves music to promptly go out and purchase them.  They are worth MUCH more than the 67.00 I paid for them
Works Perfectly. I bought 3 sets of these for my entertainment center.  They work flawlessly.  I laugh at people who purchase Monster Cables.  These work just as good, and if you think you can tell a "difference" with Monster Cables, I challenge you to a double-blind test.  You won't be able to tell any difference.  My only complaint is that these cables are very thick, and hard to manuever in small quarters (i.e., through holes in the back of your entertainment center stand).  If you are on a budget, these are the way to go
Great product-slingbox tuner. Great box, really handy.  i travel a lot so this helps me not have to readjust my times as much for when programs are on, what channels, etc
Philips HTS3400 perfect for the price. Hi,I recently got this system from overstock.com and put it with the Philips 23" flat screen LCD TV I bought from Amazon.com.  Together these are great.  I have had no problem with the DVD play and I love having a radio tuner built in... one less appliance needed and with lovely sound.  Granted, I live in a small apartment and I doubt I would turn the sound up to really take advantage of the system (don't want the neighbors calling).  But for the price it is perfect and the two together look great in my home and perform very well
bang for the buck!. i bought this last summer, originally wanting a new 5 disc changer and saw that it had a recorder built in, i use it almost on a daily basis.while it's not as fast dubbing as a computer is, it's much easier to operate and has not let me down yet.yes, the manual is not great, but through a LITTLE trial & error AND a little COMMON SENSE it's not hard to figure out...i'm not terribly techno savvy, but i was recording from cassettes the first day.to touch on what a previous reviewer has said about only using SONY CD-Rs, that's not true at all, i've used about 7 different brands and have not had a problem w/any of them...brand has nothing to do w/it.i recommend this to anyone who doesn't want to deal w/a computer to make transfers or backups, specifically referring to trying to find software that will allow you to make copies......this will record ANYTHING you want to record right out of the box.this might be slower than a computer, but a million times easier.HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
Nice little case. This is a nice little case.  The cover is heavy duty.  the pages are just typical vinyl not real great but they do hold up
Best iPod with one problem. I got this because love the color scheme of this iPod (Red and Black!) but I don't really want the autograph signings of "U2" on the back because then I feel like they're judging my music or even are loaning me their iPod or something (I bought it) and my favorite music is not "U2". I bought fine grade sandpaper (small grit) and gently worked their signatures off, which only took a few hours, and then after a few more hours of sanding with increasingly finer grades of sandpaper and ultra-fine steel wool and then buffing with cheesecloth for smoothing it all out, it looks almost like normal! Now I have the "bomb" looking iPod. I put one U2 song on it just for Karma, but I never listen to it. Get this now, and the sandpaper is available at Hardware stores (get the small grit kind)
Good Buy. Works like a charm, produces labels quickly and flawlessly. Only drawback is the Operation is not intuitive and reading the operation guide is necessary to work out the formats. This comment is typical of a geek like me who only reads instructions as a last resort
Works with Win98!. My biggest concern when looking for a card reader was that it work on my Win98 (not SE) machine.  Ive only used it with Compact Flash but it reads and writes several brands and capacities just fine.  No install problems either, even though the machine/OS is pretty old.The "pop down" door is a little goofy, but I just stick a pencil in the door to keep it from closing.  This props it up on the desk so it is a bit easier to get the cards in and out
Better than my old Belkin model. It's speedy and space saving and inexpensive. I bought this to replace my Belkin because the Belkin needed to be plugged in. This one is powered by your computer so there's no extra power cords, which is a big plus to me.The only thing I dislike about this is the fact that the Hub takes up two Usb ports instead of just one like the Belkin.
Highly Versatile. I got an Olympus 700-series camera 3 years ago and this camera uses AA cells instead of a battery pack.  It also drinks batteries like water if you use the flash.  It also needs 1.5v batteries - Nimh or NiCd's just don't work.So when Ray-o-vac released the "Renewal" rechargeable alkaline battery, i was ecstatic.  I got the batteries and got the charger.  The ability to recharge these special batteries is what make it a 3-in-1 charger.The charger is very smart; when a battery is charged it shuts off.  I have read that this extends the life of most types of cells.  I can also tell if a cell needs to be "topped off" by placing it in the charger - it will shut off right away if the cell is o.k.The capacity is 1-4xD, or 1-4xC, or 1-8xAA, or 1-8xAAA cells. The ability to charge just one cell is an improvement over my GE stereo charger.  I wish that Ray-o-vac made a charger that was 2x as large.  When I get in the mood to charge I want parallelism, baby.The contacts are good and the unit is reliable; it does what the marketing says it does, so I'm a happy customer.NOTE: renewal rehargeable alkaline batteries are getting hard to find, but I believe there are now other makers of rechargeable alkaline batteries.  Also, the renewal batteries only last about 20 charges, i've taken to writing the date on the batteries when i use them for the first time, and I try to keep them together in sets.  Tonight I am looking to buy some generic batteries of this type, and I believe they will charge properly in my charger
Targus Laptop Backpack. Good product. Could be better organized. The pockets need more closures or zippers
Learn from my loss. Previously purhcased a USB/Firewire enclosure from eBay. It ran so hot that it destroyed my drive (and data). Friend recommended this Acomdata unit and I have been EXTREMELY pleased with it.Lesson learned: Don't try to save a few dollars because in the long run your data is worth more plenty more than the few dollars.Ordering a second unit now
Very Impressed Overall. Things that I like:(1) The option to tile the front of the keyboard up makes typing much more comfortable.  I was a skeptic about it before I purchased it, but really do like it.  Also, this is the first keyboard that I have used that allows for so many typing angles.(2) The included software gives a great deal of control over customizing all of the extra keys on the keyboard.  Even if you don't have Windows Vista, you can program the gadgets key to suit your needs.(3) The keyboard has no lag for me, whatsoever.(4) I'm a big fan of the standard 3x2 key setup for the home keys, etc.(5) This is a small change, but I'm using this setup on Dell Inspiron 6000 laptop.  The software replaced the large volume notifications (onscreen display showing volume level, mute, etc.) with a smaller more attractive style notification.  Me gusta.(6) The curved keyboard is also comfortable.  It requires no time nor effort getting used to it.(7) I haven't had any problems with the keyboard being "out of range."(8) For the mouse, I'm switching from the Wireless Intellimouse Explorer 3.0, which is also made by Microsoft, to the Laser 6000 mouse included.  This new mouse is more comfortable. (not a huge difference, but noticeable.)  It is also lighter, and slides around with little effort.What I don't like:(1) The lock key above the number pad is set by default to display the same two options as when you click 'Start' then 'Log off Windows.'  I would have liked the option to change the key to the Shut Down / Hibernate dialog instead.  I haven't found that option available, so far.(2) The keyboard is a little bit wider than others, but I don't find it to be a problem.  It's just different.  Having the additional programmable buttons outweighs the downside of having the extra width.Five Stars
Great Item. Excellent hardrive. Wouldn't choose another brand. Not bad size for 400 gig. Great price. Love Amazon
works as advertised - very happy with this product. I am a professional composer/musician and needed something to provide an interface between my ibook g4 running garageband 3 and my old ensoniq sq1.  it works perfectly and i've been very please with this product
Works perfectly!. I've had this card for about 1 1/2 years now and it has performed flawlessly. It has seen thousands of photos (no exaggeration!) on my digital camera and now holds data/mp3s for my palm too. Did you know you can pop your SD card out of a camera and into a palm to view photos? I just learned this. Anyway it's a nice product and I'm about to get another SimpleTech with 512 megs or higher if they have one. If you are new to SD memory, always get more storage than you need because eventually you'll buy something that will use one (camera, handhelds, cell phones, etc. -- note that many cell phones use a smaller "MiniSD")
Reception to the Max!. I bought an HDTV in December and have been getting by pretty well with my RCA antenna which was 30 bucks, but I'm now adding Dish Network HD and decided to get another antenna so I could watch HDTV while I'm recording HDTV thus requiring 2 sources.  This antenna blows my other one away.  My TV has a bar indicator (sorta like a cell phone) and I typically got half the possible bars, but with this antenna, all my bars are maxed out when pointing it towards those towers.  Even the towers in the opposite direction are giving me half the bars now.  I no longer have to fiddle with or adjust the antenna to tweak reception, it's just all channels all the time.  I highly recommend this one, be sure to turn on the amplifier!  The only complaint would be how it looks but free HDTV has a small price to pay there
No more wires and clean sound on my Delphi Myfi. I had this FM direct adapter along with a Arkon SR88s 15" Flexible Gooseneck Steel Mounting Pedestal installed in my car at the local Best Buy.To give you an idea how well this FM direct adapter works for me I can tell you there are no empty radio channels here where I live. There is some sort of station signal or noise coming through on all of the channels that the Myfi is able to transmit on. With this adapter the sound is coming in nice and clear. It overrides the noise and injects the XM signal right into the antennae jack of the car radio giving a very clean XM signal. It's working great for me.Best Buy did not have the goosneck adapter so I bought one online and had them install the goosneck, the fm direct adapter, antennae and they hot wired it all. There are no wires visible anywhere and the gooseneck positions the radio right where I want it. The Myfi is set up to automatically shut on or off with the car ignition. I am loving my Myfi, XM and this set up in my car. It's a nice clean installation without any wires hanging around and sounds great.
Works perfect with my nikon camera. I was looking around for a new card for my wife and this one fit the bill. It works and I don't see any lag in the write times so, for the money it was good buy. I do like having 2GB, it sure strores a lot of photos. Don't waste your money buying the top end card, save it and buy one like this
nike + ipod sports kit. i like this product a lot.  its a great way to track all of your workouts, and the online journal is pretty cool.  the only thing that is negative about it is that it is not calibrated right off the bat (at least for me) but it easy to jump on a tred mill and set it to your own run style.
I've not used it yet but its a good idea to STAY PROTECTED. I like to purchase service or replacement contracts on all my electronics needs, just set back and relax....YOUR COVERED.
Ultimate Ears Metro.fi 2 Earphones. I just received my Metro.fi2 headphones through Amazon.com this morning and I'm very impressed with these headphones right out the box. I also own a pair of Ultimate Ears Super.fi5EB's and a pair of Sennheiser CX300's to which the Metro.fi's sound falls somewhere in between. The bass very deep and powerfull, tighter and more detailed than the CX300, but not that "make you wanna' smack your momma" kind of bass found in the super.fi5EB's. The midrange is somewhat distant, but can be boosted with ipod presets. The highs are very apparent and not as overpowerd by bass as the Super.fi5EB's nor as tinny as the CX300's. The chord is just the right legth for a tall person such as myself, and thicker than the chord supplied the CX300. I would recommend these headphones for listening to House, Hip Hop, Techno and Reggea
Great value. These are great little microphones -- excellent for an environment where they might get lost, taken, or ruined (like school)
Works Great. Had some problems getting it working at first. However, tech support was very helpful. Don't use the default "auto" for channel. Pick a specific channel. Much better performance and range than my previous solution
Does what it's supposed to do... No problems...  seems to work great.  They don't look fancy but they get the job done
Jake. Excellent product.  Easy setup.  The on screen setup is easy to follow, especially the balance of the speakers.  Works great with DirecTV HD receiver and Sony plasma TV
Non-standard headset jack. The headset jack which other reviewers say is broken ornon-functional is in fact a non-standard 4 connector jack (mostheadset jacks are 3 connector, one for earphone sound, one for micinput, and one for ground).Some mobile phones have stereo sound for MP3 playback, and use a 4connector jack, but Skype is not a stereo service. There is nodocumentation from Linksys on what the pinout of that 4 connector jackis.If you use an adapter cable such as the PPC Techs XDA/SX56 2.5mm STDMono Headset Adaptor, it allows you to use a standard headset with theWIP320.MobilePlanet sells that adapter, I have tested it today, and itfinally allows me to use a standard Plantronics headset with myWIP320
It is a good printer. I am really tired of bubblejet printer due to the ink drought very fast, So I choose the laser printer this time. All the functionality are working fine.Hope this time I can get ink power last longer than HP/Epson bubble jet printer
Thumbs up. Item was as advertized & delivered timely, plus was less expensive than from Apple.  Would use this vendor again
excellent. the cable works like it should and its at a great price. not much else to say about it
THIS is how a clock-radio should be. I bought this primarily as an alarm-clock-radio, so sound quality was not my main concern. So why did I shell out a hundred bucks for an alarm clock?- It has a proper user interface! To set the alarm I press one button and turn one knob (has acceleration) to choose the time. Period!- When it wakes me in the morning and I don't feel like getting up, which seems to be most of the time, snooze is ten minutes, much better than the usual 7, and pressing snooze multiple times adds 5 minutes per press so I can really sleep in!- The sound quality is excellent. I hesitated before buying because many reviewers complained about too-heavy bass, or bass distorting male voices. It sounds alright to me. If you do find the bass too strong plugging the bass reflex hole on the back reduces bass noticeably.- The display has just the right brightness on the lower setting. Viewing angles are excellent.- Auxiliary input is good to have in case I need it one day.- Dual alarms useful for couples or if you need waking from your afternoon nap.- Charcoal colour has a nice sober and quality look. I find the more popular platinum model looks cheap and plastic-y.- Rarely used buttons are hidden under a flap.- No battery required for battery backup, but see major flaw below...Downsides:- In case of power failure an internal battery keeps the time and your settings, BUT THE ALARM WILL NOT SOUND. Can you say "missed flight"? NOT GOOD.- High price.- The snooze button should be larger and placed closer to the front.- Large size.This is definitely a 5-star product, but the battery backup flaw forces me to give only four
worth trying. despite misgivings concerning several reviews on the hk cd changer i bought it in an attempt to gain better remote compatability with my other hk equipment.  hk has the rare feature that allows you to hardwire daisy chain the remote control function of your hk equipment to each other.  the changer sounds great... much better than the sony changer it replaced.  i have it connected both digitally and analog.  the analog has more depth while the digital is more crisp.  no mechanism issues.  it does make a lot of mechanical noise and the microchips seem busy doing something.  but if you wait everything seems to work smoothly.  wife likes the way it looks so much so i went ahead a got the matching dvd player.  my system works as easily as theatre in a box but with the sound quality of component
Great Scanner. Organized my business cards (over 800) in one morning.  Some verification is necessary from odd cards but otherwise it was a breeze
Surprised what a difference this makes.  Much more pleasant working on laptop. I bought this laptop stand when I found out that my laptop could drive dual screens so I could have different items on the two screens and drag stuff between them.  So now I have the center of the screens at the same height, side-by-side.  It is really nice to have twice the screen real-estate.I figured that mostly I would put background stuff on the laptop screen (like email) and use my big hi-resolution screen for what I was activly working on.  But, now that the laptop screen is up at eye level, I tend to use it just as often as the big monitor!  It turns out that my dislike of the laptop screen had more to do with having to look down at it, even though I was not aware of that until I got it raised.
Works fine. I personally don't see any problem with this product. It is easy to put in a new cartrige and to take on out. However the cartridges do seem a little expensive, but they last pretty long. I've never had one jam yet either
Panasonic DMR-ES45VS. I am 58 years old and am still looking for knobs instead of buttons....I gave this unit a four star because I have only had it for two weeks...I was a little reluctant at first because I read some of the negative reviews before I bought it......but so far I am very pleased with mine....I have played several DVDs and several VHS tapes and even did some recording from VHS to DVD....was real easy to do too.....the HDMI cable is well worth the extra money too...because I got rid of all of those ugly and dusty cables back there....before buying be sure your TV has the HDMI capability....mine does have it...and I love my new Panasonic TH-42PX600U Plasma...I played a very old VHS tape and the upconverting must work good because the picture was great....even though mine works very good so far...I am still thinking about those negative reviews that I read....so you make the call....I am glad that I bought mine....
Worked fine for me with my TI-86. They say it won't work with the TI-86, but it worked fine for me. Was able to access and download/upload files to my calculator no problemo.
T-amp - increadible sound. Great sound form small box.Nice platform for tweaking.Good power needed
Makes ripping old media simple. The USB Hookup and the Line-In jack have made this a surprisingly easy task to rip from both LP's and Cassettes (thru my stereo).  Did not use the packaged software, but rather Roxio 9.Normally I don't use Roxio, but the automatic track-break detection works great on everything but Live recordings.  Have ripped 2 gigs of MP3's off my dad's old LP collection in about a week
awesome. I reaazlly have enjoyed the ear buds, they are very comfortable and the sound is amazing. I purchased 2 pairs one was a gift for a friend
Does what it needs to do... I have only used this a couple of times but it has worked well and is fater than downloading pictures from the camera.
Archos 604 - 30GB Rocks!. Very slick, easy to use and a great way to squash a long plane flight! I started off listening to my down loaded music, switched to a recorded TV show from the night before (Glen Beck) and then onto a movie I down loaded. I soon heard the pilot say we were landing. As we taxied to the our gate I was explaining to the couple next to me about it and had fun sharing some stored photos. Clear screen, great sound, but I suggest buying better head phones to enhance the quality. Over all a great investmest. 5 Stars *****
Cost Specialist. We really loved the item.  The size of the Flash drive is perfect!  We have a tight spot to insert the driver and this item fits perfect
Best yet... I've shaved with electric razors for many years. I had Brauns before the 360. I've never had a closer, smoother shave from an electric razor. I don't see how they could improve on this one
Well-designed. These headphones, while simple, possess all the features that I could ask for.  The ear-clips are firm enough to hold your ear but not so tight that they pinch or become uncomfortable; the in-line volume control is one of those features I feel every set of headphones should have.  The sound is clear and should be loud enough to satisfy all but the most demanding (or deaf) of listeners.  The headphone cord is quite long, perhaps a bit too long, but given that one can bind it into a more reasonable length with a twist-tie I don't think of that as much of an issue.  All in all it's well worth the reasonable price
The Very Best For the Money !!!. If you have or are buying a big screen this is a must. This will make the most of your viewing. I plan on getting an other big screen in July. This is a must on my list
Very Durable!!. The reason I picked this one out of all the other cases was because where the laptop sat was in a zipped up compartment.  I also really like how the laptop is strapped down tight inside (a Velcro safety strap to fit to the size of your laptop).  There are A LOT of little pockets for all the other things to bring along.  I have a bluetooth mouse, and my battery cords that I bring along and it doesn't add bulk at all.  It fits my 17" Dell Inspiron laptop perfectly with even a tiny space left.  This is a good product if you travel a lot with your laptop and you want it safe.  But if your looking for a case that is lightweight, then don't look at this one.  It's not that heavy, but it's not the lightest of the cases...I rated this item 5 stars because I think it's a really good product.
Excellent product at a great price!. Well, memory sticks are always been expensive ever since. Only Amazon can give you an unbeatable price for this amazing product
Good box, does the job. I'm pleased with this.  Not being a "high-tech" type, we still had several devices that competed for one A/V input.  Instead of cable swapping, we click the remote and go from DVD to Tivo.  The "Blue ray" group may not be impressed, but this box does the job quite well
Superior quality and performance. The CS70 is an excellent product, easy to setup and use and good battery life
Has worked great for two years +. I've had this for over two years now and it has worked great and done everything as promised.  I run and cycle with this daily and it has never let me down.  I like the simple drag and drop file management which was straight forward to use.  The earphones are great too and have only just broken.Cons:  the provided plastic cover is held onto the armband with press studs.  This fits poorly and falls off if you try to use it with the armband.   Solution- buy the optional $10 silicone case and it stays on fine with the added benefit of allowing you to slide an extra battery doen the side of the case ready.  This works well if you use rechargable batteries.I'm thinking of buying another model in case this onme ever breaks, but after hundreds and hundreds of hours witout problem there seems to be no need.
Cute little radio. My wife and I like to listen to AM talk radio and some FM as well, in the evenings. We are spending a lot of time at her dad's house doing some renovations on weekends. I got frustrated with the hassle of unplugging the hard to reach charger on the bedside radio and sometimes forgetting to bring the radio so I started shopping for a radio I could keep in the backpack. I wanted AM/FM and an alarm and a good brand. I like to buy things from people that have been making things for a long time, they tend to get more things right. I did not spend a lot of time on research and somehow I settled on the Grundig G1000A, I think it was the familiarity with the brand name, the shortwave capabilities and availability at a local Radio Shack store that made the decision for me. I really like the little thing. I am a long time licensed Amateur Radio Op and Electrical Engineer and I found nothing to make me unhappy with the radio. Scanning a shortwave band with the manual tuning knob is actually faster/easier/better than with the pushbutton scan feature on my Radio Shack DX 395 bedside radio. Sensitivity on the shortwave bands is just a tad less than the DX 395. The audio is pretty good through the tiny speaker, and really good with the included ear buds. The radio came with batteries, I thought that was a nice touch. Battery life is quite good. The leatherette case is a very nice touch, I can put the radio in it, put the whole thing in the box and put it all in the backpack and not worry about throwing the backpack around. The little radio is a good looking thing and that is something I appreciate. The Black on Silver motif is easy on the eye. Some of the lettering on the front panel is on the top of some plastic and it appears to "float" and produces a "3D" effect that is just nice. I can not express how I feel about stuff from Japan with black lettering on black plastic!! How stupid can a designer be?? This little radio gets an "A" for design all the way around, the tuning knob being on the opposite side of the volume knob makes the unit very easy to tune and adjust the volume and you can operate the band switch with your thumb at the same time. The frequency tends to drift a little bit, all analog tune radios have that problem, this is not severe at all, mine always drifts downward on the AM band so I tune a little above the frequency and can listen for hours without having to worry about it. You have to get the idea that you fine tune the radio with your ear, not by looking at the frequency display, small changes in freq. can be tuned with no change in the display since the display is really an add on.I give this radio a "5" not on any technical matter but on the design and the fun factor. I have some fun with it listening to Shortwave and it works perfectly for the main reasons I bought it. Kudos to Grundig
great deal. these headphones are (in my experience) probably the best buy if you want good quality and will only settle for new. they are great for loud or soft sounds, excellent quality no matter what is necessary.i think the only downside is that they lack any sort of foldability, which doesn't detract from the fact that they are a wonderful purchase and will keep you happy whether you only play games or listen to any music (great lows and highs)
Decent. I got these because my roommate had them and they're cool.  They're a little tight, but my head's small enough.  There's another Amazon page for this identical item, so I don't know why there are two pages.  I bought from here because it was cheaper.I read a review that complained these headphones didn't have Koss's crisp, trademark sound.  I had a pair of Koss headphones before these and I honestly do notice a difference
Great Value!. I love this DVD player.  A huge step up from my old one, which was not a progressive scan.  I didn't have too difficult of a time getting used to the controller, which is always a pain when you get a new system.  And the on-screen features are fun.  I like the ability to adjust the position of the subtitles.  I watch movies a lot with them on and it's just nice to have some more freedom with that.Overall, this DVD player isn't the absolute "Best" DVD player out there, but if you're looking for a high quality player for a low budget price, this is definitely the perfect item.
Great. This case is perfect for the MacBook Pro, your investment will be well protected, If you have trouble fitting your charger, you will find a pouch that will go on the outside of case [...]I strongly recommend this case if you only want to carry your laptop because you will not have space for much more
A must have for using multiple sources, not worth it for HD alone. Don't buy the Sling HD connect cable - more accurately referred to as a component video adapter - if you're eager to get your Slingbox Pro broadcasting HD quality, since it won't do that.  Instead, buy it if you want to connect multiple sources to your Slingbox, since the 4-way IR blaster that's included means you can actually take advantage of the full input capability of the Pro.  I take a star off on both how this has been mismarketed and how it should have been included with the Pro, but it's a must have if you're going to truly take advantage of the Pro's capabilities.The Slingbox is a really neat toy, but they've done a semi-unethical job positioning the Pro and this adapter as HD "compatible" in an attempt to catch on to the HD upgrade wave.  Some of it isn't their fault, as bandwidth is a huge issue.  Think of it this way: compressed high definition video in 1080i runs somewhere in the 8-10 GB/hour range, with  uncompressed video directly from over-the-air stations running quite a bit higher.  Even the fastest current cable modems - let alone DSL - would have problems keeping up with that, and with uploading generally limited to 1/10th that speed to prevent you from running a file server, it's a moot issue, which is why the Slingbox limits remote uploads to 320x240.  And while you can get closer to the required speed on a LAN and the Pro transmits 640x480 video over it, it'd probably take $600 more of hardware for the Slingbox to process a 1080i stream - and while Slingbox is neat, it's certainly not $1000 neat.So the Slingbox downrezzes any HD signal you send into it.  Whether or not connecting a HD component to this adapter results in improved output depends a whole lot on how well your DVR or TV already downrezzes to 480i, which also makes sense: an expensive piece of hardware like that generally has better electronics to do so.  Generally, the best reason to buy this for the HD input capability alone is if you have an oddball HD source, like my DVHS VCR which doesn't display menus in certain resolutions.  Otherwise, it's a crapshoot as to whether or not you'll get improved video even within your LAN.  (Outside of it you probably won't notice the difference much either way.)  And by the way, even though the port looks like it accepts an HDMI input, the adapter only accepts component video inputs - although at least it includes a set of component video cables so you can pass through the signal if you need to without spending any more than you already have.The reason you buy this, though, is that the Pro is very good at streaming 4 separate devices - but while you can connect 3 devices without this item, you can only control 2 with the IR blaster that comes with the Pro.  I spent a while trying to figure out a workaround for this, looking into such things as 3/32" Y cable splitters connecting to 1/8" plugs and looking into finding another brand of IR blasters since Sling won't sell you a second one.  Then I hit my head against the wall once I realized this includes a 4-prong IR blaster.  Basically, buy this cable set if you plan on taking full advantage of the Pro's capabilities to remotely control more than 2 devices - or get a headache.No real excuse for Sling Media not to include this with the Pro and not to explain it to the consumer properly, but such is life
Response to review about will not run on DC power. This product works perfect...and was a great price especially with the rebate....To the person with the problem making the unit run on DC power....you had it plugged into the wrong jack on the back...NOT the middle jack...Plug DC cord into jack labeled DC....and then it will run fine on household current and not eat your batteries
This is a great machine!. I've only had this machine for a few days. It took me about 1/2 an hour to figure it out. I've cleaned about 10 CD's and repaired about 10 CD's. I also repaired a PS2 game. It works very well. I tried to repair some Badly damaged CD's with mixed results. It restored one to where I could play 7 out of 8 songs. The other one I restored 6 out of 10 songs. These wouldn't play at all before that and were very old and extremely damaged. I love this machine and I plan to go through my whole collection of CD's, DVD's, and video games to clean and fix as much as possible. I have over 1000 all together so I better get to work...Buy this machine, It's Great!!
Verbatim DVD+R x16. I have used many brands of discs & these have less failure rates & burn clearly - Highly reccommend the
Good Sound Quality. I was surprised by the cost and the size, but the sound quality is pretty decent for these speakers
Tablets are cool. This is great for anyone interested in digital visual art of any form, whether it be photography or comic making.  Tablet styluses are easier to control compared to a regular comoputer mouse.  It has more abilities than a DS touchpen since this tablet computer can do what an average mouse can do, including moving, clicking, double clicking, scrolling, and so on and so forth, AND it can easily make thick lines, thin lines, line that gradually change shape and size, and erase those complicated lines too.  You can draw with it like you would with a charcoal pencil or a watercolor brush.  I recommend this to all people who art, professionally or just for fun
Good works perfect!. This product work perfect!Thaddeus J. PorrasPanama Rep. of Panam
Great purchase. I bought the boom box and the car kit. The FM Modulator has a much better reception than when I have it in the boom box at home.  Unlike others, I have perfect reception with the wrieless modulator..at least for now.  I'm going ahead and buying the home aentenna to get a better reception for when I use the boombox at home.All in all, Great buy and I can't wait for STERN
The Jam Studio is underrated. I'm a computer artist and use the jam studio a bunch. Yes there are driver issues. If you tinker with it some you're fine. The software bundle is useless, but it works with any application. I've tried most tablets, a lot of them make me feel like I'm etching glass. The jam studio has a more natural (not to mention perfect size!) drawing surface than the rest. I even like the corded pen. I don't have to go far when it gets dropped. More pressure levels would be nice but not a must. Hey at this price I would buy two. It's a shame the company went under, this product got written off rather quickly...it's too bad
Great for the noisy office. I got these because of construction going on at my office. I didn't have the budget to buy the big boys, or even the need--just wanted something to help drown out the buzz. I've used them on airplanes as well and they're a big step up from standard headphones in both environments--just enough noise reduction to improve my attitude and retain my sanity at the end of the day. Comfort is decent for us low-budget types. Sound quality is as good as standard foam on-ear headphones--not fabulous--but for the features at the price (I paid about $35) I'm very happy
Excellent har ddrive with blazing speed. I built computers as a side-business and I have owned HD's from all the maor companies. So, I know what a good hard drive has. This one is superb. The speed is astoundidng due to the sata 300 and the 16mb cache, reliability is excelelnt and its whisper silent. Definitely reccomen
easy easy easy. This disc player is great. It is easy to install and has a great sound. I really like the random feature. I never know if Frank Zappa or Frank Sinatra will play next. I recommend it.
A Must Have for the iRiver. I bought this arm band after trying to use the one that came with my iRiver, and it is soo much better.   I wear the armband at it's smallest and I'm about a size 8, so it would be big on someone smaller.  Although a lot of time I just use the clip on the case without the armband.  It's a must have if you're active at all with your iRiver
IPOD  AC/DC Charger/Adaptor. Functionally, this works fine.  Compact design, AC plug folds in for a smooth case, easy to pack, hard to damage, and since there is no cord associated with the input to the AC outlet, there is one less thing to lose or damage. There is a USB cord from the unit to the IPOD, but that is it. A little more expensive, since it has an Apple logo associated with it, but it works
A must for the best home theater sound!. Accept no other!  Monster cable has the best cables money can buy!  Price might be more than other cables, but worth every penny!  These cables ensure perfect sound reproduction from the source to target and keep out  interference from other componets.  A must buy for DVD players
cd player. I am happy with the purchase of this cd player. It is a good simple cd player that I expect hours of listening to in my home gym.
Keeps my key PC from suffering hard shutdowns. At my house, during rain storms, there will often be a quick flash of the lights as a branch somewhere falls on the power lines.  That type of event would always cause my PC to turn off, and I could loose quite a bit of work or even problems on the hard drive.  This little device has keept that from happening for some time.  I am very pleased.  The battery that is in it does not keep the best "time" estimates for battery life, but knowing that the short spikes or loss of power will not cause me issues makes it worth the price
It's Worth the Money!. I got this player a month ago and have been enjoying it very much.  The picture and sound quality of this player is great! Complaints about the slow boot-up seems exaggeration to me.  The player boot-ups pretty fast (less than a minute).  I would give the picture quality of this player a 10 and that of the Sony Blu-ray, which I also own, an 8.  If you have a full-HD TV (1080p), this player is worth the money for home entertainment
Amazing. Well, first off, let me say overall I am extremely pleased with these headphones, as they are a great deal at this price. The quality of the sound, both via the speakers and the boom mic are excellent. The entire set is comfortable and you wont even notice you're wearing it after just a few minutes. The in line control is a helpful touch. This product is what I've come to expect from Plantronics. I own some of their quality headsets for my Xbox, and their PC versions are just as great. The only gripe I have is that the mic only works in one way (over your left ear) but thats not anything major
really nice!. the color is a nice bright pink, so hopefully this is what you want. The mouse is kind of small, which is nice if you have small girl hands. It lights up and is really cute.
great value. Bought this for my seven year old.  It is simple to use and he can load songs easily without help.  The controls are easy to use and the sound is reasonable.  For the price, I would not hesitate recommending it to all
Great Radio. I had this radio in my car and worked great. It is a Clear talker ... but remeber , to recieve and transmit well you must have a good antenna. A good radio is useless without a good antenna
IPod to Go!. I originally bought the CDA-9856 and exchanged it for this CDA-9857 model. Why? I have a 30 Gig IPod and it's difficult to dial through all of my 100's of albums/artists/playlists, let alone songs, with the slow rotary dial while I'm driving. The 9857's "Percentage Search" skip ahead feature makes selecting/playing music from the IPod a real pleasure. The 9856 doesn't have this feature. Also when searching albums, the 9857 displays 3 albums at a time, whereas the 9856 only displays 1. Both head units, however, only display 13 characters of the album/song title. This makes it very difficult to select the correct album if you have several with the same name for the first 13 characters, or perhaps multiple discs of the same album, but easier with the 9857 because it shows 3 albums at once. The 9857 is also a digital display, rather than analog as with the 9856, and the digital interface really speeds up the menu item selection and seems to make the IPod interface more "stable" (I had a problem with the MIX feature alternately refusing to turn on and then randomly turning on by itself with the 9856). Is it worth the extra $100? Well, I plan on keeping this car and this head unit for 5-8 years, so the ease of use that the 9857 offers makes listening to my IPod a pleasure that I'll enjoy for years to come, and to me that's worth the extra money. This is a darn good unit.
It really works! 100% clear digital signals! You will LOVE IT!. I do live somewhat close to L.A Calif but I did not expect to get the signal and quality i'd get from buying this. I gave up on TV all together because I refuse to paid $60+ a month for satellite or Cable. Sure satellite is cheaper but then you need a phone line. $20 more a month right there. I use cell phones so no use for a phone line in house. I will first off say that DO NOT BUY if you dont have a Digital TV. These are satellite DIGITAL signals you are picking up, not regular analog channels. But if you do, you will think you have a satellite dish sitting outside your house. I get all 2-13 channels in pure 100% digital quality and i'd say 20+ other channels in 100% digital from history, cartoons, cooking, movie. Now I pay NOTHING per month. I had mine on top of the TV but figured it would work even better on my covered patio.. I was right. Just a stronger signal. If you have a place outside, get the outdoor version. But this one still works outside if you want to save money. Just stick it in a milk crate like I did so the wind doesnt move it. Hey, cheap and FREE per month! Tell the cable and satellite companies to take a hike to put it nicely
Works Great. This Casio isn't as full featured as the big boys, for sure. But for down and dirty text only labeling on my DVD's it works great! Let's face it, most of the time you are burning only a couple of discs and need the most basic of labels on the them. Why waste 1000's on a more complex automated 4 color thermal when it's not necessary? Why waste hours and over time 100's of dollars or more on inkjet?This Casio is great for the smaller jobs that require something clean in presentation. Bye Bye Stickie Labels
Excellent Bluetooth Receiver!. While certainly not a cheap unit, this device is worth every cent. It basically has all the high-end features you expect in a Premier deck, but it also has Bluetooth! So I won't bother talking much about the awesome sound quality, great color LCD that is very easy to read in ANY lighting condition, or the many extra audio features. :)Since Bluetooth is of course the feature that sold me on the unit, let's talk more about that. (If you want more info on non-Bluetooth stuff, check out the P7800MP).I have it paired with my Sprint PPC-6700 PDA phone (latest firmware), and it works great. First thing to note that is your BT phone may not support all the features available. For example, the signal meter, battery level, and phone book transfer don't seem to be supported with my model. Also keep in mind that the manual does indicate that almost all of the "extra" Bluetooth features may or may not work on your particular phone. This is typically the result of your phone not supporting all the bluetooth "protocols" it uses.The PDA paired up just fine, and once "registered," the P9800BT will remember your phone. It also has an "Auto Connect" feature, that when enabled, will always look for your phone and happily connect to it when it's in range (typically within about 10-20ft).So here is what happens when you get a call:1. The phone rings through your stereo (you can pick a few built-in ringers) and the music is muted for you.2. Caller ID is displayed on the bright/clear LCD (phone number only - unless you programmed or transferred a phone book)3. You press the handy "Multi-Function" button to answer your call (there is an "auto-answer" feature available) and you are Live with your caller.4. When the call is over, you may hang up yourself, or wait for the caller to hang-up.5. Then the music starts playing where it left off.My friends still can't get over how cool that is. :) But what if you want to make a phone call? You've got a few more options!1. Dial the number on the remote.2. Use the built-in phonebook (if you transferred or created one yourself) to pick the number to dial.3. Use call history to dial a previous number4. Or the way I prefer - use voice recognition! I simply press the Telephone button and then hold down the "Band" button. Then using the voice recognition already programmed in my PPC-6700, say the caller's name, and it dials for you.So if you've used a hands-free ear-piece with your BT phone, it's rather similar.This unit is installed in a 2000 Z71 Tahoe with exhaust and big all-terrain tires. So this isn't exactly a "quiet" environment. Which is why I've been very pleased with the call quality. No static, no echo, and both myself and caller can hear each other just fine. If there is an echo, it is because I have the volume turned WAY up (and only the caller hears the echo.) The mic is mounted on the sun visor, but can be mounted anywhere that works in your vehicle (dash, steering column, etc).And to wrap things up, here are a few pro's/con's regarding the unit as a whole.Pros:- Has all the awesome features of a loaded pioneer head-unit (WAY too many to list here, check out the online manual)- Excellent sound quality with any source (Thanks to 24-bit D/A converter and DSP w/ 16-band EQ)- Mini-Jack (1/8") stereo connection on back of receiver (in addition to the typical pioneer proprietary connection for auxiliary sources).- Impressive color LCD that can be easily read at night or in direct sun-light- Bluetooth works surprisingly well... and reliable!- Auto connection feature for Bluetooth phones- Included mic works great- Rather cheap considering all the features you get (about $400 at time of review).Cons:- Won't work with a typical GM/Pioneer wiring harness (must be hard wired)- Doesn't work with some of the "minor" extra Bluetooth features on my phone (probably my phones fault there).- The new "Multi-Function" button takes some getting used to.- There have been a few rare instances where BT wouldn't automatically pair up with my PDA. Could be the PDA and/or receiver though.- People will think you are crazy talking to yourself while driving.Overall, *most* of the initial setup is straight forward - just keep the manual handy for the BT stuff. :) I've tried many other "portable" hands-free units; none worked nearly as well as this one. So if you've got BT and want hands-free, I highly recommend this unit!
First impressions. I have only had this for 4 weeks, so I have not tried out all of the possible combinations, but so far it meets all of my expectations and it lives up to the other reviews that I read on it before purchasing.  This is my first true A/V receiver; I had an older Onkyo Amplifier that provided good service over 15 years.  I also upgraded my speakers from 2 positions to 5 with front L/R, rear L/R and a center speaker.  I had Fluance SV-10's with the Onkyo and added an AV-SC and two AV-BP2 speakers.  The room is small enough that I do not need a subwoofer.  The VSX-1016 can be configured to route the low frequencies to the two main speakers and you can choose to bi-amp those speakers if you do not want to use the 2nd Zone feature.  The sound is phenomenal.  I have not made the jump to a large flat screen yet, so I cannot evaluate the HDMI connections yet or any of the HD performance.  CD and DVD performance is very good.  After I have used it more, I will submit an update.  Based on the performance for value I would recommend this to others
Excellent Laser Pointer. This laser pointer is a high quality, sturdy laser pointer. It is very bright and you can even see the green path of the laser going through the air at night. I had absolutely no problems with either the seller or the laser pointer. Thanks
I love this player!. For those of you who bought MiniDisc recorders to move away from analog tape recording, this product is wonderful.  Especially good for recording lectures, voice lessons, etc.  It works quite well with the built-in mono mike, or you could use an external one.One of the few players that lets you record from a line input or an external mike -- you toggle which setting it is in the settings section.I record my radio shows by plugging in the line-out from the station's tape deck to my iRiver.For those who recorded live music with their MiniDiscs, it's a little trickier.  You have to set the record input before -- you can't change it on the fly.I've recorded live DJ shows with the built-in and AGC on.  Of course, the booming bass distorts horribly, but overall an easy record of the show.  Very easy to keep in a pocket rather than to be obviously recording a show.I've also tried external mikes with the record input turned down very low with very good results.  A bit of trial and error which I'm still refining with later iRiver products.The single AA batter lasts a good long time.  Summer School involves 2, 2-hour classes, and I can record several days of them before battery is low.  If the battery runs out during recording, fear not, the file is saved!The negatives are the requirement to go through the special iRiver music program, but there are now firmware updates that will change your iRiver into the typical USB external drag-and-drop drive.Files are recorded in a .REC file which one then converts to a .mp3 file after transfer to your computer.  I don't know how different this format is because it takes up exactly the same amout of space as the .mp3 file.  But you can't trasnfer .mp3 files off your iRiver, even if you made them yourself, so don't think you can use this to transfer .mp3 files from one computer to another.Also, the molding where the line-in input is sometimes gets in the way of certain plugs such as some RCA to 1/8" adaptors, so make sure you pick one that alows it to fit in securely all the way.I've had mine for just over a year now and use it every day, whether just playing mp3s or recording classes.  I'm only just starting to have some trouble with the on/off/play/pause button.  After so many presses, it's starting to wear out.  But it's still working reliably.  I just have to press a little more precisely and pay more attention.I have the 1G model (iFP-799) which is great.  I was able to record a 12-hour radio show marathon I produced with it.  Previous marathons required a stack of cassette tapes or minidiscs.I'm quite happy with iRiver and plan on buying from them in the future
Just what it says. This is a great card adapter. The user who thought it would convert an xD card to a Compact Flash was misinformed and their rating should be held against this product. This card allows you to put your xD or SmartMedia memory card into your PCMCIA-equipped laptop to transfer pictures, etc. It works great and is highly recommended for the price. A rock-solid product in my opinion
Excellent hardware at excellent prices. I purchased an AMD Athalon 64 processor 3200+ Socket 939 from this person and was quite satisfied. It was sold at an exceptionally low price, arived in a timely manner and works perfectly
Pioneer - They Are Always The Best !!!. Got the product a few days after the payment had been done on the site.The installation process is very easy and quick. (Did it by myself.)I used to play CDs using Pioneer CD changer. Now I can use my iPod also in the car.This is a good value product. Driving the car is like being on a concert.It is easy for every day use. You can connect the iPod when you get in the car and disconnect it when you leave the car at parking lot and take the iPod with you. It takes seconds.Buy and enjoy the music on your iPod. It is much better than transferring the music from the iPod by other iPod radio transmitters
Great Deal here!. these are good DVD+R cheap too a they look like their double layers for burning each side works fine with my Burner great product
My Book Pro. Very easy installation. Could have been four stars for the power button not working reliably and the drive was becoming mysteriously unavailable in it's first weeks of use. Not an issue any more... may very well have been malicious content on my drive that has since been ushered out. All is working now. All photos videos music and lesser used files run from it, what a relief to clear up all that space
Works Great. Brought this product for my kid, ended up using it whenever I got time, feels nice and smooth, not disappointed at all
A Great Way to Expand Range. This equiptment does require a solid speaker/amp set up.  This will give you the capability to blow out cheaper speakers due to a lack of internal limiting circuitry.  Not a complaint at all though.The range on this thing is very good, also allows you to EQ recordings you make to CD, Tape or MP3 if desired.  Made the music sound much bigger and sharper.  Especially feeling my CD's were flat in sonic output.  If not desired, the bypass button will stop this effect with a single touch.Mine was built a year or so ago, sat around in it's box and yes, got "sticky" before it was sold.  I quickly resolved this by blowing dust with aerosol out while pushing the buttons in and out.  Not a problem since.Smooth operation that doesn't impart a "click" onto your recorded media when reproducing and fine tuning things live.  Plated plugs and a turntable ground wire in the rear all plusses aswell.  Quite pleased, gonna buy another
very good product, very good price. Well made:  well engineered and fabricated; heavy duty construction with a nice powder coat finish.  Adjustments are heavy duty and positive.  Best of all, the product delivers for a very good price.  No problems whatsoever mounting.  You may consider some sort of decorative buffer to protect the first pivot knuckle from bruising the wall if and when the screen is flattened out against it.  (You'll figure it out.
Just what I wanted!. This bag is just pefect! I purchased it for my Dell Inspiron 6400 and, although the fit was pretty snug, I am very pleased with the purchase. It is easy to carry and above everything else, is very stylish and professional.
Good for the price. These are just fine for what your going to pay for them. To get it a much better speaker your going to have to open up your wallet and pay a whole lot more. These are not high tech indoor sound systems. They are just outdoor patio speakers and they sound just fine for what they are meant for. The reviewer who couldnt hook them up hasnt ever hooked up speakers before because these were incredibly simple
A must for AirTunes. Item works great, however, dd the remote only works if its in line of sight of the receiver
Skullcandy- bang for your buck. Upper end audio quality in ear phones for cheap. I love being able to move and work without them falling out, the accompanying sleeves really work
painless installation, Vista x64 compatibility. I was having trouble finding a compatible print server.  This was the first that I found that works on XP, Vista, and Vista x64 with my Samsung ML-2510 monochrome laser printer.  This print server has the added benefit of having 4 more RJ-45 jacks in the back and isn't any more expensive than comparable print servers.  I am not using those plugs now, but perhaps some day they will come in handy day
Good Product. This is a good product. I didn't like the fact that it isn't found in stores, but what are you gonna do? I like the fact that it has 1 gigabyte of memory. People freak when I have so many songs on my cell phone. A memory card is a memory card, and this one, in terms of size and memory, is top of the line
My review. The item arrived quickly and was very simple to set up.  The TV mounted to it as it should and it works great.I recommend this product
True plug-and-play. I used Lexar Media Multi Card REader in my P2120 Fujitsu laptop via a USB 2 PC-Card adapter.  It's truly plug-and-play without any need of drivers in Windows XP
received product. came as promised & is working great.  Living in FL we needed this & now feel much safer
Sony CNE330. The 50 hour battery life of this portable CD player is only one of it's many features.  I love mine and use it daily
Perfect mouse for traveling - 2 thumbs up!. This mouse has made traveling with my laptop so much easier. Even though I tend to be an avid user of the track-pad on my PowerBook it can become very tedious and making room for a large mouse has made packing tricky. Since purchasing this mouse I've had no problems and have increase my productivity while on the road. It has also made it easier for those non track-pad users to jump on to my computer without a problem.Although it took a few uses to adapt to the smaller size, I wouldn't trade it for any other mouse. The cord can adjust to any length and has never tangled. The software included to customize the mouse buttons, speed, etc. is easy to use and has allowed me to adapt the mouse to my specific style.Definitely a must have mouse
Working beautifully. We had a Linksys WRT54 for a couple of years and I thought that it was doing a nice job. Did some research about what could be a good replacement and found this. Never had heard of the company, but reviews were generally and consistently positive. Signal strength has improved tremendously. Easy set up for my Mac Powerbook. Need to be sure to use ethernet cable provided when setting up security. Very pleased with this router and I would recommend it to anyone.
Great Deal. Hardware was A breeze to install.took about 20 minuets including the bay.Same for the software, no problems.Sound Quality is much improved over my old live card.In battlefield 2 game play is much improved on my 2.4/radeon 9700 pro/512.Before I would freeze framing during start in rooms, and during game play in intense situations.Now with the X-Fi I have none of that, and the game runs much smoother overall. Dvd movies sound much improved. Music is also much improved. The only problem Ive  had burning expanded mp3's is 1 didnt convert well out of 5 so far. Software interface is also A bit lack luster, but is functional. Card is worth the price, hopefully upgrades will improve interface.
A great speed demon. This will greatly increase the speed of tranfer, from your i-paq to your  desktop PC. Just imagien tranfering the averge files in around eight  seconds. When partnered with the AC adapter this couple are cheaper than  the cradle and making it easy to bring on road trips. The i-paq is the only  handheld to be supported by Macs and the USB cable destroys the need to buy  and use a serial cable converter
Casual user -- 50 discs in 6 months --not one coffee-cup mat. Excellent / flawless -- works great on my PC's Sony burner. Highly recommend. No coasters yet
BUY THIS!. After over a dozen++ different types of headphones used over the years with casette, cd, even the PC when I want to feel the gunshot from an alian blast through my head. Now thses are not #1 in fidelity, but as for an all purpose set, these are the ones.  If your active, moving or working you cannot finde a better design for the ears. You could skydive with thses and, jam all the way down. Price vs. quality vs. design = 5 stars. Now if you want the boil your brains with alien laser fire you will need to go with something else, but for 90% of my listning, on the move or otherwise, I use thses. This is my second set ( for my chica) my first is blue
Functional, affordable. Does fine as a carrying case.  The seat suspension system works OK but is somewhat cumbersome to set up.  Worked fine for my 8 inch screen portable DVD player and would recommend it
Good player, but has it's bugs. The I bought the MZ-RH910 one year ago and so far it has been the most convenient player around. The player itself is well designed and the features are very welcomed, specially the line in recording, which makes good quality recordings. The problem is in the PC-Player interface. SonicStage sucks to be honest. The program crashes often during transfer and the transfer speed with conversion is slow (which could be the program, the player write speed or both). Also the player strangely does not recharge while connected, you have to press and hold the stop key so it'll go into recharge mode, so you can't listen to it while it is recharging. The battery life isn't great either, at most 4-6hrs, My old mini disc runs on regular AAs and it gives me well over 10hrs. Overall not a bad player, specially for recording. I have to admit sound quality even during compression is admirable. But bugs here and there make it cumbersome to use
Excellent. As a competitive SC gamer, this is the best mouse I've ever had. Nice simplistic design and astonishing smoothness and accuracy. The side buttons take a few days to adjust to, but now I find using them during web surfing almost 2nd nature
so far so good.. after getting this a few weeks ago, i have been wondering why i didn't get one a long time ago.  i've already backordered the newer version.  it is very convenient and so far trouble free
Excellent Bang for the Buck! - OSX. This scanner worked flawlessly out of the box with my new Intel Powerbook. It took only a couple of minutes to unpack it, take off the tape, unlock the transport lock on the bottom of the unit, polish the glass surface, plug in the USB cable to the computer and attach the power outlet.Installing the software was a simple insert the CD and respond to the screen prompts.Hint: After the software is installed and you run it the first time you will be asked at the bottom of the scan screen to identify (link) it with an "external program" - I would advice skipping the PhotoArc software installed by the CD and "link it" to your iPhoto application. Now when you make a scan it will be instantly installed in your iPhoto library. You can easily use the iPhoto tools to crop, clean, and organizae your photos.I have been using this with an OSX genealogy program (Reunion 9.03 and highly recommended).One limitation is that the negatives are for 35 mm only. If you have a lot of large negatives you will have to look at other options. However, the 35 mm negatives works alright but it is almost faster to scan just the photos.I have owned more expensive scanners but for $90 )including a free Amazon shipping promotion) makes this an excellent purchase.
Great Deal for the Price. I am no expert, but I am very happy with this purchase!  They work great, great fit and sound, perfect for me
Good Machine for the Money. I just received this machine and overall am very pleased with its performance.  It is quiet, can easily handle multiple sheets at a time, and has a large bin.  Its only negative is the bin is kind of flimsy.  But for a home office it will work just fine.
Exactly what I ordered. Other than the fact that it came with only a USB cable and earphones, it was brand new in the box and was just what I ordered.  It works great.  Just keep in mind you will probably need to spend another $100 dollars easy, on accessories.  I currently have roughly 1800 songs on the unit and have only used 10% of the space available.
Turn your iPod into a big screen movie player. Just great.  Easy to use and plugs into any TV.  The S-video quality is the same as TV quality and almost as good as DVD quality.  Download movies and TV shows from iTunes and play them on any TV.  Who needs a DVD player
This product rocks!. I bought this so I could get rid of all of the CDs in my truck and have my entire music selection with me.  My Armada has a Line In jack on the dashboard.  I bought a shielded 1 foot 3.5mm to 3.5 mm cable at Radio Shack.  The sound is fantastic.  No noise or hum at all.  I would highly recommend this to anyone
So easy a caveman can do it. Very easy to install, runs fast and quiet.  I highly recommend this drive.  Just make sure you have a USB 2.0 port available to get the full speed
Does the job. Works as advertized and holds at least 30 sheets.  Easy to use. Does not jam easil
Wireless Phone Jack. Great item for homes lacking phone jacks. Easy to set up.Better than trying to hard wire
Samsung 244T High Res. Monitor. I was looking for a larger high resolution Monitor, one that would let me use my ATI HDTV Wonder Tuner Card in my Pentium 4 computer, and see the local free HDTV stations programming in full HD format (1080i). Though a little pricey, this Monitor completely filled this requirement. The size is about as big as you can use when setting at a computer desk. The colors are so beautiful and natural (Set-up software excellent). Using it as a Computer Monitor and displaying my photos from my 5.1MP camera was such a surprise to see the fine detail in the scenery and close-ups. I just love to use it. Thanks,  Dick N
Great Reception. I bought this Antenna and we are 30-40miles from the TV transmitters. It gave great reception and we received all the channels possible! It was also the lowest  price we found. Installation was a snap. The profile looked better on my home than a boom antenna would.
Excellent. Good quality, good power to clean computers, i don't use it as a vaccum, pretty good product.
Great headphones with one small gripe. These headphones sound great, and they are really comfortable. The only gripe is that the neck band is not adjustable but that is only a small gripe.  I would definitely buy another pair of these if I needed them.  They are a lot better than the ones supplied with my MP3 playe
BUY!. I used this on a Panasonic DVP 5960 dvd player and HDTV. Picture quality is good, cable quality is good
Ok for the price. I picked up my pair at Fry's on sale for $80 a few years ago.  Initially they replaced my BSR (points if you rememba them) 10" woofer old school 30 pound furniture speakers because those old fellas finally gave up the ghost.  Missing the bass, I quickly got a polk subwoofer and it was a new world,  ABBA never sounded so good in life!  Then, of course I had to have surround, so these litle fellas were appropriately assigned rear surround duty, at which they soldjerly march on.  Not the best, not the worst, but adequate for a little 12X20 living room when paired with a subwoof, and pair of nice JBL Northridge in front.  However, when cranking up Boston one day one of the JBL tweeters blew while the Bose hung in there like a champ
Fully Satisfied. The transaction was easy and the response was immediate.  I received the product well within the time it was expected and I have been happy with the memory card since I received it.
Bike Mount for 201 Forerunner. The bike mount works great!  No problems with it of any kind
What's not to love?. This DVD player is gorgeous!  I use it with my Samsung 50" Widescreen HDTV.  I've been using Netflix, and sometimes the DVD's are scratched.  My old DVD player would just stop and refuse to play.  This DVD continues, crunching through the scratches until it can get to a part and play normally again.  And it was so easy to connect to my TV!  I can immediately tell the difference in audio/visual clarity.  The price is right for this DVD player.ALERT***ALERT***ALERT  This is not a player that plays HDTV DVD's.  It plays regular DVD's and makes them look better.
On the Contract. If you buy this service plan, print out the contract and keep your receipt. I did not purchase the plan, but looked over the contract intensely since I nearly got it.Some notes on the contract:1. It is only good in the United States (including Washington, DC, but MINUS MAINE), but it does not include Guam, Virgin Islands, etc. So if you are in another country or outside the 50 states + D.C., this contract will be nothing but a waste of money.2. This contract is transferable and the directions to do so are simple.3. They will only fix/replace/etc IF the manufacturing warranty no longer covers the item. That is, if the manu. warranty is still good, you have to use it.4. If the item needs to be shipped, shipping/handling will only be covered if the manufacturer would cover those costs in their warranty period. If the item is being replaced, "You will be responsible for the delivery or cost of delivery of the covered Product to Our authorized service center. Reimbursement will be issued in the form of a check payable to You." I'm uncertain if that means you cover those costs or they reimburse you.5. No lemon policy of 3 service repairs for the SAME defect, and a upon the time of a 4th repair, as determined by them, they will "replace it with a product of comparable performance. Repairs performed while the Product is under manufacturer's warranty DO NOT APPLY." (Doesn't sound like a great no lemon policy... your product would have to breakdown in the same way 4 times in the number of years they cover you -- many electronics are typically already covered by the manufacturer for 1 year.)6. There are numerous conditions that they will not repair for, but they all sound typical of such plans (such as, they don't cover accidents and they don't cover "the elements or acts of God" ... sorry, I had to note that second one since it stuck out to me from the other things). But, in all seriousness, read the list before you purchase.So, now that I have summarized much of the contract, if you want to get the service warranty, PLEASE READ THE CONTRACT SINCE I DIDN'T COVER EVERYTHING!!! (Don't hold me liable since I don't have much money anyways.) Also, I think this is typical in warranty contracts, but you will occassionally see the phrase "at our discretion" in the contract.Assuming they aren't jerks with their discretion and aren't too tough to deal with, I would give the warranty 4 stars (minus 1 star for the crappy lemon policy). I didn't get the coverage because the product I was going to get it for had just made into the next price category (so it was pricy for my product, being at the lower price end of the scale)
Great cooler!. This works great for my laptop, especially while gaming! I would start it when you sit down, rather then waiting for your laptop to get warm and then starting it. This is light. I can stick it in my bookbag and take it to school with my laptop and not notice extra weight. I would really recommend this to anyone looking for a great way to keep your laptop cool
Excelente televisor lcd. He estado disfrutando de este tv por alredeor de 5 dias, la imagen es muy buena, facil de instalar, lo unico que se deberia mejorar es el sonido.
Very good hardware, substandard software. This is a TV card I used to replace my aged Lifeview FlyVideo98FM card, so I could watch/record (Trinidad & Tobago) games from TV during the world cup in June '06.The TV quality is the best I ever seen from a TV card to date. Give that it is an ATI based card, this is really good stuff.Unfortunately, the software package has let me down. The card came Bundled with Cyberlink PowerCinema. In day to day usage of my computer, I like to have the FM Radio function on. With the old card and 3rd party FM Radio software, there was no issues at all... With this new card, I often can't even load a webpage without the music sticking and stuttering - this on a computer with 1GB RAM and 2 hard drives!I definitely blame the software for this. If the sticking becomes too much then the Radio stops altogether. I'm forced to close and re-open Power Cinema to listen to Radio again.TV is at least stable while doing other stuff, but you can't shrink Powercinema down to a 320x240 window. also there is a 2 second lag between TV and computer watching the same TV station. This never occured with the old card. Intervideo's WinDVR used with this card had no such issue.It's a pity I don't have XP Media Center Edition (XP Pro I have) to compare XP's Media Center software with Cyberlink's.. Somehow I think Media Center will perform better. WinDVR works better too, barring that the software currently has no sound support for the card.PowerCinema works, but it's not very intuitive. The software is written for the novice user with NO advanced options at all. When recording, you do not know exactly what quality you're using outside of "good", "better" or "best". You can't even change the default recording folder!I am sure that this occurs with other brands of Theatre 550 Pro cards, not just MSI's version.As a side note, the remote that comes with the card works well.In conclusion, It's a card worth getting if you can deal with PowerCinema's Issues, or find a better program to use with the card.
imagine that u play your favorite game without this keyboard. helloas i said this keyboard made my play a lot easier with the shortcute that it have on it and i can change the keys as i like from game to game but i hope they expande the coverage of the games that they have there keys it worth to try it
amazingly good for the price. I wasn't expecting much, to be honest, but when I plugged this into my usb on my work computer and listened, the sound was very good. Admittedly I cannot crank it really loud at my desk, but for office use, I can hear it clearly and someone else over the cubicle wall does not hear it at all.It folds up nicely and precisely, compact enough to fit in my lunchbox.Now, the downside is that it doesn't come with an ac adapter, even though it needs one if you don't have a usb port handy. The BIGGEST annoyance though is that even though it says ipod nano, and its the right color, there's no way it was designed for it. In order to plug in your nano it has to sit upside down in a slot 4 times bigger than it needs to be...so in other words, your nano is very loose. For sitting on my work desk, its no biggie, but if you were thinking it was going to look like the cool ad for it, it won't
Perfect for jogging. I clip to my shorts and I'm ready for my workout.  Great to not have to buy an armband holder
good price.  Just not sure it is needed. good price.  Just not sure it is needed
Blu-ray movie availability. If you are looking for an honest way to decide which player to buy, try this  Go to Netflix and look at the number of Blu-ray movies that are available.  You will have to click on the icon and open it to see what formats are available. It will tell you if it is available in DVD, Blu-ray, or HD-DVD.  So far I have found 2 movies in HD that are not Blue-ray, and of the 50+ movies in my Que that are Blu-ray maybe 3 or 4 of them are also available in   HD-DVD.
Great support, great product - no luck on Mac w/Canon 4200. As of Dec 06, I have owned this for about 8 months and I'm impressed with the product and with Buffalo's very strong 24x7 tech support. I did have one unit mysteriously fail after about 3 months, and was able to get a replacement under RMA without too much hassle (had to send in the dead one and wait for a replacement).Two Windows XP-based PCs use the LPV3 to share a Canon ip4200 without any problem whatsoever. However, we tried to connect a new OS X-based MacBook to LPV3 and failed even after calling Buffalo and Apple technical support. The MacBook can indeed see the print server, but I can't find any way to get it to recognize the 4200. I suspect this is a Canon printer driver issue, though, not a problem with Apple or with Buffalo.It looks like some reviewers had success on connecting Macs to the LPV3 when using Gutenprint driver support (a couple of reviewers here mention success with Gutenprint drivers for Epson 2200 and Canon ip4000), but the Gutenprint drivers do not support ip4200 at this point.Given the challenge getting the MacBook connected, I'm keeping my review to 4 stars on an otherwise 5 star product.By the way: thanks to Amazon for allowing users to share valuable source of information about interoperability and suggestions for making products work together.
Good 16 gauge speaker wire. I can verify again that this is indeed 16 gauge wire. This size works very well for small-medium satellite speakers. I am using this wire with a Samsung HT-Q80 HTIB. It's working wonderfully and I'm getting nice crisp sound. Unlike the other reviewer, my spool came fully intact. I would suggest this for anybody looking for good, cheaply priced 16 gauge speaker wire
Maxell DSR-1 Pro Disc Fixer. This is a nice machine. Not hard to use, with switching of cleaner disks. It does the job of cleaning and repairing subject problems. But if your disc drive can't read or write to the disc. It not because of the surface problem.
Panasonic Telephone Accessory Handsets. Great!!!!  Will definitely consider ordering other items on Amazaon.  Again, many thanks.  Very satisfied with my order
BELKIN XM Antenna Headphones Helix Pioneer Inno F5X002. I purchased the Samsung Helix XM radio for listening at home and also as a portable.  The antenna built into the radio is very directional and of course had to be carried high on the body for best reception.  The Belkin XM antenna headphones plugs directly into the radios docking connector. This allows the band between the earpieces to become the antenna and increases reception dramatically.  The radio can now be clipped to an inside pocket, belt or just hand carried and still have 5 bar reception.  The sound quality started out very good and became excellent as the speakers broke in.  The inline volume control is also very handy.I highly recommend this product for use with the Samsung Helix or Pioneer Inno radios.
A Great Value. We ordered the system for our granddaughter's ninth birthday.  We could not be more pleased with it.  The price was less than what we had expected to buy and the quality was excellent.Within minutes of opening her package, our granddaughter was able to hook up the system to her TV and was singing along with the music.  To say we are pleased with the system is an understatement
Roller Laptop Case. Wonderful case. The single telescoping handle is much better for me that the U handle type and the wheels are maybe the best I've seen
Not a general but worth the the five stars. Well worth the five stars I gave it, its a cannon dont have to say any thing more.Price is right.Shipped fast,right to my door.Dont have to say any thing moore
Nice camera. I bought this camera to check on my apt while I am working. So far I am quite satisfied with it. Setting up the remote internet access is a bit tricky, but - I guess- it is always like that with these gadgets. I have a "standard" wireless network at home (w/ a Gateway 2wire router).To do so, in brief, you have to open a new channel in your network firewall. This includes a port forwarding of the camera to a channel other than 80 (like 1024).I am also using a linksys software (sololink) to track the dynamic IP address of the camera on the web, but you can use other freeware softwares for that, as well.Pan/tilt function is great, color is OK. I'll try w/ an IR soonIn concluson this is a great camera for this price
Works "out of the box" on 15.4" MacBook Pro. Opened it up, put it in the ExpressCard slot, plugged in my external LaCie HD and it started working immediately.  No drivers or software to install.  Gotta love Macs.  Good product from Belkin.  My only minor quibble is that the card  protrudes out of the MacBook a little more than I would have liked
Pretty solid product. Solid product, just a little disappointed in the latching mechanism for the dvds.  DVD almosts falls out too easily, but then again, other than transporting them, they sit on a shelf and have no worried.  All in all, they were all intact and a good product
High Sony quality...high Sony pricing. Memory Sticks have always been great technology from day one. The Pro models are no exception. They have fast transfer speeds and are very reliable.Of course, that comes at a price. Compared to the other flash memory standards, Memory Sticks are expensive. Even the SanDisk "generic" Memory Sticks aren't that much cheaper than the genuine Sonys.The only other (well documented) drawback to the Pro models is the useless (for digicams) MagicGate feature that steals a fair amount of the total capacity of the card and can't be disabled. Sony really should remedy that for digicam users. Don't hold your breath though.4 stars because of the price issue and the MagicGate annoyance
Works as expected. I have a Dell Axim X50v (PDA) which has build-in Bluetooth. I originally was hooking up the GPS-360 to the X50v using the included cable. I was concern that the Bluetooth would not provide a reliable connection. However, the cable connection is cumbersome, so I decided to try Bluetooth. This dock allowed me to connect the GPS-360 to my X50v wirelessly. And the connection is reliable. The X50v needed to be reconfigured to access the GPS-360 via Bluetooth before first use. The reconfiguration process is not easy. I rate it medium difficult for average users. But you only need to configure it once. Once it is configured then connecting it to the GPS-360 is easy. Now I am (mostly) WIRELESS. (PDA still needs wire to keep it charged.
Nice features for the price. I use it to listen to talk radio in the kitchen and it works well for that. It does have trouble picking up some weaker AM stations, but that could be caused by a lot of different factors. I do use it occasionally for music (both FM and CD) and it works fine but the sound quality is not great.  The clock is cool looking but hard to read
This product is fantastic!!!. I bought this product expecting marginal at best GPS functionality on my Axim X51v but was astounded at how well the product worked.  My family and I drove from Boston to Ontario and back having turn by turn directions all the way.  I especially love the waypoint feature in the included software as it was indispensable in finding places to eat, shop, fuel, etc in unfamiliar surroundings.  Thank you Garmin for making such an amazing product
Review by a Runner. I've been running with this for about a month now in Kuwait.  It's my new running buddy!  It has many options for running/training.  The only thing it can't do is hook up to your computer.  However, it can store 2yrs worth of training.  If you're a techy, then perhaps the 201 or 301 might be for you.  But the 101 does pretty much everything they can do.  Just for the record, it does not have a heart monitor, but who cares?  Just RUN
Easy to use. I haven't had a weather alert yet, so I can't testify to it's reliability, but it was easy to program and has loud alarm.
Great SD Case. This case to hold Secure Digital cards is a great solution for keeping these cards together.  It is not as nice as my aluminum Sony Memory Card case, but it does the job
Its Good to Have. I like this all in one product it satisfies all my needs. I believe it's good product for home use definitely. Still I don't know the life of the tonner
Awesome!. These speakers pump!  They sound great and can be used for almost anything since they accept multiple input sources.  The subwoofer is HUGE though.  Make sure you have space for it
Black is beautiful. I was waiting to get a sony walkman which can play CD-R/RW, MP3. Happy that I got this one. Plays MP3 based on folders, not genres. Decent sound quality. Good battery life. Seeking is fast. No backlight. Seeking noise is prominent when reading a MP3 CD for the first time as it loads all files information. Overall a nice unit
almost perfect. The case is almost perfect. If it had a way to store the headphones it would exactly right
Great little radio/mp3 player. Everything works great. The only marginal issue is that the batteries don't last a full eight hours. It works in the car but cuts in and out.Guess I have to break down and buy the car kit
Work well for their purpose (and their price). These buds are definitely a step up from the standard iPod buds.  They stay in your ears much more easily (without the foam black covers, which are easily lost), the sound is at least marginally better, and the overall construction seems to be better.  You can't do much better for the money.However, if you're willing to spend a little more, the JLab JBuds are the way to go.  I own both the Gumys and the JBuds, and the Gumys are my workout pair, and I use the JBuds for everything else.But if you're looking to spend as little as possible yet still upgrade from the iPod buds, the Gumys are the way to go
Great Value. I got this calculator for my son in school.  It has worked well and my son learned to use it quickly
Brother MFC-7420. Fast shipping from amazon. The printer is easy to setup but a littlenosiy when printing. Also I saw the same printer in Office Depot on sale for $30 less a week after I bought the printer. Shop around for a sale
Couldn't be Easier to Use!. This computer lock is extremely easy to use and easy to reset the combination.  The dials turn very easily, unlike the earlier version with three numbers.  I also like the fact that this one has four numbers - muc harder to crack the code.  It's a great deterrent while I'm at the library or other public place and need to leave the area for a short time to get a book.
Texas Instruments TI-83 Plus Graphing Calculator. On time delivery with well packing condition.Price was also good with no tax & free delivery
GREAT!!!!. Few days ago I've bought it in Best Buy for...$40.99 plus tax!!I was very happy with it and saw on Amazon the same one for only $34!!!!So I imediately bought it!!!Great product for an incredible price!!!Highly recommended!!!
This is my fourth Sony DVD player, and easily the best. The very first DVD player I bought was Sony's very first 5 Disc DVD changer back in 1998. It was an excellent player, but as the technology improved, it could no longer keep up. I upgraded to a single disc Sony which could handle DTS, and later to another single disc player which could handle progressive video. But I always missed the convenience of a 5 disc changer after having been spoiled by one at the start. At about one-third the price of that original DVD changer, this player has all the features of those previous upgrades and more while retaining the familiar functionality of my first player. It produces an excellent picture, has lots of tweakable settings, has more outputs, and is also very stylish looking.I do have a couple of nits, though. My original DVD changer had buttons on the remote which allowed me to jump directly to whichever disc I wanted. With this one, I have to press a Disc Skip button to cycle through all the discs until I reach the one I want. The front of the player does have direct access buttons, though. I wish I still had my old remote control as I'm sure it would work with this unit to restore that remote functionality.Second, the upscaling through HDMI produces a great image, but not really any better than leaving the image at 720x480p. In fact, upscaling will sometimes magnify some interlacing artifacts visible in the picture. It's also unfortunate that while connected through HDMI, progressive scan cannot be turned off. This shouldn't be an issue most of the time, but there are some video sources that might look better with it turned off. Progressive settings can only be changed on the unit itself and not through the remote, but they cannot be turned off when connected through HDMI.One last thing about the HDMI connection. There can sometimes be a noticeable audio sync issue when using HDMI connections and digital TVs. This is not a problem with the player, but with the way HDMI is currently implemented. This player has an audio-sync adjustment feature which should compensate for the problem. However, the audio-sync adjustment doesn't work if the player is connected to a receiver via its optical digital outputs. Since I need to have mine connected this way in order to enjoy 5.1 sound, the audio-sync adjustment feature is useless here. And that's a shame. By the way, there should be no audio-sync issues if the player is connected via component, s-video, or composite outputs.There's also a minor thing I've found about all my Sony DVD players that I haven't liked. They are unable to correctly display Time Remaining on certain discs, or more commonly on the special features (documentaries, etc.) on certain discs. I also have a cheapo Philips player which has no problems displaying Time Remaining on those things (even on the menu). It's an improvement I'd really like to see implemented on future players.Now, despite the complaints I've listed above, don't get me wrong. This is still an excellent player and I really love it. I happily recommend it to anyone considering purchasing it. It really is a great value and it performs very well in most instances, and I feel it's the best DVD player I've ever owned. It's just not quite perfect. In all likelihood, it's also the last DVD player I'll ever own as I'll probably be buying a BluRay or other HD player in a couple of years when that format war is over. But this is a great player to hold me over until then
Better than my old Belkin model. It's speedy and space saving and inexpensive. I bought this to replace my Belkin because the Belkin needed to be plugged in. This one is powered by your computer so there's no extra power cords, which is a big plus to me.The only thing I dislike about this is the fact that the Hub takes up two Usb ports instead of just one like the Belkin.
Excellent small mouse!. Works fine on my iBook. Love the size and responsiveness. Good value
Great TV for the bedroom. I bought this TV last week to my bedroom and i just love it, the picture is great, have a lot of imput easy to use and set. i strongly recommend this TV for video games and live tv. the only thing i didn't like is that it only have one hdmi input
Purchase of Monster Cable Component Video Cable. Satisfied with the product. The cable is currently being used to connect a Philips Digital Audio/Video Surround Receiver to a Toshiba TheaterWide HD TV. The quality of the picture while playing a DVD has improved considerably.
Great. This is exactly what it appears to be.  A thin, space saving great sounding stere
Good as they get. I've been driving a Logitech Momo (black) for about 3 years, and loved it. Until now.This new wheel, pedal, and gearshift set is, in a word, awesome.With 900 degree wheel rotation, stronger force feedback, a clutch, and gated shifting the level of realism is unbelievable.Did you ever want to go racing, but couldn't afford the time or cost? With this set and Live For Speed, GTR2, rFactor or (one of these days?) iRacing's as yet unreleased programs you can. And after some practice "in the privacy of your own home," you can go online and race LIVE with folks all over the world. You heart WILL pound and you WILL sweat!Okay, maybe I'm weird, but at 60+ I still manage to find time to race 10-15 hours a week! And there are no long, tiring drives to the race track, no hotel and food expenses, no long waits for the other classes to get off the track, and no long drive home with a wrecked car on the trailer behind you. An hour behind the wheel is an hour racing.I have a heart valve problem and there are times I wonder if this is really safe after all
Best Printer I've ever had!. In my home office I've have had a number of printers over the past 10 years.  This is the best!  I checked out 5 printers before deciding on this HP model.  Why is it better?  It's fast, quiet and compact.  Ink cartridges install easily.  Print quality is superb for photos and printed pages.   Having 4 functions in one unit streamlines my desk and my tasks.  The LCD screen is bright and easy to read. Controls are intuitive.  Software (in spite of what I'd read) was a breeze to install and easy to use.  The interface with my iMac is seamless and intuitive, as are control buttons on the unit itself.  The purchase process from Amazon as well as their delivery was perfect
bulky but does the job. i have a card reader slot in my computer, but i purchased this to keep in my camera bag just in case i want to download to a computer that doesn't.  it works great, but my only complaint is that it's a little bulky.  other than that it's a great card reader
A Remarkable Radio!. I purchased a 'Cobalt/Cherry' version of the Model One radio back in 2003 to 'replace' the annoying 'junk' radio that a co-worker had for us to listen to. His radio would not receive our 'favorite' FM station whenever the weather outside was rainy, or when the equipment bay door was closed (we were in a metal building). My 'new' Tivoli radio changed all that. Not only were we able to listen to our favorite station reliably and clearly, but it just sounded SO much better. Everyone was amazed with the quality of the sound, especially from such a 'small' box!Four years later the same Model One sits on a shelf in my present place of employment and still brings me the joy of music from whatever station I want to listen to. It is extremely sensitive (with the 'wire' antenna supplied) and selective (no 'adjacent channel' interference). It is one of the best "investments" I've ever made for a consumer electronics product. The build-quality is top-notch and the real cherry wood veneered cabinet is strikingly beautiful with the dark cobalt blue faceplate. Both music and voices are reproduced with the quality of a fine 'hi-fi' setup and sound as natural. It "plays" loudly enough for almost anyone's needs without sounding distorted at higher volumes and it shows that the late Henry Kloss was gifted in understanding the overall "balance" necessary to make a great product! Someday I plan to purchase a Model Two for a little 'stereo system' (with my portable CD player plugged into the aux. input jacks on the back )for my bedroom.A truly remarkable product (also available in other color and wood options) and most highly recommended!!!!
external hard drive. I needed extra space for pictures and musis downloads this was just right not too expensive and large enought to fit the purpose
great quality product; great price. this was my first receiver; it was very easy to setup, sound quality is great
Fair price nicer performance. This is a fair priced equipment, nice for homes and regular internet activity, work's best with windows xp, i took it out of the box follow the easy instructions and had it working properly withing 45 minutes, be shure to know what expecific plan you're isp gives you to properly configure the router.
Lasted Four Years - I weep for Palm. I am filled with feelings of anger and despair as I see the once great Palm Corporation in its death throes.  I bought my first Handspring Visor Deluxe in early 2001 for $250 -- had it stolen 11 months later -- and bought another refurbished one from Handspring in Feb 2002 for just $100.  The device gave me outstanding service until it died just a few days after its 4th (re)birthday.  A refurbished device lasting 4 years!  Since yesterday I have been looking for a replacement, inexpensive PalmOS handheld.  Unfortunatlely, there is only PalmOne (or whatever they are called now) corporation left (having swallowed Handspring) and the PalmOS has been sold to a Japanese company.  The reviews for Palm's current products -- nearly all from longtime loyal Palm-product users -- nearly uniformly slam the products.I am depressed.  I hate the MS PocketPC (or whatever they call the current version) devices -- they are much too complex, they are slow, they are too Windows-like, and they are darned expensive.  In contrast, PalmOS devices were snappy, reliable, simple and easy to use, and relatively inexpensive.  What more could one ask for?There seems to be no reasonable alternative now.  Should I take a risk with the low end Palm Z22 (and have it fail in two months).  Handspring's customer service used to be outstanding.  Palm's current customer service sucks big time.  Even if the company goes out of business in the next six months (it definitely will be gone before December 2006), I don't care, as long as I can get a decent PalmOS device that lasts the next 4 years.Thanks for all the good times, Handspring and Palm! Too bad you faded away and left us to be devoured by Microsoft
Great Memory, package is to big. Works great, easy to install. The only problem was that the package was to big and due to the fact that I used a PO box they charge me too muc
Excellent "add on" for charger unit. I bought these batteries along with the Sony BCG-34HE4 Super-Quick Worldwide Battery Charger with 4 AA NiMH Batteries.  Exellent charger, excellent batteries.  A real money saver.
If only it were always this easy... Product exactly as advertised, billing painless and super duper fast shipping. Incredibly stoked about the transaction
A Must  for Disaster Kits, Emergencies or Camping. Living in central California, the most probable emergencies we face in OUR AREA are earthquakes and power outages.  The Eton FR250 should suit our needs best - as long as radio & cell phone towers are still standing! The FR250 has 7 shortwave bands that might provide information from outside our area if local communications are lost. I let the built-in rechargeable battery (a replaceable 3.6 volt portable telephone battery) completely discharge and then cranked the dynamo the recommended 2 turns per second for 2 minutes (with a short break in between). It provided enough power for the radio to play at a moderate volume for 95 minutes - RATHER IMPRESSIVE and the 2 1/2 inch speaker provides very clear and pleasant audio. Another nice feature is the fine tuning knob.With the built-in battery charged or with the 3 AA batteries, the flashlight will light in very dark conditions (tho not brightly), a path approximately 50 feet.This little radio packs plenty of features at a reasonable price.  A must for disaster kits, emergencies, camping or even giving as a gift.
Great for basic home use. If you're looking for a very basic copier to make the occasional black and white copy this unit is fine. It makes very clean looking black and white copies. If you can think of a question in the form of "Does this copier have _____" chances are the answer is no. It can do double-sided copies, but only manually. There is no multiple-original feed. No shrink/enlarge options. It does have auto-exposure with a manual override if it's needed. Knowing all of this I think it's a steal at the $25 AR I paid. Otherwise you're probably better off with a scanner and printer for most uses
Works great, but one small drawback. The drive works well, and certainly as advertised.  It is readily accessible from the network, appears to be realibale, and is acceptably fast.The issue I found is that, despite there being two USB ports on the back for atttaching expansion drives, the chipset that the devices runs off does not support addressing any drives bigger than 500GB.  So... if you buy the 500GB WD NetCenter, don't bother trying to attach extra drives and expect them to be read/write accessible
Great card at a great price. This card is great. Even though the item's packaging says Sandisk, the card was stamped Olympus which allows me to use the panorama feature on my Olympus camera. With this 2gb card I can fit close to 1300 pics in the second highest setting on my camera and 500 on the highest setting. That is more than plenty for my needs. This was the best price I have seen anywhere for an Olympus M class 2gb xD card, glad I found it
great sound. Great sound.. much better than the stock ipod earphones or buds.Knocked off one point because they are slightly too large.  The sound more than makes up for the slightly larger size.Considering the price and sound quality they are a steal
Does the Job, but not Blown Away. I bought this to replace the aging micro center channel speaker I had been using for years. And while this is a definite improvement, I must say that I haven't been overly impressed with this. Dialogue can still be difficult to make out at times, and I just haven't noticed this speaker as much as I thought I would. Maybe that's what a surround speaker was designed for, but I guess I just was expecting more
Warning!  It's for the new iPod!. The description for this product says something like &quot;fitted with the industry standard firewire port, to work with older iPods.&quot;  This in direct contrast to the picture, which shows the newer connector and ipod.  do not buy this for your older ipod
yo. I want to give a shoteout to Jorda
Pleased. We purchased 2 of these recently -- putting one on the wall.  One of our main criteria was that the screen info could be read easily. We are very pleased with the product in this and other respects. Looks good too
Worth Every Penny. The Speck Nano SkinTight Deluxe w/ Holster is everything you could ask for in a case. Its very sturdy, durable. There are some hitches, though. First, its tough to get your iPod in at first and the screen protector was also confusing put in. None of this came with instructions. Also, the holster has a belt clip that swivels but isn't really functional unless you never need to see your iPod while its on because the belt clip puts it out of your reach. I'm a new iPod user so I frequently handle my iPod so this posed as a problem. This case serves well for both new or veteran users of iPod, though. New users, like I, might carry their iPod in their pocket or somewhere close to their hand and this case gives you enough protection that you won't have to worry about smudging, smashing, banging, or cracking the body or the screen of the iPod while removing or putting it in a jacket pocket. iPod Nano is so small that it gets lost easily in the shuffle of a pocket but the Speck Nano SkintTight Deluxe gives the Nano some extra gerth to hold onto without making it cumbersome. I often had concerns with accidently touching my click wheel and blasting the volume level during playback becuase of the streamlined feel of the Nano but this case gives it some structure (with a raised click wheel opening) that I need. Veterans of the iPod might have many playlists which would make frequent fiddling with the iPod unnecessary and give a great purpose to tuck the Nano away with the holster. Overall, the pluses outweigh the negatives. Its stylish and purposeful. A good buy
Overall good mouse, with some quirks. I have been using this as my primary mouse for about a month, and am generally happy.  I plan to continue using it for a long time.  The mouse is very comfortable to use and the batteries seem to last longer than I expected (still on the original batteries after a month of daily use).I do find a couple of things kind of annoying about this mouse:* The scroll wheel is hard to press down as a middle click.  Because the wheel is not centered in its opening, sometimes I end up pulling the wheel to the left (side scroll) instead of pressing it straight down.* Horizontal wheel scrolling is mostly worthless, and there is no way to remap horizontal scrolling to any other function.* The scroll wheel is very smooth scrolling, it does not have notches like my old Microsoft Optical mouse.  This works fine for scrolling a scrollbar in an application, but is very annoying for scrolling by page in a PDF file, or zooming in Google Maps because moving the scroll wheel a tiny bit can throw you hundreds of pages away, or zoom you out completely.  It would also making any game that uses the scroll wheel (for changing weapons, for instance) very hard to play.* The default setup for the buttons is not what I had expected.  I had to change the function of the buttons using the provided Microsoft software to get middle clicking to work (the default was "Instant Viewer") with the scroll wheel.  Back is the default for the large thumb button, and Magnify was the default for the small thumb button.I had to change the way I used a couple applications (like viewing PDFs in "Single Page Continuous" instead of "Single Page" view), but overall this is an extremely comfortable mouse, and I would recommend it to anyone who won't have major problems with the annoyances listed above
This Thing Is Great!. I recently bought a wireless video streamer (a 5.8 gHz) that was supposed to also make my remote work in another room.  It didn't.  The video quality is awesome, though.  Anyway, I thought I'd try this remote extender.  It works as well as the video streamer does with video - awesome!  I could not be more pleased with it.  I put it's little remote eye on the floor of my component cabinet, right behind the glass door, as a temporary test, and it works great!  I can only imagine it will get better when I stick it closer to the component I want to control.This thing really works, folks!  Buy it!  I only wish it would work with my Harmony 880 remote (it doesn't have AA or AAA batteries)
good printer. I bought this printer because it was recommended by consumer reports magazine.  It prints well, scanner and copier is good.  It also prints good photos.  For this price, this is a good printer.
Great hub - just a few minor issues. PROSSmallCuteSelf-powered - comes with a power adaptor.  I have 6 devices hooked up to it, including 2 USB Hard Drives, and it works fine without the adapter - a big plus for me. Most hubs would not work with this setup.USB 2.0 & 1.1 - 6 devices hooked up, 3 low speed and 3 high speed, all work very well.Runs cool.CONSNot sure why, but they put the 7 ports on one side of the hub and power/uplink ports on the other.  This is dumb.  If you have the hub on a desk it looks awkward.  All ports should be on the back and leds on the front.  Here, the leds are next to each port which makes them completely useless as you don't see them.The hub is very light so when you have lots of devices hooked up the font gets a elevated.Overall, the best hub I've ever had and I tried many
Try hard. This is a remote worth owning. You do have to try hard to program it to some of the new combination machines i.e. VCR and DVD combo, but if you can get past the first step you are home. Do not skip reading all the instructions and you will end up a happy owner
COOL!...huh?.. WOW!. For you people who don't like to read rants people write in here, here are the pros and cons.proscomfortable (cushy earcups)great sound (bass is deep and round, tone is balanced and has great detail)cool ear ventilationheadband = comfort for any size headmicrophone included (good for gaming/talking on internet phones etc)consmicrophone line is attached (awkwardly) to headphone line but is 1.6m down from actual headphones, so you can hide themheadband mats hair down! really short hair or really long hair people disregard thisAt first, I was ordering these headphones because they just looked plain sexy.  It's white, it's big, it fits around your entire ear, and it had a microphone to boot.  I decided to order them the following week.When it came in the mail, I was disappointed when I opened it.  I hate to say this now, but the packaging was flimsy and cheap and the headphones looked bulky and awkward.  After the initial review, I took them out of the box and examined the contours of the earcups, and put them on to test for comfort.  The earcups were extremely well ventilated compared to my last headphones, which left my ears hot and irritated, and the cup covers that contacted around my head were extremely soft and cushiony.  The inside of the cup has the speakers positioned at an angle towards your ears, which is a unique design which I have never seen before.  The headband at the top makes these headphones extremely comfortable, even though I have a huge head, though my brother has a bigger head and says it's a little tight, and all that really bothered me was that it pulled a little on my skin.  Not a big deal after wearing it for extended period of time, as I later found.I plugged everything together and took them for a test drive on my ipod video.  Though the sound was reasonably good, I didn't think it was worth my money, but decided to use them despite this disappointment.  One night I left them on accidentally as I went to bed and I found them still on the next morning.  I turned them off so I could recharge my ipod, and plugged them into the computer.  I don't know so much about headphones but the sound quality was WOW.  The tone had rounded out, and the bass gave me shivers and rang in my ears IN A GOOD WAY.  The detail was much improved and, since then, I have written this review.  Great buy, great quality.  Best headphones I've tried thus far
I am pleased... I have been looking for a device to expand the capabilities of my XM2GO.  I took the iMX2 with me camping last weekend and it worked great.  Nice little carrying case with pockets for the AC adapter and XM2GO. Sound quality was very good for such a compact unit. I am pleased with the iMX2
Perfect for your studio with the HP Photosmart Pro B9180. More a review of the printer than the ink. This ink is the perfect match with HP's Advanced Photo Paper and the HP Photosmart Pro B918
Works great. The card works great in my camera. What more is there to say
Hits the Spot!. Wireless is the way to go!When I put any of my wireless controllers down on the table they look like they belong there and not out of place...Singular and clean looking this Sweet little controller is, IMO, another triumph by Logitech!Though a little smaller than the S-type, it feels good in the hand and it does not slack at all in performance. I got mine used and, once again, put old batteries in it(takes 2)...even four months later, I am just now getting the low battery light flashing...Still VibratesStill Responds AcuratelyAnd the analog sensitivity is better than the wired.Get it, get it... GET IT!!
Great Product. You can almost completely stop those peeping toms with this filter.  While it is not 100% effective, it does block or blur most of the view from people who are not directly behind you.  You can kind of see the double sided tape squares you place in each corner to keep it affixed to your monitor but it isn't obvious enough to be annoying or distracting.Amazon.com has the lowest price I could find on the web plus free shipping.  I got my in 3 days and am completely satisified with this product.
Wow! Can I give it 7 stars?. I am glad that there are real software programmers out there that truly know what they are doing.  The maps are accurate and the calculations take almost no time at all (3 seconds for a 400 mile trip - well, that is with my HP Pocket PC and 133x SD card).  I have seen and use other GPS-Map programs and this one is the best.  The only one which could be up to the same level is OnCourse5, but again, the maps are made by the same company as iNav.  All the others I've seen have way too many `buts'.  I love especially how you can zoom to 100 feet or zoom out to 10 miles.  The maps are loaded automatically as you pan the screen (giving that you had installed the whole city, or state, or country when you first setup the application in your PDA) and it shows you all the rivers, lakes, mountains, parks, etc.  It really does what it says it can do and in the way it says it can do it!!  I wish that the updates for software and maps could be free.  Oh, by the way, you can use it without a GPS receiver: ALL features are fully functional (except for the one that tells your current position, of course).  NOTE: a lot of time has passed since this review was first posted.  Now, version 3 is on the market.  It is even better, much better
Fantastic Add-On for iPod Mini. I have my iPod hooked up to the stereo on my motorcycle. The iPod stays tucked away in a safe place, and the remote gets strapped to the handlebar. All the needed functions are now at my fingertips. I can lock the iPod control pad, so it doesn't accidentally get bumped.I also use the Griffin FM transmitter. Nice, but not nearly as slick as the remote. I can't use them both at the same time, but I don't need to
Do Not Buy This From J&R!. J&R charges $28+ for shipping on this item!  I even called them to have the obvious typo corrected they had a rude attitude with me.  Never will buy from J&R again.As for the adapter - it does the job well. The other reviewer doesn't seem to know how to plug something in
Excellent Buy. Not as easy to use as a larger Panasonic I used to own butotherwise fine. Good sound.  Using CD player and radio.Buying via Amazon as usual is super
256MB Memory Stick Pro Black Magicgate Compatible. great product at great rate. highly recomended to buy from amazon. no one can beat that. i check the prices every where but ameZon had the best.....
Excellent...a must have for the normal listener!. If you're looking for a 'real Boom-Box',as in those 70's models with the huge bass, pass this up! If you really want a player with true fidelity that will leave your ears intact...this one is for you! It will fill an entire home with sound that's equal to some of the best eq1uipment out there...and can be as soft as a lullaby, depending on the volume.Controls are very easy to reach...and the remote is a bonus that Sony put in as an afterthought, I think. For a price like this, it comes with a great radio, cassette deck, a sleep feature,and others like CD shuffle programs that I've yet to use! For the money, it's just what I wanted! You won't be sorry that you bought this one at all!
Zaurus battery. I think the battery is fine, but the Sharp Zaurus is power hungry. A spare battery may be a necessity if you plan to use your Zaurus all day, every day.
Nice. I think these are very nice headphones for the above average listen.  Every serious music fan needs to have a nice set of headphones.  These are great they are not the best but for an unamplified source they do a dang good job.  I have not had problems like some of the other people but these are my first real set of headphones and I have only had them for a couple of days but no complaints yet.
outstanding. This CB radio has an outstanding performance, but beware of the low volume on the internal speaker, just as an advice you should also buy an extension speaker, there are a lot of low priced Midland extensions on amazo
Good stuff. We bought this microphone to facilitate recording meeting minutes.  It works well in a conference room setting w/ say, 10 to 12 people.  We connect it to a Dell laptop's microphone jack.  Using the mid-boost built into the Sony mic helps a lot.  We also use a free version of Audacity software to record the meeting directly to the computer.  Audacity allows you to rip it to .mp3 format directly for long term archiving which is very handy.  It also makes it easy to distribute minutes widely.  The product works well in these conditions and I'd recommend it
Clean, clear, and good price. This is my first foray (actually it was a gift) into Polk Audio merchandise. I am pleased with the crisp, clear, and detailed high frequency sound it emits. It has considerable resolution and articulation that helps deliever lifelike representations of vocals and instruments. There is virtually no distortion, and it sits above my T.V., which sometimes speakers and T.V.s will play interference with each other, but not this monitor. I have it hooked up to my Sony STR-DE697 Receiver, and it has been able with great clarity to handle high volumes. This is a great buy, even if you have a modest receiver
Terk 50' outdoor extension antena (Sirius). I was getting so frustrated losing my signal to my Sirius Sportster until I purchased the Trek 50' extension antena. I moved and mounted the antena to my roof and now it works great.  I now have 7 to 10 bars instead of the 3 I used to have, I strongly recomend this purchase
Nice Leather Carrying Case -- Recommended. It is always chancey to buy something judging by its online pictures, but I made a good choice for me in selecting this case. In fact, I bought two at the same time.The leather, as some others have noted, is not soft, but I did not expect that in an item in this price range. I wanted something that was made of leather, looked somewhere between casual and formal, and that would protect my notebook from scratches, bumps, rain and wind. This bag does all that. It is not at all bulky and that was another feature I was looking for.The model I purchased was for the 15 inch screen computers, so if you have a 17 inch notebook, you would get the larger size; but the construction is similar. I did not want a huge carrying case because I don't carry extra USB or printer cables, or a bunch of DVDs, yet there is ample room for a power supply and the basics.If you want to step up from the canvas type carrying cases, then you should definitely consider this case
Mini Speakers with a boom. I Love these little guys. I have them on my desk to as a desktop sound system only. I don't use them as a main stereo source. I'm in a small office and each work station in the office has a pair of the Duets, and honestly for blasting your Itunes Music the sound is great, if the sound gets a lil tinny (like a tin can) or too bass heavy it's nothing a lil adjustment to the Itunes EQ can't fix. Their small with good sound clarity and pack a heavy bass sound when it counts. They can fill a 750sq ft studio office easily with it's sound. JBL has the best mini speakers out there in my opinion, I also have the JBL On Stage Speakers for iPod, AWESOME as well!!
Great Camera, does everything I expected. A great web camera for the price.  Plug in the ethernet and power cable, and you are nearly ready to go.  Note that you will have to plug in the ethernet cable for initial setup, even if you are planning on using wireless.  You can access the camera directly, it has its own built in webserver.  This allows any program that can use HTTP to work with it.  Very handy if you want to use a program to upload shots from the camera to your website at regular intervals. No propritary software needed to get images, view everything from HTTP or a browser
More than I expected. I ordered this hoping for a protective yet sleek and fashionable bag.  I bought the Miami messenger bag and have been very pleased with it.  When I received it I noticed there was much more room than I thought from the pictures.  There is plenty of extra space without making the bag seem bulky. My notebook was a little smaller than the 17" screen this bag accommodates but with the adjustable divider it still fits well. I have been very pleased and I think my husband is jealous of my bag now
great addition to a great camera. I recently ordered this for a week long trip I was planning to Olympic National Park.  WOW what a great find.  I didn't have to worry about how many pictures my memory card would hold and could just snap away.  I think it also increased my shutter speed too. I would definitely recommend this to anyone and have actually
Great sound quality, but silly design. Great, crisp, full Sennheiser sound in a small package. I am using this on my 20GB Creative Zen Touch and my HP laptop, sounds way better than the included Creative earbuds on both devices. Can't really go wrong for the price.The design of the earbuds? Okay, well there's this carrying case that's included, and it's sort of half wind-up, half take-it-out-and-completely-give-up-and-get-it-into-a-tangled-mess-anyway. I have a set of Javo eBuds for my cell phone and I love the windup design of these and wish the Sennheisers were similar. The cord is too short. There are also no foam ear pads included, minor annoyance.Overall: Great set of earbuds, love the sound quality, but I would gladly pay more if anyone out there has something without such a thoughtless design
An easy entry point for beginners. After a year of guitar, I was interested in a little musical cross-training.  I had been looking at these keyboards at some of the brick and mortar music stores, but was unsure of whether to take the plunge.  Amazon's price for the refurbished model closed the deal for me.  For a very low price, you can buy the keyboard and a music book.  I just had my first learning session with this, and am very pleased with the purchase.  A year or two down the road, I may trade up to a real keyboard, but this one is certainly fine for learning.  My guitar is also from Yamaha.  They really do make great instruments, at very reasonable prices.  This refurbished keyboard is in new condition.  I only know that it's refurbished because of the marking on the packing box.  Also, I found the included DVD to be helpful.  I'm using 6 regular AA batteries with this, but plan to switch to rechargeable batteries
Player is Great, but hope you never need support from COWON... This would have received a 5 if it weren't for the horrible customer service from COWON.  Buyer beware, and set your expectations very low for their support.  At all times I treated them with respect, never cursed or acted irate, which I must say was very difficult to do considering the way they treated me, a new customer.1) The only way to "speak" with support is through online chat or email.  They do not have working phone numbers for support.2) I received 1 player, DOA.  Replacement player also DOA.  It literally took 4 weeks before I received a working player since they do not offer cross shipping for defective products (they email a UPS ground shipping label, once unit arrives it sits in their queue for 5 business days, then they send the replacement via UPS ground)3) It does not matter how professional you treat the support team, they will treat you like you are inconveniencing them.4) They will not let you speak with a supervisor, they can only relay your chat to them5) Check the Better Business Bureau rating, its currently an FI really don't like being so negative about COWON but this whole experience left me wishing they didn't have such a technological superior product.  I encouraged them to alter their treatment of their customers, never received a response.  Even sent them a letter, no response.Their players are great, the customer support is the worst I have ever encountered
Awesome. This adaptor is great, especially for the price.  Installation was as easy as it gets, right out of the box.  I had it up and running through a WEP-enabled local network and surfing the web in 2 minutes.  It locked on to the network in under a second and never dropped the connection.  Both FrontPage and ClieMail ran fine.  Speed is maybe 80% of what I get on my laptop running a 333 MHz. Celeron and a PC card 802.11b adaptor.  Just be sure your PDA is on the (small) list of supported devices.Negatives: it's not the sturdiest looking thing in the world.  I wouldn't leave it in the Clie when not in use and I sure wouldn't want to drop it on the floor.It does chew through the battery, but not any more than the backlight.  I did a test with my UX40, with the backlight set at minimum (ie. not off entirely) and using CliePet's UnderClock app to slow it down to 96 MHz.  This is a good combination of power saving and usability.Then I got on the net and loaded pages non-stop.  Starting from a fully charged battery, it ran 55 minutes before the first alarm.  I was able to get another 20 minutes of intermittent use out of it after that.  I consider that perfectly acceptable.  With an EB40 extended battery you should easily be able to get 2 to 3 hours of use out of it.Overall, a great add-on for a fraction of the price of a UX50
Nice Drive - Sony DRX-810UL. I'm really happy with this drive. Installation was quick and easy. I've made a few copies of DVD disc on Verbatim 16X DVD-R media with absolutely no issues. Fast with exellent results
Yamaha reciever. I just bought this item 1 week ago and i love it. I replaced my pioneer reciever which finally gave way. It is easy to use and the sound it great. I did not need alot of watts per channel i live in an apt so the 550 watts of power it offered was great. It does the job and the price was right. I recommend this product. It beats my old pioneer and yamaha has been around in the business of music equipment for along time you can trust the name
Great HDMI. this dvd player is exactly what i was looking for. i have had no problems so far with the player. the main reason i got the player was to try out the HDMI of my LCD tv. the picture is perfect i can finally view my dvds in HDMI. plays everything i put in the player.
Bought two of them. I bought two of these radios for my two sons and they have both said it  is a great product with magnificent sound quality.  I would certainly buy it again
Superb!!!. I bought this card after I got a Logitech Z-2300 speaker system.  It made a huge difference in the overall listening experience.  Highly recommend it, especially if you're currently using your on-board sound chip and have decent 2.1 speakers.  You will get optimal performance if you connect the analog audio output from your PC's CD drive directly to the card rather than going through the motherboard.
ONLY CDR's I EVER Use!. I started burning my own CDR's 5 years ago when I finally got a stereo-unit CD burner. I've mainly only been making mix CD's for my friends and compilation CD's to trim down the size of my extensive CD collection. By far, these Music CDR's from Maxell are THE BEST out there! Over the years, I've had very few problems with them, whereas with other brands I can't even begin to list the problems I've had without getting dizzy from the sheer astronomical number of problems.The only problem I have, is that these CDR's are getting harder and harder to find. 4 years ago I was able to pick up 10 packs of them(in standard-sized jewel cases, which I prefer) at any Walmart or K-Mart in my area. Now I have to resort to searching for them online. I want to stock up on them before they are completely discontinued, and I highly suggest that everyone else out there who's interested in TOP-QUALITY CDR's do the same
no complaints. What is there to say?...it's great ink.  I use it in my Epson 2200.  My only wish would be the cost being lower.  :
My Samsung LNS4041D 40" LCD HDTV. I have had this TV now for over three weeks.  I have to say that I am very satisfied with the product.  The TV was pretty much ready to go right out of the box.  The colors are vibrant and the details are very sharp.I would recommend this product to anyone who is looking for a value buy that is of very high quality
Strange shipping policy!. Amazon offers free shipping on all of Canon's BCI-6 inkjet inks except the red & green colors (which also ship directly from Amazon.) When asked, I received no reasonable explanation from Amazon. Bummer
Great wall stereo. Looking great on the wall in the bathroom, just the thing I was looking for, very stylist and not too big. If it came with mp3 it would get the 5 star
Definitly worth it if you want the best. This cable isn't cheap. So why pay so much for it? Why not just buy a cheap s-video cable? Because the quality suffers. They don't just jack up the price for no reason. Gold tipped connecters, more shielding from interference, thicker wire, and better quality materials used provides a better picture. Colors are more vibrant, the whole picture more defined. You get what you pay for, and this Monster Cable is definitly proof of that. I have this cable and it is worth it. Monster all the way
PERFECT. I've owned 2 sets of these types of phone systems.  A GE set and a 2.4 gig Uniden set.This is by far the best.  Actually, it's perfect.  No noise on the line at all.  Everything just works perfectly.Only one caution. This particular model does not have an answering machine.  I was moving too fast when i bought and thought that it did.  If you want an answering machine to come with, make sure you buy the right model.I'm totally sold on the DECT 6.0!!!!Buy it.  You won't regret it.
Great dock for price!. This is a good deal at the low Amazon price. The only problem I had was the USB cable that came with the unit was defective. I used another spare cable and it worked fine. The remote is a little cheesy, but it does work. Some of the buttons have a weird symbol that takes some experimenting to figure out.Soooo, overall this is well worth the price. It was compatible with my G5 60 Gb video iPod
Can't hear the television!. Blocks out enough noise that I can hardly hear my boyfriend blasting the TV at night, but can still hear the alarm clock by my head to wake up in the morning.These ear plugs are relationship savers. Inexpensive enough that when the parrot chews 'em up, it's not a huge loss
Great price, easy to use!!. I bought this for my folks for Christmas.  It took no time at all to hook up, and making DVDs was simple.  Everything from recording off the TV, to recording movies and shows stored on the DVR, to transferring home movies from the original VHS tapes.  I'm sure for about $300 more you could purchase some higher end recorders, but for under $200, you really can't go wrong.  The only flaw I could find is that the initial hookup (according to the book) didn't seem quite right.  After taking a whole 2 minutes to look up the easy to read instructions online, everything went smoothly.  Because of that, I'm still going to give it a full 5 stars..it's not as if those 2 whole minutes ruined our life.  Really, if you're new to this technology, you're not going to have any problems..believe me..A++
skullcandy. best earbuds ever. cann't beat the price and the sound is fenomenal
Good Headphone. I initially bought it from Fry's for 79, then I searched amazon, after I saw the price (with free shipping) I bought it right away and returned fry's later.The headphone arrived 3 days after I ordered it.It's comfortable to wear, much better than my old RCA infrared wireless(which broke after only a year usage).  Sound is very good too
great product. the privacy filter does what it says.  although it doesn't totally black out your screen from an angled view, it is dark enough not to be able to tell what you're doing.  the only minor drawback is that it decreases the brightness of your screen.  otherwise, a great product
Holy crap it's great. I mean seriously, I'm running a Ubuntu box here. With other card-type things, sometimes I'd have to modify or find drivers and wrappers for some stuff to work - not with this. I just slid it into the computer and WA-BAM - makes my DVD player a bajillion times faster than it was before and just worked out of the box
Great perfomance and value for money. Great DVD player.  Bought a non-branded machine 1-year previously at Best Buy for $100 that promptly expired as soon as the warranty ended.  For almost the same price the Philips DVD is in a different league altogether.  Looks sleek and stylish, bright, crisp display, no skipping or jumping, excellent sound, robust and sturdy, long battery life - what else is there?  I wouldn't have even paid attention to the noise it makes on starting up if the other pedantic reviewers hadn't pointed in out
WE LOVE IT!. I purchased this item to take with me on a trip across the U.S.  My husband and I were able to send postcards, with our pictures and places we had seen, to our small grandchildren.  It is portable, easy as pie to use and we love it. Take pictures with your digital camera, hook up to the machine and print.  That easy.  Pictures are wonderful and color is great.  We were not disappointed.  We could also download pictures to our laptop, edit them, and then print them.  Just took a few minutes during our downtime in the evenings at our hotels, then we'd mail them the following morning before taking off again.  Got so many oohs and aahs from the desk clerks.
Nice case over-all. Improve shoulder strap feel and look. sleeve fits xps gen2 like a glove but if your in a hurry to remove laptop the zippers will drag your laptop :-(  and the handles need to lock like the Ogio case. but is a awsome bag for $50 delivered compared to most
A Keyboard Worth Noting. After purchasing 12 of these for our educational institution, I find they work very well in our classroom environment. Aside from being very cost effective, they are small enough to fit on our bi-level workstation desktops along with full-sized keyboards. Plugged into iMac flat screens, the keyboards offer enough flexibility to work with all our software
What You See is What You Get. Don't expect great audio quality from these speakers, or any discernible stereo separation. But you do get a reasonable speaker for the price
pretty in pink. I love my new keyboard and mouse, the bright pink makes your day a little brighter.  Works great and is fun to use
Great addition to a Fuji digital camera. This card is a vast improvement over the original XD series cards, with much faster write and read time. Having 1gb of storage is wonderful, because I can fit over 400 5.1mpx fine quality photos on a single card, more than adequate for my needs, but like hard drives, your needs end up growing to fit the space available
Solid little mouse. The appearance and feel of this mouse is top notch. The only weakness was that the installation CD did not contain an OS X native software. The download from Macally was very small and now the mouse works fine in OS X, right click and all
Very good quality for the price. I purchased this printer with the intent to use it for both photo printing and regular text printing. Photos look great and print relatively quickly, but I had a problem with white streaks when printing text. I ended up calling Canon support and they sent me a new printer head for free since the printer is still under warranty. I've had no problems since. I give the printer a high rating mainly because I was very satisified with their tech support
works great. I bought this yesterday and have burned 5 120 minutes tapes without a glitch.  I wanted something to plug in and burn and that is what it does incredibly well.  The quality of the dvd is great and it works on all of my home players after I finalized it. I also love it becuase it is smaller than the previous sony products.  I am very happy with it.Scot
Great Player but....... Am happy with everything about this player except that for the money spent, I would have expected better support for DVD+R DVD-R media.  Granted, that feature isn't listed in the technical description, so the mistake is mine
works. i hung off of this thing and did pulls ups on it before putting my 50" plasma on it.  it didn't even flinch.  i'm convinced that thousands of years after i'm dead and gone that mount will still be there holding up the tv without any problem. i have no idea why anyone would pay for the more expensive mounts.
Perfect for papers, not for books. This holder keeps papers upright and in position, but it doesn't handle books particularly well, as the clip cannot grip surfaces as thick as most books and the base isn't as wide as most books when they're opened. I have this AND a book stand so I keep myself covered on both ends
IPOD KILLER!!! THIS THING RULZZZ GET ONE. THIS IS THE GREATEST MP3 I HAVE EVER OWNED I LOVE IT!!!!!!!!!!! It is way better than the ipod. I know this because my friend owns a ipod and i like my Zen much much better. Not only is this Zen cheaper it stores more music and dont worry about how thick it is. It make the Zen more durrable because I have dropped mine many many times and it works perfect. The only problem I have ever had with this product is. That after 3 months the left earphone would not work so i sent it back and its perfect now. It also has Great sound qualiy. Also I am a kid and NOT hello kitty Mommy im her son lol
Good For Me. I upgraded from using a business mic to one of these and came to be very happy. The mic has high clarity-- certainly it is more than adequately sensitive. It also picks up a signal which, though less stereo than some, nonetheless provides a signal bifurcated enough to allow the listener to place objects by ear. The mic is very small and light, and appears very sturdy. It has been ideal for my use with a Sony MD Recorder. It has definitely helped me to improve the sweetness and clarity of my audio projects
Excellent. I just love the color, the stile  and the price.It is a perfect player.Thank you.
Fun to use...motivational....nike+ shoes not necessary. At age 52, overweight with type 2 diabetes and high cholesterol, I decided to save my life and buy new nano and nike+ unit here.The unit is a joy to use. Autosync-ing your runs to the nike+ website couldn't be easier. Note I have dial-up only connection (&lt;32kbps). Watching your run data collect on the nice nike+ graphical interface is great fun!As stated by several here, nike+ shoes are not necessary. I put my shoe unit in an unused luggage tag and stuffed between my New Balance tongue and laces.Minor complaint: During workout, I can't fast-forward/reverse within songs that are playing  (a minor complaint when one considers I am now running 2 miles daily!)Try the "PODRUNNER" podcast at iTunes to find free and extended workout mixes tailored to your desired beats-per-minute (BPM)
Love it!. This item is a wonderful unit. Much more accurate than any garmin units I have used. Any negative reveiws are because some people can't figure out how to use it. For some it comes naturally, but it seems some also need to read the manual a few times. Has more features and channels than the 60csx for a lower cost. Always gets a REALLY quick cold fix
ch user from 89. I started with this sticks lesser sibling, 3 buttons and a hat on the stick, you,ve seen it. I don't know what happened to it somewhere between 95and 97 but let me jut say&lt; CH is the King of flight control
Port Computer Case. This is my 2nd Port product and I have been impressed with both
pretty good memory card. I use this card mainly for taking video with my digital camera. It is totally fine with writing a file more than 100 MB and transferring the data to computer.It works great
Great for the money. I bought this because I wanted a dvd player that could EASILY tap into my car's audio.  With the built-in FM transmitter, movies sound great!  The tablet style design makes this unit compact and stylish.  I have no need for the wireless headphones, so I haven't even tried them yet.  The controls are easy to learn and use. The viewing angle is better than I anticipated.  No complaints
Five stars -- but only for satellite receiver. Seems to work well with my satellite receiver.  I have not used it for any other purpose so have no idea how it would work in any other capacity
Great Product. It's a great product from Microsoft and i love it. Had no prblems with it yet and the fingerprint reader is easy and fun, comes in handy.
Simply Amazing!. The picture quality of my HDTV has improved significantly after using this unit.  Well worth the price for super high quality entertainment.
Nice product Nice service. I could easily found Amazon is the cheap seller of this product. Others will the same item for less online but they charge big amount of shipping and tax. The product is real good and working nice with my new Sony camcorder
Good Device, Small Size is a +. I'm not hiding that I like Netgear products for entry level use. This device has a 5th port that you can use in uplink or normal mode. It is very compact with indicator lights for connection and collisions. It is also very reliable
Fast SD card for my digital camera. I bought this SD card and took some 100 snaps out of it.The card is really fast with my canon A510 camera.Reading takes a slightly longer time than writing.I would recommend this card to anyone.Actually this card outperforms the 16MB MMC supplied with the camera.Also the 256MB card will hold upto 200 (may be lesser) 3.2MP pictures.
I love it. I bought this fan today at Walmart (for $47.94).  I needed something to cool my medium size office (18'x18').The fan was easy to put together.  I placed it across the room from my desk and within five minutes temperature had noticeably dropped.The remote control is great and the timer feature means I don't have to remember to turn it off before I leave each day.
Optoma mounting kit. Worked just great!  We're using a projector for a home theatre, but needed to use the projector for a presentation and it was very easy to dismount and remount.  It was easy to install in the first place.  Absolutely no complaints
its what i ordered. the company sent me a great product, at a great price. im glad there is an ebay to shop around for great deals
It's worth it. I have case logic CD wallets from 7+ years ago that are still in good shape...despite the abuse I put them through.  I bought this one only because of CD collection expansion. I find simply wiping off the outside cover with a wet sponge keeps it clean. The nylon covers really hold up over time. Remember- the "128 cd capacity" refers to CDs without their accompaning booklets. It's really 64 CDs with booklets.
Solid. I got two of these, and as others have said, this is a great game pad for the money. It feels sturdy and has good, well placed, buttons.
Western Digital WDXE5000KSN right on target. I purchased this drive, set it up next to my wireless router in my wiring closet in my basement, and that is the last I have seen of it. I use it to make incremental backups of 3 desktops that I have running 24/7 here at home. I do periodically check the backups and do a restore (always a good idea with any backup method) and it works flawlessly. In fact I purchased 2 more drives. I use one at work and the second here at home to archive photo's and music. Drive read/write time might not be as fast as others I looked at but for what I use it for, it's perfect and the price/Gb is right, and so far, excellent dependibility and easy to set up. Give this drive a look
Does the job... It worked.  All the labels from the side of the power supply just fell off.  Kind of looked cheap, but it did the job
Midland Outfitter Series GXT650VP4 5-Watt 22-Channel GMRS. Only used these radios this past hunting seasons;worked great;has all the features you need for quiet operation,(no beeps and silent alert);plus weather bands;the only thing I think I will do is get the better set of headphones;the ones that come with it are so-so;(takes some doing to get them adjusted to fit);Radios have low-med-high power that works great to save battery power;you easily get two days of standby time with a little talk time;and if you talk alot it will last all day.I would highly recommend this product.
XFX GeForce 6200 256 MB DDR2 AGP Video Card w/TV, DVI. Awesome video card.. Im using this with Dvi cable on my 22 inch Viewsonic lcd. I must say it installed great and looks awesome!! Great card for the money def a happy customer!! :
No Problems Here. I have had this CF card for nearly a year (A year ago, it cost nearly $300--boy those CF memory prices have dropped!) and it has worked without incident where I use it for MP3/WMA storage on my iPAQ PDA. It does not appear to cause a significant power drain on my iPAQ battery, so it must be a fairly efficient chip. The write speed of this chip is roughly 40% slower than a Sandisk Ultra II CF, which is preferrable for digital cameras. For reliable storage and backup applications though, this 2GB CF is now an excellent value
Great Product!. I'm very happy with my labeler. I don't know how I live without it all these years. This model is very easy to use, I found out my thumbs are quite coordinated, as I seem to use my thumbs for typing and to change the options. As far as the battery issue goes, the battery prompt came up during the first two full rolls of tape, and the batteries never actually died (It doesn't come with batteries, so I used a couple used ones). I turn it off after each label, which is simply the touch of a button. When you power it back up, theres no waiting, it continues just where you left over, immediately. I wish the tape rolls were less expensive at $10 each. However, the first couple days, I went through 2 rolls like nothing. Now a month later, I'm still on my third roll. Once the house and office were labeled, it's just a matter of labeling here and there, and roll lasts quite a while. I was only able to find this brand roll at Office Max, Kmart and Walmart didn't carry them. Overall, the product was a good buy and I'm very satisfied with it, and the options it comes with
Good USB. Ive had it for a month and it works well. Its a great product for  a low cost.
Better than expected. Have had no problems with the unit. Replaced a turntable from the sixties with better results, still plays albums made in the sixties with great sound.
Good batteries, great price. I bought three boxes of these and have had great success with them.  I can't tell the difference between these and Duracell's or Energizers.  Very pleased with my purchase.  I will buy some more
Smooth as Silk (so far at least!). This PSU looks great and performs great. I am using it to power an ASUS A8R32-MVP motherboard, AMD Athlon FX-60 CPU, ATI X1900XT-X graphics card, four SATA II hard drives, couple of DVD drives, high-end audio card from Germany, and other miscellaneous components. So far, it has done this without even a hiccup.I have a fairly tall case, so it was easy to tuck the extra power cables away. Some folks may prefer a PSU with modular cables, which I have in another computer, but I usually end up using most of the cables anyway.Connection of the main power cable, however, did require a glance at the manual (at least it did for me) because all of my motherboards use a 24-pin connector, whereas OCZ has split their Outlet Power connector into a 20-pin cable and a 4-pin cable. It was not intuitively obvious to me how these two parts connected
Atheros Chipset for Geeks means decent operation for everybody. High end users and users who consider themselves geeks will find this card useful.  The chipset allows for direct and immediate integration into Linux systems with no additional work on most platforms.  The chipset is also able to be used in special modes by a number of Windows applications.For any users at all, the card will do a decent job of operation with a good range and sensitivity.This card does not include an external antenna jack, however.  And in certain modes in Windows, it has a bad habit of SSID loopback.  This causes occasional issues with the card claiming that it can see its home network even if the network is far out of range.  This may cause confusion for some users as they try to connect to the network and are unable to.  Investigation revealed this to be an issue specifically caused by Windows' interaction with the card, and not the card itself, as it works fine in other operating systems.  Also, in the time that I have used it, I have only experienced this error once.Overall, the card is well worth the cost, especially if you are looking for that chipset.  The decent performance in my opinion outweighs the very infrequent trouble with SSID loopback.  if you are looking for the chipset for a linux machine, this card is excellent
I got my money's worth. For $30, it's worth it. I found no problems with the quality of sound with the headset it came with. I just wanted a simple, cheap mp3 that can hold a good percentage of songs for my walks....and this does it. I didn't have to install any programs, my computer just recognized it as a USB drive and I transferred my songs quickly.Some things I wish it had?- an on/off button. I read the manual and stuff, but nowhere did it say on/off button...but I think if you leave it alone for a little bit, it turns off by itself. (correction:  just hold the play button for a little bit, and it'll turn it off!)- a mode switch between the voice recorder/mp3. I have accidentally pressed the voice recorder a couple of times and I couldn't switch back to the mp3 without taking out the battery.- a way to browse through the music. All it has is a scroll on its side and that's how you go from one song to the next.But nonetheless, I got what I want. A cheap, functional mp3 that can suit my needs. If you want something fancy, this isn't the mp3 for you, that's for sure.
Amazon Customer Service. Ordered 2 items...Ideastream CD Storage Boxes and Fellows CD Sleeves. which is obviously 2 different manufacturers. When ordering, I clicked on a combination option to order both. Needed 10 of each...the "10" only tranferred to 1 item, not both.  Was not noticed until transaction completed and received a verification.  Called customer service and found out there were two "customer Services" to deal with.  Could not change the order even though it was less than 5 minutes when I first called.   Customer Service is obviouly not in the US...had a communication problem and could not get a "supervisor" as no one was available for 2 hours.   ended up paying for 2 freight charges because we had to place a 2nd order to get the quantity needed.   Could not get any help...will look elsewhere before we place another order of that type.Items were exactly what was needed.    Amazon Customer Service was non-existant
Great DVD's!. I use them on ILO DVD recorder and also for recording home movies or data disk. I have not had a problem with any of them ever. I love them! Plus, a great price!
Good Quality Ink for an Inkjet Printer. The BCI-3eBk is good quality black ink for an inkjet printer.  I have used this ink for a couple of years now and don't recall it smudging on the pages I print.  The price on this product (compared to HP products) is fair, but I am able to print a 100 to 200 pages before running out of ink.  Of course, you will get more pages out of this cartridge if you print more color graphics than text
Finally, rechargables without self-discharge. I had always been frustrated in grabbing the digital camera (Minolta S404, using 4 AAs). We'd have to "schedule" it because by the time we went to grab it, the NiMH batteries would have discharged to the point that a few pictures would shut the camera down. Of course, recharging on the spot is not an option, and leaving the batteries in a charger all the time isn't a good thing either.While the Eneloops have a lower capacity ("merely" 2000MaH), so far they've worked exactly as advertised.We'll see how they hold up over time, but until then, if your digital camera uses AA or AAA batteries, buy 2 sets _immediately_.We'll see if they can be beneficial as an alkaline replacement as well on some RC toys. I'll have to do a cost and waste comparison compared to alkalines..
Fantastic Machine!. I live in central Florida.  Our winters are mild, but we have a bone chilling dampness that sets in December-March.  The heat pump warms the air in the winter, but does nothing for the dampness.I bought the Soleus one year ago.  I cannot believe how much moisture it takes out of the air.  I empty the bucket every morning and night.  The machine has different settings so you can choose how dry you want the air.  The quiet setting works just fine in our home and the machine is very quiet in that mode.  It does generate some heat when it runs, but seeing as it is winter anyway, the heat is welcome.  The Soleus is a snap to maintain, very lightweight and well worth the money.  You can set up a hose to automatically drain the water too.  Our house is 1,450 square feet of living area and the Soleus makes the entire house comfortable.
Same as KDS-60A2000. The only difference in this model and the A2000 is the color.  They are otherwise exactly the same.  This one is all black instead of silver/gray and black.  The A2000 was 2006 model and this is the new 2007 model.  The electronics, display technology, and software are all the same
It Does What I Want. My entire Home Theater is powered through a Panamax isolating / regulating power supply.  All except my sub-woofer.  I wanted to isolate it as well.  I only needed a small socket mounted protection device and I found this item.  It only takes up the lower socket on the standard wall socket, so you can still plug the vacuum into the upper one. The item has one more socket than I needed, no problem, I put a child-safety cover into the other one so nothing else gets plugged in.  It also has a coaxial isolation for your cable, I don't use it.  I give it five stars because it does what I want it to do, and it didn't break the bank
HP 6210 All-in-one. This is a very nice printer for the price.  It is rather slow, but you pay for speed.  The color features are especially nice
Good Product for the Money. I purchased the transmitter because I don't have an aux input in my car. The product works well.  I live in an area that is crowded with stations and the transmitter still provided a strong enough signal to override weak stations and provide near quality audio.One review mentioned the Sansa player won't fit in the transmitter with the silicon case on. I use the silicon case to protect my player.  I took off the belt clip that comes with the case.  The player and case fits well enough in the transmitter.
love it. 1. privacy2. antiglare3. protects lcd screen on notebook4. a snap to install (easy)rocks!!!someone in a restaurant thought I was crazy... typing away with a blank (black) screen!!!       LOLPrice could be lower... 3m woul sell more of thes
Excellent, but sound is not as good as I had expected. The recorder operates well, but the hiss is more than I had expected.  But perhaps others are as bad or worse
My iPod is back to new!!!. I used iCleaner on my so-easy-to-scratch Nano and was very impressed with the results. I followed your instructions and the screen and casing scratches came out leaving a very highly polished, mirror-like finish, just like brand new again. I highly recommend this product
Belkin Wireless 2-Port Print Srvr. ( F1UP0001 ). Works great with my HP OfficeJet 551
Great motherboard for nvidia Core 2 combo. This is one of the few 680i chipset motherboards that was available at the time I was ordering.  Initial setup was very easy and the bios allows sevoptions for a person looking to overclock.  I have this with a E6600 Core 2 and a 8800 GTS video card and other than the first one being defective there have been no issues, and Amazon had a new board sent out the next day when I told them my other board was not working at no charge
I love these DVD's. They print so nicely and look great and record nicely too.
Great little TV. Don't let the bad reviews for this TV on this site dissuade you from purchasing this beautiful TV.  No, you're not going to get a TV with an ATSC tuner for this low price.  Samsung only puts those in the larger sets because smaller sets inherently have better pictures.  I also have a 40" Samsung with the ATSC tuner.  Both beautiful TVs....Despite the bad reviews on this site, I just bought a pair of these for my mother- and sister-in-law.  They were so thrilled with the picture quality and sound, I am going to buy another one for my daughter.
iPod Nano 2 GB. Overall, very enjoyable, sleek design and easy to use.  Wish I had waited for next generation release (a month or so after purchase) to get lower price during transition.  Could get a few more things included for the cost, but the value is good.
Great, if you get it... I ordered this on 2/12 from Amazon and as of today, March 15, 2006, I have not received the refills since there is some delay due to what I understand to be availability/shipment of the product from the manufacturer
Get the updated version of Model One if you can!. The new updated Tivoli Model One adds AUX option to selector knob so you need not disconnect your ipod or other device before listening to AM/FM radio. The price is identical and it is not clear if Amazon is selling the older or newer model. (The photo shows the older model
Excellent MP3, movie, picture, OGG, FLAC player. [...]. This is a small player with small buttons that fits in the jeans change pocket. The navigation is simple and straight forward press the button for menu item then press center OK button your in. The sound quality is Excellent, sturdy and well built body. Line in for direct encoding from another device, portable or home system: MP3 player, CD player, boom box if it has line out or headphone jack it will take the signal and encode to play on the player. Plug and play with other devices, connect to USB, line in, or Aux on home stereo, computer, or boom box and control or play. Don't forget to use in the car...Screen is small, however, store movies on the player to play on portable DVD player and leave the DVDs home or for a quick flight watch fromm screen.Supports many codacs MP3, OGG, WMA, FLAC, WAV and DRM protected files.This is a good choice for Gym, Runners or working outside no moving internal parts to come lose.My daughter enjoys this player and the extra space she has. Has her to favorite movies on it, however, uses more for music, pictures and FM radio.I like the Cowon players, you get many extras that you can't get, or have to pay more for with iPod. iPod CAN NOT touch these players in what counts most the SOUND QUALITY. This company has been making players before iPods, however, Jobs has done an EXCELLENT job at marketing the iPod
great psu. had it for two years now and no problems so far...its great psu for the price.
Excellent product, and I received it free!. This is a great product, and you can get it, along with any other products on Amazon up to $500 Free! Participate in a special promotion and get a free $500 Amazon Gift Card at this web site:   nocostnow.info/amazo
Great  KVM, so far ....... Works well, as they0 said........both ps2 mouse and keyboard work off the same USB plug
Very Impressed. I grew up with a big base scanner.  This one is one eighth the size and picks up so much more.  I programmed in over 50 local frequencies from the Internet and the scan features flies through them, so you don't miss much.  The manual may seem a little intimidating but once you know the basics, the scanner will be easy to operate.Some of the transmissions cut off and on periodically but I live out in the boonies, so that may have something to do with it.  I live in an area that is susceptible to brush fires and floods, so this will come in handy.  Quick delivery too, by the way.  Thank you, Amazon
no complaints. What is there to say?...it's great ink.  I use it in my Epson 2200.  My only wish would be the cost being lower.  :
Very Impressed. This is the first review of a product that I have bothered to take the time to write.  I am extremely impressed with this product!  It was fairly well documented but what floored me was the wizard that actually copied all of the files from the existing boot drive over to the Seagate.  After a quick cable switch it booted right up.  Being a tech support person by trade, I expected the worst and was preparing for a day full of "putting humpty back together again" but it was beautiful!  And it runs fast and quiet.  Thanks Seagate
Work fine. I've used these (and similar) cases for years.  No problems, even with the cats occasionally knocking them around and walking on them.1) I've never had one crack.2) They hold the disc securely, but not with so much force that you risk damaging the disc when removing it.3) As long as you open them properly - from the front (clear) side by pulling near the corner(s) while holding the back (colored) side - they open fine
Great product, slow delivery. The cartridges are great, seem just as good as when I buy them at Staples. The delivery time was a problem. I ordered them the First week of November hoping to have them before Thanksgiving to print pictures for family. the Cartridges didn'come until 4 days after Thanskgiving. Not sure why the shipping was so high for such slow delivery
zhang. We were looking for a compact system and this particular system takes up very little space!  It also has amazing sound
Best bang for the buck. I bought this projector about a year ago (I am also using it with my PC now as I write this) and it has not let me down once.  Regular (non-HD) programming is marginal at best but that is a problem with almost any projector or plasma TV for that matter.  DVD's, PC and console games as well as HDTV (especially sports) are nothing short of amazing.  I have a 92" screen in a mostly dark room but I can also use it with the lights on in this room without any issues (the lights are on now as I write this).  I have the bulb on economy mode and you can barely tell when you switch from full mode to economy mode.  Economy mode is supposed to make the bulb last 30% longer so the very small difference between economy mode and full mode is not enough for me to sacrifice 30% of bulb life.  We use it every day to watch TV or for work.  The ONLY small knock on this is that there is little contract between the darkest shades of dark blacks.  Since I am not a video expert, this may be able to be fixed through adjustments but I am not bothered by this problem enough to try it.  I have considered projectors 1.5 to 2 times the cost of this one but the performance of this one stacks up with them and it is tiny.  I have friends who have projectors that they spent a whole lot more for and they are huge eye sores in the middle of the room.  This one performs as well if not better than that one and it is smaller than your standard dictionary
Great print server. Had tried other print servers, but this one works. I have a HP laserJet 4050, HP 3650 and a HP photosmart 7760 hooked to it and all perform great. The only reason not a 5 is that it is not a simple plug and play. Instructions are poor..you need some knowledge of ports and IP settings. In the end it works great
Magnificent beast of a TV. We have had this TV for 3 days now and are very pleased thus far. Amazon had an amazing deal (which they unfortunately no longer have) through TigerDirect and we managed to purchase this for $779.99 flat with free shipping.The picture and image quality are phenomenal and comparable to the LCDs and plasmas we looked at in Circuit City and Best Buy. The colors (especially the reds, blues and greens) are extremely vivid and sharp, especially with nature shows. The image seems to get a bit grainy when you have dark scenes in movies, but nothing worth crying over. Standard def programs don't look that great, but I think that may be a factor of our digital cable company and not the TV itself. HD programs, however, are SPECTACULAR. We upgraded our digital cable box from Time Warner to HD and set the output at 720p and we are hooked watching even the most crappiest of HD shows.Viewing angle is good. We agree that you lose picture at around 45 degrees. But for our small living room, we're usually watching head on so it's not a problem.For gaming purposes, we hooked our XBox360 up using Monster HD component cables and it is STUNNING. Better than an arcade and in the comfort of your own home. Marvel Ultimate Alliance went from something where you didn't know if you were beating up your fellow team members or the enemies on our old reliable 19" to Spiderman and Captain America running around in your living room destroying Doombots.Sound quality is not on par with the picture quality, but acceptable. Again, in our small confines, we didn't even need to hook up to our speakers and it was fine. Nothing to complain about.Remote doesn't look cool, but is easy to use and allows you to switch inputs, which is nice. TV itself is nicely designed, and is actually not that bulky for a 42".Connections are mislabled as other users have pointed out: composite (1 in), S-Video (1 in), component (2 in), HDMI (2 in) - ONLY 1!!!, RF (1 in), PC VGA (1 in.) - NONE!!! There is something that looks like a VGA input that is not addressed in the instruction manual, but we checked with Toshiba and we think it is an output for updating firmware/servicing.The PIP/POP/PDB options are great and vast. You can switch audio between your 2 sources to whichever you like. You can have XBox on one screen and a TV show on the other. Only thing is you will need to purchase a separate HDMI cable to use PIP (one source must be HDMI, the other can be any of the other sources).Delivery took approximately 1 week and came by special truck freight. They called in advance and were courteous, but there was only 1 poor guy to do the work, so my husband had to lend a hand.Again, we are very pleased with this purchase. Our only concern now is about the DLP lamp blowing after a few months of usage. The 50" model have a few negative comments on Amazon about lamp reliability, but overall good reviews.Short term review - 5+ stars. Long term review - only the future will tell.
I really like it. This is a pretty good mouse, I can't really expound more than those below me but, It is almost the perfect size, maybe just a tad big but, nothing to cause problems. It, in my opinion, is defenitaly not too heavy, it is actually suprisingly light to me. I installed it and it didn't work, I un-installed it and re-installed it and it worked great so, I am thinking it was just user error. This is a really great mouse, my opinion, buy it
Heaven sent. I received an Evenflow vaporizer during my shower and thought it would help once baby & I got sick.  Way to small for my room. I looked at many vaporizers and warm mist humidifiers that would actually work in our room. This one was perfect.  I doesn't run out in the middle of the night, and helps keep the room warm when the heat goes down to low at night [apartment headaches].  The amount of night time coughing has lowered and asthma triggered dryness and dry sinis at night have ended. Perfect buy without the high cost
Great multi-function machine. We liked this one so well we purchased another one for our home office
This device did the trick!. We purchased the Hawking device on the recommendation of our wi-fi provider to boost reception.  It took some trial and error to find the "sweet spot" to maximize the signal, but it works great.  We now travel with it, and it really pulls in access points that are just not visible by our wi-fi crd without it.  It is a bit bulky to transport, but it works when we need it
Excellent deal. Best price I've seen on this TV. Even after shipping, it's about $150 less than the local stores are selling it for. Packaging is well designed to make it easy to remove from the box, and setup was very easy. Picture quality is great, although I was disappointed to find that my local cable provider doesn't have HD channels yet. Still, I have an up-converting DVD player--a must have for getting rid of motion artifacts when watching DVDs on an HDTV. The picture is impressive even though it's not true high definition.Don't waste your money on brand name cables! Amazon has perfectly good generic HDMI cables for like $7
Super Power. These are by far, the best batteries you can get. They last 5 times longer than standard Alkaline batteries, they look cool, and they weigh almost nothing. You'll love being able to save lots of cash by not constantly  running to the store for batteries, and the fact that your portable  electronic will weigh less! I've used these numerious times in many  different electronic devices, and I LOVE THESE BATTERIES! TRY THEM! You  won't be sorry
Great add on to BJC-85. Setup was painless,i was scanning 5 minutes after i opened the box.A &quot;must have&quot; for any BJC-85 owner
Short term reliability. For the time being as I am in the process of purchasing a new computer, the USB device will work for my laptop, taking into consideration the fact that I don't have powered up devices attached to it that would draw from the laptop.
Satisfied overall. Good product. Works fine. Reasonably priced.  The only problem I had was in getting the instructions to come up properly.  I had to figure out how to connect everything on my own.  Thankfully it wasn't that complicated. Everything is working fine.  It does what I needed it to do.
Great drive for the money. I now have about 8 Lacie external USB drives and they have all been great.This one is fast, quiet, well designed and easy to install and use.  Unlike the 250 GB drives, this one does have a fan, but it is whisper quiet.  I acutally did not know it was there until I noticed the vents and put my finger there and could feel the air flow.  Then I listened carefully and could hear it (up close).  But you will never notice it in normal use.Easy to install, very cool design, fast, works good.  Sounds like a five to me. ;)
Great value. After reading countless reviews, I settled on this unit. I'm not disappointed. Great specs, great looks, quality build and materials, great price
Smith Victor - Light Tent. Excellent value and quality. Easy to set-up and take down. The portability factor is great for going almost anywhere
Big Bang for the Buck. These speakers have great sound quality and are perfect for the regular consumer.  Gamers and geeks might want something a little more techy, but they suit me just fine.  They also look great
Scrabblers without Squabble. This recent purchase was actually for a gift; however, I have had the opportunity to tinker with it and get the input of the end user, my 75 year-old father.   My father is still getting used to it and discovering all of its capabilities.  He likes it as an accessory not actually replacing the hard bound dictionary which shows all the spellings close to the words that are searched.  I found the device to be user friendly to those not savvy to computers and/or current electronics.When it comes to challenging a player, it has been quite interesting to obtain such instant results with the capability of prompting for the definition, and the response you are given when the word does not exist.Because the size is so compact without compromising the the size of the screen and ability to see the screen, it is great for taking along in the car or a plane trip because the game features make it intersting enough in which to stay engaged.I am pleased with my purchase.
Does not have S-Video. The Amazon description states this unit has S-Video which is incorrect. This receiver is a great value otherwise
Ultimate iPod Case. If want the ultimate protection for your 30 or 60 GB Apple iPod, then the iSkin eVo3 is for you.A few months ago I purchased my 60GB Video from the apple store. In addition, I bought the iSkin eVo3 and it has been the best accessory I have gotten so far.  It has kept my $400 investment in flawless condition.  In fact, when I cleaned the case recently my iPod looked as it did on the day it arrived.There are many aspects of the case that make it a great buy and they are as follows:(1)  Seemless design, it looks like a product designed by apple.  It fits so perfectly well around the unit that, on occassion, some question if it is the next generation of apple's ipod or some competing brand. It is simply beautiful.(2)  Offers shock resistance with the soft rubberized outer shell.(3)  It makes your iPod virtually scratch proof as, once the case is on, there are no exposed surfaces except for the tiny holes on the back that serve as heat vents.  Everything is protected including the click wheel which - wonderfully - is not impeded by the covering.  In addition, your screen is perfecty safe under the crystal clear hard plastic shield.(4)  Offers water resistance as the skin is practically air tight around your iPod.To sum it up it is the "ultimate iPod case".  Portability, protection, and seemless beauty in one... that is definitely worth the price.Now there a few minor critisms - so minor they might not be even worth mentioning.  However, that is why this isn't the perfect iPod case and why it got only four stars from me:(1)  It's a laborious task getting the skin on and off your iPod, so if you use an armband to go running it will be a little bit of a pain, if you use a docking device, or a cartridge device like the Altec Lansing iM7 it will be a bit of a pain.  But that inconvience is minor.  In fact, I stopped using my armband, the case with the belt clip is all you need and will protect your iPod better than any armband on the market.(2)  The air vents on the back, I feel are unnecessary.  The iPod would be water tight if it wasn't for them. But again... minor.(3)  The rubbery part of the case does collect dust easily, yet it is painfully easy to clean.(4)  Finally, you can't use the hold button without physically altering and cutting the skin...  I never use the hold button, so it is not a big deal to me.  However it does mark exactly where you would cut should want to; making me believe it would be quite easy.I would give this case a 4.9 if I could falling just short of the perfect iPod case/skin.
Best Value!. I left my $300.00 Brookstone NC headphones on a plane once and purchased the Sharper Image NC headphone at an electronics shop in Frankfurt airport.Electronics in Europe are usually 25-50% higher than in the US even if one buys at the airport. However, I have been amazed at the value I have received with this small traveling but big comfort and sound headphones. There would never be a reason why one should spend $200. plus more on a headphone. This is a first rate product and it delivers great sound with excellent comfort.
excellent music quality. I was amazed by this product. It is awesome. Small and since it can be used as a USB flash drive, it worths the money you pay
Excels in every way. I nearly bought a Logitech gamepad but saw the glowing reviews of this device. I just got started back into the action and racing genres It's got great touch and seems sturdy enough for the long haul
Big, beautiful monitor. Excellent aspect ratio and working area.  Superb sharpness, color, brightness, contrast, build quality.  No bad pixels so far.  Good software functionality.  A lower minimum stand height and easier-to-use software would make it perfect
Soleus CFM-40 Dehumidifier. I have used this dehumidifier for about two weeks and I am completely satisfied.  We have had an unusually humid summer in Texas and this device has made my sunroom much easier to aircondition and much more comfortable.  I need to empty the (approximately one and half gallon) tank about twice a day and I'm thinking about connecting a continuous drain hose (a feature that is built into the CFM-40) to the outside. The CFM-40 also runs very quietly, even on high speed. An excellent product
Great Value. Very long battery life.  This is great if you need focused light in a dark setting. Center of the light beam is bright, but the rest of it is weak. Not that visible outside in the bright sun, but great at night and it dark lighting. I own two of these. The light is bright but does not go far. Great flashlight none the less. great value.
Better Performance at an Inexpensive Price. We have a computer that had only 2 USB 1.0 ports.  This card was an easy upgrade that allows use of USB mouse, USB Scanner, and USB Iomega external hard drive for backing up the c:Drive.  It works great and is a good way to get a few extra years out of an old but fully functional computer
Very Good Value for the Price. This keyboard is a very good value.  It has only a PS2 connection, so if you need to use USB you will need a converter plug. I needed a PS2, so it was OK for me. Also, I deducted one star because the cord for connecting to the computer is a little shorter than the one I had, but if your computer isn't too far from your keyboard, you'll be ok.   Keys are quiet and require minimal pressure.  Has a top row of quick link keys including Favorites, Mail, Homepage and Music and others.  Nothing fancy, but if you need a simple, quiet keyboard this one will work well for you
Good value. Really, it is hard to go wrong when purchasing an LCD TV.  Just look for something that is HD, has at least 800:1 contrast ratio and 8 msec refresh rate and is as cheap as possible.  This is a very good TV, with a very good picture, and a very low price.The only major downside with this TV is that is only 720p or 1080i, instead of 1080p.  720p and 1080i are fine for most applications, including HDTV.  But if you want to look to future, you might want a 1080p TV.  The newer HD DVD systems (Blue Ray and HDDVD) and Play Station 3 require 1080p for the best picture.  Personally, I don't think HD DVD will really take off (but I could be wrong) and I am not going to get a Play Station 3, but I would still get a 1080p TV, just in case.  However, I don't think you will find a 1080p LCD TV anywhere close to this price range.The other minor downside to this TV is that it is a little confusing to setup.  It comes with a sheet of quick setup instructions, but there is no paper owners manual.  The owners manual is on CD, or you go online to view it.The default mode on this TV is that the normal antenna connection that you would use for cable TV is disabled.  So, you have to go through the menus on the TV to figure out how to enable the antenna hookup.  After that, you have to instruct the TV to do a channel search, both analog and digital.The TV comes with an ASTC tuner, so that you can get HD channels off the air (for free).  However, getting HD channels off the air can be difficult.  If you get poor reception in your area, then you won't be able to get the HD channels.  Locking on the HD channels is more difficult than the old analog channels.  If you don't have a rooftop antenna on you house, then you need to get rabbit ears.  Then it is like being back in the 1960's with screwing around with antenna placement to get a signal.  I get the best signal with old rabbit ears that my kids broke off, and touching them to a wrought iron stand.  I have been thinking of bringing out the aluminum foil.The TV also has a QOM tuner, so that you can get the HD channels directly off of cable, without getting a special cable box.  For most cable systems, you can pick up all the local HD stations they offer on basic cable (in the Bay Area, it is only 5 of the 12 local stations).  You can pick up ESPN in HD if you have the expanded basic service.  The only thing you can't get is the premium channels like HBO.  For HBO in HD you will still need a cablebox.On most LCD TV's you get right now, the default setup for the picture quality is not optimally set up.  This is especially true for standard analog TV.  When you first hook up an LCD TV, the picture can look pretty bad.  You will need to go in and adjust the color, contrast and other settings to get the best picture quality.  Although the defaults on the Olevia were better than some others I have seen.Although Syntax and Olevia are relatively new names they are recognized as one of the leaders in LCD TV's.  It is hard to go wrong with this TV.In the end, I recommend choosing the size TV you need, deciding if you really need 1080p, and then buying the cheapest TV you can find.
Great disc changer. I had one of the older models for many years before it quit working and I just loved it, so I went looking for another one.  I couldn't believe none of the stores carry these anymore so I was thrilled to find it on the internet.  It came really fast, was packaged very well and works like a charm. I really like the single CD player feature which my other one had, too.  I would recommend this disc changer to anyone
Sony Bean. I just ordered the second one for our family.  It's the 3rd Sony MP3 player to join our househould.  They've been very dependable, and they're easy to use.  The software is simple.  The sound is great, and the batteries hold a charge for an incredible amount of time.  My teenagers (girls) love that they come in colors, and they're different than what most of their friends have.  Mom loves that they're affordable
Fuji Film memory stick. The product is exactly what i was informed it was and was delivered sooner than expected. I have no complaints at all
So Pretty. This Holiday Tree is so pretty & festive hooked up to my PC via USB wire.  I hope the company comes out with many more this coming Xmas. I have 3 computers to hook it up to & they make a great gift
EXCELLENT VALUE. Got this unit to replace a fried Mitsubishi. The old unit got to the point that it would freeze on every dvd. This one had good reviews and I must say it seems to be worthy of it's reviews.We've had it about 2 months now and it plays everything, even dvd's that were completely unplayable by the Mits. We're not using hdmi.....Would definitely recommend
antennae up high solved my problem. My signal strength increased from 1 bar to 4 bars when I installed the antennae stand on the wall. My PC tower sits on the floor, and the signal had to go thru the PC and several walls to the router.  This device made my connection go from very unreliable, to excellent.  Good solution for my installation
Use it all the time. I make a lot of presentations.  This little unit stays with me no matter where I travel on business.  The case makes it easy to keep the two components together when not in use and reduces the risk of loss or damage.  Have not found a PC that did not work with it.  Whenever some one else uses it, they want to know where they can get one.General use (page up/page down, and laser) are simple to use.  But there is more that can be done, just not intuitive to figure out the more advanced features.  But then again, not sure I need them
Superb value, good sound quality, just bought two more. This microphone is a great value for the money.  It records/captures loud and clear.  Very good pick up of sound.  I've used a lot of different mics for various things.  This is a very good value for a PC based microphone. It works excellently with Dragon Naturally Speaking.
Idiot Proof Remote. First time I've ever written a review.  I'm not a high tech type, and sometimes it's nothing but frustration for me to deal with high tech stuff.  This remote was a breeze to program, and works fantastic.  My wife and daughter are even less high tech and love it.  Any problems with use, just press "help" and the remote with ask you questions and correct the problem.  Highly recommended
Problem fixed. The product arrived in very damaged condition - about 15 of the cases were smashed.  However, the seller promised to refund my money if I wrote a positive review - which works fine with me.  The cases that weren't smashed are great
Better than average, does it's job. First off let me tell you what equipment I'm running with it.It's a basic set up:DLP TV, Sony DVD player, Directv DVR, Pioneer receiver. HDMI only running from DVD to tv.Very basic. First of all the programming via the web was a breeze really. No hangups as so many have mentioned. I was done in 20 minutes. Basically as long as you can get the names and model numbers of your equipment you are ok. I called Direct TV to get the exact model number of my DVR.After programming, oh and I have DSL internet, so it wasn't slow, the remote immediately took over for my others. It worked right off.Some have mentioned syncing problems. If you don't leave the remote facing the devices long enough when you use the activity selections(watch TV, watch DVD, listen to radio etc.) then sometimes it will turn on the first couple of components and not the other, but the help function quickly takes care of this. You can also get it all back in synch if you simply press the device button and turn off the other equipment then start new with the activities button again.I haven't really had problems with reading the screen as many have mentioned and the functions are pretty easy to come by as soon as you get used to the layout of the remote. It turns itself off after two hours of non use and when you pick it up it turns itself back on.The reason behind this particular remote purchase for me was ease of set up and the activities buttons layout. I wanted something that would be user friendly so when I have someone watching my house they could easily perform the basic functions of the system like watching a dvd without hitting wrong buttons and messing up presets and such on the receiver or things like that.The only reason I don't give this five stars is that the remote does feel a bit on the fragile side and if you have kids I could see them dishes out some mean punishment on this thing. For instance if you press on the soft number buttons to harshly they can get stuck under the casing. This happened once. Not a big deal but still.I would say this is not a child friendly remote and let them use the ones that came with the devices instead.Other than that. Great product and so far so good
Perfect Vista Tuner. Getting the Tuner to work was as easy as pointing driver installation to the drivers folder on the included winTV disc.  After Installing three different remote apps on the disc, along with a vista mce patch, the remote now works perfect with Vista's MCE.  The picture looks great, and the remote is pretty good.I now need a bunch of HD Space though due to my recordings with MCE.  Which is only 90 hours with my 400 Gigs...  I love the quality of this sound card, it is great.  But of course there is no documentation... the only down side.  On vista, click cancel on the prompts.  open the cd manually and run setup.  It should run the Vista Installer automatically.  If something goes wrong, just do what i did and click every remote app till your remote works! heh.  Also, The silver IR Receiver works with the remote .  The other one is for changing channels on your cable box when using the s-video in.(again, no documentation)I would definitely buy again (I might buy one more for dual HD tuners in MCE if they support it)
Great Power Strip. Bought 2 of them and like them.  After much research these seemed to be the best for the money
Just Amazing !!!!!. The first time I saw this piece was at Wal-mart. I had listened to Sony,Philips, JVC, Panasonic, RCA in that order, the difference was instantly clear. Then I went back to listen to the Philips again and the difference was clear.I recommend that first time buyers should go to a store with several brands on display that they could listen to. I made up my mind that if  I wanted a home theater in a box (HTIB)package it will be the Philips brand.This was about 10 months ago. Each time I stopped by the electronic section of any store I would check it out. Finally, I decided to buy one. Next thing was to read expert reviews and consumer reviews. Most reviews rated it high. However, I was concerned about the hissing sound some consumers had experienced.I still went ahead to buy one at Fred Meyer for $179:00 on sale, if I did not like it, I will return it, I reasoned. I bought the black colored piece. Costco and Radioshack had it on sale for the same price but Fred Meyer is closer to my home.Since adding this piece to our family room, the audio effects in our family room is certainly more welcoming, warmer , richer and entertaining than before.I will address the concerns of a few reviews here.1. Hissing sound: I found none, but discovered that if the audio OUT on your TV has one jacket like mine, instead of two or three jackets, then you need to get an extension RCA jacket that will split your one outlet to two or three OUT jackets with the apporpriate color codes (white, red (for two jackets) and yellow for the third jacket) to match the audio IN jacket (white and red) of the DVD player, otherwise you will get either a humming or hissing sound. Please note that the key here is to have the color codes on your TV audio OUT,to match the color codes on your Philips DVD  audio IN otherwise you will get a humming or hissing sound.2. DVD player jumping disc: You are using a defective disc. solution: change your disc.3. Back speakers not working: They will not work if you do not use the remote control to adjust the surround and sound buttons to the appropriate mode e.g. movie , stereo etc. Sometimes, some movies are not recorded to produce surround sound effect, so change the TV channel or your DVD disc.4. Speaker wires not long enough:Some consumers had enough length, mine were too short for our large family room (too large for me to bother to measure). One reviewer was able to use banana plugs to make the adaptation,I could not. So I returned the banana plugs, I bought from Home depot. Instead, I  bought some digital extension cables. They come in different sizes 14G,16G,18G,20G etc. The smaller the size number, the thicker the cable, the better, to avoid loss of digital signals. I bought size 14G. The risk with attaching extension cables is that since you will have to cut into the original cables that come with the equipment you can not return your equipment to the store nor sell it at ebay for a good price if you wanted to,since it will be considered tampered with. But be reassured you will not need to dispose of this equipment once you have it properly set up.If you decide to use additional extension cable/wire, cut the orginal wire at about 6 inches from the speakers. Attach your extention cable to this cut end and run the attached extension cable from your speaker location to where your equipment is.Then attach the other end of your extension cable to the other end of the original cable, so you can still use the proprietary speaker plugs that came with your equipment to attach to the back of the set.This method makes it cosmetically suitable to have one cable (i.e. the extension) run through your entire room and at the same time use the the proprietary plugs attached to the orginal cable at the other end with your equipment, which by the way is the only plug that fits into the jackets at the back of the DVD player/receiver.REMEMBER to tape over all exposed wires/cables with nonconductive electric tape. Normally, comes in black.Caution: you need to buy enough length of extension cable though, they come in 25ft, 50ft and 100ft length. Having a large room I bought three 50 feet cables to do the job satisfactorily.The cost for each 50 ft cable was $19:00.5. Wall mountings:The enclosed wall mountings are fixed. You can not rotate the position of your speakers once mounted. For less than $15:00 at Wal-mart , I bought a set of 5 speakers wall mounts that I can rotate from side to side or move up and down to a suitable head angle.Speaking of the sound production, it is clear, crisp and true theater realism. The sonics can not be described justily unless you hear it for your self.Do your self a favor and buy one.But for the proprietary plugs that make it difficult to consider using extension cables , I would have given it 5 stars. Philips should make the plugs universally adaptable, so consumers wil not have second thoughts about adding extension cables, if they needed to. Better still, Philips could add more length to the cables or make provisions for one to order fitting extension cables through them so you do not have to cut into the original cables.
Best Nano Armband. I spent a lot of time researching armbands for my nano.  I ordered this product and I am totally satisfied.  The armband is made out of a nice, soft microfiber that is very comfortable to wear for long periods of time.  The armband slides through the case that comes with it, so the nano is totally secure.  I would recommend this product, especially for the price
How many pictures will it store?. How many pictures will it store?  It is the most commonly asked question from digital camera enthusiast but usually the question that is the most difficult to get a straight answer about.  Well, considering I worked in the memory industry for over 7 years I can help clarify this perplexing question and do so unbiased as I have since changed industries.The Lexar Media 1GB SD Card SD1GB -32-231, like most 1000MB cards, will store on average 1137 pictures when used with a 2 megapixel camera, 853 images when used with a 3 megapixel camera,  512 pictures when used with a 4 megapixel camera, 409 images when used with a 5 megapixel camera, and 320 pictures when used with a 6 megapixel camera.  These numbers are based off the assumption that you are going to shoot your images at the highest quality JPEG setting available for the camera and understand that they are estimates and may be off by as much as 10 percent due to numerous factors including the complexity of the scene being shot and the compression algorithm used by your specific camera.One last thing to consider when buying a 1000MB card.  Do not necessarily choose the least expensive card available.  A 1000MB card should be an investment.  You need to consider quality, reliability, and speed with a card of this capacity.  Worse case scenario would be you taking this card (and only this card) on vacation with you overseas and for some reason it gets corrupted.  Then what do you do?  Purchasing a high capacity card changes the game a little, just be mindful of that before you hit the buy button.I truly hope this review was helpful to you in determining whether this card is the right capacity for your specific needs
Dane Elec 512 MB Secure Digital Card Review. This type of card came with the digital camera I purchased and performs great--I've had no trouble with them. Everything works as it should with the camera and uploading onto my Picasa Photoshop Program.  I just went from a 128MB card to the 512MB card so I could get more photos on the card.  Service was fast--received it in about 4 days
The best PC joystick on the market !. I have owned the CH Products Fighterstick for a little over a month now and I am now ready to compose a full review. I have been a MS Sidewinder force feedback2 user for years. I was very happy with that stick but when I started playing Lock On I decided that it was time to step up to the plate and purchase a real HOTAS system. At first glance the fighterstick appears to be built to last. It is constructed of very heavy gauge plastic and all of the devices seams are sealed properly. It is not flimsy or fragile in appearance or feel.The stick only comes with an instruction sheet. There is no owners Manual or software disk included. The new owner must download the drivers and CH Control Manager software from the CH website. Setup is a very simple operation which involves plugging your stick into it's own USB port and running the drivers software. Setup was completed without a hitch and I did not miss the absent owners Manuel. I then proceeded to use the CH Manager software to configure the stick for the first time. It was at this time that I encountered my first and only problem while using the software. While attempting to configure the Y axis I noticed that the stick's signal would jump from one end of the scale to the other with very little movement from the stick itself. I could not figure out what the problem was on my own so I called CH customer service and they told me to be sure and center the two trim wheels before configuration. Sure enough after I corrected the position of the two wheels, the configuration process was completed without a problem.Next, I ran Lock On in order to put the stick through it's first flight trials. The Fighterstick fits my medium sized hand very well. My only complaint is the fact that button #2 is located very high on the stick and is hard for me to reach without repositioning my hand. I believe this is due to the fact that this stick is based on the design of the F-16 joystick configuration. The problem with this choice of design styles is that the real F-16 stick is mounted between the legs and at about waist height inside the cockpit, where as the CH Fighterstick will be mounted on some ones desktop. This creates an ergonomic problem that the F-16 design was not meant to handle. Beside my issue with button #2, I have experienced no other problems with manipulation of the stick ingame.Stick response and accuracy are very good. I can pull all kinds of high "G" maneuvers, fire all kinds of weapons and deploy my counter measures with a level of speed and accuracy that I have never experienced before. All the buttons work as programmed and the x/y axis is very smooth. Some say that the springs in the stick base are very lite. I don't feel that there is anything unusual or loose concerning the feel of this stick. I am very comfortable with the level of tension in the stick. Keep in mind that I have been working with the Sidewinder up to this point and that this may be the reason why I don't have a problem with the level of tension in the stick.CH Control Manager is a wonderful program that gives you the ability to adjust all of the sticks important settings. It also allows you to create your own personal button program maps which can be loaded or saved for future use. CH Control Manager does not come with a tutorial so you will need to consult with an experienced user in order to fill in the blanks left after you have read the online user guide, as I did. After asking a few questions on an internet user forum I was ready to begin programing the stick for the first time. Once you know how to use it, CH Control Manager is a joy to work with. However it is not as intuitive as I would have liked it to have been.The CH products Fighterstick is considered the top of the line PC flight controller. Unlike Thrustmaster's best stick it doesn't have any outstanding quality control issues. The Fighterstick has an excellent maintenance record and I am confident that it will last me for many years of flight siming fun.Update: I stand corrected on the position of the stick in the real F-16, however I stand by my criticism of the feel of the stick when used in the desktop position. Thanks to the PC cockpit I now use, I no longer experience this problem
Superb and never die out batteries. These batteries are far stable and durable in long term use. I have owned non-brand name and Kodak rechargeable batteries. They are either unstable voltage output or die out much earlier than their publicized life-span. Sometimes one in pair die out then other remains(Not SONY). I can't use them for the digital camera power source because it requires delicate and stable voltage supply.Those SONY batteries seemed not to go down voltage levels and when their charge are drained, the pair(2 batteries) go down together.It's perfect use for an equipment that needs constant and stable power supply, like digital camera
Works great, but live support  may be a wait. Newbie to wireless. Bought this one because I wanted to keep it simple, and this one apparently does that well- better than some much higher-priced models. My brand new Vista notebook (Dell) works fine with this. Didn't add any alternate firmware either.Have never had any problems getting onto or staying on my network in the two months I've had this. Also was able to easily pick up networks at various airports and to get online while visiting a condo community network that other laptops couldn't access.Only reason I haven't given it a 5 is that it often takes a 30-minute plus wait to get to a human in their 24/7 tech support. I think Buffalo could improve this, but most reviews seem to indicate that you'll almost never need to contact them. They have been very patient and helpful both times I did work with them.I just added AES encryption today with the help of tech support and will add comments later if I have any problems. Wish I'd thought to ask about adding intrusion protection, but it may be better to wait until Vista is more common to ask about that. Too many firewalls can be problematic.I'd buy it again. Just call early AMs for best shot.
Great value for Kingston high quality. This is a great value for pair of 512 MB DDR400, one more reason to avoid those no-name brand memories out there
Very, very good sound quality; don't expect to go jogging. Sound quality is the best I've heard for an earphones product. The only negative I have found is that they are nearly impossible to use while running
Memorex DVD-RW Media Review. I am very enthused about being able to purchase your product via the Internet and at a very reasonable price. It's very hard to find the correct media for my recorder at local stores, i.e. Walmart, etc.. Even Best Buy & Circuit City(Memphis, TN) don't seem to carry them. Keep up the good work. I applaud you.J. Rud
Great deal for the price. I installed 5 of these in the ceiling of a small family room as the primary speakers for my "secondary" home theatre. Along with a fairly cheap subwoofer, they are certainly more than acceptable -- and much better than I expected considering the price. If you're looking for cheap surround speakers or even a full set, and you're not an audiophile, I doubt you'll be disappointed. My only issue is with the directional tweeter that is basically a "bubble" in the center of the grill...the JBLs I have in my main system look much nicer as the grills are completely flat, without this "bump." Overall, though, highly recommended for home theatre on a budget
Great ! Transportable Mini Speakers. These speakers were purchased as part of a birthday present for my son.  We do minimalist camping excursions with the family to remote cabins in addition to overnight canoe trips.  The speakers fit into the corner of a pack - batteries last a very decent amount of time - sound is clear and good volume for our purposes.  These are NOT big boombox sound but great for a day at the beach or picnic etc. No regrets and would recommend for use with an MP3 player
iPod U2 30 GB Special Edition - just great!. You'll never get disappointed with it...it's great
Great drive, wish the drive were attached to the lanyard, rather than the cap. I've had this USB drive for about a month and It's been terrific. I haven't noticed any speed issues, but I'm basically managing small files. I've had no trouble with it in Windows 2000, OS X and FreeBSD. My only complaint is that the cap is attached to the lanyard, not the drive itself. I can easily forsee a time when I reach for the drive and find that it has come unattached somewhere. This seems poinless to me, as there's a nice little latch on the lanyard to disconnect the CAP from the lanyard. If I'd looked more closely at the photos, I'd have figured this out. Still, I have no regrets
Great product w/ great great sound well worth the money. Great product w/ great great sound well worth the money. I bought 7 pair
Outstanding Educational Tool. I bought this for my freshman son and he loves it.  Not only can he use it for algebra but it also has organizer software that helps him stay on track at school.  Well worth the $$
Fantastic!. Shipped very fast from pattyir...much faster than I thought it would.  The Belkin F5D8010 Wireless Pre-N 802.11x Pre-N Notebook PC Card Adapter works wonderfully.  Very easy setup and an immediate connection to the Internet. I'm very pleased
bang for the buck. A good no frills wall mount for your flat screen.  Good, heavy construction.  Plenty of hardware and excellent directions for mounting.  Finish was also good, no bare metal or unfinished surfaces.  Only horizontal adjustability, but good enough for most applications
EQ 200. Buying an equalizer seems kind of retro these days, but I still have a good cassette dual deck and have recently purchased a reel to reel again.Used to have one years ago...now use both of these for fun and the occassional uploading of music from the old formats to my media center computer.The equalizer acts as a hook up device to have both decks on my stereo which is then hooked to my computer.It allows for some sound enhancing along with the computer
No reason not to like it!. I use these Sony tapes in my Sony DCR-TRV310 Digital 8 camcorder.  The quality is great, even after you record over it.  Sixty minutes in D8 is fine for me and I see no reason to disapprove of the tape's performance
Getting colors right for photo editing. Great product, and great price at amazon! I live in Malaysia, where the local price is 250% of Amazon's list price. For USD9$ (shipment) I had it delivered in Singapore in just a few days, and picked it up at my friend's place. First thing that came out when I plugged it in, was that my old monitor had lived its useful life. Althought the colors were still correct(able), the overall luminosity was so low that I could only work in a dark room to view the full scale. I bought a new LCD monitor, calibrated and profiled it in a few minutes (it wasn't quite right straight out of the box - too bright), and now all my pictures come out beautifully! I can display 256 shades of grey distinctively, which was previously impossible. It's not just photos, even the dull windows interface suddenly comes to life. Highly recommended to anyone with a DSLR and a desire to spend more than 5 minutes improving their pictures on photoshop.
Quality product with WRONG manual. WARNING: PSW10 does not have a single subwoofer socket. Instead, you need use L or R socket for its stereo inputs.Good quality. Sounds ok, matched with my purchase of a pair of R50.Recommended for entry level home theater system
Great Performances. The product performs great. It produces quality sound and offers excellent value for its price point. The stereo does everything the manufacturer claims and it meets all my needs
WORKS GREAT. The Modem was VERY easy to hook up, I plugged it up connected the wires and it hooked right up and worked.  It couldn't be easier and since I hooked it up it has provided flawless service.  I have used D-Link devices before and all of them have done everything I need them to.  Thank you, D-Link
One of the better cases available. I bought this case because I wanted good screen protection that didn't have to be attached to the iPod. I also needed access to the docking port (for my car stereo) while it is in the case, and a belt clip.The case fits perfectly around the iPod without any spacers. The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is that the belt clip attaches very tightly to whatever you clip it to, but can be difficult to remove without using both hands.I don't have any scratches, but I know it's going to get scratched because it's made of plastic. If you can't live with that, then get something else
HDTV. Great service, prompt delivery,works great.Only draw back is eventhough it's an HDTV there is no cable card
Exaclty as advertised. Very solid, nice looking shelf, easy to assemble with good instructions and all required pieces included.  It's exactly as I expected it
Worked great for me!. I had a DVD that was scratched during shipping. One repair kit did nothing to help it. I considered using the Skip Dr., but I never cared for what it did to the disks. My church's Media Center uses the Optifix system, so I decided to try it, too. The scratch was gone, and the DVD plays with no problem whatsoever. I'll admit that not all scratches can be repaired this way; some scratches cannot be repaired at all. I just know that it worked great for me
Samsung LT-P1545 15" Flat-Panel LCD TV. First, I would buy it again if I needed to.  This 15" takes up less space on the kitchen counter, i.e., speakers are on the bottom. Second, picture and sound are excellent, i.e, clear.I would not buy this item if I wanted a true VESA mount to monitor configuration.  The stand, not the monitor, has the screw holes for the VESA wall mount.  Not enough or clear info in the description. However, it is just as easy to turn on the counter as on the wall.  If you need counter space then buy something else.
WR-300 Midland. Wonderful product with one exception - You have to reset it if there is no weather warnings/watches in a 10 day period.  The instruction booklet does not make it clear as to how to do this.  I tried several times to re-set my weather monitor and never could. Finally we had a thunderstorm warning in my county and it re-set itself once the warnings had expired
Perfect. Little.  Easy to use.  Tons of storage space.  Perfect for what we needed.  Now we never have to worry about losing our music or pics.  Great buy
Excellent CD Player...so far. Ok, so I've only had this player 1 day. Still, it is exactly what I was hoping it would be. It plays all my "trouble" CDs like home-made CD-Rs that have some scratches. I love the snap that holds the cover down. I love that all the buttons are big and directly on the front cover - very easy to use. I went for a walk with this in a sholder bag and it never skipped. It DOES have the auto-resume feature where if you are listening to a CD and then turn off the unit...when you turn it back on it starts where you left off. The entire unit feels VERY solid, like it won't break. I also like the clean styling, no crazy designs, just a good player. ~ The user manual could be a little clearer, but with a little playing around everything makes sence. ~ One example is it doesn't have a "stop" button when playing CDs. You have to press the "radio off" button. Easy enough to figure out, but it doesn't say that in the manual.Overall, great product. I'm very happy with it.
As good as Monster, a fraction of the cost. I bought these from Amazon last fall to connect my DVD player to my new HD.  I did not want to shell out the $100 for monster cables and figured I could only loose $8 getting these.  They have worked out very well!  I am very impressed with the signal quality.  I compared my picture recently to a friends.  While we both have rear project HD sets, we have different brands of TV and DVD.  He has monster cables.  I did not see any difference in the appearance compared to my setup.Save yourself the money and get these.  They work great
great little printer. I received the cp720 model along with a canon digital camera and I am thoroughly impressed by the quality of prints that this prints- I would have believed that these photos were printed from a lab if I didn't know otherwise.The replacement ink cartridge is extremely easy to use and replace, no mess. They are designed for a specific number of prints and they work great right up until the end, so there are no faded pictures when your ink is low.The photo paper is very nice, thick stock, and glossy, with perforated edges.You are limited to paper by the manufacturer, but refills are reasonably priced, compared to getting prints professionally made
Nice case for a 15.4" Laptop. Good value in this bag.  It serves my purposes well in transporting my 15.4" laptop to and from work.  The only thing I would recommend the manuf. to change would be to make the small pouch for the cell phone out of leather also
Garmin USB Data card programmer. It would be impracticale to buy a memory card larger than 32 meg without buying this product.  I had the 32 meg memory card, and it took about 8 hours to load the maps in using a serial connection (cut the battery life in half while flashing).  Now I flash a 128 meg card with the usb programmer, and the total time to load ~127 megs of maps (including indexing time) is about 13 minutes.  This was on a 400 MHz Windows 2000 computer.  If you have a faster computer, it may be able to index the maps faster. I highly recommend this product
Works just as expected. The cable elecrically works fine.  The length (6 ft.)is adequate and it has a little green power LED on the cigarette Lighter plug that indicates the presence of 12 volt power.  Appears to be well made
Great headphones. I love these headphones.  Combined with the Sound Blaster X-Fi, it gives me the best sound I've ever heard from my PC.  Really great value for someone looking for a first set of above average headphones
Must Have Item!. The external antenna is essential for vehicle use.  It allows the GPS to acquire more satellites faster and boosts the accuracy and reception in a huge way.  It comes with a magnetic mounting, a suction cup mounting, and a screw-on mounting.  It's a must have for any serious GPS user
Excellent sstem. Looks sleek and sexy. This CD player is great. The chicks love it. It is very cool looking and plays good stuff like mp3's so I can fit about 120 songs on 1 cd. It is really cool
Great Multifunction Device. It was between this and the other brother mfc that performs duplex printing for my home office which two people use on a daily basis. We figured we didn't need the duplex (although we wanted it!), so we decided to save about 100.00 and go with this one.I was very pleased with the construction, installation (XP) and documentation. Brother has a new customer in my organization. Coming from HP, I was acustomed to clunky software, and machines that wouldn't always perform as planned.I couldn't be happier with this product and would recommend to all
must have professional. picture sound all great. the only problem is that you must have an advanced degree in english,engineering,and computer science to set the television up.  without my cable company making a house call setup is impossibl
Grayish. As much as I like the MP450, I use it for photo printing mostly, and must say I'm still looking for a printer that represents black better.Comparing photos from an actual lab to the MP450's output, the print doesn't use the black cartridge when printing color, so black is generated by mixing all available colors, resulting in a grayish tone instead of black.Other than that, it's a fine printer
Neuros 2 Recorder. This product is Great. Easy to use, and a great problem solver for mpeg 4 conversions. Simple one button start and stop recording. Great Product. A must have
Works well, but tricky to set up. I received this unit via my home insurance after my RCA 5-disc changer was stolen.The unit itself is solidly built, and I don't have any issues with the playback performance or picture quality. I think if you get this unit, you'll be pretty happy with it.What stinks is the documentation, remote, and setup.The manual is your typical poorly-translated engrish guide that most people have come to expect from inexpensive electronics. Fortunately, if you've had any experience setting up a DVD player, there's not much different here.Unless you want progressive scan.Here's what you have to do if you want to use progressive scan mode:1. Connect both the component cables AND an S-Video (or composite) cable to your TV. Hopefully it has both inputs (most HDTVs do).2. Put your TV on the S-Video (or composite) input.3. Enter the Setup menu (not to be confused with the Options menu!) and choose Progressive output.4. Now you can unhook the S-Video (or composite) cable and put your TV on Component input mode.Thankfully this is a one-time hassle, but it's still assinine that Panasonic couldn't have either designed an autodetect or used a physical switch like my old RCA had. With the RCA, I just hooked up the component cables, flipped the switch, and set up the DVD player for 16:9 aspect ratio and I was done.Lastly, the dreaded H07 error. I think I figured out what's probably causing the majority of them: when you eject the tray, the currently playing CD/DVD is still on the motor and continues to play. A neat feature for swapping the other discs without interrupting your music, but the upshot is that the ejected tray has an empty slot in it.Can you guess what happens if you accidently put another CD/DVD into the seemingly empty slot by mistake?To avoid this, instead of using the Eject function, use the Swap function. This will stop the playback and make sure all the discs are out of the drive and avoid damage.Overall, a great player for the price. Just be careful with it and bear with the tricky setup
Good product good price. This works great for me! I love it...i watch t.v. on my computer all the time now..
Samsonite L45 Notebook Case. Well designed, well built laptop case.  Fits widescreen laptops securely.  Have two of them, would recommend.
NOAA Alert. I have not experienced any severe weather since purchasing the NOAA Alert. I do not use the alsrm clock feature since I am retired
Midland GTX550. Excellent radio.  This radio has silent mode, good range in the hills, weather radio, many sub codes.  It is much better than the new model, 650, because the 650 has compatability problems with other GMRS radios.  A good choice
First Laptop Accessory You Should Buy. I looked at other locks in stores and did some online research and everything pointed to the MicroSaver DS with keys.  While nothing will stop a determined thief I believe this is the best security available.  It's well thought out, easy to use, and simply looks tough.  It slips into a laptop bag easily yet it's long enough that you'll always be able to find something to attach it to.  I use it while travelling and even at home.I look at it this way.  Once you realize that there is a device like this available you have to buy it and use it.  Otherwise, you have no one to blame but yourself if your laptop is stolen
great product... i first bought a monster product equivalent in bestbuy, and it absolutely sucked. after buying this i am very happy i did. It works just how it says it does
No Problems with these CD's. I have found that, for the most part, if I purchase a name brand product I usually get good quality.  These Memorex CD's have been working just fine for me
Usable replacement for most multifunction remote controls. I needed a a new remote because the one that came with my ReplayTV had stoped functioning, the most used push buttons had, properly. I needed a remote that would control atleast six components and the Magnavox PMDVR8-8 device remote was right for me. It also had three programable macro programs that come in handy. Did I mention a good remote at a great price? Well it is. Only down side was, like any universal replacement remote it will not replicate all the functions of the OEM remotes that it replaces. However I am more than well pleased with my choice of a universal remote and as always it's a pleasure doing business with Amazon
What else can I say but... What else can I say but "it's excellent!!! I enjoy using it, traveling with it, using it to carry music and video's, and talking books, back and forth to work. The only thing it needs is a convienient way to hook it up to my car speaker system with out major surgery
VCR/DVD  operation. I found the setup very straightforward and was able to run the basics very quickly. It was difficult to follow details after basic recording.It took several weeks of background reading of the various DVD formats and what would function with what. A non-technical person would not be able to grasp the operation beyond the basics. I would reccommend a rewrite of the manual
excellent!!!!!!. this quite an incredible moue pad,  few days ago there was an online write who said that this mouse pad didn't work with the mx revolution, well let me say it does indeed, and its increible comfortable mouse pad
Works, but not quite what I expected. I guess my expectations of the product didn't fall in with what the product is supposed to do. Was expecing the filter to cut off the screen totally beyond a certain angle, but the reality is more like the screen gets progressively dimmer as the angle widens.Brought it on the plane when I was flying coach. My co-worker in the next seat could still vaguely see the graphics and color contents of my screen, albeit at a much dimmer view and it was hard to read the small prints. The guy at the next aisle probably can't see anything though
wow!. Well I did a bunch of research before purchasing this projector.  I was a little leary as there is no location local to me that carries the thing so I was never able to witness it in person before ordering but no one seemed dissapointed.  And I can still say I know of no one that is.  This is an amazing projector for the price.  Even with only a progressive scan dvd player the picture if phenomenal.  The crispness is exceptionaly clear on complex scenes (Lord of the rings) or color differences (Sin City).  A superb product and a great price.Have not tried the HDMI interface yet however.  No real plans to either until the timing issues have been worked out in the standard.  So can't say how good the image is off that yet
High performance memory. I bought Sony's 1 GB MSX-1GN memory stick for use in Sony's new Cybershot DSC W7 camera.  The memory stick has performed exceptionally well.  I can store hundreds of high quality, 7 MB photos on it.  Or, I can store about 15 minutes of camcorder-quality video on it, recorded at full 640x480 and 30 fps.The chief qualities that set this memory stick apart (and probably why it costs more than other Pro memory sticks with the same storage capacity) are speed and durability.  On the durability side, all of the recent flash media, such as memory sticks, compact flash, and SD cards, are notoriously fragile and can be easily damaged by wide fluctuations in temperature and weather conditions.  Sony has ramped up the durability of this card dramatically, claiming that it can handle temperatures from -13 to 185 degrees Fahrenheit.  I'd have to see that to believe it, but nevertheless, it is a good thing to have a more durable card.The real advantage of this card, though, is its speed.  It can support read/write speeds of up to 80 megabits per second.  To put that in perspective, your typical cable or DSL broadband Internet connection can only handle 1 to 3 megabits of data per second.  And even the earlier Sony Pro media (for example, see their 1 GB Pro MSX-M1GS memory stick), though they were very good, could only support around 15 megabits per second.  So that makes you realize just how fast the new MSX-1GN really is.  It's important to remember that just because the memory stick supports such read/write speeds, that doesn't mean it will actually work that fast in your camera or other device.  Each device has its own bottlenecks and limitations, but the important point here is that the memory stick itself will never slow your device down. So if you buy a new hot rod digital camera that boasts of having very little "lag" time between shots, you can be sure that this memory stick will be able to keep up with the camera, so that you won't have to miss that perfect shot while waiting for the last picture to be written to memory.This is an excellent product, and I would highly recommend it.  My only regret is that the 2 GB card was not available at the time that I bought my camera.  An important point to take away is, Sony has lots of memory sticks with lots of model numbers.  But if you get one, make sure you get the latest ones in the "GN" series (as in, "MSX-1GN" for the 1 GB card, or "MSX-2GN" for the 2 GB card), because these are the ones with the great read/write speed.  Note that these sticks cost almost twice as much as the other Sony memory sticks of the same memory capacity, but be assured, they are well worth it and you should not hesitate to buy the faster ones.  Why would you want to shell out $400 to $1000 for a cool new camera, and then skimp on the memory and buy slow memory that causes you to miss great shots or take poor quality video clips
Goes Together Easily. I enjoyed putting this together. The spacers kinda threw me until I realized you use 2 per pole under each corner of a shelf. I got it assembled then my daughter pointed out that the DVD shelves weren't spaced properly [CD sized] so I had to take it apart and redo it, but that wasn't too bad. The spacers snap apart easily enough, even for my feeble fingers.  It's not terribly sturdy [maybe I didn't get the poles screwed down tightly enough] but as long as it's in its permanent location, holds the multimedia well. I really like the way it looks. Bought this item for my teenager and will have to get myself one, too :
Very Clear Headphones. I had been shopping for a pair of headphones with the ability to block out background noise for sometime now since I work in a loud environment. I had been really shy about buying this pair or any for that matter because some reviews weren't favorable. I was nervous. However, I bought these because of the name Altec Lansing has in audio. I was shocked when I first listened to them. I had to replace the rubber tips and use the foam ones because the rubber ones were just not that comfortable. But wow! The clarity of these phones are incredible. No matter what others said about these, I found the bass to be tight, but not booming. If someone wants booming bass like what would be heard in nightclubs, then they need to stay away from headphones period. If you are searching for a pair of IEMs, then if I were you, I would seriously consider this pair. Just make sure the seal is tight and they are in all the way, which I never really found that to be an issue. I don't really understand what others were doing wrong with that. If you bought these, I highly recommend it, you would not be sorry. I am thouroughly impressed with mine
From "high end" to "bargain basement". EXCELLENT IMAGE FOR LITTLE MONEY!I bought the Infocus X2 to replace a worn out and broken $15,000.00 "high end" CRT projector. My budget would not allow for a more appropriate replacement. While the X2 could never satisfy the true videophile, who usually spend anywhere from $10,000 to $30,000 dollars on a projector, it was never intended to.That being said, I will say that the Infocus X2 when being shown on my Stewart 100" screen is projecting an impressive image that is pretty close to the $15,000 unit it replaced!  A true videophile will certainly see the difference, but your average person will not. With my limited budget, I am quite satisfied with the very good image quality.  DVDs are sharp and clear, TV is quite satisfactory also.If you are looking to enter the big screen front projector market, and you don't want to spend more than a thousand dollars, here you go!But seriously folks, even though it works, stop shining your projector on a wall....  get yourselves a screen. There are special reflective properties in a screen that a painted wall doesn't have to really bring your image to life.
Excellent for PC Monitors. We got a sample and boy talk about removing dirt.If you got a dirty monitor then buy these wipes
Works for me. I have been using CF card now for a while in my Nikon d-200.  I have been very pleased with its response time.  In multi shot mode it keeps up with the camera and I never have to wait.  Highly recommended
Replacement plan. Have not had to use it yet so I don't know. Did I really need it I don't know but I bought it
Great memory card...excellent price!. I bought this memory card in addition to a 512MB and 1GB Olympus cards I had. I wanted to get a high speed one for a change, and this one has been working great. Now i don't have to wait a while for my picture to load and i can work in burst mode without a problem. I work a retail store in South Florida and we sell the slow version of this (Type M) for $75 plus tax...needless to say, I was very happy getting mine here for total less than $65 and is high speed! Would recommend it if you can find it :-
Haven't burned a coaster yet. I have used these DVD+Rs for over two years now and they work absolutely great. I have burned movies, games, files, everything. Haven't had a single coaster yet and the movies worked in all the DVD players I tried them out on.Not much else to say
WOW!  So Beautifully Detailed and True Color!!!. After reading the reviews (several negative), I wasn't sure if I should purchase this for my Canon i9900.  I am sure glad I purchased this!  I bought this because my Canon paper fades so quickly that I was sick of reprinting pictures to keep the colors vibrant.I printed about thirty pictures of my previous vacation and was so amazed.  The color is wonderful, the detail is so much better than on Canon paper, and they all printed up without one bad picture (ie,smears-ink blobs-etc).I am definitely buying more being an obsessive picture taker.A definite must for those who take an obscene amount of pictures!!
I love it!!!. I don't have anything to compare this to because it's my first MP3 player.  However, I am surprised at just how much I love it.  It is so easy to use and very small and light so it can fit in your pocket.  It was extremely easy to download the music and figure out how to organize music folders.  It holds just about what is advertised which is approximately 200 - 250 songs.  However, I am sure the length of each song will determine how many can actually fit on this MP3 player.  The price was great - $50.  If you are a person who loves the radio, then get the Nano Plus.  Otherwise, this is a great player for someone who wants ease of use and does not have more than 250 songs in their collection of favorite music
Why I Gave This a 5. For the money I wanted to spend, this is the best out there and I tested many others.  I too would have liked a backlight but it would have cost another $50.00 and I did not want to invest that.  It is very fast and accurate and has multiple features that I love.
Amazingly Awesome!. I love this thing so much! Honestly, if you do any kind of art you want this its so much easier. It takes like 5minutes to get used to but once your used to it its like drawing on paper. GREAT BUY! and the size is jsut right i dont know why youd need one any bigger
perfect for my needs. I needed a device to mount on the handlebars of my motorcycle and tuck the ipod securely in my pocket under my clothing for motorcycling.  The device works perfectly - just as advertised - just as i needed - give it a grade of A+
The Best Overall Cable. I currently utilize the 3 foot version of this cable for my DVD player. In the past I have used the common "yellow" analog connection for my dvd players, however, after discovering component video there is no turning back. This particular cable is very durable, and provides outstanding signal strength. Acoustic Research is reasonably priced, and there are no defects to their products. As a result of their excellent products I have become a loyal customer for years to come
replacement battery. I shot several hundred pictures at a wedding with a battery grip and 2 of these batteries and did not have a single problem with power
NuLOOQ-Excellent!. Logitech scored a big plus with this item.  The important thing is that you really need the processing power for the device to run properly.  The first review is really unfair.  Logitech does not hide the fact that you really should be using the NuLOOQ on a G5 processor. It says so right on the box. I'm using it on a G4 1.8ghz and I feel that I'm behind a bit with power. To review the NuLOOQ on a G4 800mhz is ludicrous.  Of course it won't perform to the rigid standards of todays graphic professionals on an underpowered box. Hook this thing up to your updated Mac and you'll see it shine. My workflow has been streamlined and I enjoy the more tedious tasks more than I ever did.  Good job on this one. I recommend it highly
Great MP3 for a great price. What I like about the e130 is I can use the sd cards (use the fast read write 60x and 130x) to play music so I can have a library of sd cards to plug in. I use 2 gb ones and the prices are really coming down on the sd cards.I use the online local library to check out audio books and use the FM transmitter (E100 Sandisk, bought separately) in my car to listen to on my way to work.  I modified the clear plastic case (removing the snaps) so I can use the clip (to shirt pocket, pants pockets) that came with the FM transmitter.I've had mine for about a year and really like the sound and yes, if you turn it off, then turn it on later, it picks up where it left off.The FM station comes in loud and clear.I use a rechargable AAA battery, that way it saves on the cost of batteries.I use different earphones that what came with it cause mainly the right earphone gave out on me, the earphones wasn't comfortable, and I wanted a better quality sound. I already had some good earphones, so that wasn't an issue for me
smokin buds. Good headphones but they still hurt my ear. also the little plastic/rubber piece that goes in your ear WIll fall out and then your screwed. Horrible design.....kind of annoying when your riding somewhere and you have tunes but you cant listen to them...
Good tape. Captures great in a Sony TR7000 camcorder. Works great in both Hi8 and  Digital8 modes, though only captures 60 minutes in Digital8 format. The  tapes retained clarity and sound quality after multiple edits. The material  of the tape is the second-highest quality used in Sony tapes
Good sticker system!. The sticker tape sticks to almost anything; Tree bark, windshields, toothbushes, even cat hair. To help my daughter learn Spanish, we labled eveything in and around the house in Spanish. Our Gato and Perros are labled, so are all the vacas y pollos. Her hermana y hermanos also got labeled, but the stickers do come off in the bath.
Flawless budget mini-stereo. I bought this model in order to be rid of my almost-new Sony MHCEC70 with its faulty ergonomics and detestable tuner.  Having once owned an earlier PM-series model, this new Panasonic was the obvious choice and it does not disappoint.  Like its predecessor, the PM53 is a nice, powerful compact stereo with (for the money) ridiculously nice audio quality and a good tuner, especially on the FM band.  It can easily be turned up load enough to cause hearing damage and annoy neighbors in adjacent houses.  The remote covers every function and is easy enough to figure out without consulting the manual.Right now, this is the budget stereo of choice for the discerning.  Sony's competing models are cheesy-looking (hog attention on store shelves,) bigger (i.e., take more materials/cost more to ship,) and consequently suffer certain cost-cutting measures like the aforementioned crappy tuner and simplified (and of course, proprietary) antenna connector.  It's like choosing between the Pontiac and the Toyota.  The Sony is for the unwashed rubes who want 300 watts of mylar-coated bling.  The Panasonic is for people who want something that makes pleasant sounds and looks like the rest of the furniture.
Finally a real UNIVERSAL remote. I love this remote. It actually has buttons for all the functions for my TiVo, LCD HD TV, AV REceiver. It's easy to program from the web site, just type in the make and model of your device, download and you're done. I finally have been able to put away all those remotes and use this one. Would highly recommend this product
Excellent switch. Got the GS116 quickly.  It installed without any problems.  It works well in my development environment where I'm moving large files from one machine to another.  I've always liked Netgear products and this one is no exception
best changer in the world  !!!!!!!!!!!!!. I've had a number of changers from the carousel 5 disc changers to the 500 plus that go round and takes you a week to load . the PIO PD-M426 is a great answer to the ?s of why my old changer keeps playing the same song or the same disc and not the others . well its got a a little thing thats called a Random memory that remembers what it plays and what it didn't . the only thing I wish it did have was a headphone jack but other than that it's a great unit .
It's a USB cable, and it works. I bought this cable because it was pretty cheap, cables at my local electronics store were running for over $30...  I'm using this cable for my printer, and it does what it's supposed to do
Great Product for sharing a printer on a simple home network. I love the form factor. It simply plugs into the parallel port on the printer - no printer cable. It is a snap to set up if you just follow exactly the instructions in the Quick Installation Guide. I had it working with four computers, three Windows XP and one Ubuntu Linux, in less than an hour
Very Solid Component for the Price. Full, rich sound with a thoughtfully-organized rear panel and an impressive roster of DSP modes. Very easy to set up and use. My only complaint: The device can't remember individual channel settings for separate source inputs. For example, I like to watch DVDs with the center channel set at +5 dB, so that dialogue pops more clearly. But for music, I prefer to use a surround mode with the center channel at -5, which increases the field depth to my ears. With this receiver, that's impossible unless I want to get used to changing the settings every time I switch back and forth. Different DSP modes are retained for each source, but the more granular audio and channel settings are system-wide. Not a huge inconvenience, but important to know if you want a high level of control over your listening experience
Toshiba 32DF46 32 Super Great. The Picture and Audio quailty are excellent, and has excellent adjustments for color and audio. Yes it could use more inputs, what TV couldn't, but if you know how! everything VCR and DVD all work with it's inputs perfectly as outlined in the VERY HELPFULL USER MANUAL.Measurements are accurate, and it fits in the older type Entertainment Centers made for a maximum width of 32 inches as this measures 31.5 Inches. I couldn't be more pleased. My previuos TV was an RCA top of the line HDTV 32 Inch curved tube. This Toshiba blows it away.
INCREDIBLE TV!. I'VE HAD MINE FOR A WEEK...SO FAR...SO EXCELLENT (BEYOND GOOD OR GREAT)...I ABSOLUTELY LOVE THIS TELEVISION! YOU WON'T REGRET BUYING THIS...YEAH..IT'LL BURN A HOLE IN YOUR POCKET, BUT ABSOLUTELY WORTH EVERY PENNY YOU PAY FOR IT
jdpbecker. After much research into the Epson R2400 & R1800, I got the 2400.  I am absolutely impressed with the quality of pictures!  It does a phenominal job.  I have two other epson printers, one is the much older 800 which I took to work & am still using.  The other is the R200 that I use for general printing & printing on my cd's & dvd's.  I had a canon 9900 & I90 before.  The epson is far superior to the canon.  I liked the tech support at canon but I love the epson printers & have never had to use tech support.  Yes, the ink is hard to find.  It is a high end printer & your ordinary big box stores doesn't want to mess with it.  I order online & save money that way.  When I run out of one cartridge, I order 2 to replace it. The printer gives you plenty of warning so you don't run out.  I am an amateur photographer & do lots of scrapbooking.  I print all my own pictures with the Epson.  It's not your ordinary printer but I don't want ordinary pictures. I haven't been disappointed yet.  You just have to make sure you set the print settings for the media you are using.
Great sound; horrible cord. I've had a pair of EX71SL's for over a year, and the sound is great.  The bass is pronounced and is probably not suitable for true audiophiles.  However, it is just right for me.  I find the midrange and treble to be appropriate.I have a pair of Grado SR-80 headphones, and a pair of Sony MDR-V6 headphones.  Each is a $100 conventional full-sized set of headphones, and yet I actually prefer the sound of the Sony earbuds.The only problem I have is that the cord is far too short without the extension, and far too long with the extension.  (A free and extremely long extension cord comes with the phones.)  What were they thinking?  Also, the fact that the right ear's cord is so much longer than the left's is ridiculous.  Don't they have a focus group review these things?
Great Karaoke System. This cartridge adds 200 songs to the basic system. I has a good variety of music that I like. I highly recommend it
good item. i love the mobilemate sd.  I haven't had any problems yet.  It's small compact and gets the job done
Full of features. I like the features of this player.  However, the controls are a bit hard to use, and the start and stop controls make a loud beep that, if transmitted to an amplifier may damage the speakers. So watch out for that
Powerful control panel. I agree with the first reviewer in that it is hard to find reviews of this product anywhere online. After reading lukewarm reviews of other draft-n routers, I picked this one up on a whim, hoping for the best. I am extremely pleased. The other D-Link products I own are a mixed bag in terms of level of control in the firmware, with the DGL-4300 being leaps and bounds better than the DI-LB604. Luckily, the DIR-655 firmware is akin to the DGL-4300 in terms of control, features and flexibility. It's even a little snappier thanks to fewer graphics and has better Firefox compatibility.Setup was a breeze (if you know what you're doing, you don't need to insert the CD first as instructed by the unit -- just toss it) and though I haven't had it long connectivity has been stable for the past 24 hours. I have yet to try a Skype session, but the "intelligent QoS engine" promises improved call quality. Overall, I'm very satisfied
note to K. Macleod and everyone else. Just wanted to let you and everyone reading these know that the Axiom series is not actually the only aftertouch-capable m-audio keyboard, but I will also add that the other cheaper m-audio controllers, such as the keystation (not pro)and ozone series, have a very poor aftertouch, sometimes not even responding consistently (!).  Bottomline is I wouldn't expect to get a decent controller under $200 in my experience; the Axioms feel great to me and would recommend them to anyone looking for a capable controller on a budget
As Advertised. The Pyle Pro works perfectly.  Am able to use my own turntable to download LP's, 45's and 78's to my computer and burn CD's.  Very happy with the results.
It's a bit large, but it's well worth it!. We shred a lot of docs due to sensitive material. I found this baby about a couple month's ago. It's a workhorse. So far no regrets at all. It is a bit messy cleaning a full bag, but that's why they invented vacuums. tall kitchen trash bags fit perfectly. I buy the draw string type so it's snap to remove and seal. This unit is the high end of a home shredder and lower to mid of office (commercial). Buy it,. You'll be very happy you did.
Excellent Home Phone System. I just got this set a week ago, and am so happy with it's performance. It has the loud and clea voice with a smart look with no antena. It has couple new features which I have never seen any cordless phone before. Like you can add your own sweet ring tone and your own wallpaper. My son just loves it when he sees his picture on it.I have the base phone 2nd floor and the other handset on the first floor and there is no noise at all. It's really attractive to look.I am only worried about the battery which is very good now , I hope it maintains it's strength for couple of years at least not like other Pana phone which works very good when they are new and after couple of years goes down.I have not bought the camera with it yet, no plans to buy too, so can't comment on that.Only thing I was expecting in this phone is a Belt Clip.If you are okay with the price, it's awsome.....
Killer sound quality, you won't be disappointed!!. The Shure the E2G's are were designed for use with portable video game devices like the Sony PSP. The audio clarity and response from these tiny earphones is fantastic!  Listening to digital sound using the E2Gs is great because the sound quality is fast, balanced, and accurate. I could actually pick out background sounds that I never noticed using other headphones - it's almost like having surround sound headphones on. I must warn you that although the mid-range frequencies are solid, and high frequency  is good as well, the bass falls short and may be too soft for some users.The sound isolation feature works pretty well. These earphones block out external noise (like people's voices, which noise-cancelling headphones are not designed for) allowing you to hear audio from your PSP more clearly. This feature also helps me to save battery life because I can keep the volume level lower  than with regular headphones.Overall, the E2G's deliver superb sound quality.  Just a warning, you might be shocked at the $100 price tag...I know I was.  But after using these for a few weeks I can't live without them!
Does what it's supposed to do. Well, what can I say: It does what it's supposed to do. Oh, almost forgot: It has a nice red light shaped into what I think is the head of an Indian when it's being accessed.Anyway: the SD card is easy to insert and easy to pull off.Nice gadget.
Survived the laundry. Mine just went through the washer and then through the dryer. I plugged it in... and IT WORKS...!!!!!!!!
The case is fine, no belt clip though. While the silicone case fits snuggly and seems to be effective protection, it's a little useless without a belt clip attached. Despite looking I didn't find that bit of info till the case was in my hands--oh well
what a deal - finally affordable!. We are thrilled with this purchase, which was for an all-pupose bedroom TV.  The picture is GREAT!!!!  Football Games - GREAT!!!  Delivery was prompt and TV was new in box.  An HD TV VCR at this quality and price can't be beat
Memorias excelentes a buen precio. Memorias de calidad a buen precio, pero no soportan Dual Channel
Ease of use and great product. Installation was simple, and the software is easy to use.  I have had this product for some time now, and it certainly does what it is supposed to do.  An excellent upgrade for your computer
EXCELLENT TV. An excellent TV. Great sound and picture. Easy to use remote. No compalaints.
simple and works. if you have a G4 laptop dont waste your firewire 800 port, buy this connector and you'll have two firewire ports instead of one... simple and work
How do you review Labels??!?!?!. Hey, they stick to the envelopes.  What more can you ask for
Don't buy other than Sony. Previously I've buyed Sandisk Memory Stick pro and within the first month of use the memory fails with the typical error stated by other users (look rating for sandisk memory stick). With this one I have no problems, its fast, reliable and today there is no big difference in costs. Don't use other than this!!
Flawless compatibility with Tivo. This is my second unit because it worked flawlessly with my first Tivo unit. Not much else to say, other than it just works
Excellent Drive!!!. This drive has served me well for years!  As always, Western Digital is the way to go for hard disks
A well designed product to fill a special need. Last week I recieved a nice box of birthday gifts that my sister purchased for me here through Amazon, and the flylight went into immediate use and "test-mode." It produces a nice low light glow that really helps for those late nights when you are browsing the internet on your laptop, and you don't want the glare of a table lamp messing with your screen just so you have enough light to type passwords, etc. This product really does the trick, and the flexibility is good enough to wrap around and give you light just where you need it. The neck is about 1 inch shorter than I would have liked it as my USB ports are located at the back of my unit, not the side, and an on-off switch would really help. It was probably left off as something else that could go wrong, but it really would make the unit more useable than having to search in the dark to plug it into the tiny USB port on the back...
Not a bad laptop lock. Some confusion in the color coding in the instructions but once you are past that it is a very solid lock
Great way to get great wireless sound. I plugged this in last weekend for one my clients, and it works superbly. We connected one ZP80 to a set of Polk Atrium 45p speakers, and another ZP80 to a set of Advent AV70? speakers, and they sound great. I recommend these for use with smaller speakers, as they will deliver enough satisfactory sound. For larger speakers, though, I recommend the ZP100, with its built in amplifier.Set-up of the ZP80 was remarkably easy. I do wish the 2-minute "activation" period was a little bit longer so I wouldn't have to run around to connect each machine to the wireless subnet that the Sonos systems create and use.The remote is big, bulky, somewhat heavy, and the scroll wheel is difficult to use, especially if you are accustomed to using an iPod scroll wheel. Actually, I suspect that the scroll wheel is just a couple vertical and horizontal heat sensors packaged as a scroll wheel. If you can get over this small disadvantage, this product is great
Outstanding card for picture transfers. I ordered this to easily transfer pictures between my cameras and my computers.  It helps save time when I want to access a picture or set of pictures to transfer and print on my system.  I can carry it with me and transfer all manner of pictures to other family computers.
Seagate ST3400601U2-RK 400 GB. Easy to install. Available as soon as connected to a computer
Great notebook case. This case is great for value and for space..for the most part. It's actually really hard to find a good value leather case for a 15.4 notebook, but this was it. Unfortunately though not much room for any other types of peripheral, ie notebook mouse, once my adaptor and power cord went in, as nothing else but my notebook fits in that compartment so they had to go in another, but all in all, really nice case, and not too heavy being leather either. Another good point ladies is that its looks are relatively unisex, not too masculine but not too feminine either. Highly recommended
Stylish bag for Dell 700m. I'm pretty picky, but this bag lived up to the various good reviews I read on Amazon.  As others have said, you cannot fit much in the bag other than the laptop itself.  In other words, bulky accessories will not fit.  However, you can fit your Dell 700m with the extended battery and an extra 4 cell battery as well (placed vertically next to the computer).  You can also fit on top of the computer a very small wireless mouse (e.g. I found a very small GE Wireless Mouse, which isn't the best product, but fits in the case---there are probably several other small mice that will fit).  In addition, there is an outside document pouch that you can fit some papers in--although a small stack of papers is all that will fit.  The bag is very attractive and professional and provides ample protection for your computer.  I would have given the product a 5, but the bag is experiencing a little bit of wear on the corners and I've only had it for a few months.
USB 2.0 To DB9M Dongle Serial Pc/Mac. The converter works great with the PC.  The software for the Mac OSX was not on the CD.  A quick google found the FTDI OSX drivers at FTDI's site.The USB cable included with my converter is defective.  I was unable to contact anyone about a replacement.  Fortunately this is a standard cable and I was able to replace it for under $5.00, locally
Great Device. I got this model because of it's size and speed.  In fact, I got it after returning a cheaper 2GB CruzerMini which was just too slow for my liking (severals times slower than my older 256MB JumpDrive).  This drive, despite the complaints others have had about it, has worked just find for me for nearly a year.  It probably helps that I don't fling it around on a string, but instead carry it in a pocket or in my laptop bag
It's not Targus at fault here. Laptop manufacturers want you to buy their products at their markup.  Dell is no exception.  Dell itself, on the motherboard, checks adapters.  Whether it's this model, or the iGO, the 610 won't work.  Thank Dell -- I have, by buying another company's laptop
as good as advertised, wonderful picture quality on my TV. Apple TV performs exactly as promised, allowing the user to play iTunes media on a TV. Most people will use it for watching downloaded iTunes television programs or films. In my case I've been living overseas for the past nine years, so I've become very dependent on iTunes to keep up with programs such as 24, Lost, Heros, and Battlestar Galactica to name a few. While I was content to watch shows on my MacBook, I was longing to watch them on a normal TV. It was especially difficult when my wife and I scrunched together on the sofa to watch our favorite shows. We're probably among the minority who actually bought a new TV for our Apple TV (our old one was not compatible). The need for a more current TV is perhaps a consideration for some as they decide whether or not to purchase an Apple TV. The picture from the Apple TV is outstanding on our LCD television. While it's not HD, it's still very crisp and clean. As with almost all Apple products, Apple TV is extremely simple to set up and use. If you know how to Sync an iPod on iTunes, you should have no problem using Apple TV. Initial setup involves only a few very simple steps. My only issue is that Apple ought to have included larger hard drive. Other than this small issue I am extremely pleased with my Apple TV. I highly recommend it to people who watch a lot of things from iTunes on their computer and would like to see them on a television
Great idea!  Nice card. This is a high capacity card that can hold a ton of digi pix.  It's pretty fast when downloading info to my computer via the integrated USB device.  Not having to use an extra card reader is also a real plus.The main downside is that it seems a bit flimsy when opening it to the USB connector.  I have to be very careful not to snap the thing in half.  Other than just being gentle with it, it's been a great purchase
Very Happy!. I love eVO3. I love the fact that it not only protects the screen but it protects the wheel. The only thing that I do not like is the fact that I can not leave the cover on if I am using my dock with speakers. It won't go down far enough to make the connection with the cover on. So if you use a dock a lot this may not be a wise choice, but if you don't mind having to take it off then you'll be happy
***** W O W *****. Very rarely am I so impressed where I feel compelled to write up an optional review of something I purchase. But in this case im happy to take the time to do so. My reason for buying this product was to keep informed of news and weather condition's during power outages, I have a 1500 Volt Ampre UPS battery back-ups system hooked up to this TV and between it's very modest voltage requirements, DVD feature, and of course TV capability, It's worked out astronomically well..........The performance and quality of service/reception it provide's is second to NOTHING ive used in the past. Im a 2-Way radio comm's tekky type person, and always beleived in being prepared for the un-expected, but I must stress the point as to how well this little TV work's & what a fine fit and finish the company put into it's production of this DVD/TV/Video Display unit. Thank's Amazon.Com for offering it to us, and for the fine website choices I had available to me. Respectfully Yours....Frank
Peerless ST650P Tilting Wall Mount for 32" to 50" Flat Panel Displays. Great value & quality on this wall mount. Would not hesitate to purchase again. Easy to follow directions, use a level for best results
Check out the Creative HN-700 instead!. They're the same headphones for $30 less on amazon and at the creative store as well.  If you don't believe me, compare the pictures.  They're identical and the specifications are the same as well!  Save some money!  Buy the creative version
Worth its price. The settings are very easy to use, it is lightweight, and very practical. If you have two male connectors (two way headphone wire thingy) you can easily listen to the music you are practicing and play along with it, this maximizes your practice efforts. It packs a punch of sound in a very small package. I would not recommend this amp if you want to add a pedals and fancy stuff to it, save your money and buy the upgraded version. It works wonderfully with my acoustic in the clean setting and it is a lot of fun with my electric
Tough little bugger... I use my Cruzer Mini constantly at work.  It's great for quick data transfers, small utilities, drivers or patching systems that are off the network.  It's slim and lightweight enough that I tend to drop it in my shirt pocket and forget about it.  You probably see where this is going...but yes, it's been run through the washing machine at least four times.  What may be even more impressive is that it's been run through the dryer three times (once I did catch it after being washed and saved it from the dryer, allowing it to air dry instead).  It still works as well as the day I took it out of the package, never missing a beat
Reliable!. I agree that this drive can be a little slow, but it hasn't caused a problem for me. I keep copies of many files (about 1 GB total) related to a large project at work on mine. When I first copied all the files to the drive it took a couple of minutes, but now I just make changes or updates to the individual files and the write times are short enough that I don't even notice them (just a second or two). I also seemlessly work on the files on both a PC at work and a Mac at home.To me the best feature is the reliability. Between my husband and I, we've had several Cruzer Minis in various sizes and each one has worked great, even through accidental abuse. One of his 512 MB drives accidently went through the washing machine. We thought the data was gone, but when it dried out, it worked fine. Just today I found my 2 GB drive at the bottom of the dryer; it had been left in a pocket and had gone through both the washing machine and dryer. Yep, it still worked! I'm buying a new one to replace it (just in case) because I don't know it there might be some long-term effects from the water and heat, but I'll keep using this one for less important applications. Changes are good, though, that it'll never have a problem. These things are amazingly reliable
Great Cable. I recently replaced a PC with a Mac laptop.  The only video output on a Mac is a DVI-D port; I had been using the DVI-to-analog converter that Apple shipped with my laptop.  I notice a pretty good improvement of the picture quality, probably due to the replacing the DVI-to-analog converter and another analog cable with a single cable.  If you're considering replacing a DVI-to-analog setup, this cable is well worth the $14
THUMBS UP!. As of 2007 most of the bugs mentioned in the other reviews are fixed. The ipod fits snug as a bug in my unit and it even charges it.Youu can even find this as low as $140 or chaper.  Im not sure why the bad reviews.This is a wonderful dvd player and the newer one i got even plays your ipod through your tv if you want..older versions did not allow this. You should buy this.The video quality isnt great, but good,  thats why i gave it four stars instead of five It is bulky but you need room for the ipod to plug in. the only bad side is no ipod naviation from the menu. you must use the ipod itself..But being able to play your ipod and dvd through any tv with rca jacks (audio/video) is great..i can now backup my purchased ipod items to dvd since i have an eyetv250 which allows you to use your computer as a tv. the eyetv has rca jacks on the device which allows me to record it to my harddrive which i then use toast to burn my dvd..all in all its completely worth it. even as a stand alone dvd player it's great..never had the first proble
Blazing Fast. This is an excellent hard drive. It is blazing fast! You know that Western Digital is a name you can bank on! Get one for yourself
I like it. This is my first mp3 player and I really like it.The only this I did not like was that when you listen to the FM radio the sound gets loud then quiet and you have to stay still if you want it to stay at the same volume. But overall I recomend this for many people
Good GPS but mounting sucks. I like my new Garmin Nuvi 660. The wide screen really makes a big difference. The point of interests features on this Nuvi is minimal so you might need to consider another source for this or purchase the download from garmin for your area. We had some problems with the mount. Couldn't get it stick on the windshield. Doesn't matter, California law prevents us to use to that. Thus, we bought an after market air vent mount which I like very much. It is perfectly positioned on my bimmer. We bought the air vent mount from eBay.
Worth the Money. I was a little hesitant buying this without trying it but I thought the other review, and the fact that this brand/model seems to be carried widely, was a good reference.I love it!.I wear no-line bi/tri focals and with normal monitor screen heights on my desktop I was always tilting my head backward in order to view the screen. This lead to a stiff neck a lot of times. (Yes, setting the monitor back a couple of feet would work too, but by then the print is so small one would need a larger monitor, and that becomes expensive quickly.)With this mount I have the bottom of my 19" widescreen Viewsonic LCD monitor right on my desk in front of my keyboard. My neck feels better already! If on occasion I need the desk space the monitor swings up and out with only a couple of fingers worth of force.The mount comes with adjustments for lifting force and frictional (sideways) force. It also comes equipped with an optional screw-in desktop mount. In my case the clamp mount is perfectly adequate. In fact as I tighened the clamp I was impressed that I could not do any sliding of the mount sideways. It is a nice design.This is well worth the money.
Good Shredder. Shredder does what it is advertized to do. Works well and is easy to use/\.
It is What It Is. The title says it all - it's a simple, black, rubber watch.  No frills.  It works.  I like it
Great drive for cheap!. This drive has been great.  I am glad I went with an affordable drive because this is a great product
Great: a culmination of calculators. If you are the 89 series programmer, then this will make your life a lot easier with the QWERTY keys. That was my primary reason to buy it, plus that my students are required to learn the 89 series for coursework. That forced me to leave behind the ways of HP's RPN notation machines and head back into TI. Want the ultimate machine for math, calc, physics? Here you go
Perfect product!. I only have two optical inputs on my receiver and 4 outputs needing to be heard.  This gadget works perfectly.  No noticeable sound degradation could be heard!  I highly recommend this product
Works fine. It works as well if not better than the one I have beeen renting form the cable. I was paying $7 rental. Therefore pay back will be in 8 months.
Panasonic just misses. This Panasonic is all right, except I would die to get my old Sony system back.  They just don't have the sound quality at Panasonic that Sony had with these small systems.  I don't like that I don't have a clock display at all times and sometimes the CD changer is confusing to me, but it will just take time to figure it out.  Since these kind of bookshelf stereos are becoming more obsolete, I am happy to have this one.  With all the sound quality of the Sonys I have owned (I've gone through a half dozen) it will please me if this just hangs on and does not become a disappointment in functionality.  I would like this one to hang around longer.  Hopefully, the CD reader will not go out like my Sonys did
Shhhhhhhhhhhh.... Not only is this drive much faster than my old IDE drive with 8M cache, it is as quiet as can be.  In fact, if I didn't see my screen updating, I'd think the drive was dead it's so quiet!  It's almost night and day the difference in noise!!
works great, no analog though. It works!  The antenna isnt junk either, I am getting almost all the digital stations from chicago 25 miles from sears tower with it inside my house sitting on my desk. I also get many digital channels that happen to be on the comcast analog cable in my area (chicagoland). Problem is that all the analog stations on my comcast cable are untuneable, so I cant watch those on my mac.  Its not supposed to be a cable tuning box, just digital stuff, so its fine, I just thought it did that as well.next thing to do is get a bigger/better antenna mounted outside and cancel cable (as I only watch a couple stations anyways).eyetv - works.cytv with it - works great!  make sure you go and donate to that opensource project
Pleased so far. So far I have been very pleased with these batteries. My last digital camera had it's own battery and held a charge for a very long time. These batteries have met or surpassed my expectations
super bag, worth the price. The other reviews are accurate - this is a super bag.  I researched a lot of bags and settled on this one to replace my old Targus CityLine bag for my Dell M1210.  I would just add a couple of notes to what others have said:First, it's a little heavier in the hand than you might expect, though the handle design helps distribute the weight evenly. BUT once it's on your shoulder, the ergonomic contour design makes it hardly noticeable.Second, the shoulder strap is well padded and doesn't slip at all.  This can actually be a problem if you're wearing a heavy coat, however, as the strap can be a royal pain to remove - no matter what you do, it won't slip off your shoulder.  Instead, you have to sort of peel it off.  Takes a little getting used to, but this is a minor annoyance compared to the benefits of this case.Also, I was pleasantly surprised to find that the handy ticket/passport pocket really is convenient when you're traveling.  The front pockets are also very convenient.  It's a little unfortunate that there aren't any CD sleeves built into the bag, given that it already has more pockets than a levi's factory.Overall, a fantastic bag that looks good, and is great for travel.  Highly recommended
Great Product, Lousy Instructions. The instructions fail to mention that you have to change the settings on your iPod so that it sends the signal out to the tv or that the red and blue plugs should be plugged into the white and red (in that order) AV inputs on your TV
Picture Perfect. I just purchased the Canon 20D and this card is a true marriage of the two necessities.  Plenty of picture room and I plan to purchase a 2GB prior to my trip to IRELAND.  Price wise I did great and the turnaround time was excellent.This card was ranked No 1# in two seperate on line test so I was very sold prior to my purchase.
Good Link. If you run short on cable when making a connection(s), you can connect another RCA cable(s) with these Female-to-Female connectors. They are color coded for Left and Right audio. I use them because I am constantly moving equipment around. I use them for audio but they can also be used for video if you are using RCA connectors. Monster Cable makes a high grade product. Highly recommended
Great Product. Super product!  This case is light, super solid, and convenient. I carry it with me wherever I go with my camera, so I always have extra cards on hand, and never have to worry about where to store a card
Another California Investigator. I made the investment in this recorder and have been very pleased.  I use the Olympus 2300 for witness and subject interviews in closed enviroments (interview rooms, offices, etc).  The sound quality is great.  The ability to add memory sold me.  I installed a 256 MB chip and on standard play I now have over 42 hours of recording time!  No more worry about fliping tapes.  And no more booking tapes.  My interviews could go all day and the logistics involved in standard tapes is not a consideration anymore.  I upload everything to my agency's server and skip the evidence room.  I like the folders option that allows for the division of recodings by file...A to E.  On road trips, each letter is a day.  Each interview is a number.  On my paper notes and just note A1, B3, E5 for quick reference.  After the recordings are uploaded to my server (or laptop) I then re-name the files to the names of the persons who were interviewed.  The larger screen is easy to see and the recording time counts down so I know how long the recoding has been going.  I can then make notes on paper with a reference to time into the recording allowing for quick play back later.  The only problem I had are batteries.  I carry extra AAA batteries and repalce them if the battery level falls below half.  I recently got 20 plus hours of record time on a set of two batteries...but always be ready to switch them out if things could go long.  Overall, great tool and easy to learn and use
connect your pc to your home theatre system in no time. i bought this cable to connect my laptop to my home theatre receiver, eliminating the need for computer speakers whcich could never match up to the sound of my home theatre system.  the 12 ft cable is plenty long enough and it is surprisingly high quaality for the price.  i don't give the cable 5 stars because i know there are higher quality cables out there with 24 karat gold connectors which will give you a cleaner sound.  don't buy the 12ft version unless you need the length because the longer the cable, the more signal loss there is.  this is perfect for the average guy who just wants to listen to his mp3's or play PC game audio through home theatre system
Good purchase. The item works as I expected. I received within the tiem offered by the seller. I'll buy again from this merchant
Speaker purchase. We are very happy with our purchase of AudioSource LS100 speakers.  Very good quality for the price and our purchase went very smoothly with timely delivery
Easy to use, lightweight. This is my first portable mp3 player and it took me about an hour to go from taking it out the box to having music on it and for me to learn how to work the controls. I did have to read the manual for a few minutes to understand what "hold" meant on the screen - but other than that - very nice little product, good price, and very easy to use
Works as advertised. Great with my Rebel XT. Hard to be verbose about a CF card...but it has performed without a hitch in my Rebel XT. Used a 1GB Ultra II when I bought the camera a year ago, picked up the 2GB card before a family vacation in August. Excellent product, no worries
Amazingly detailed. I purchased this software more for it's street mapping detail than for the topographic mapping. Living out here in rural KY I have yet to find a backroad or country highway that isn't accurately mapped in this software. Even the local B&B's, restaurants, and filling stations are in the POI (points of interest) database. Simply amazing. You can easily define waypoints and build routes. If you plan to do any kind of road navigation with your Magellan handheld GPS but also want the additional features of topographic mapping then this is the software to get.I will mention that version 1.0 appears to pre-date the eXplorist series because there is no built-in support for direct download to the eXplorist. It takes an extra step using the Magellan Conversion Manager software to load regions into your eXplorist. Not difficult at all.The 3D view option is somewhat useless, as it often does not depict the physical world closely enough to be meanigful. The ability to select regions for downloading to the GPS seems to be limited to rectangular selections only. This works well enough in most cases but for irregularly shaped terrain it causes you to select a lot more area than you really want, which consumes more GPS memory. Maybe this is a limitation of how mapping software works but having a freeform selection tool would be a nice addition.Be aware that converting regions for download takes a lot of computing power and memory! Converting an entire state like KY takes several minutes on my 3GHz computer and results in a 55Mb download file!Overall this product is well worth the price
Cell Phone Morphs to Mp3 player. Got this card for my son's new mp3 enabled cell phone.  Works just like any flash drive player.  Now he doesn't need to carry multiple gadgets around.  Best price was here on Amazon and shipping was lightning fast.  Took about 2 seconds to install the card.  Thanks Amazon
Great Value. If you are looking for a cost effective replacement for your original white earbuds, this is it.  The different size rubber earpieces offer an excellent choice of giving you comfort over a long period.  I have slept with these earbuds and have not noticed them.  The sound is very pleasant and for the average person will be very acceptable.  Let us face it, most of us cannot hear the entire extreme high and low frequencies any way, so why pay more for something that cannot be used.  These earbuds are the way to go for comfortable, cost effective, pleasurable listening to your device.  Whether it be an MP3 player, radio of CD player, these earbuds will make your music a most enjoyable experience
Gets the job done. So here is my story:I had a Dell Dimension, and bought Neverwinter Nights 2.  My ATI Radeon 9550 had a lot of trouble running that game, so I ordered this card along with a power supply upgrade.  However, my Dell case wouldn't allow the power supply upgrade(go figures).  So I decided to finally build my own custom computer like I have been wanting to do.  To make a long story short, I had already ordered and opened this card, and didn't want to return it, so I pretty much built my system around this card.  The bad part of that, it's an AGP.  That is my only regret on my newly built system, no PCI Express or SLI.However, in relation to this card itself, my system is PRM800 Pro M7, 2 GB DDR2 533Mhz, PD 830 3.0Ghz, Zalman 9500 LED Ultra Quiet CPU fan, Ultra 550W x2 psu.  This card with this sytem, even though agp 8x, runs killer.  I can run Quake 4 and Doom 3 at ultra quality settings with full openGL settings enabled.  FEAR and FEAR Extraction point run at near highest setting (volumetric lighting set to medium) flawlessly.  And Neverwinter Nights 2 runs at near max perfect.  I also use a Samsung SyncMaster 17" LCD with 200Mhz forced refresh rate.So if you're are wanting to play the newest games at max or near max, for at least another year or two, this is a great card and a good money saver.  But if you're building a system, spend the extra cash for PCI-Express, SLI compatable.  It will be worth your money in the long run.  I have a feeling AGP will be phased out soon
Very Happy. I have been using this TV for just about a month now and really enjoy it. Shipping took about 10 days with no problems. The tracking info is not always correct so don't get too worried. I was called on a Friday to have delivery scheduled for the following Tuesday (Between 1-5PM). The delivery driver called about 15 minutes before arriving to make sure I could still be there. Like others, the reason for the 4 stars is due to sound quality. However, 90% of the time I use different speakers so it is not an issue. I would also recommend adjusting the energy savings level as soon as you get the TV. I put mine on low (standard is High) and it makes a huge difference for brightness. The price dropped about $70 after I bought it but Amazon credited me the difference when I e-mailed them. I don't have cable, but am using standard rabbit ears to get a great digital signal. The Masters looked unbelievable in HD. I recommend Amazon to anyone looking to buy a TV based on my experience
Battery Problem Fixed!. I've been using this phone for about 2 years now...And have been fuming about the cheap nickel cadmium battery for about that amount of time as well!When I purchased it, this was Panasonic's top-of-the-line phone. So naturally, I just assumed that they had used a Nickel hydride battery -like my last Panasonic phone: the KX-TG2550S. I didn't even notice about the battery right away. But when I finally got around to opening up the back of the handset, I was *horrified* to see that NiCd label!Since the 'memory effect' of nickel cadmium batteries is well known, using one in something like a cordless phone is inexcusable! This is because it will be recharged frequently, is usually never fully discharged -and is unusable when it is. [OK, so you can still use the speakerphone in the base, Gah! Might as well just plug in a regular phone!] Those that haven't had battery issues are probably singing a different tune after a number of months when the NiCd battery's power output nosedives.And since I've had better battery performanace, there aint no going back!There can be no other reason for the decision to use such inferior technology, except to save a few bucks. Or more likely, since a Panasonic replacement battery costs $20-25, to cash in because they need to be replaced more often.[an absurd price because all the battery consists of -I took one apart- is 3 AA size batteries]Fortunately, Energizer now makes a Nickel hydride [NiMH] replacement battery for this phone, Search Amazon for Energizer ER-P511
A must have for burners of CDs and DVDs. I recently burned 25 DVDs, all of the same thing. Realizing that I didn't want to give people a DVD that said "Office Depot" on it, I decided on buying a bunch of labels and using them with the spindle I already have.The labels are high quality, as you would expect from Avery-Denison. Even though the package says they are for the CD Stomper, they can be adapted to work with any label maker. These labels are also excellent for use in a printer that is capable of printing on CDs
Awesome upgrade from my Muvo!  Who needs an iPod anyway?. I really love this MP3 player, it truly deserves a five star rating. I got this as an upgrade to my Creative Muvo TX FM MP3 player and immediately noticed a significant improvement in sound quality. I also noticed that I can now download songs directly from Rhapsody onto my U2; the U2 recognizes so many file formats that you can get your songs from just about anywhere. Another significant improvement is battery life, its seemed like the Muvo would perversely run out of battery power while I was out in the middle of a pasture far from a fresh battery. With the built in rechargeable battery of the U2 I have only ever run out of juice once. I love that I don't have to carry around yet another AC adaptor to charge this thing, just plug it in by USB to charge it!Those are all my favorite things. I was a bit disappointed at the lack of armband, I had become very fond of wearing my Muvo on its armband. However that was easy enough to rectify, I simply ordered an iAudio armband and am happy again.All in all, this was a very worthwhile upgrade from a Muvo and definitely worth the extra money too! I think the U2 will give the iPod's a run for the money, so small and light and rugged... I sure wouldn't want to wear one of those iPods while working with my tractor
Great Price and Service. The product was exactly like in retail stores, for about 60% of the price, what a deal! GREAT service, shipped within 24 hrs and arrived on time, in a professional looking package.I will use them again for my replacement blade needs
works flawlessly as a bridge. I bought two -- the second one after realizing that one will not work as a bridge. It plugs into the Linksys Cable Gateway in one room, and to a 5-port switch in the other room. Nothing more to say -- follow the instructions and it will work as advertised.
Sony DVD Changer. Excellent picture, especially for the price. Very easy set up. Highly recommended
PERFECT. Does the trick...perfect for what I needed....gets rid of the unwanted splicing of different speaker wires...highly recomended!!!
Sweet Speakers. I bought these speakers w/ some birthday money I got and I love them .  For being so small the sound is great.  I use them all the time when I'm at home.  Overall these were a great buy and a steal for the price.  I would tell anyone to get these
Targus Wireless Keyboard is great. This is a fantastic little item. You can attach your PDA, position the infrared wand and off you go. With this keyboard, you can type and also use a button on the keyboard as a mouse-which is a similar experience to using a laptop mouse. My only problem was with customer service which said the keyboard wasn't compatible with my PDA when in fact it was
Better range than others I've tried. I live in a heavily wooded, mountainous area. This radio is the fourth I've tried in two weeks. I returned the previous three sets because of their hopelessly poor range. Two Unidens were capable of a very marginal 1.25 miles, and another Cobra only about .75 miles. I wasn't expecting the max advertised range because of the terrain and trees obstructing line of sight. This new Cobra can reach 2.25 miles, and that's from inside the house to inside the truck at the other end. Another plus is the use of lithium batteries. The weather radio feature and the vibrating alert are two more handy features. The only negative comment I have is the thick case, 1.5 inches including the belt clip. I think I'll keep this set
CD wallet. Good quality.  Well made.  Good value.  Saved me a lot of space, with room to expand
Great Case!. I recently got this case from amazon.com, and when it shipped to my door, I couldn't wait to open the box. I thought, "I finally got a case for my new ipod nano!" I opened the box, and took the case out to put it on my nano. It fitted just right! It wasn't too snugly or too loose, it was perfect. The only bad thing about this case is that you can't charge the nano while its in the case, but you could always take it out and charge it with care. I'm so glad they made this case!
Smokin!. This is definitely a USB 2.0 HIGH SPEED reader.  I got 17.1 MB/s and the package up "up to 18 MB/s".  I was using a Sandisk Extreme III 2GB Compact Flash card.  That means you can move 1 GB of data in about 60s.  The speed difference between this reader and my USB 2.0 full speed reader is like night and day.A word of caution:  USB 2.0 is not necessarily faster that USB 1.x.  What you want is USB 2.0 "High Speed", with the high speed being 480 Mbit/s data rate.  A device can be USB 2.0 compliant and not be high speed, which is typically the old 12 Mbit/s rate.  Many people get confused on this point and think USB 2.0 means the device is faster, but this is not necessarily the case.Rest assured, this Sandisk Extreme Reader is a USB 2.0 high-speed device.  If take a lot of pictures and fill up card above the 1 GB level, this beauty will save you lots of time.  I am totally satisfied and would highly reccommend this card reader to friends
G4000A by Grundig/Eton: More than I expected!. I needed a new clock radio, but I hate the tinny sound produced by most offerings. Why not, I thought, invest a bit more money and get a radio/clock? Something I could run on AC but could take with me and use battery power. AM/FM with a backlight and an alarm and sleep function would be perfect, I thought, and I came close to buying a Degen, even thought about the more expensive Sony.This G4000A is sleek, just big enough to make it's presence known on my bedside table, but small enough to leave room for the lamp. The build quality is just fine-light enough to make it truly portable, yet just heavy enough to balance the antenna if laid down using the back support. The case is awesome, a throwback to the days of real leather cases (this one is vinyl) and compliments the set. Controls are easy to use, and dang! This set is not hard to setup or change things like memory stations, time etc. Shortwave is fine for my purposes, and the tuning steps are selectable in digital and there is a dial for fine tuning.AM/FM reception is great, but the tone button effects little change. This is a great radio for the house, to take on vacation, anywhere. It is my new 'radio/clock' and for the price I paid ($99.00 Cdn) I couldn't have asked for more. All needed accessories are included. Buy a better antenna if you need one.I love it
If you use a laptop but like a real keyboard & mouse check this out!. Since I travel a fair amount I need a laptop for the portability. But when I'm at my home location I love being able to slide my laptop into my Kensington Laptop Desktop and use a real keyboard and mouse - I can type and click much faster. Since your laptop rests at an angle, the laptop screen is elevated to a much more comfortable reading level.  It also allows for a good airflow to dissipate heat from the laptop; something I always had problems with when the laptop was resting on the desktop since I would normally have documents and a notepad laying next to the letter. The black trim with the Kensington logo is actually a clip for holding papers - this was another nice, handy feature.I checked out as many other laptop desktops or stands as possible before buying this Kensington model. For under $40 this was hard to beat. Most were either brand specific docks and were much more costly, or they just elevated the laptop slightly and didn't allow you to rotate the laptop up to a 45 degree angle (this really helps raise the screen and get it closer; which helps when you have a full size keyboard in front of it). I love this accessory and you can't beat the price!
It's as easy as plug and play. We currently have the Linksys BEFSR41 4-port router/switch for our home network.  It's been working great for about 4 years now, but we've now run out of ports.  I did some research on the 8 port router/switch product from Linksys, but the reviews were mixed.  The reviews were mixed for similar competing products also.  So I took the route of getting the EZXS55W to expand our existing home network.  I just plugged it into the network and it just worked out of the box.  No configuration needed.  It's also very tiny.  I highly recommend the product
Case Logic 72-Disc Wallet (Red). The wallet is as advertized & arrived suprisingly quick. I would buy again
Best Value available. This are great speakers. Bose keeps delivering reasonabably priced products in the market. ALthough I dont think these were meant for music specificly, they work great for sorround speakers and make a great compliment to the Acoustimas 7 system since they can be hooked up directly to the rear and fx channels from my amp.Lot of people rag and complain about Bose but I am very eagered to purchase from them again. Klipsch and Bose are great companies with decently priced equipment.
Five Stars Isn't Enough!!. I love my iPod, and it's even better when paired with this under counter player.  The sound is amazing!  You won't be disappointed if you buy this.
I'm amazed. Wow, 50 batteries for 9 bux is a DEAL! And of course, it lasts as long as a name brand battery if your going to use it for small devices (cd player, clock, etc...)Get sumthing else if your going to use these for a camera
Good product. This is a good alternative to an expensive PDA.  It holds a lot of information.  The only thing I would like to change about it is to be able to look someone up by Company and not last name.  I also have not got the download function with outlook express to work yet, but it serves the main purpose of keeping all your numbers and addresses in one place
samsung 4GB mp3 player. i am really glad with this player. i lovee it!! the only disadvantage is that it cannot play video and it is 4GB however it has many features i love. it has radio which is an important feature for me and you can view photos with it. it has a long battery life about 14 hours with headset and the most striking feature is its speakers. you will be amazed with the sound !!! really!! all of my friends ask what it is at the back and when i say they are the speakers they get amazed!! they are also thinking to buy one after they see mine!
"Not sold in stores". After several shopping trips in search of a replacement blade set, I realized that they want you to buy a new shaver, not fix the old one. So finding exactly what I wanted online was a real win
Must have for presentations. Installation is just "plug and play", a great aid for classes and presentations, I love to use it
The hardest part about the install was finding an outlet!. My wife and I have maybe a dozen or so devices connected via WiFi spread throughout our four-bedroom home. Among these were an Avaya 4610SW SIP (VOIP) phone and a PC serving as an Asterisk server (Asterisk is an open source PBX). This configuration has worked well for a couple of years now. In the past few months I've been having occasional disconnects of VOIP calls coming in to Asterisk from the PSTN. After some investigation, I decided to move my phone and server off WiFi and onto a HomePlug network, using the electrical wiring as another Ethernet. The hardest part of the installation was freeing up an electrical outlet in my second-floor office where my phone is, in the basement where the server is, and in the family room on the first floor where the LinkSys WiFi router/access point is located. After that, it was just a matter of plugging in an Ethernet cable from the Netgear box to the router, and moving the Ethernet cables from the WiFi boxes for the phone and server to the Netgear boxes. It was that simple.[...]I wish all high-tech equipment were this easy to install
Great TV. At the time of purchase this TV was rated very highly in consumer digest,, (#2 I believe)worth every penny. Sound is fantastic, it actually has some base to it which is rare for TV soun
Hands down.... The best mp3 player I have ever had.  It is much smaller than the picture makes it out to be.  Fits in your pocket easily and the sound is amazing.  I was able to charge the device, put over 50 songs in it and play it about 30 minutes right out of the box.  It's so easy and simple to use, highly recommended.  It also has a lot of additional features.
Excellent little unit. I've been using this player for nearly and month now and truly LOVE this unit. It's physically very small (in many ways it's smaller than the iPod Nano!) and the sound quality is quite good even with the headphones Creative provides with the unit. The inclusion of a built-in display is very useful, especially when you configure the internal features of the unit. Because it is a device that works under Microsoft's "Play for Sure" specifications, you can also play back DRM-protected .WMA files downloaded from many commercial music web sites such as the ones offered by Wal-Mart and Yahoo! Music.I would recommend a couple of things though--consider getting rechargeable AAA batteries since the unit does use up AAA batteries fairly quickly and also for maximum sound quality, get a good "in ear" earbud headphone such as the Panasonic RP-HJE50 available on Amazon
Excellent peace of mind. I started looking at network storage products after one of our PC's lost a hard drive that had some of our old scanned film images that I'd never copied over to our newest PC.  The best thing about the Media Vault is it was very easy to setup all my PCs to automatically backup my photos continously.  We'll never lose another picture (which has also gotten me out of the dog house with my wife).I'm also using it to store all of our music which helps with some of our kids PCs that have limited hard drive capacity.Overall, a great product and very simple to setup and use
good product. works well, easy to use and I use it daily, mostly in my truck.  The software was easy to understand.  I had trouble with the first one I bought in less than 30 days.  I returned it without a problem and had my new one in less than 5 days.  I now have used it for 3 months and enjoying it.  For the money I would buy it again.
Close to perfect, but not quite... Great styling, sound, and features really make this a standout product.  The Bose Wave radio is a thing of beauty and will enhance any room decor, while the sound quality is outstanding.  It has nice features, with the auto dimming LED display and the gradual volume increase on the alarm particulary well thought out.I have one gripe - all the time setting features are set by remote control, which in theory is cool, but in practise is a pain in the neck.  On most clock radios, to get the digits turning quickly when setting the clock / alarm time, you hold the button down - same with the Bose remote, except that the infrared link isnt perfect, so instead of being able to advance the time quickly, the time advances slowly (painfully so) because the button never stays 'held down' long enough.  It took me about 20 mins to advance to the desired time - doesnt sound too inconvenient, but when you've just shelled out over $300 for a clock radio, it's a bit frustrating.Still highly recommend product - only loses a star because of time setting shortcoming.
TIVO gave me a life!!. Not going to beat a dead horse...there's plenty of reviews on this product.  However, I love this product.  I would recommend this to anyone that hates spending time watching commercials, hates flipping through channels constantly looking for things to watch, and likes actually being able to no-kidding own whats on the box and not have to lose all your recordings just because you change cable service providers.
good product. The mini SD card worked fine, had one read/write error the second time I used it but nothing else since.  I think the card got a little hot causing the error
This is a great deal. I don't quite understand all the negative reviews.  It is a little tricky at first to figure out, I think.  There seem to be a few holes in the instruction manual, and things should have probably been explained better.  I don't know why that is the case, but it seems to be.  Also, you really do need to look at the online instructions as well.  You cannot just go by what is in the paper instructions that come with it.However, just a little monkeying around with it and you should be able to figure it out easily.  It has worked just fine for me, and was so cheap.  I bought two more, one for my brother and one for my dad, and they both love them.  Mine has frozen up twice, with a lot of use.  Upon resetting, one time the music was lost.  So, keep everything backed up on yr computer.  But, honestly, with just a small amount of patience you should really not have much problem with this thing.  And, it is so cheap, the small added effort should easily be worth it for most people.  If you are among the economic elite and also don't like to spend any time with small technical challenges, I would recommend putting out more cash for something a little easier, maybe.  For the rest of us, I think it is very hard to beat this deal
Excellent product. I have two of these guys, one for backups, the other my "briefcase" (going back and forth between work and home every day). Not a single problem, plug and go (I am using the FireWire interface), and silent. My boss got one on my recommendation, after ditching another brand, and loves it too
Excellent Printer!. This HP all in one printer/copy/scanner is just great.  I've had mine for about a month now and I haven't had a single problem thusfar.As far as printing, the printer is much like previous models of HP laser printers.  The prints come out flawless and are crisp and dark.  Speed was very important in buying a laser printer and this one lives up to my expectations.The copy/scanning property of this AIO printer is easy to use and very powerful.  While I can't copy color photos (b&w laser printer), the scanning of any image, color or not, comes out pretty well on the computer.  It is easy to tell the AIO printer to scan an image from the computer and the picture is conveniently saved as a jpeg at a location of my choosing.  No fuss or hassles.I'm currently a college student and copying class notes or study guides has never been easier.  I just put the stack of papers into the copying tray, tell the printer to copy them, and it's done...quickly.  Long gone are the days when I had to run to the library or copy store and find change to get copies.  This thing does it all.The ONLY reason why I gave it 4 stars is because of the printer's size.  It is big.  I imagine it is quite difficult to pack a printer/copier/scanner all into one printer and maintain a small size, but I think HP may have been able to do it.  This printer does take up a large amount of desk space compared to other printers I've seen.  However, it still beats having a separate printer and scanner, so I won't complain too much
A pretty solid multifuction device at a good price. With the HP Photosmart C5180 printer, Hewlett Packard has brought to market a very good multifunction device at a great price point. Although it doesn't seem to be part of the current HP product line any longer, it is still a great multifunction device that deserves your consideration if you are in the market for a new printer or multifunction device.You get a lot of features packed into one unit. Along with the printer and scanner, there is also a set of memory card slots that will accept the most popular types of digital camera memory. The control panel features one touch access to many functions, including the copier functionality. A small color LCD lets you adjust printer settings, make copies, configure the onboard network interface and perform basic photo editing and printing functions. Unlike any other printer I've seen before, HP includes some document "templates" in the printer's memory. These templates let you make graph paper and ruled sheets of notebook paper. Finally, there is the included Ethernet interface, which lets you connect the Photosmart C5180 to a network and use it with multiple computers.Out of the box setup was easy. Removing the packaging tape and inserting the ink cartridges for the first time is a very straightforward process. The inks click easily and positively into place.When you've completed the basic setup and turned the unit on, you're ready to start installing the software and connecting the unit to your computer. HP provides two options for connectivity--you can use either USB or plug the device into an Ethernet network. I used the network connection. HP's software found the device immediately and configured it with no intervention on my part.The included software bundle is available for PC and Macintosh computers. As an added bonus, the Macintosh version of the software is a universal binary--that is, it runs on both PowerPC and Intel Macintosh computers. HP's software selection is pretty well rounded. You get everything you need to organize and print photos, make scans and adjust the printer settings. I found the software easy to install and was able to use it well within twenty minutes of completing the installation.If you use the network connection, the Photosmart C5180 has a basic management web page that can be used to quickly check ink levels and even perform an immediate scan that will show up as an image in your web browser.Ink life is excellent and print quality is very good. Photographs printed on this printer using the special HP photo paper look just like professional prints and hold up well to being handled. Text documents are not quite as crisp as those coming from a laser printer, but they still look very sharp and clear. After printing several photos and over 200 pages of black text documents, the only cartridge that showed any drop in capacity is the black one. All the others still show as being completely full.Unlike many printers, you won't break the bank on consumables. You can buy all six ink tanks and a 150-pack of small photo paper for about $36 USD. Ink can also be purchased by the color, at about $8 USD per color or $12 USD for the black ink. This helps offset the purchase price of this printer.Unfortunately, there are some things that are not so great about the unit.  For starters, the PC version of the software takes a long time to install.  While the stability of the Intel version of the Macintosh software was nearly perfect, the PowerPC version didn't do nearly so well. I saw a lot of unexpected crashes or applications that disappeared outright, especially when managing photos on my PowerPC G4 Mac mini.Some people have reported that the unit's scanner is not very good. The scanner does have an unfortunate tendency to produce "noisy" scans, especially with items that have a lot of dark colors. Photocopies made using the "black" copy button have a greenish cast to them. I was able to solve this problem by using the "color" button to copy black and white documents instead.The printer also moves very swiftly. This isn't a problem as much as it is a notice of caution. You should place the unit only on a very sturdy table or desk, as it moves quickly enough in some printing modes that it could possibly fall off or break what you've placed it on.HP Technical Support could be a lot better. The first one of these units that I purchased was stuck in "manufacturing mode" and would not act normally. The representative that I spoke to was hard to understand, didn't seem to understand my problem and couldn't offer any advice to solve the problem other than returning the printer to HP for replacement. I returned it directly to the vendor instead. The replacement worked perfectly in every respect.This unit uses print heads that are separate from the ink tanks. While ink is easily replenished, I saw no way of replacing the installed print heads. They look to be permanently installed, which suggests that if they ever fail or become clogged, you may be buying a new printer. Considering that HP builds printers that usually last a very long time, this comes across to me as a surprising decision on their part. Only time will tell for sure.Finally, there are some features I would have liked to see in this unit. Topping the list would be a duplex printing module. Some of the higher Photosmart models can have this feature added. It seems like HP planned to offer this for the C5180 as well. The internal web page has a "duplexer installed" field, and the back door can be completely removed. Second to that would be the inclusion of a document feeder. Having network scanning functionality is very handy, but it gets a little tedious to get up, walk across the room and change the document on the scanner bed. Again, higher end models in the Photosmart lineup do include this feature.All things considered, I find the HP Photosmart C5180 to be an overall good product. It has some areas where it needs improvement, but what product doesn't? I don't think you can go wrong with this product, as much of what it does is done very well
usb2 to db9 converter. I use this product with Tiki Navigator navigation s/w to connect my garmin gps 76 map to my laptop.  This product was recommended by Tiki Navigator to use because it was previously reviewed as performing perfectly, which it does.  It installs easily and with the blue led allows you to see if power is still connected.  Highly recommended
BIEN. ESTA CAMARA ESTA BIEN, NO TIENE MUCHA NITIDEZ PERO ESTA BIEN. AUNQUE ME VINO UNA DEFECTUOSA Y ESTOY ESPERANDO QUE ME LA REINTEGREN
Good Looking Shelf. This shelf is quite attractive and easy to install. The depth of it is greater than I was imaging, so if you're using it for a smallish item (like a DVD or cable box), it will stick out form the wall farther than you need.
Great sound from small speakers. I bought this to use in my office at work.  This seems to be an ideal placement for this speaker system as it projects great sound in a small area.  I haven't tried to really pump up the volume, but have turned it up a bit later at night when no one is around and am surprisingly pleased with the sound quality. It is very compact and modern in it's design as well.  The remote control is nice as you can immediately pause the play when you need to.  I would recommend this to those who are looking to use this system for small areas (such as an office).  I can't comment on how it would project in larger rooms, however, I think it would be fine there as well.
Great, portable product. Although standard CDs are fairly inexpensive and flash drives the norm for media potability, I find these pocket-size CDs to be quite convenient when you want to share files with others.  Fits into just about any envelope with the case, in case you to mail something you burned (without adding very much postage)
A definite must have for iPod owners!. When you use the video function on your iPod it depletes the battery pretty quick. I can keep this nifty little gadget with me and juice up my iPod anytime I want. Great product, I highly recommend it
Simple solution to adding speaker zones. This is a good, basic solution to adding speaker zones to your home.  It's not much to look at, but does the job.  My biggest complaint is the appearance; otherwise, a good buy
Better than cutting holes in your walls. I have used the PLEBR10 for an extended period of time now (more than two years). In fact, my latest purchase was to replace a unit. The newest generation of this product is an all-in-one unit, which looks like a "power brick" rather than having an external power cord connected to a different unit. My wife told me she would not allow me to cut holes in the walls of our home for Ethernet cabling, so I decided to let the existing electrical wiring, handle networking chores as well. Setting up encryption with the enclosed CD didn't take much time and was easy to do as well. If you're a network-minded person who wants quick setup, this is your answer
&quot;Excelent Laptop Case&quot;..... The Quality is excelent and I recommend to any person that looks for a computer case with very good price and comtemporary appearance.  Superior and finest leather finish.  Excelent product. Zomar
excellent remote. easiest remote to program. has tremendous ability to tweek. will keep recommending to all my customers
A Great Mouse. I think like any mouse, the Razer ProSolutions requires a little adjustment to get used to.  I'm using a PC, and I thought the install and button assigning and all that was pretty easy and straight-forward.  The mouse is light weight, sleek, and I think, very comfortable.  The only thing i found difficult to adjust to, are the two programmable buttons on the right hand side.  They take a little extra time to get used to pushing.  I use this mouse mainly for playing FEAR and Age of Empires III, and i feel that it's a very responsive mouse (Especially after adjusting it to your tastes).  I'd reccomend this mouse, but i'd also reccomend holding one first, so you can get the feel before purchasin
excelent service. The best value in memory stick is SanDisk. Quality and very good price. I will buy again SanDisk products.
Does not fit the E2c. These are great sleeves, but they do not fit on the E2c's (the flange has too small of an opening)
V2230wm flat screen monitor is super. This ViewSonic flat screen replaces a regular large screen ViewSonic that I used without any problems for about 5 years.  The flat screen offers the same vivid colors and large image that I had enjoyed with my first ViewSonic. The screen arrived well packaged, easy to set up and has functioned for several weeks now with zero problems. I am a huge fan of ViewSonic and recommend it without reservation.
Very fast ... not sure of its reliability. When I bought my camera, the vendor included one of these cards as part of the package.  It was very quick--far faster than any of the 512MB cards I had on hand, even those that were of the previous generation of "professional" Lexar cards.  My camera seems to have no delays writing from its buffer to the card, to the point that I can easily shoot multiple frames per second repeatedly.My only complaint is in the card's reliability.  After about a month of medium-load use (about 1000 photos taken), the card ceased functioning while within the camera.  Neither could my camera read or format it nor could any of my card readers (including the PC Card slot on my laptop with a CF adapter).  The image "rescue" software provided by Lexar on the card was of no use, either.Lexar replaced the card, which has worked fine ever since.  However, I purchased a second one, which subsequently also failed after about 2000 photos taken.  Again, the included ImageRescue software failed to help--it found errors but could not do anything about them--but a commercial image recovery tool I purchased was able to read, then reformat, the card, and it has worked reliably since
great quality and solid performer. I am a light user of this printer but it meets my family's needs very well. With the built-in networking, duplexer, and extra memory there are just no issues with the printer - it just works. It is very solid.You may find a cheaper printer, but in a year or two you won't remember the price difference, and will still be satisfied with printer.
Looking for a PCMCIA card for your FreeBSD notebook?. Look no further.  FreeBSD 6.1 and later will recognize this card.  Earlier versions of FreeBSD might work, too.  But this card will do the trick.  I am so glad I found this card
A great choice. ... That said, I'm very happy with this printer. Other reviews, like the one on C|Net, have faulted the printer for mediocre text printing. I can't really address that complaint...have a laser printer for text and only use the S830 for printing photos and I'm very, very happy with how it performs that function. It's fast, I like being able to replace the ink cartridges separately, supports Exif if your digital camera outputs the encrypted data and the pictures are indistinguishable from those printed conventionally. It's the perfect color printer for my advanced amateur needs
It was fun while it lasted. I accidentally fried mine while plugging an external speaker system into its headphone jack - an operation I'd performed dozens of times successfully. It then began starting and restarting, blinking its poor little display on and off. I took it back to Sears for a refund and cancelled the XM service
Microsoft Wireless Optical Mouse. pretty standard mouse I think.Reciever on the floor and mouse on the desk and it has been working fine, no faults as of yet
Clean. Nice and clean sound.I bought these as side surround speakers...I didn't read carefully...there are no brackets to mount them.  I nailed on picture frame hangers.Low keyed nice looking speakers.AdamWest L
Sanus VMPL50B Universal Flat Panel TV Wall Mount Bracket, Black. Mount works beautifully.  Installation was straightforward using directions provided.  Initially, I was concerned about mounting such a heavy object on my wall (which is plaster), but once the mount was installed I realized just how much stability it would provide.  Great product.  Thanks!D
Great DVD recording media. I've never tried verbatim media, since there were 5inch computer floppy disc (circa 1983-85).  I pleased to find that verbatim still makes a quality product
Trick to get the Airplay2 to work. I must disagree, partially, with a previous review of this product. I find it to be a good product, once you get used to the quirks.I received the Airplay2 for my birthday and for three weeks thought it was not working -- Sent e-mail to Xtrememac customer service and received no reply, so called them. Learned that I needed to connect the Airplay2 to my Ipod Nano and press/hold the center and menu buttons to re-set. This worked and now I enjoy the AP2 a great deal -- Just thought I'd post the reset fix for those who find themselves in my situation, as it seems a previous reviewer is/was
One Terabyte External Hard Drive. Sure is louder than I'd like - my wife as well - but the idea of having 20 years of collected computer files in one place is really appealing. Plenty fast. Sleek design. Lots of options - and all the correct cables. Had a problem during installation that was quickly fixed by calling WD support people - the drive was not "initialized," which took about three hours to accomplish
cabin watcher. After reading all the connection problems with wireless IP cameras , I decided to purchase the wired ver. (BL-C10A panasonic). I was very pleased with the easy setup and dns service included for the camera . I currently use this camera in a cabin , so I can look in and see the temp. inside and look around. This is simpe remote monitoring , as hookup took less than 1.hr to get up and running. I do not use the emailing feature presently .Pros : simple to setup and get running over internetprice is reasonableimages are the best for a camera this cheapusing viewnet  (dns service) very easyCons : wired to the routerno included light leds (but at this price)must use timer to reset ip camera (cheap house timer every 24hrs
Easy to use. I purchased a new 250GB computer after using up all the disk space on my 100 GB computer. I had used a Maxtor 120 GB external hard drive with the old computer. Now I needed a 250 GB external hard drive which I use as a dedicated backup for my new computer. That along with Norton's SAVE & RESTORE software I have the perfect combo for backing up my hard drive to the WD 250. Everything is easy to use and practically automatic. I use Norton SYSTEMWORKS with SAVE & RESTORE and the WDG1U2500 and I get perfect backup and recovery
Replacement plan. Have not had to use it yet so I don't know. Did I really need it I don't know but I bought it
laser multifunction printer. Excellent product and Canon tech support was excellent when I encountered a start-up problem caused by a faulty USB cable that I had provided.  Unfortunately the printer does not have a USB cable provided with it
Great Case. This case is great it keeps the IPOD safe from scratches. Buy this item you won't be disappointed
excellent product, but of course it is monster. If your a serious gamer and want the best quality money can buy, like me, I would highly suggest this product. Sounds are crystal clear, and fiber optics is the next step up in technology. My first question for you would be, "how much do you invest in your gaming?". Once again, if your like me the answer is a lot. My next question would be "how important is your audio experience?" YOu dont know what your missing out on until you actually experience the difference. Very happy with this product
Great hub - just a few minor issues. PROSSmallCuteSelf-powered - comes with a power adaptor.  I have 6 devices hooked up to it, including 2 USB Hard Drives, and it works fine without the adapter - a big plus for me. Most hubs would not work with this setup.USB 2.0 & 1.1 - 6 devices hooked up, 3 low speed and 3 high speed, all work very well.Runs cool.CONSNot sure why, but they put the 7 ports on one side of the hub and power/uplink ports on the other.  This is dumb.  If you have the hub on a desk it looks awkward.  All ports should be on the back and leds on the front.  Here, the leds are next to each port which makes them completely useless as you don't see them.The hub is very light so when you have lots of devices hooked up the font gets a elevated.Overall, the best hub I've ever had and I tried many
Good price, decent quality, too bright LEDs. I liked the unit. it is very well built, materials and workmanship are close to perfect, sound quality is also very good. at least more than enough for a car.Mp3 player is quite fast - it takes 2-3 seconds to recognize the disk."Random play" is not really random - the sequence is always the same and very predictable.Controls are convinient, radio reception is also very good.The only issue which is VERY annoing - blue leds highhlighing push-buttons are EXTREMELY bright. there is no way to dim them or swith off. it's hard to drive at the night time with the unit on. I had to make a small black paper cover for it to get rid of this bright light:
Best sonics.. bad ergo. Seems to be unanimous that this unit is great sounding, I'll vouch for that compared to any I have heard, even with a chinsy mini plug/rca sounds damn good even compared to my super duper home player. The, after all it is about the sound... with that said, cannot see the small readout in almost any type of lighting, the the push tabs do the job but its hit and miss before you learn the placement as to what does what.  Compared to the sony which is on the average 15-20 bux more, it looks cheap, feels cheap and sounds excellent.  I'm glad i bought it, for little money be surprised be very surprised
Cyclo Memory Cooler. It is a good product, but I think that he should throw more air, Having more RPM in the fans, and this way it would cool much better.On the other hand, the aspect tunning and the super silent fans do of the Cycle Memory a big product of Thermaltake
no charging out of this, but sound is good for the price and size. Puts out a decent level of sound from an inexpensive set of speakers.  It looks best suited for someone that travels with an iPod and wants to listen to tunes at the hotel without sticking the earpods in the ear, and it satisfies that need--quite good sound for such a small unit but of course it's not gonna match the bigger Bose or Apple or Klipsch or similar units that you might sit on your desk.  A note of caution--while the description refers to routing the charging cable, this unit does not charge your iPod.  All it does about charging is to let you put your separate charging cord from your separate charger through a hole in this unit--don't be mislead by the mention of "holds your iPod cables for charging" that it has anything to do with actually charging your iPod.  The travel bag is 13" long by 4" around, which is the size of the unit (it doesn't fold in half or anything like that), so it's fairly portable.  Volume is definitely acceptable, as I see some reviews for similar products comment about issues with the volume on those units.  Just make sure your iPod volume is turned into the top half so the speaker unit isn't trying to do magic with very low input.
Great choice for my Nikon D70. I bought this card about 10 months ago to go with my Nikon D70 and I've certainly had no regrets. I haven't tried pushing the card to its limits to see how quickly it can write, but it's been plenty fast enough to keep up with me in single-shot mode. The card is always ready when I am. Downloading from the card to computer via my SanDisk Imagemate is fast too.I like it so much, I'm buying a second one today
This is a GREAT product. Believe or not, I have purchased two other brands' 5.8 cordless phones before but returned them less than a week. But this time I have been using it for weeks already and I will keep it. It met all my satisfactions and I gave two thumbs up. The sound quality is crystal clear and the intercom is so handy. Best of all, the built-in three mailboxes is a nice feature and my kids felt repected because they have their own mailboxes. The price is no where else you can find and it is the best especially with three handsets.
Great sound and quality!. I was just tired of rapping my ear buds cord arround my MP3 player - these retractable ear buds work very well.   Gold plated connectors, good fit, and overall quality is excellent.   Sounds better than other products I owned that were priced above $50
Great bracket!. Easy to install, holds the 20" Sharp Aquous TV with no problems.  We have it attached to a stucco wall on our patio in Phoenix!  We got a defective one in the first shipment, but were able to return it with no problems and got a new one sent out immediately
Be aware that it is USB 1.1 only. It works well, but be aware that it is USB 1.1 only. I am not using it for my Epson RX620 scanner/printer, which is USB 2.
GREAT PRODUCT!!. How can you go wrong with panasonic? YOU CAN'T! They are the best electronic producers around, in my opinion. This little card is great. I use it in my GPS to store maps...fast upload, there is no drag time. It's storage capacity is great too, I've got 6 different maps saved on it, of two to four states at a time. It's a great product and a really great price! I will forever buy panasonic, forget the other guys...if you want reliability and confidence, buy panasonic.
Fabulous Bookshelf Speakers from JBL. I purchased these speakers from Amazon thinking hmm...buying speakers online without even hearing them first. Needless to say, I was more than pleased. Replacing my now retired Polk Audio front channels, these JBL E10's did just what I needed--to provide good quality sound with enough bass to balance the other speakers. Also in my setup is a pair of Bose 210's as the rears which work amazingly good, and a Polk Audio center channel.   Others have complained that the high upper range in these speakers is not that great, but if you adjust the treble settings on your receiver along with the bass ones, you can really get it just right for any type of music. Fabulous speakers, even better price! Would definentaly reccomend and even purchase another set for the formal livingroom
Panasonic Cordless Phone Batteries. The batteries arrived is good delivery time and have made my phones like new again.  I thought I was going to have to buy new phones.  I am well pleased with my purchase
Customer Service. The price was great and the service was outstanding. Received within just a day or so after ordering.
PAL Radio. One of the best products I have ever purchased.  The sound of this unit is incredible.  It's design is sleek and the array of colors fits any decor.  It is easy to use.  I would recommend this radio to everyone and anyone.  You will not go wrong.  Makes an excellent gift for you or anyone else.
TI Voyage 200. This calculator offers a comprehensive set of mathemeatical and statisitcal features suitable for advanced students or professionals. If you have work which demands this kind of flexibility and computing power it is a must. The package is comprehenise and supplies all of the compents needed to get started. One review I read suggested that the usb cable was not included; it is.The unit is larger than a conventional TI calculator which means that it is a desk unit and not ultra portable.The only negative comment I have is that the manual is pratically only an online tool, as it is a 1000 pages long. I was surprised TI could not have included a printed manual which covers the advanced features with the unit, or at least offered one for purchase. As it is new enough to mean that the reference guides are only available for older models. (I could only find guides for the TI 89 range online).In short a incredibly power calculator capable of almost any computation needed up to 1st year Bsc and possibly beyond. I would suggest, given the size a careful "fit for purpose" exercise is conducted
quick service. As quickly as the order was given, I was responed to and the package was on its way.  Kudos
Handy Little Radio. I spent a lot of time reading reviews of radios with AM  capabilities and I am pleased with my choice. This little one is light, works well and has a lot of extra features which could prove to be helpful if we get any more storms here like we had recently.(Flooding and power blackouts caused a lot of inconvenience.) Reception is good and sound quality is excellent for such a small radio. Because I have a substantial hearing loss I especially appreciate that. So far I haven't had to use the cell phone charger, the flashlight , short-wave reception or the siren(!) but it's nice to know they are there, if needed.On top of all that good stuff...the price was right
Excellent sound quality and comfort. I wanted to upgrade from the crummy (and painful) earbuds that came with the iPod Nano and settled on these after reading the reviews. I was not disappointed. Fantastic sound, exceptional bass response, extremely comfortable, and they look cool to boot. With these earbuds, you won't need to use the [poor] EQ settings to boost the bass (which just add distortion). Highly recommended
You're gonna need this, TI-89 owners. The TI-89 is a great calculator but doesn't have some probability distribution software built in. This includes the binompdf and poissonpdf functions that are readily available on a stock TI-83+. (This applies to the original, black TI-89; not sure if the TI-89 Titanium has these installed standard or not)Serial ports are nonexistant on Macs so you need this if you have one. Some people who wrote early reviews noted that the software didn't completely work with the calculators. With the TI-84 and other new calculators released last year an update of the graph link software was obviously needed, and I am willing to bet my old Mac Plus that it was tweaked to work smoother.To my knowledge this supports every TI graphing calculator. This cable has come down significantly in price over the past four years and is worth buying over the serial one now
Good choice - Does not require included CD on newer Win 2000 or XP. From appearances and description, this appears to be identical to my SDDR-92 (no A15) except for the shape of the button.This SanDisk is an excellent unit - compact and reasonably slim, with a detachable USB cord.  It is perfect for carrying in a pocket of your laptop case (unlike my Dazzle which is fine for a desk top, but awkwardly shaped for compact storage).The unit is reliable and fast, and, unlike the 8-in-1 or 12-in-1 units which use up four hard-drive letters, this unit only uses one hard-drive letter.  It supports reading, writing, deleting, etc., and works with either USB 2.0 or USB 1.1.If you do not care about the button software, this unit installs plug-n-play, without needing a driver CD (at least on Win 2000 and XP).  It simply appears as a removable hard-drive letter in Explorer.I did not install the button software because I am not a fan having extra transfer mechanisms and photo organizers on my computer.  I would rather be in full, manual control of how and when things happen, and where files are put.I think that this is a 5-star unit, but I downgrade my own unit to 4 1/2 stars because of its overzealous packaging and arrogant installation instructions.  In both the instructions, and on a sticky label on the unit (which I still have not been able to fully remove), it proclaims that you MUST install the button software before connecting the unit.  I ignored that warning, and the unit worked fine without any installation needed.One of the important requirements in a card reader is portability.  Since not everyone takes kindly to your installing software on their computer, the card must be able to work just by plugging it into the USB port.  The SanDisk SDDR-92 meets this requirement, although it proclaims not to.This is a good choice for a CompactFlash Reader/Writer.
Canon KP-108IP. The product is very good. Produces beautiful color and paper quality is excellent.Compatible with Selphy CP51
Great TV, Service & Delivery. I have had my Samsung for about three weeks now; no problems.  I am extremely hapy with the picture quality and the number of inputs.  We also bought the 42" plasma for my parents; we've been extremely happy with it as well.  In addition to the television, I am extrmemly happy with Amazon and the delivery process.  Everythin was handled very professionally.  The tv arrived within the timeframe and undamaged.  I will buy next tv through Amazon as well
Dual Layer DVD Burner. This DVD burner has exceeded my expectations. Additionally the price was right including a rebate offer with my effective price lower than some no-name brands
CD player. Not bad so far, the only thing I probably can have used is a clip, or something to help me carry it on the walks
exactly what i needed. great for anyone with an extra drive kicking around, also alot cheaper than pre-assembled drives (even including buying a new one).  the only thing to keep in mind is that you NEED to have the drive's jumpers in master mode, as the enclosure isn't capable of cable-select
Perfect Companion to Sandisk Sansa. Perfect companion to my E280 8Gbyte Sandisk Sansa. Connecting to the USB on my HP laptop is not only a pain at times, it's not always convenient. Because I use the E280 both at home and on my sailboat while rolling over the waves of Lake Michigan, I need charging that's close by without having to turn on my laptop. It also works with my Xantex 400W portable power pack so I can charge while I'm "moored" in some cozy little cove enjoying the summer breezes and listening to either my downloaded tunes or directly to my favorite FM station. It's too bad Sandisk doesn't offer one as an option when you buy their product, however
Excelent delivery and value. I received my package within three days via the Super Saver Shipping (cost me nothing). The printer is great, too. I used the Brother 1440 series before and now upgraded to HP and I'm impressed. The printer shoots out the first page immediately without having to warm up, and its very light weight and small size making it more portable. I love it
Great stand!. This stand is fairly sturdy and provides a wonderful way for those who enjoy reading or are dedicated students to avoid hurting their necks and backs.  It hold the pages open to their correct spots - although the page holders come out of their holders.  The page holders are easy to put back in.  It saves space on your desk.  I am a medical student and I have a notebook to write down important information from books I am reading as well as the bookstand and my textbooks.  It is a great device - considering bookstands are difficult to find
Excellent & Usable SMB Product. This once available product has served me well.Very dynamic, universal in use, and user friendly. What more could be asked of a simple battery backup system that doesn't cost hundreds of $.I'm looking for the replacement because it's best duty is under every critical user's computer
No problems with this. Bought this item over a year ago and have had no problems with this card.  It holds lots of pictures (depending on your settings) and hasn't caused me any problems.  Well worth the money!  I take lots of pictures of my son and anytime we go anywhere new, so it gets used a lot
Better price here than elsewhere... Bought the Hitachi DVD Camcorder--one of the first ones out, and it uses DVD-RAM for rewreitable media.  Who Cares?  I thought...  Except when it comes to buying media, and everyone else is using DVD-RW, so my media costs 5x as much!!!  Aargh!  Oh well, if you have to have it, then you have to have it.  And this is the one to get if you have a Mini DVD Camcorder that uses DVD-RAM.  It is double sided, for a full hour of video, and seems to record well
Memorex 700MB/80-Minute 52x Data CD-R Media (50-Pack Spindle. the product arrive to me in very good condition, will recommend this product to anyone who needs blank cd
Excelent sound, design, everything!!!!. Amazing Sound, deep Bass, crisp trebble!!! Just amazing, cool design also
Great Product. Easy installation in my VAIO PCV-RZ desktop.  Computer recognized the new memory on initial boot-up after installation.  All programs run much faster, especially my h/s internet connection.  Have upgraded other computers with Kingston memory and have always ben impressed.  As a bonus, Amazon had the best price on this memory
Very pleased with the unit. I couldn't find many reviews on this when I ordered it so I was hesitant.  I'm very happy with the performance of the unit.  It sounded great even when turned up much louder than I would expect to use it.  I'm getting fine reception with the antenna 15 feet from a window
Hot little big sound. This little unit is big in sound and features. I love the remote and the digital readout. I have heard better small speakers, but for the features this unit has a lot. Not quite the bass I expected but acceptable. A querky interface is about the only complaint I have. For the price this unit has the features and the volume to keep things thumping
great product. set system up and was able to get great CD's from some of our old records and then using aux. was able to go from tapes to CD with excellent results. The only draw back is the speaker system
Excellent beginners tablet. I was considering purchasing a tablet and Wacom was consistantly recommended.  I was originally hesitant to buy the graphire line because I didnt think it would be very good for drawing compared to the top line (the intuos line).  I was pleasantly surprised to be proven wrong.  Installing a driver was a piece of cake and I began drawing away in minutes.  It is very responsive and works with all my drawing programs (paintshop pro, painter, photoshop).  The mouse is pretty useless however, and I would have preferred if they had included some extra pen tips instead (they seem to wear out, though I do press pretty hard).  Other than that, its an amazing product
Good mic!. This microphone works just fine for me.  I use it with TeamSpeak, and though I do have to be pretty close to it, I and the people hearing me have no complaints
using armbard at gym. I use the armband at the gym primarily, both cardio and weights.  It loses a star because the headphone wire comes out at a very conspicuous angle, sometimes getting stuck on the machine I'm using at the gym.  99% of the time I don't even notice that I'm wearing it, which is the idea.  It is very easy to adjust and put on/take off.  Custom designed for iRiver, the casing is excellent
Perfect!. I love these cases.  I bought one set to try out thinpaking my DVDs, and then ordered 4 more to do the rest. I currently own 157 DVDs, and so far I've moved 97 over to these cases (the rest are mostly box sets or already thinpaked).  Its very easy to adjust the covers to fit these thinner cases, just trim about 1-2 mms from the two sides, then slide it in.  I recommend using a straight edge blade with a ruler or other straight guide to get the best results.  Every new DVD I get will immediately get moved to these cases in the future.  My entertainment center is no longer double stacked and looks much neater
Cables..........to go!. Cables are well made from what appear to be great quality components. Fast shipping, great cables, who could ask for more
Netgear 8 port switch. just plug it in and your ready to go !! no set-up or configuration to do at all !!
Great for hiking. This GPS has gotten me out of the woods more than once in the dark.  By setting waypoints on the unit 4 of us were able to get back down off North Dome in Yosemite in the dark and find our way back to the car.  For the price this unit does plenty to get you out of trouble and as an avid photographer i use it on every trip.  Like the old American Express add never leave home without it
It does what I hoped it would in a portable unit. I bought this unit for my son as a Christmas present.  We live in western NY and our weather is especially unpredictable because of Lake Ontario.  My son landscapes in the spring and summer and plows snow in the winter and he depends a great deal on the weather.  This unit allows him to take it with him and check the forcast whenever and wherever he needs to.  It seems very easy to program and use
Great product. This shredder although a bit more expensive than others is worth every penny. Shreds great,looks stylish. Highly recommended
Great classroom tool!. This works great for powerpoints and website exploration in the classroom. I work in a 2nd grade class so having the freedom to walk around the room is wonderful. I don't think I could ever be without one again
Sony SU-RS11X Stand is great for Sony 60. I love the stand, looks like steel but more of a combination of nicely done press-wood which was covered with a great looking aluminium product. It was easy to assemble and setup. It has a security strap to hold the set on. The only minus is that the upper shelf has limited headroom. It was fine for my TIVO/DVD units but had to more my larger Sony Receiver to bottom shelf for it to fit. Not as easy to read or adjust at that level
A SOLID SYSTEM. Hands down, this is the best budget stereo system for the price. Period.
Very good deal for a reliable product. I bought this card to be used with an IPAQ HW6945 it has enough capacity for GPS maps, programs and some music a 4 gb one would be great but it seems there is no 4gb card from Sandisk that is supported by the IPAQ. The reading / writing speed is ok too. Very good product for only 18 bucks
Pleased as Punch. After doing a fair amount of Internet research about MP3 players and their features I was under the impression that I would go with an iPod.  Having been in the computer industry for almost 15 years I have never been fond of the Mac and have always been a little biased towards PC's.  This added to my reticence to own a Mac product and the growing complaints about service on the iPod being a 'bit' over priced I forged on.I started reading through all of the reviews I could find on the Internet and as always, found a wealth of them here on Amazon.  To my dismay all the reviews I could find on product names I knew absolutely trashed the products they were reviewing which scared me immensely.  Thats is, until I got to the iAudio line.  The reviews were almost all positive and the complaints that were present were things I could easily overlook.  I love the control, I am big guy with big hands and I have rarely, if ever, pushed the control and not had the result I was intending.I have had my iAudio X5 for over a month and I have nothing bad to say in the least.  I am an avid Linux user and it works flawlessly with Linux, the sound quality is phenomenal, except the ear buds that came with mine have a lot of static in them so get rid of those.  The FM tuner is great (you wont get that on an iPod).  I travel a lot and I pipe my X5 through my car stereo using a cassette tape converter plugged into the stereo out port.What else can I say, this is a great product with great features and it looks good too!  I also bought a case from zCover which fits the purpose but I think that as time goes on some better more versatile cases will come to market.A Satisfied Custome
Words Great and Looks Great. I needed something to put my 26" LCD TV on and something that would fit the cable box underneath,to save room on the dresser in a bedroom. The television fits great, and the digital cable box fits underneath keeping it neat and using less space. It was a shot in the dark because the measurements were not clear. Note, my other cable box that has DVR is larger and would not have fit under the platform. The cable guy thought it was an awesome idea and said he'd recommend it to other customers. It's pretty sturdy and has a nice clean modern look. I don't think I'd put anything bigger than a 26" on it though.
Excellent. I bought my son the Creative Zen Micro Photo and he LOVES it, he got it as a graduation gift. I bought this one in pink for myself, get it, you will love it. I did however purchase a better set of creative ear phones as the ones I upgraded to are more durable and have a better sound quality. You wont be dissapointed with your Zen Micro
A Great Storage Device. I really like the Fellows Nylon CD Album (320-Disc Capacity). I have cleared out an area in my dresser that was filled with all my music cds and dvd movies. The album is also at a convenientt location next to the stereo system and it is also mobile. I can take in the car on a long trip or to the park on a picnic. It is very convenient and so mobile
Good SATA Drive Enclosure. One of the few of these type of items available on the market. I bought it with great trepidation after reading all the reviews. I had received some free drives from Newegg (Seagate) and needed to house them. This was a no brainer set up. The utility found it immediately without me having to mess around with turning virus protection or firewalls off. (XP pro SP2). The firmware was one rev prior so I updated it - absolutely smooth as silk. Reformatted the drives. I chose the RAID 1 option and ext3 format. I like the fact that you can specify RAID size and the leftover is formatted as striped volume. The drive is fairly solid. The fan is not very noisy. The front slide up access door is a little kludgy. Good user interface. I was also surprised with the speed of transfer especially having chosen RAID and ext3. The only thing I can never get to work and it is 100% MY lack of knowledge is the email alerts. I couldn't get Infrant to do it and same with this one.As an aside I love Amazon and NewEgg. Great retailers both of them
Nice memory ,but is very litle. This memory is litle than I thougt , but very secure and very cute
Great Protection. This clear case gives you good protection without adding much weight or bulk.  Its very hard to tell that the ipod is even in the case unless you are holding it your hand.  One disadvantge is that the case makes it diffcult to turn the ipod on and off.  Besides that all the other buttons are easy to use.  I would recomend this case to anyone who wants to protect their ipod from scratches a dings
Sturdy, reliable media. I've run through about 30 Ridata dual-layer DVDs thus far almost without untoward incident (the one exception being due, I suspect, to an operator error). I make no extravagant claims about the breadth of my sample, but the observed price:performance ratio has left me favorably impressed to date
Low price, good product. The machine was well priced for what you get.  It's easy to setup and has a resonable memory capacity.  The message play back sound quality could be better but for the price you can't complain
Well made, but pricey. If you don't care about price, this antenna is probably one of the best out there. Rugged, with grounding points, and weatherproof. It reeks quality. Even units which show up on ebay command close to new prices.I have 3 of them connecting three buildings about 200' apart. I used to lose signal when the rain hit. No longer. Perfect connections even in very bad weather. I've used them with ME103 and WG302 units.You will need special antenna wire to connect from the antenna to the WAPs. Netgear sells pricey wire designed for low signal loss as well. Keep it short. If you mount on a wall, make sure the antenna stands off a bit from any structure (6"+) for best signal, otherwise the wall may cause signal loss and interference.I bought all the pieces and the overall system works very well. I don't regret buying them one bit
Totally fun product, next versions will be even more awesome. Being able to access digital media from my tv and hifi system by remote, from the couch is awesome.The product works as specified, right out of the box.A few gripes:- Cables not included and cost me $70 extra- Capacity of &lt;40G is way too small for anyone with a large collection and leads to paring down choices (defeating premise of the product)- The software is stable but obviously rev1 since-- wont stream music to tv but will stream videos-- doesn't allow browsing of iStore-- content is limited to istore and not more generally e.g. youtube google videos-- initial download of several gigs takes hours/days on my wifi network-- Need HDMI and Widescreen but what early adopter doesn't have those?The limitations appear to be commerical rather than technical in nature.  I'd suspect the labs have a full-on version in prototype.  Some hacker probably has Red Hat Enterprise Linux running on it even now.Thankfully all the tech nonsense is hidden.  The hardest part was just setting up wifi id and passwords, which took all of 5 minutes.Devices like this have been available to the technically savvy for many years but rather like the ipod itself this is the first consumer-ready one.Microsoft and Oracle both had famous false starts with set-top boxes, Apple is beating the larger dinosaurs at their own game, although its closed business practices and products come straight from the big lizards playbook, they're much more nimble and stylish
Great deal for the money!. I've read other reviews for this product that have people complaining about losing their data when the batteries are changed. THIS IS NOT TRUE if you're carefull.  First of all, my ebookman came with a bright blue warning flier stating that your ebookman needs to be turned OFF when you change the batteries.  Pretty simple, huh?  Also, don't wait for your battery to completely die before you change it. The main menu screen has a battery meter in the bottom right hand corner, and I just switch out the batteries when the meter reaches 10%.  I primarily use my ebookman to read ebooks and I love it
Almost as good as the original. I'll admit, I lost my original stylus while moving my home, so I had to buy a replacement.Pro: This new stylus works just as well, with the added bonus of having a built in ink-pen - that's fantastic.Con: The only negative (and it's only a slight negative), is that the telescoping top doesn't work quite as well as the original. Don't get me wrong, it does telescope and feels great when in the 'long position'. But while in the 'holder', sometimes it doesn't pop-out on the first push. It's more of a slight annoyance than a problem
Speaker Mount. The ceiling speaker mount was easy to install.  I mounted a 12 pound speaker on the mount, which was designed to support up to 20 pounds.  It held the speaker securely into position
Like it but it's not perfect. If you use it in the same general area and aren't overcrowded with radio stations it should work fairly well.  It's very simple to use and when you find a signal that isn't being used by another radio station it works great.  I travel to different areas quite a bit and have to find another station pretty frequently.  This can be difficult while driving unless one of your presets works.  When you pass under high voltage lines you get a lot of static and if another station starts to come in the tunefm will be overridden.I like that you can use it with or without the charger even though when using without the charger the battery is drained much quicker.  Overall I would recomend with these few caveats
Great sound, great features, great price. The sound quality in this little alarm clock radio is great. I listened to it in The Apple Store and decided I needed one of my own. The gentle wake feature is a nice touch. The AM radio antennae is a little on the clumsy side in terms of its size and the way you have to attach it to the radio, but NPR comes in crisp and clear so I'm not actually complaining.Another selling point for me was the overall usability of this product. The buttons are nicely positioned and the interface was pretty intuitive.
Great But I Lost It!. I liked it but after attempting to use the little key chain thing it broke and fell off and I lost it.
Excellent product. I got the Soundsticks to use as a home stereo in a small room. I wasn't expecting superb sound quality and the Soundsticks really suprised me with the full and detailed sound they produce. Overall, the product is great value for money and the space it takes up. My only gripe is that there is no off button on them, so the only way to power off is to unplug them. I'm not sure how much power they use when idle, but not being able to power off is definitely a down side if you're energy conscious.
Device and software OK, GuitarPort Online is fantastic. This is an excellent practice/learning device.I was pretty dissapointed with the quality of the tone and emulations, but that's not what GuitarPort was meant for.  Also, the software for it is not all that great either.But none of that really matters.  What makes this shine is the (optional) "GuitarPort Online" service.  It has a huge collection of tabs, along with good quality recordings of the songs without the guitar part(s).GuitarPort Online is a brilliant idea well implemented.
Performs Better Than Advertised. I was skeptical of the claims stated for this product.  I have been fooled by marketing people before.  But this does what is advertised.  I was very pleased with the ease of set-up and show everyone who stops by the house what a joy it is to not have four different remotes...this replaced my TIVO, TV, DVD-VCR, and Stereo remotes
bose is steady. Are they the best no.. Do they impress people who havent hear them before YES!! To me thats the best compliment, they are much more objective listenerswith no preconcived notions. All I ever hear is " Those speakers sound so Good" " I love those cool little speakers" etc. I've played everything from Bach to Dio and they sound very realistic. Subwoofer placement is key to having the proper bass level. At [...] they are a steal.. I paid [...]in 1991 and listen to them everyday they still sound like they did when new.
gps  antenna. This item definity improves the reception of your gps unit, I now have a minimum of 7 to 9 satelites guiding me when we are taking a trip.....
Perfect product for me. Came quickly and was exactly as offered. I am completly satisfie
By Far the Best Antenna I've ever used. I was quite amazed at the reception this little antenna provides.  I can pick up so many more channels than I've ever been able to pick up before.  It was very simple to hook up, and doesn't look nearly as hideous as most other sets of &quot;rabbit ears&quot; that are out there.  For the price, you just can't beat this one
Perfect. I have the bigger 20g iPod because I wanted to have hours of music at my disposal when I go on my training runs (5k, 10k, half-marathon) and when I run races.  I'm willing to give up some to size to get this.  If I only needed an hour or half-hour, I'd have gone with a Nano.But the next problem is finding a sports band that won't let the iPod flop around, as they have a tend to shut off and have to be reset if they bounce around too much.  This armband is perfect for that.  It's comfortable neoprene, encases the iPod tightly, and secures it to your arm without letting it bounce at all.For men, this probably is just fine.  For women, it's probably a bad thing (depending).  But most runners don't care so long as they don't have to fight with their music
Sleek and Practical. I ordered this from Amazon after checking it out in a store and on the Salamander website.  Has great features - finally a system that lets you deal with all the cables for your media!  Also, mesh doors look nice and keep the air flowing. BE PREPARED to assemble this baby, though.  Luckily, I had a friend with patience who actually read the instructions!
it works. the drive works well, seems to copy items pretty quickly with firewire connection.  the orange rubber cover looks cooler than it is - sort of flimsy & removeable.  all lacie drives i have had have worked fine.  a bit overpriced perhaps, but reliability may be worth the price
GREAT PRODUCT. Brother DK-1207 CD/DVD Label Roll works perfectly as expected.  I joined Amazon Prime & the shipping time was amazing
Best compact but roomy rolling laptop bag you can buy. I have looked at many - Delsey, Tumi, Targus, Samsonite, Swiss Army, you name it.This one has it all:-Ultra lightweight.-All the right pockets, well thought out design for different storage places, easy access to the things you need to get to quickly.-Room in the back, which I have not seen any other maker take advantage of - perfect for power supply and other bulky things there.-Room for the laptop, a writing pad, papers, and even a change of blouse and undies for an overnight trip!-One carrying handle - most others have 2 - one on either side, which makes picking the bag up quickly a bit of a fumble, unless you have them velcroed together, which then limits access to the insides!-A nice touch - a hook on the telescoping handle to hang your bagged lunch you had to buy at the airport to carryon with you - or your purse.-Will easily fit under an airline seat.-Only 1 minor negative - a great idea, but poorly executed...the shoulder strap is designed to be a quick attach/detach mechanism, but in reality, it is hard to engage, and next to impossible to detach.  Which means that if you need to quickly get rid of that strap, all you will do is open one of the zippers slightly and stuff it in, leaving it attached on the outside.  This is very minor, and the only reason I mentioned it is that they went out of their way to design this neat thing, but it just doesn't work.As a very frequent traveler, female, under 120lbs, this gives me plenty of room at a light weight, small size, highly configurable, and I can grab my boarding pass and earphones in a flash.Well done Kensington!  For the first time in a while, I can't wait to run to the airport
I love it. I'm coming to Amazon to buy one for my wife too.  Both of our cars have got AUX jacks, allowing us to listen to the iPod, and with this great remote control, we can pause or fast-forward/reverse without having to actually hunt for the iPod while we're driving.  I highly recommend it
Ease of use and reliability. I purchased this product for my work in order to curb the necessity of installing our Canon's software onto all computers.  This product does everything you'd expect it to do quickly and easily.  Many of the staff at my work are not the most technologically savvy, so a product as easy to use as this one is desirable.  You just stick the memory card in, plug it into the the usb port and it works just the same as any other flash drive
fine little antenna. Radio Shack wanted $39.95 for a similar item so at $9.95 this was a steal - swr is good and performance is as much as I need for Corvette runs although it hears well and gives a good transmit signal for the small size far beyond what I need.  I did have to put a metal plate on the Vette (discreetly) as it wouldn't stick to the fiberglass.  Good produc
Excellent Product!. This LifeCam has the best quality for the money.  You can't go wrong.  Vivid and detailed images and easy, easy set-up and installation.  Works great with Vista
Great Protection... This case is a little pricey...but so is the MacBook. And so if you want great protection for your pricey buy, go ahead and purchase this case. I have no complaints, it snapped on easy as pie. I haven't tried to take it off yet...but there's no need except for cleaning. I've only had it a week but I'm impressed. It doesn't cause over heating and doesn't get in the way. Definitely doesn't take away from the attractive look of the MacBook. Would go well with the white or black style. Great protection, great buy
Things to consider if you're getting a 2GB card. I purchased the 2GB Elite Pro SD card but found out that my older SimpleTech FlashLink card reader is not able to recognize the card under WinXP SP2 with and without the most recent SimpleTech drivers. I don't have another card reader for my computer, but the pictures recorded on it by my digital camera can be viewed on my PDA so I assume that it's the card reader. Shortly afterwards, I also discovered that Kingston makes a combo kit that includes their USB 2.0 SD/MMC reader for a bit less in price than the card alone.I also noticed the ATP line of 60x and 150x SD cards. I have no experience with their products, but their SD cards are potted versus placed in a plastic shell. They tout their cards as being more rugged and waterproof. I'm very careful and have not had any flash cards fail on me, but with the rising capacities and smaller form factors, I will consider the ATP cards in the future.
Don't buy a new CD player. Over the course of the last few months my CD player had gone from the occasional skip to eventually not being able to play a CD at all. 5 minutes after my package arrived with this CD cleaner in it and I was playing CDs again. I can also play CDRs now, something my stereo hasn't been able to do for six months
Just order another one.  Gread CD Wallets. Already own the Velocity 320 CD wallets and Velocity 264 CD Wallets. I just ordered another Velocity 96 CD wallets because of the good quality and the value of these CD wallets.  I am going to use this 96 CD Wallets in my car to carry my music on the road.I don't see any problem about the rebate.  Some buyer already clarified the rebate issue with the manufacturers and posted on the Velocity 320 CD wallets product page.  Check it out.
Works as expected, with extras. Quick Background:I have been using the Pharos GPS kit for the Dell Axim x3i.  When I upgraded to an Axim x50v I wanted to continue using the GPS software, and Pharos offered this adapter that would work since the x50v has a compact flash slot.Pros:-Does exactly what it's supposed to do.  Allowed me to use the kit I already owned.-Allows the GPS to work without being plugged into power.  I am no longer tied to the car - I can walk/bike/whatever around with my GPS.-Includes an extension cable so I can stick the receiver on the windshield.Cons:-Not much room for improvement with an adapter, but do wish it were a little less expensive.  I don't think adapters in general should cost more than $25
I Love this product. This is a great armband.  I have been using it for several months and have had not issues with it.  It stays on when I run and I never worry about losing my iPod.  The only issue I have is that there could be more velcro on the strap.  The strap is big enough for a larger piece of velcro but for some reason they choose not to fill it up.  Otherwise...a really great product
Excellent card. This card is lightning fast. I am using it with my Canon SD700 and works great. Only drawback is that it is slightly expensive, but quality never comes cheap. :
The mouse is fine. The buying experience, not so much. I needed three of these mice. For reasons that are STILL unknown, Amazon forced me to purchase one mouse three times; I could not order three mice in a single order. I have yet to receive any explanation or apology for this inconvenience. So if you need multiple mice without a hassle, look elsewhere.So far as the mouse is concerned, I have no complaints about it. The eMacs recognized and used the mice without any issues, although it only recognized the two primary buttons (left and right click) and the scroll wheel. I opted for the excellent shareware "USB Overdrive" to program the other buttons and never had a problem. The mouse is surprisingly light for its size which makes controlling it a little odd at times. My 14 year old nephew had no problem adapting to it, but my 9 year old nephew was constantly overshooting things until I turned down the sensitivity. The mice have been operating for 7+ months without complaint, so I don't have any complaints either
GREAT. I bought a pair of these earphones a few months ago and they are great. The sound quality is excelent, the external noise isolation is amazing! It comes with 3 sets of rubbers to ajust to your ears so the match is perfect.I would definitely buy them again
Lots of discs are a very good thing... As a person who has used lots of writable CD and DVD products I would highly recommend this product. I have yet to have any problems of any kind while using this product. If your storage needs are under 650 + megabytes I would buy this product. Note : This product needs several Megabytes of room for formatting and does not hold exactly 700 Merabytes of your data. For the price listed this ad it is a great deal as well..
Great Buy. This product is worth buying.  Great price compared to the store prices.Wasnt hard to to put up and plenty of space to put wires in back. Just need to adjust for beam 12' ready for a  19' beam size, but it wasnt a big deal
Fantastic!!!. I received my Bravia today.  It is incredibe, even without an HD source--got my HD cable box being installed Monday, can't wait.  No problems with delivery.  Setup is a breeze, remote is excellent in my opinion.  Video is superb and the sound wonderful, whcih is really nice since I don't hear well.  All pros and no cons
What a bargain!. Easy to install! I finally got rid of my old CD player.  This was easy to fill with CD's.
Very cool, very useful, and very informative. I was a bit dubious about swapping out my regular cyclocomputer, especially for the extra dollars. Could something like the Edge 205 really give me that much more than the distance, speed, and time information I usually acquired with my $30 computer? Well, after a few rides with the 205, I can say that I'm a fan. The thing went on in a jiffy, works like a charm, and gives me all sorts of information I didn't have before. Wonder why that hill is so tough? Well, dummy, it's 13% grade. Didn't know that before. Wonder how much of that ride was spent ascending? Oh, about 1/3. Didn't know that before. How much climbing did I do on that ride? Oh, about 2,500 feet. Didn't know that before. And all this from a ride I've done at least a dozen times, and one I consider to be a "throwaway" training ride. A very cool, useful, and informative device. Well done, Garmin
Grey, not black. Nice custom fitted case for the Tom Tom One.  I was disappointed with the misleading advertising photos which portray a black case.  You actually get a dull grey case.  On the other hand, the case is nicely labeled with the Tom Tom One logos. There is no room for any extra cords (eg. USB or auto charger)
Great Printer for the money. The printer arrived as promised and following the simple set up instructions, I was able to print my first document in less than 20 minutes.  The print quality is outstanding! For home office or home use, this printer is a great value for the price
Nearly all in one!!. This device has nearly everything you can wish for:- Fm Tuner,Speakers,ability to load using Windows drag and drop and not have to use Media player, with the optional accessory you can charge the device without being near a computer. The finish is great and the speaker sound for the size is quite good.The only thing missing is the ability to create a play list on the fly in the device.
Good. This is a good webcam for a first timer (which i am)altough the camera sends the sound b4 the picture so its not excactly in sync all the time
If you like Tivo and XM radio then you'll like this player. First things first: this is NOT a portable XM radio. It can only receive live XM broadcasts when docked with the included cradle and satellite antenna. But you can connect this to your stereo and listen without earplugs. But the best feature is the ability to record XM radio for later playback--just live Tivo.So at home you can listen through your stereo speakers, and then if you're  away from home it acts just like an iPOD. This is better than the current portable XM radios since with those you cannot predict what kind of signal strength you'll get when on the go. The menu system is great, although the buttons are small. You can record any channel at any time, and build your own playlists. Everything you need comes included in the box except for the car kit, which is a separate purchase. For the price this device delivers everything I expected. I'm even thinking about buying another one!
Video Converter. I purchased the Plextor converter on advice of NERO.  They claimed that it would be compatible with their software.  After I plugged it in and tried to convert my tape, the system froze.  That happened several times.  I wrote about this to NERO, they asked me to send them a report.  I did that.  That was almost two weeks ago.  I am still waiting for a reply as they are notorious with their responses.  You may want to contact NERO directly, however, I doubt if it will work.In future you may want to put some sort of safeguards in place referring to the software vendors with the description of your product(s).Otherwise, I am very satisfied with the service I have received from you as I bought many other items through you.Martha Pelensk
Ideal for a standard entertainment setup. This remote saved my nightstand space and has brought me great joy.  I didn't have as much of an issue with the SET key as the other reviewers did, though I would recommend being a bit forceful with the buttons when programming items in.  As far as other qualities are concerned, the remote is extremely durable, having been dropped on the hardwood floor no less than 30 times and still working perfectly.  It has been on the same set of batteries for about 2 years now, and has never given me any trouble.  It's a very solid remote control for a good price
Great deal!. This is a very nice printer, especially for the price. Quick printing, good quality
Almost completely compatible... This remote works very well, but I only have two gripes...1. The real Apple Remote sends a return instead of a space for the play button, and so applications that expect that, like EyeTV's full screen menu mode, do not work.  However, it does mean that it can pause iTunes and other apps directly without having to use Front Row at all.2. The signal could be a little more powerful, I think.  The angle where you hold it does actually matter at times
Great Product. This turntable exceeds my expectations.  Works smoothly and quietly.  Also is much sturdier than I expected
Pretty Good Book Thing. Sometimes I need to have a few books open at the same time, and still have clear desk space for note taking. I used to keep one in my lap, or close it with a scrap of paper in it to keep the page, or sometimes just put an open book on the floor so I could open another.  Not any more! Now I look back on those days and laugh at myself like a maniac until my face hurts because of what a total moron I was. What the crud was I thinking anyway??  This thing keeps my books open, and saves space on my desk. The little page holders fall out, but not all the time, so who cares? You're not going to loose them unless you've got a silver shag rug that's three inches deep, and it's not a big deal to pop them back in.In truth I have two of these pretty good book things
good camera for the price i guess. i still think the picture could be better, common it's 2007 already!!  works great with msn messenger
Great Machine but be cautious if you're a Mac user!. This is a great all-in-one copying and printing machine but works poorly with apple computers!  We have had so many problems setting it up with our computers since we purchased it a month ago and even after getting help from Brother's tech support (with limited knowledge on Macs) we still can't get the machine to function at its full capacity.
great product. The product came in a timely fashion and was exactly what I wanted.  I have not yet been able to fill up the memory with my camera, but will try to soon
A great printer. This is the only printer I found that did everything I wanted:- network connectivity (using wired)- 2 trays- duplex printing- inkjet w/photo quality- actually a fast printerI've had a 6840DT for over a year and been thrilled. I just got the 6980 for a client and expect them to be as happy as I have been
look good, sound good. these speakers look exactly as they appear in the photos. They have a clean, simple stylish design. They sound as good as we can expect for a speaker of the size enclosure. Maybe they sound even better than average. Mounting was as easy as 2 screws (not supplied) in the supplied brackets. There are several mounting options. The only negative is that the mounting brackets are 2 direction hinges and not swivel. No big deal, I knew that when I purchased
Works perfectly!. I've had this card for about 1 1/2 years now and it has performed flawlessly. It has seen thousands of photos (no exaggeration!) on my digital camera and now holds data/mp3s for my palm too. Did you know you can pop your SD card out of a camera and into a palm to view photos? I just learned this. Anyway it's a nice product and I'm about to get another SimpleTech with 512 megs or higher if they have one. If you are new to SD memory, always get more storage than you need because eventually you'll buy something that will use one (camera, handhelds, cell phones, etc. -- note that many cell phones use a smaller "MiniSD")
Just what I was looking for. This little device is everything I wanted and I got it from Amazon for a good price too.Pros:* size* sound* features (radio, video, pictures, etc)* supports subscription service that I already useCons:* none that I can find unless the battery dies since it cannot be replaced by the userI also have had a Zen Micro 5GB for the past couple of years and, aside from its headphone jack problem, have loved it too. I'm planning on keeping it to use for a recorder instead of taking notes.
Amazing!!!!. This ihome is like the best thing to get your ipod! Its has quality sound, and you can listen to the radio! The best part is that you can set you alarm to listen to your ipod when you wake up! Man, you people who think this is Ok or bad, are CRAZY
Does its job well. This case is perfectly functional and actually looks good.  It is transluscent with a circular cut-out on the back for the Apple logo, so it doesn't hide the beautiful color you chose your iPod Mini for.  It protects the body and screen while allowing access to all the relevant buttons and ports.  The silicone gives a better grip than smooth plastic, so not only will it protect your iPod if you drop it, but you'll be less likely to drop it.  I cannot speak for every example of the product, but I will say that mine is totally odorless.It is true that the screen tends to collect dust and lint, but it is easy enough to wash off (after removing the iPod)
Great For XM kinda Okay for MP3. When i first got this device it was okay with it i liked that it can record XM which i find really awesome. But if you are a Subscription music fan (napster,Yahoo places like that) then here is the down side to this product. If this product supported subscription based music it would of gotten all 5 stars but it got a 4 but overall Sound Quality is great menues are great battery life is awesome memory is awesome but the MP3 with subscription music *point fingers down* not good. Hopes that Samsung will release a Firmware update to support Subscription music cause i don't wanna wait for a song that i want to listen to play on XM so that i can record it so 4 Stars
Good value for money. Batteries have quite a long life, and recharging takes one hour
Excellent Value. This was an excellent purchase. As we all know about the outrageous prices for HDMI cables from Monster. This cable which is connected to my cable box  ti nt Samsung LN S2341W LCD display provides a noticeably improved picture from the component cables. It reduces the motion artifacts that you get from LCD TVs when you have fast moving images to the point where it is non existent. All for under $10
Excellent delivery. We were amazed how fast we received our leapfrog wireless remote control.  We couldn't have been happier with the price and the service of delivery. Thank you.
Great Product!!!. I just bought one of these at Linens & Things for $29.95, minus the 20% coupon that was in my Sunday newspaper. It's great! Took me less than five minutes to assemble without tools. I'm also confused by the negative reviews. All the pieces were carefully wrapped in plastic...no scratches. I wouldn't use it to put heavy objects on, but it will be perfect to use as a table to eat dinner in front of the TV, or for playing solitare. I'm sure my mom will love it!!
Great to have mixable media for travel. A recent review I read in PC Magazine where they felt the ATRACformat was noisy, not the case. A disk I started (using ATRAC) sounds roughly as good as some disks I dubbed using an MD deck some time earlier. Hence my decision to go with this technology as opposed to the FLASH RAM or hard drive based devices since I already had an MD library. It sounds pretty good, not great as it is a portable device and my ears are pretty good for such things. I hope it lasts a while because looks like Sony is getting ready to bail on the MD format and I don't want return to make any more Sony electronics (non-media) purchases. Don't get me started on the rootkit nonsense because I believe the music execs all deserve jail for creating a new conduit for spyware
Fine. As usual for any order by or through Amazon the price was right, the delivery was fine and the product fine
Very Good TV. I'm very happy with the set.  Although not listed in the specs, it must have a QAM tuner, because I am able to watch unscrambled digital broadcasts through my cable service even though all I have is basic cable.  I was thrilled when I made this discovery.  Watching football games in HD, without paying for digital cable, almost made me weep with happiness.The picture quality for analog channels is only so-so.  I really wish the remote was illuminated.  Also, Amazon took much longer to deliver the TV than was promised.  Other than these negatives, I'm very happy
Good!. When I first opened it up, I thought it kinda looked shabby.  Its made out of plastic but doesn't look rly shabby...just kinda.I really like the 3 extra USB, 1 Compact Flash, SD, MS, and 2 others which I have never used.This the USB to USB from the cooler to the laptop must be plugged into the laptop to use and the power adapter is optional.  There are 2 fans in the center and over all its pretty good.Any other questions or inquiries you can email me at koldfyre@gmail.co
absolutely good one. I bought this cable half minded reading the other reviews and i was bit worried whether it will work. When i hooked up the cable between my laptop and TV, wow.... this is really worth a buy.
excellent. It took a few minutes to figure out how to slide the things all the way into my ear, but after i got it down, they work beautifully!  No quality reduction, just volume reduction.  Wonderful product for the price
A Great Accessory for the Gym. The iRiver pops easily into the holder and stays there. I like the angle at which the iRiver faces while in the holder because it allows you to easily adjust the volume or change tracks without twisting it away from your arm to see the controls
1 GHz memory card. Great memory card for the price.  I would highly recommen
Works as Advertised. This product simply worked as advertized. The quality of music from my mp3 player through my car's premium sound system does not appear to be degraded in any way. If you have a cassette player on your car's sound system and you enjoy listening to your mp3 player then this product is a must
Very Pleased. I'm not really a "get in there and mess around" computer guy, but this card was a great purchase. Pop it in, connect the tv cord, install the program, and you're watching tv on your computer! You may think you're lazy, but you haven't experienced lazy until you find yourself not having to turn and to watch tv.Did I mention the pause/record features? One of the problems I have with following shows on tv is it's so confining watching a show at one particular time, and then sitting through it without distractions; now I can record shows to watch at a later date. The pause is useful too, I can step away from some random "Seinfeld" episode and catch up when I get back, not because I care so much, just because it's so convenient.I recommend a couple of things though. A big hard drive would be nice; some movies, sporting programs, or sitcoms can really add up, especially when recording at a high quality. Also something to save these videos, be it through editing or a DVD-burning program. Editing commercials out and transferring video to a different format can save a lot of space. It's also useful if you just want clips of a program, perfect for an upload to YouTube or etc. Also, you can save those videos you really want on DVDs and delete them off your computer.Overall well worth the price of admission, you'll wonder how you ever lived without it
Sony TV Stand. We looked at many TV stands to go with the Sony TV we were buying.  Only a few were worth considering, but finally decided to go with the Sony unit designed for our specific TV.  Am I glad we did!  It has hold downs to secure the TV and the cable straps at the rear are easy to use and make the installation clean and clear.  Very nicely designed, along with being good looking
Easy to use, and good quality product. It fits good both my job Dell Latitude and my personal ibook. it's easy to use, and feels saf
Sleek design, easy setup - A few problems. I would have given it 5 stars if it werent for the few problems I am having.Problem 1.  When using the cable box, there is a high pitch "buzz."  It's highly irritating.  I paid $1491 at Sams Club + $5.00 to extend the warranty for 1 year.  If I have any problems whatsoever I will just bring it to Sams for a complete refund.Problem 2.  Remote control keeps turning off the TV even when using volume, channel, etc.  Called Samsung - They are shipping me a new remote.Colors are beautiful - TV is awesome!If I can get rid of the buzz sound I'll keep the TV.  Otherwise I'll return it and keep looking
Norelco Cool Skin 7735X/7737X cordless shaver (factory reconditioned). Excellent product and user-friendly ordering process with good delivery tim
Easy to use and reliable. Our FR114P was damaged by a lightening surge, and Netgear replaced it under warranty. I surge-protected the second one and we have used it for several years. This is a reliable unit and very easy to use. I have recommended it to friends, who were equally pleased. I also bought several for our portable LANs at work, and those have functioned beautifully, too. In summary, this is a great product that I highly recommend to those looking for a foolproof and easy to use cable/DSL router with robust firewall
happy so far. i am pleased with the projector so far. i i am using it on the wall at a distance of about 10 feet that gives me a 100 inch wide screen. colors are good sound is okay. i am running it though my hp laptop with windows media center edition. i have a tv tuner card with cable tv hooked up so this is my tv. i also play pc games with it which are awesome. love the carry bag that comes with it. great  product/price
Sony RDCW500C CD Player/Recorder. Nice as a 5 CD changer. OK as a recorder. I wanted this to convert 33 RPM Records to CD's. Many times I need to use a separate CD for each side.--not covered in Manual of on-line FAQ's.The manual is a little weak. This is consumer electronics not computer hardware/software and more information, more easily understood, would help.The Changer is large (deep) and may not fit in some shelves. Not a problem for me and the construction is typical Sony; heavy and apparently well-constructed.When a 33 RPM is well-preserved, you get a nice recording. When there are scratches, dirt, etc., you get what yu created when you originally played the records. If the turntable does not have a pre-amp, you need to add one
Excellent phone. Have had several Panasonics and after reading on-line reviews, decided to try something else. I had several problems with the Panasonics. I own a Motorola cell phone & really like it because it is easy to use. The same goes for the new cordless I bought. Great phone, modern design, clear sound, lighted hand set wit a speakerphone in it, intercom, answering machine and a very cool looking blue light that signals you a message has been left. I am very impressed with this phone and will buy another handset soon. Only thing is I wish it had speed dial, but it works very similarly to a cell phone, so getting to the phonebook is fine
Good drive. Amazon service was fast. Drive installed easily and is working well after 3 weeks
so awesome. I kept handing out my one drive to give/receive some files, wouldn't see it back for a week or longer. These are so crazy cheap that I was able to buy a handful
Good Product. Easy to install within 20 minutes, and that's going carefully.  I wasn't able to intercept the hotspot near my house, but when I get closer, this works like a charm.
case logic dvd storage tray. The case logic dvd storage tray is wonderful!  The dvd storage tray easily mounts on the wall of a home / apartment.  The dvd storage tray looks great.  The dvd storage tray displays all the titles of the dvds that it holds.  I will DEFINETLY purchase more case logic dvd storage trays for future use
Wireless gaming is the best. The controller is exactly like the Microsoft controller so the transission is easy plus the freedom of being up to 30 feet away from the T.V. and not having a cord in the way.  The controller works perfect
Excellent Buy. Sound great and look great and a very good price. Would buy again in a second. Very happy
Best for its price. 24 ports Gig switch that handles large files, 2 meg buffer, low price, rack mountable, reliable manufacturer - great stuf
Great Television. This television is an absolutely great purchase!  The picture is very clear and has a great viewing angle. The only problem I have had is in the sound from the television.  Each channel has a different volume.  I will contact the manufacturer to see if this is a setting I am missing or what.  Otherwise, an excellent product
does what I want. I wanted to set a timer for certain events. This does exactly what I want very well, at a very fair price. After reading the reviews, I had expected it to gain or lose minutes each day, which would be ok with me, but have had it for a month or so and it keeps the correct time. Pleasant design, works fine, I am pleased
ipod nano case. I had got this case for christmass and It looks so good on my ipod nano, but after a couple of opening and closing the magnent started to come out of the case. But overall the case is a good case
Works great!. I love this radio.  It's the best shower radio I've tried.  Worth the extra money
Sony  CDP-CE375 5-C D Changer. We have truly enjoyed our CD changer and have had no problems with it at all.  We like Sony products and this one have proved to be good, too
Well-designed, sturdy, flexible. I installed these on two LCD monitors, a 17" ViewSonic and 18" Dell.  The unit is very easy to assemble.  You can instantly change the height, angle, and rotation of the monitors without having to turn any set scres.  You just hold the screen and move it to whatever position desired.  There are various pieces of hardware supplied to fit many monitor types
Great Budget Setup. I got these after purchasing a Denon 2807 mostly for it's HDMI ability and feeling that it was being underutilized on my stereo speakers.I picked them up at Fry's for $199 and I must say that I think they sound great.  I haven't got a lot of room to fill (perhaps 15ft x 25ft) and I didn't want anything too loud as I live in an apartment complex, but the sound definitely fills the room and the frequency ranges sound very well represented.I haven't got much else to compare them too, but I think that even though they may not be the latest model, that a name brand for this price shouldn't be overlooked
excellent product. I have used HP's toner cartridge most of the time for my 10 year old HP Laserjet Printer. It gives good black printing and lasts a very long time so the up front cost is worth it
Best wireless keyboard I've used. I got this keyboard about a month ago, and I've been using it regularly since.   It's very nice compared to other wireless keyboards because it's symmetrical, so you can put it in your lap and type on it - there's no numeric keypad sticking out on the right.   If you're a heavy numeric keypad user, this will be a problem for you, but if your life is spent more on the home row, it's really nice not to have all that extra junk off to the right.The reason I rate it four stars rather than five is that the function keys are a real problem - I occasionally hit them accidentally, because they are proximity/capacitive sensors rather than actual keys.   I'd rather they weren't there at all.   However, after using the keyboard for a month, I hit them much less often, so if you like the feel of the keyboard in general, as I do, this is probably not a deal-killer.I'm using it with my Mac, running OSX 10.4.   The OSX driver doesn't support any of the extra features of the keyboard other than the volume control and mute button, so for example the trackpad doesn't work.   This is unfortunate, but I can definitely live with it.The mouse is heavy and I don't use it much, because I prefer a trackpad, but it does seem to work well with the Mac.   The recharging station is a nice touch - I wish the keyboard was also rechargeable.One thing to be aware of with this keyboard is that there's a learning curve for using it, and if you type Dvorak-style, you can't switch the keycaps around, because they're kind of smeared into a crescent, which means that some of the keys at the center of the keyboard are sized differently than the other keys.   For me it took a day to type well on it, and when I've been typing on my laptop keyboard for a while, going back requires a bit of re-learning.   But if you type a lot, and the features of this keyboard generally appeal, I don't think this is a barrier to using it.All in all, the nicest keyboard I've tried in a long time.   Ted sez check it out
Awesome. 4 gig in such a small package.  It is so great to have to not worry about if you have enough room or not while on the road.  While going to college I can keep all my previous class information for reference anywhere I go.Has not failed once and with the cover that you can't lose makes the whole package great
A great addition for your inMotion speakers. I purchased the Altec Lansing sub-woofer to add some bass to my inMotion speakers and was very surprised and pleased at how much better the system sounds with it.I have owned other Altec Lansing speakers and I have always liked thier quality and sound.I now have a stereo system that sounds as good, if not better than my $5000.00 home stereo.If you buy the inMotion speakers,get this sub-woofer to go with them.You won't be disappointed.         Gary McMurchy
Don't try another brand of DVD +,- R. I never write reviews, but these dvd's are the best recordable media I have ever used.  I used my fair share of these discs without a single coaster.  Even if these are pricer than other brands don't waste your money buy these no questions asked
HAD TO HAVE THE RPN LOGIC. The price of this calculator was about twice as much as I wanted to pay, but I had to have the RPN capability.  When you have used an RPN calculator as long as I have, it's difficult to change.  The metric conversion functions were a must have feature for me also.  The one thing I dislike the most about this calculator is the key layout.  The keys are not layed out straight across, but rather they are in a "V" orientation.  If you are single finger user as I am, you will miss some keys
Western Digital Passport 120GB External Hard Drive. This is just Great. Lots of storage for data files and pictures. Allows me to keep my file with me where ever I go. No additonal software required, just plug it in the USB Port and you have instant files, fast and easy to use. Small in size but big in storage. I give it 5 stars
Wonderful picture, feature set, sound, I love it!. This is my first plasma TV and I love it.  We bought this to put the icing on the cake after having remodeled our complete house.  The TV sounds great, and looks great.  HDTV is stunning!  I am very pleased with my purchase and would recommend this TV to anyone
Great First Time GPS. I just received my X930 and used it to hunt down garage sales in a large city near my small town.  It cut my time in half.  No, it doesnt know all the shortcuts I know, but I didn't buy it to take me on the routes I already know.  It found all the addresses I put in, which were quite a few, except for one that was in a new subdivision currently being constructed, understandable.  It even put up with me taking my shortcuts against its wishes and ended up rerouting to my shortcuts.  I'm sure it doesnt compete with Garmin, but for the price you can't beat it.  The X930 will get you to where you are going, and find the places you can't.If you are looking for something to use once in awhile, or like me for garage sales too, the X930 is the perfect unit.  Don't spend the big bucks for something that will spend most of its life in your glove box after the novelty wears off.  Save your money, get the X930
Can't live without it.... I just love this little MP3 player. I have about 300 songs on it and still have 4MB left. I don't think I'll ever fill it up. I just can't live without it now. It was super easy to install, works with RealPlayer and Windows Media Player.  Also works great with Belkin Tunecast for the car. Just make sure the volume on the player is turned up all the way, or the Belkin won't pick it up and turn on
Great. High speed reader that works flawlessly and at high speed. All you need for your card and computer
Ipod who? Zune who?. This is absolutely the best mp3 i have ever owned. What makes it the best?1. 16 million color 2.5 LCD touchscreen.2. Battery life is too good to be true. 52 hours audio 10hr video.3. The best sound, it has how much tweaks, its sick. You can slowdown a song or make it sound like the chipmunks. Has BBE,Wide stereo, enhancement stereo etc.4. The volume is sooo dam loud. I had a Zune and the volume level was at 20, the lourdest it could go. The D2 level is 50 and at 30 it sounds as high as the zune.5. You can encode AVI video bitrate at 1.5mbps.Also have WMV which you can encode at 768kbps.6. No need to install to transfer files, it works like a USB flash drive.7. You can change backgrounds and if you put a black background and your text is black, you can change the text color to 20 difference colors or make you own.8. The touchscreen is smooth and flawless. WHen playing music it tells you the info of the file. example bitrate info, Hz etc. Something that is lacking on the big boys.9. Has tv output, also has a recorder to record conversations.10. Can view .txt files.11. Can view pics at very high pixels.12. Fm tuner, you can record from the FM radio. You can set the bitrate from low to 256kbps.13. Has a SD slot for more storage. Get a 8 gig SD for a total for 12 gig. Imagine in 2 years when they have 20 gig SD.14. Great support, firmware updates are always available.Plus sooo much more
Jakob from England doesn't know much...... The cable itself if phenominal.  When I bought my first DVD player I bought along with it Monster S and Optical cables, and I haven't looked back since. *But, for the most part, this review is just to state that an  earlier review from &quot;Jakob from England&quot; should be disregarded  due to his obvious lack of knowledge of the product.  I mean, what exactly  was he &quot;watching&quot; with this optical cable
Cruising w/optics. I have been very pleased with the performance and ease of operation of the LX7 cordless optical mouse I purchased. It has greatly enhanced the use of my laptop computer & reduced the stress caused with using the touch pad. I would recommend this product to anyone wanting to simplify their work on their computer/laptop. For those who do a lot of gaming, you will want to get a more expensive mouse with more features, but for the normal routine computing you can't beat it for the price. Again, as with other products I have purchased at Amazon, I got this item for about half of the list price in most stores or on line
Perfect Connection. These were not easy to find...until I searched Amazon. They are actual Monster brand and fit perfect
Great strap, but....Hello Canon....wheres your brain ???. I owned the Canon EOS 1-d, which I sold to obtain the &quot;latest-greatest&quot; EOS 1-d Mark II. My first model(1-d)came with this handstrap, and I found it to be VERY, VERY useful, and incrediby imporant me, being an action-sports photogropher-Imagine my dismay and anoyance at discovering that this item which was so useful and,(IMHO)absolutely necessary as my wonderful handstrap (WHICH WAS INCLUDED in the previous model)..... had been left out of the &quot;newer and so much improved&quot; version.I've called and emailed Canon repeatedly(WHICH I STRONGLY SUGGEST ANY/EVERYONE DO)trying to bring attention to this issue, which, to me, is unexpected, and a completly unacceptable discrepancy.Then consider the 30 plus dollars that Canon is TRYING to charge for it, and well here I go, off to my old fateful Amazon to GET ME ONE !! Actually, its from Adorama, and only about 20 bucks, instead.As for my review of the strap itself, if you haven't yet gathered; Considering the cameras weight, and me constantly running up and down dirt hills chasing motocross racers and the like, I found it literally, indespensible!Highly recomended !!Bob W.MoXioN Digital Production
Listening Pleasure. I enjoy my new headphones.  They are of an affordable quality and make listening a pleasure
Just what I was hoping for,. Before purchasing this Wacom, I did a lot of research and decided it was probably worth a few extra bucks to get one with a good reputation. I have no complaints. I can't complain about the size because I knew what 4" X 5" amounted to before I bought it. The clicker on the pen takes a little getting used to, but what doesn't? Like the title says, it's just what I was hoping for
Feedback on Samsung LNS3241D 32" LCD HDTV. The product arrived according to the scheduled time and was in new condition as expected. The quality is also excellent
Totally Secure. I got this jacket a month into having my ipod.  I had to buy it because I had been using the one that comes with the ipod and when I pulled the iPod out of that case it was easy to drop.  One time I did drop it and within a month of owning the iPod I had it in fro repairs.This case protected my iPod of another 11 months just fine.  My complaint with it tough is the plastic peice that protects the screen and pod from falling out.  It is stiched on the inside so when the ipod is in there is creates friction.  Acrilic and plastic do not mux and you get a slightly scraped serface.It will protect your pod though
I love it so far!. I bought this MP3 player from eBay for about $68 bucks.  I love it!  It's much smaller than I thought.  It's light and easy to use.  I bought it because of the scheduled FM recording which works great.  I didn't have the best signal at first, but when I put it farther away from my body it gets a better signal
Good mic at a great price. Better for interviews than the built-in mic on Olympus voice recorders. It's not as sensitive, though
Good product and on time delivery. The delivery and the product was good. I got what i was expecting
Excellent, but not for the vinyl traditionalist... (Updated 03 April 2005) The AT440ML is widely regarded as a great quality phono cartridge, but there *is* some controversy.  I've been using this cartridge for well over a year now, and my opinion is that it has a very "modern" sound -- its tonal balance is almost an imitation of the typical CD player.  Not that that's bad... it's just that many vinyl fans prefer the "midbass bloom" warmth and other traditional qualities of the so-called vinyl sound, and this cartridge doesn't have it -- if you prefer that kind of sound and are on a budget, look into one of the high-end Stantons.  This one does tend to be a bit "V-Curvish" tonally, with a bit more emphasis on bass and treble than on midrange (as well as being a bit bright and/or thin sounding with certain systems).  You'll really just have to hear this cartridge with your particular setup to decide whether you like it or not.  IMO, the great thing about vinyl is that it's all about what we find pleasing (euphonic), not some unattainable standard of absolute accuracy.As far as tracking goes, this one's a winner.  Not only does it track better than 99% of cartridges out there, but it's highly detailed as well -- the stylus shape is designed to dig every bit of detail out of the groove.  Surprisingly, this *does not* seem to come at the expense of more surface noise.  If anything, this cartridge is pretty quiet and you'll hear less surface noise than average.  I'm sure the light tracking force (VTF) helps in this regard.Mounting-wise, I found this cartridge a bit more difficult than most.  Part of the thing is I was trying to be more exacting than usual, because a Microline stylus can eat your records if it's mounted poorly.  I did encounter a minor channel imbalance which was eventually corrected.  Unless you're really skilled at mounting cartridges, be prepared to take some time with this one.  In particular, you may want to play with VTA (if your tonearm supports it) to avoid a sound that's too thin and bright.Overall, I'd say at around $100 this one's a real bargain.  It's very nearly a mismatch with my Thorens TP16 tonearm, but with modern lightweight tonearms it should be perfect.  If you do get it for use with a vintage turntable with a medium-mass tonearm (like the TP16) be advised that you're working at the very outer edges of this cart's tolerances and you may encounter issues with warped discs, etc.  For me the price was worth it though... for less than $100 you get true audiophile quality, albeit with some flaws.  There's an effortless quality to this cartridge's performance, one that generally only comes with really expensive models.  Recommended
Does what I bought it to do. I wanted something inexpensive to use to remotely advance my PowerPoint slides in my college classes.  This does the job perfectly for under $30.  It does not have a lot of bells and whistles (which I intentionally avoided as unneeded and, therefore, not worth the extra cost). The only thing I wish it had--which some of these do have--is a way to insert the USB portion into the clicker portion for storage. It did come with a storage pouch for the two parts, but carrying one would be nicer
Memory stick PRO. Works very well.  Unfortunately, not for what I intended as I hadn't realised there is a diference between the Pro and Duo cards
I'll keep it for now. Mainly bought this item as a mouse replacement and was tired of using the touchpad on my laptop.For anyone who likes to use SonicStage instead of windows media I am happy to say the media function works with this program nicely. The volume wheel also controls my computer volume when not in a media player which is also a nice feature.The mouse function works pretty well once you get used to it although the button feels like it catches a little.I'd give this item five stars if they had used a regular battery or a rechargeable for power
DO the JOB. These headphones are very good for running as they are light and they go around your ears. They are good for sports in general but lack in sound quality. But I'm not an audiophile. Recommended!
Quick&Easy. In and out, very quick and easy to use, and worked perfectly the first time
Nice phone  good price. Works well, good sound nice features.  I'd recommend this phone
Great Mouse (4 1/2 stars). Most people will think this is a minimouse, but not at all, this is a small big-mouse or a big mini-mouse, i have big hands so i can't handle a minimouse with ease, this mouse feals just right in your hand, if you're right handed the thumb-button is just in the right position, but i find that the zoom function is not for me, i have it as a close application button.With the intellipoint software (required to install) you can map a specific function for each button for a given application, which i find very usefull, for example, in a drawing app, i prefer to use the thum button as pan, and the middle for pen-styles.The 1/2 star i took from the 5 stars is because for the click wheel you have to press with more pressure than the rest, and for the wheel not having the stepping sensation you just might scroll right before you click.Because the middle button is that hard to press, you just might ending tilting the wheel before you actualy press the button (i have 4 days with the mouse and that doesn't happen anymore, but was anoying in the begining)PRO:* Great size* 1000 dpi !!!!!!!!!* Looks sharp* 4 way tilt wheel* Rubber sides with grips* Nice USB Adaptor (it doesn't count, but it's niceCONS:* No clicks for wheel, it's smooth (but still ok)* Middle button hard to press at the begining.* Not-so-good price at the moment (but worth it
An eyesaver. This monitor stand is worth every penny, and considering the price, that really isnt that many pennies.  What a monitor stand does is it raises the monitor to make it easier on your neck to view.  I have an IBM laptop and I place it on top of the stand.  With the stand, I probably have to look down at most about 10-15 degrees.  Before the stand, I would have to look down at about 35 degrees.  This does not seem like much, but if you spend alot of time staring at a computer screen, your neck will be sore.  Buy this stand and your neck will thank you.
good. I've had this printer for one month, so far so good. except the ink runs too fast
SAMSUNG PRODUCT BACKUP. I HAD SIMILAR PROBLEM WITH TV NOT TURNING ON, AFTER HAVING PURCHASE A YEAR AGO. FOR ALMOST YEAR IT WORKED GREAT !!TRIED ALL SOLUTIONS GIVEN TO ME, AMAZON WAS HELPFUL WITH CONTACT INFO.  IT TOOK ABOUT 2 WEEKS TRYING TO GET SERVICE,  WHEN SAMSUNG COULD NOT FIX PROBLEM, IT WAS RESOLVED BY OFFERING TO SEND ME NEW REPLACEMENT, THIS YEARS MODEL.  I AM COMPLETELY SATISFIED WITH SERVICE
It really works. It works clean and prefect. What else can be said but get it
Everything the reviews said they were. Out of the box, these earphones are superior any of my other head/earphones.  I have Bose QC II that are excellent, and the E500's are better.  Since my QC II's were excellent, I tried the Bose In Ear headphones, and while they were good, the E500's are far superior.  The rubber inserts worked best for me, an I used two different sizes to achieve an optimum fit.  The E500's are the earphones where I can say: Wow, these are truly spectacular.
Kick Ass. This product works great!  It keeps my 20GB iPod safe and dry, even in the rain!  I recomend it for anyone who needs to keep their in a hands free location
Two Years and Still Happy!. I purchased my Samsung 56" DLP nearly two years (6/05) ago and even though I paid a higher price than other reviewers it was still a great value.  It has surpassed all of my expectations.  Watching Discovery HD's Planet Earth series or other similar high definition programming makes me glad I made the investment. I have not experienced any problems to date with bulb, fan, or color wheel and the tv has been on an average of 8 hours a day.  Only shortcoming that appears to be on everyone's list is the non-user-friendly PIP.
Works like a charm. I'm very happy with this device.  The suction cup holds very securly.  I would advise anyone who buys a satellite receiver to skip the adhesive mounting bracket that comes with it, it will come un-stuck eventually.  Just get one of these brackets and mount the radio right in the first place
Awesome screen. The screen is fantastic. I would have given it a 5, but unfortunately, it malfunctioned just 2 days after very slight usage :(That is a shame. I am so unhappy :(   :(   :
So easy a caveman could do it... and what a great price. It is sturdy and does not take up a lot of room. I love it. My husband put it together quickly with no problems finding the parts. Told me to be sure to give it a rave review
ASUS motherboards are great. I'm not really sure what happened with the first reviewer of this board but ASUS is top notch quality boards.  Honestly, if you are not sure what you're doing with a board like this in the first place, I would recommend sticking with Dell systems.  There are countless available non-ASUS resources readily available around the net.  There are many forums out there that have hundreds of thousands of members who help each other out with what settings to use, what BIOS versions are the most stable etc.This motherboard is for the extreme over clocker in mind.  Coming from the regular A8N-SLI Deluxe, it was a big step up as far as over clocking options are concerned.  Not only that but this board is feature packed with nice passive cooling.  It has more options that you could wish for.  Again, great motherboard but if you aren't sure what you're doing, may I suggest sticking with a Dell or visiting one of the many great technical forums online.
Great Starter or Back-Up !!!. I am partial to Uniden anyway, however this CB is great for a first time user or as a back up to a more expensive unit.  I have been using CB for about 10 years and I always make sure I have a Uniden 510 available for a back up, or use it in a second car.  It has superior range when used with a good antenna and the received audio is decent. I would suggest using an external speaker unless you have a super quiet vehicle. The anl switch cuts through static really well to improve reception, although it sometimes dulls out the audio of the person you are trying to hear. You can use it with a cigarette lighter plug with an adapter from radio shack for a few dollars.  They will even show you how to hook it up.  It all boils down to being a great CB at a great price.  Remember a simple rule of thumb... An inexpensive CB on a good antenna will perform just as well as a high-end CB on a cheap antenna.  Don't forget to tune your antenna and have fun
Good Value. I have been enjoying these speakers outside by my pool for several months now, and the quality of the sound is excellent, particularly given the reasonable price.  I'm sure you can get better performance, but it will cost much more.  These speakers are a rare find in today's business world -- something that is actually a good deal...
Great buy. This is a great buy! Although I can't even set the darn thing up correctly to do basic things like view my playstation through my television, it looks really nice in my living room and can make sure good conversation to insult my lack of stereo skills hahathis is a great buy at a great price, 5 stars
My Coby is Special to Me. My Coby is the best gift I ever had. My Coby works really well. I like the favorite color of it and I like it very much. The screen works great and I can see it very clearly.  I like the way the headphones fit my ears. It is really cool and you get to listen to music and watch movies so buy one for yourself
No Problems. I have owned this product since last summer.  I have not had any problems with it.  The switch was easy to set up and install.  I currently have four pcs hooked up to the switch.  My switch is hooked up to a Linksys 4-port router.
"Try it, you'll buy it!". This is a really nice receiver.  A feature I like is that it is XM Radio ready.  I bought the hook up package online for under $60 shipped, subscribed online and am enjoying the songs of the 50s and Old Time Radio.  Those, and over 170 other stations for only $12.95/mo.  "Such a deal!"  I don't think you can find a nicer receiver for the price.
comfy but not gel all the way through. Item works but I was wanting solid gel not foam wraped around gel
GREAT ITEM!   No More Telemarketers!!. I bought the telezapper in the past for $40, and after about 2 years, it suddenly stopped working. I just bought another one (in April 2006) for $10 from an Amazon.com reseller (brand new in original packaging), set it on the higher setting, and for the first time in months, I haven't received any telemarketer calls. Before that, I was getting up to 10 per day. THIS IS AN AMAZING PRODUCT!! I just hope it continues to work. Some people say it doesn't work. On the lower setting, it didn't for me either. But on the higher one, it did the trick. I don't like the sounds it makes before you dial or answer a call (like the disconnect tones), but you get used to it. I'm surprised such a product still works after being out for so many years, and that the telemarketers haven't found a way around it (though I'm sure some calls can still get through); like the saying goes: Building a better mouse trap. Yet somehow, this trap is still catching plenty of mice! (lol
love my new printer. I am very happy with my new Canon Pixma IP4300 printer.  I especially like the feature that automatically turns the printer on if I send a print job to it.  It also turns itself back off, which means I don't go off and forget I left it on.  The photos I printed looked much better than my previous printer. On the glossy photo paper, the black was glossy also.  My previous printer, the black was flat so the picture looked strange from a different angle.  I also received my printer very quickly
Targus PA870u. I have had this item for about a year.  I got it for my Dell Axim 5.  I really like the full size keyboard.  It took no time at all getting used to it.  Very easy to set up.  Like the fact that you have a mouse option.  Only negative is that you get some play where the keyboard is hinged when on an uneven surface.  This flaw is hardly worth dwelling over this is a good buy.  Researched alot of keyboards happy with purchase.
Nice Minimalist Amp with Strange Feature. My feature-laden Yamaha RX-577 receiver/amp finally gave up after 11 years of service, and since we now live in the country with little or no radio reception, I looked for a simple amplifier, with simple controls and adequate capacity (hint on the meaning of "adequate" - I am no longer 19).  This amp is an understated black box, with basic minimalist styling and simple controls that adjust balance and volume, and speaker outputs to A and B.  It does a fine job on my average home stereo system.  I concur with other reviewers that the silly feature of automatically turning itself to a stand-by state when no input signal is present is essentially useless on any kind of music other than the constant drone of Scottish bagpipes or techno.  Between tracks of a CD, or even in silent pauses in music, it dutifully and maddeningly turns itself "off", and then, oops! - back on again when the music resumes - after missing a few measures, of course.  Happily this feature is only present on line 1 of the system.  If you use line 2 as your primary source, it overrides line 1.  As an engineer, I find this logic perplexing.  Since when should a secondary line signal override the primary signal? Who thought of that? Anyway, this is the only fix that I know of to stop the automatic stand-by feature, and it does work.Beyond that user-correctable deficiency, if you don't need 110+db sound anymore (or never did), this amp is a highly suitable piece of equipment that appears well built, is simple to use and understand, and simple to hook up.  It is relatively heavy for its size, and like watermelons, heaviness potentially equals quality, especially with things that supply power.I am overall quite satisfied with this amp
Great phones; easy set-up. These phones are great.  Sound quality is very good, including the speaker phone option.  Phones have many handy features, and all features are intuitive to use.  No problem with the range.  Very easy to set up.  Battery life has proven to be no concern so far.  The phones feel comfortable in the hand.  I couldn't be happier
Not that comfortable for me. I purchased this for jogging.  I'm an average-size female and found these arm bands (I bought 2 so far) are too large for my arm.  The material is scratchy. I found it better to wrap it a couple of times around my wrist as that allows for easy access to the controls.  If I were a manufacturer, I would design for females.  Guess I just haven't found the right gizmo that works right for me
Toshiba TV. TV arrived in about 2 weeks.  Delivery persons brought it in, set it up and took all the packaging away.  Perfect!  TV works great
Oregon Scientific Weather Radio. This product is very good.  We already have one and wanted another for our niece who just moved here
love it love it loe it. i was so tired of buying ink only to have them run out or the heads to dry up I'll use laser jets foreve
Maybe it's only me... But I love these cases.  I have had no problems with them yet.  They snap closed, stay closed and are fairly sturdy.  Granted, I do not go throwing them around or anything.  But for organizing things and keeping the dust off, these cases do a good enough job for me
The product is very good. but the shipping is bad. I live in seattle, and it's shipped to Kent. Never shipped to my home and ask me to pick up myself. Terrible. Well, I believe it's just a mistake
Excellent mount for lcd TV. I am very satisfied with how well this swingout arm wall mount works. It is very heavy duty and handles my 32 inch Hyundai Q320 lcd TV with no problem. It was very easy to install and the mounting screws provide with the mount worked great for me. The mount when folded back against the wall, only extends out about 4 inches and the articulating arm allows you to position the display at various angles for viewing.  The Premier AM2 is a quality mount at a very good price and I recommend it to anyone who is looking for this type of mount
SILICONE CASE. This case is exactly what it say it is. It works good and is functional.
Very well made and efficient. I found this overnight laptop bag to be a nice change from lugging a laptop bag over the shoulder.  Nice space for documents, office needs and 1-2 nights of minimal clothes.I would recommend this for the person that needs to take the office with them and a 1-2 nights stay
Excellent HUI Jog/Shuttle Wheel. This is an excellent bit of kit.  I use it for editing in Mackie Tracktion.  The included software was simple to set up.  There are some really great function options for the dial and the wheel.  The shuttle wheel has seven turning gradations for each direction.  You can also set the stationary function as well.  The five programable buttons are really useful as well.  All around high quality feel and sturdy construction.  At this price (~38.00 USD) if you think you need it, you should get it.
Targus PA870u. I have had this item for about a year.  I got it for my Dell Axim 5.  I really like the full size keyboard.  It took no time at all getting used to it.  Very easy to set up.  Like the fact that you have a mouse option.  Only negative is that you get some play where the keyboard is hinged when on an uneven surface.  This flaw is hardly worth dwelling over this is a good buy.  Researched alot of keyboards happy with purchase.
small but necessary item. the item ordered performs well in what it is supposed to do
Sanus Systems Model VMAAA18 TV Mount. This is a very good product which performs exactly as advertised. The design and manufacture of this mount are as good, or better, than one might expect. Moreover, the assembly instructions are easily followed and the illustrations faithfully reflect the equipment. The parts packages include all the neccessary components.
good fit. good and perfect fit to keep the keyboard free and clear of dirt, food etc
Epson is the best. By far this is the best printer I've had I been buying epson for many years if you like your pictures to have that pro photo look this the printer to own.The price is great delivery was very quick rec'd it next day.When you buy epson you won't back.
Quite good for the price. This little reader is fast and as easy to use as a USB flash drive. Pop in your card, plug it in, and wahlah, all your files are shown. Transfers are very fast and easy. It uses a standard USB cable, so it's likely you could use the same cable for a variety of devices (MP3 player, camera, cell phone)The device is somewhat flimsy, however and the front always snaps off when you try to open the unit rather than working like a hinge, as it should. This is somewhat annoying to have to reattach the hinge everytime, so it gets 4 stars. Still a very good buy, especially for the price
watch out where you plug in your laptop. The one in our bedroom wouldn't always work, couldn't hear the kids calling.  I was unplugging my laptop charger at the same time someone was calling and discovered the charger was filtering the voice.  Both my Dell charger and Thinkpad charger had the same effect, even without the laptop plugged into the charger.  If your having problems, I would start with unplugging other things first.Overall, these have been a Godsend, wife no longer has to scream at the kids across the entire house.  Used to drive me crazy
Great watch.  What about a light?. Totally love this watch (wish it were fancier), but why not put a light on the dial?  I always have to move into light to find out what time it is at night or in the dark.  A choice of bands would be nice too.  I highly recommend it for anyone
Antenna. The previous review that mentions antennas are key to a good CB setup is correct. For a normal CB user I would recommend either the Wilson lil' Wil or the Wilson 500 antenna. Both are magnetic mount antennas. The lil' Wil antenna is a relatively small antenna and it's only around $39.00. Actually any Wilson CB antenna will be fine. Also, to do a good job at setting up your antenna you should purchase an SWR meter. They are not expensive. You only need the meter connected inline between the radio and antenna when you are adjusting the antenna. Once you are done adjusting the antenna you can take the meter out of the connection and connect the antenna directly to the radio. Don't be fooled by cheap ordinary CB antennas like you will find at radio shack. Do not settle for anything less then a Wilson antenna. Cobra and Uniden both make fabulous CB radios so either make will be fine
Outstanding with one minor issue. TV is outstanding however I have one minor issue. When the picture is dark or all black you can see some uneven brightness in the background. Its only noticable when the room is dark as well. Its pretty minor but at times is annoying. Other than that I love it and its a keeper!! Now its a waiting game to see whether Blue-ray or HD DVD is the winner so I can buy a player.One more thing: to get the best possible picture you will need to calibrate the video settings on this TV. I did a good and found some examples that worked great
Great for travel, and for the office. I love this little speaker system and now have one in the office and one at home for moving around the apartment and for travelling. It is small and compact, and comes with international plugs so you can take it around the world. Having the plugs is critical - you don't want to have to worry about batteries when travelling - but it does mean that, eg, you can't take this system as easily to the beach. The sound is good enough (you're never going to get great sound with travel speakers), and it fantastically charges your ipod while you listen to music, which is great.  My biggest complaint is that the audio re-sets to a default (and quite loud) level every time you turn it on or off, so you just have to remember to turn the volume down at work before you hit play. Definitely worth buying tho
Absolutely Amazing. This is the best TV on the market!  Consumer Reports ranks it number one again this year (500U last year).  Please turn the settings down out of the box though.  Panasonic puts the TV in the horrid "Vivid" mode which makes you feel like you got ripped off, but once you turn down the settings the TV couldn't look any better.  The sound quality is excellent for non-auxillary sound.  CableCard, PIP, VGA input, better sound and much nicer bezel than the 60U were the reasons I chose this one over the 60U
money well spent. I was burned by another company with I bought their product and they didn't offer a replacement plan.  The item died and no one can repair it
100 Pack Memorex DVD+R. Not a coaster in the bunch.  I started using these a year back and have stuck with a winner.  I won't buy anything else.  And a bargain at that too
Works in Fuji and Olympus. I have been using xD cards for several years and find them very reliable. They are interchangeable between my C-50 and S9100
Basic way to carry your MacBook. Hard shell case, perfect size, great protection and padding. Could have more room for charger, etc. but fits well in a suitcase. Not badly priced
My first one broke within a week. I bought this unit after reading the reviews here. I really like it. It is great for plugging in your ipod at work or on a trip. My first one broke, so I returned it. The new one works fine. I followed the link left on the comments section regarding the fact that no generation 2 nano adapter was included. The company sent me one in the mail for free. For the money ($109 on Amazon), I could not find a better unit. The Bose is too expensive and the logitech did not sound as good. The altec lansing slim speaker unit also did not sound as well. This unit has a remote, charges the ipod, and has a rechargeable battery to allow day trips to the beach. I recommend it barring the bad unit I got initially
best deal I could find. I've heard that Sony is the best from reliable sources, but these were the best deal I could find; and they seem to work well enough for my family's purposes
Love it!. I just got it today and I love it. It's a regular alarm clock with a nap timer. It's easy to use and the nap timer button is awesome. I like to take 30 min naps in the afternoon so I set the timer for 30 min (it has a memory) and all I need to do now is to press the nap button and it wakes me up after 30 min.It's has a nice blue night light and the numbers are big enough so that those who wear glasses can read the time without having to put their glasses on. It works with 2 AA batteries and at its current it's a real bargain.
Awesome Sportsband. I recently bought the sportsband for my nano ipod to go with the sports kit, and it's great.  It's much better than the nike armband imo because you can actually see the screen and you don't have to buy the (ugly) 100 dollar shoes.  Also, I don't have to worry now about my ipod falling out like other bands, and the transmitter/receiver thing is safely snugged inside the pouch while running.  One thing though is because im running and sweating, it makes it a lil difficult to adjust the volume but thats expected with any band and sweaty hands. Other than that its perfect. I definitely would suggest this to anyone who doesnt want to buy the nike armband and shoe.
Good & cheap. You lose the retail packaging and get to steal 2GB for twenty-some dollars from a reputable company.  I tripled the storage capacity of my $250 smart phone with this $20+ disc. (Is it really still a disc or is it small enough now that we can call it a chip?  It's a chip.  I say chip.) In either case, this is another no-brainer
good product but where is the Amazon customer service!. The creative MP3 player is a great little friend to have, at half volume it is louder than an I-pod at full volume!  It is easy to download songs to the player even though there are not a lot of instructions that go with it.  The USB port comes in very handy with labtops etc.You can put songs in 4 libraries and it even has a graphic equalizer.  It also comes with a handy dictaphone which is good for students to use.However I started having lines run through my player after 2 days use, creative were helpful but Amazon have been pathetic in dealing with the return. I have been waiting since January for Amazon to give me a refund. They claim they could not deliver the package to me for some unknown reason (undeliverable) even though I had my new address on the return item box
Works even if your shuffle is in a case. The included Shuffle dock is great... unless your Shuffle is in a case.  It's a pain to remove the case each time you want to sync or charge so this is a great alternative since it will connect even if your iPod Shuffle is clothed.  I agree with the other reviewer who said that Apple should take notice.  This is a small and efficient design and works as expected.  Good price for a good product.  I purchased based on a favorable review from geekbrief.tv.
Perfect if you're a minimalist. So I waited a few weeks before i got my MoGo but now that i have it i love it. I am not a fan of clutter and dragging things along with me so i have not bought a mouse because i didnt want to find a spot for it and worry about the wireless adapter sticking out and such. It is very much a mouse for a road warrior. storing it right in my PC Card slot is pure genius and the fact that it charges there is just the icing on the cake. I was worried that being so little it would be uncomfortable but after a little bit you dont even notice its so small. you use the same 4 fingers that youd use to control a normal sized mouse except you dont feel the body in your palm. The range is excellent too, ive used it during power point presentations to click slides over as well. I have yet to test the 30 foot range but im sure it wouldnt be a problem. The only thing i dont like is that there is no scroll wheel. I know that the size of it makes it hard to have a wheel but maybe a touch wheel like one some laptops could have been  possible. its a little pricer than most other mice but the convience and performance cant be beat. I dont regret my purchase one bit. I doubt ill ever loose it either because of how its stored. All in all a good bu
nice little tv. I bought this tv for use in a computer room / kid's playroom and it works nicely.  I looked at several similar models and was drawn to this one for the price and picture quality.  I do have two complaints.  My Dish Network universal remote won't operate the tv.  When I called Dish Network they said that it couldn't be programmed.  My other complaint is the sound quality.  It is really bad.  I ended up buying some Bose computer speakers and they plugged right in.  A VAST improvement.  Overall, I am pleased with this purchase
I love my 15-pin d-sub vga cable... This cable was delivered in excellent shape, no bent pins etc....It works great...
Garmin 205 Love it!!!. The Garmin 205 has been a great addition to my cycling training.  My only regret is not getting the Edge 305 that offers the heart rate monitor.  The unit works great and offers plenty of data to analyse.
Excellent service. The best product available. The price is great. On time delivery, and sooner than expected.Thanks Amazo
Excellent little boxes!. Just bought a pair of these, coupled with a 10" Subwoofer also from Polk and the combination is great - fills a 14 x 28 room with full sound that's true and beautiful.  Couldn't be happier for the price
Power cord works great. The direct power cord has allowed me to keep an open socket on me cigarette adapter. When done, just push cord back into defroster dash area and you hardly notice the tip
Best in Class. If you own a Canon digital camera this printer is great.  It is portable and makes great prints.  People think they are from a photolab.  It is also vey easy to use.  I have seen other mini printers from Olympus and Sony and they are not as good.  They cost more too
Everything advertised.  A very good product - definitely recommended. The only thing I would change to improve the product would be allowing wires to somehow be run in a concealed fashion down the shaft.  But otherwise, it's a very stiff gooseneck that stays in place however you set it, and the mounting bracket accommodated my Tiburon's seat as well as my girlfriends RSX seat
great monitor, great price. Overall I found this to be a very good monitor at a fantastic price.  I am a picky buyer, and am contemplating buying another one!  I use it for business, movies, and occasional photo editing.  That said, I found the buying process to be horribly confusing and spent days trying to figure out exactly what the differences are between any two LCDs.  Here are some thoughts to aid your search:1) the 206BW is Samsung's most recent 20" wide screen monitor.  the 205BW and 204BW are its predecessors, are inferior, and are still sold in stores. the 206BW appears to be a big improvement over the 205BW.  2206bw is the corresponding 22" monitor.2) the 20" monitor appears to be the sweet spot of the line.  the 19" has lower pixel count, the 22" has the same pixel count as 20".  The .258 pixel pitch of this monitor is also among the best I have seen for a consumer grade monitor.  the 19" and 22" both have worse pixel pitch3) this monitor gives a very large work space.  I can comfortably have two documents, spreadsheets, etc. side by side.  At 1600+ / 1000+ it has 10-15% more pixels, and a ton more space than my laptop.  I was initially considering a non-wide-screen monitor.  I am pleased that I chose this instead.4) movies look fantastic.  dark scenes particularly look better than they did on both my old CRT display and on my laptop LCD5) monitors appear to have similar specs across manufacturers for their generation.  this monitor appears to have been just released (3/1/2007), and has industry leading specs- 2ms response rate, 3000:1 dynamic contrasts, etc.  Samsung's competitors (Viewsonic, etc) did not have comparable products when I bought.  If you are tempted to by a product with lesser specs that may be marketed as "better," find out if this is actually the case, or if it is just an old design.  LCD lines seem to turn over every 6-12 months.6) stay away from monitors with speakers.  reviews consistently pan them as gimicky and non-functional, and they add size and cost7) one drawback is that the monitor stand is not adjustable.  If you care, buy a good stand.  there are standard interconnects on the back.  it should work with this or any future monitor you buy.  for my money, I would rather have a product with better performance than a more functional stand.I have no comments on life as I have had the product for under a week.happy shopping!
Sony ICF-CD73V Shower CD Player/Clock Radio (White). I love this radio/cd player/clock radio. I actually do use it in the shower every day. It has really good sound quality. I love being able to see what time it is while I am getting ready for work. I also gave one of these to two of my brothers for Christmas and they really love it too
Works great most of the time. I love the way this mouse just feels when its using it and everything is working correctly... but sometimes when I boot up my computer it just doesn't work.Occasionally the reciever won't pick up a good enough signal (it might just be interference) but then it gets all jittery and unusable even after the mouse is reset. Only other complaint I have is the options you have for the extra buttons under Windows XP, I prefer how other software allows you to just set them as "MOUSE4" and "MOUSE5" for gaming.This aside, the mouse feels great, moves super smooth and accurate when working. It also has a power on/off button which is a godsend when transporting (and therfore not ruining the battery) and the inivisble optic is just great (less annoying)
Great notebook case. This case is great for value and for space..for the most part. It's actually really hard to find a good value leather case for a 15.4 notebook, but this was it. Unfortunately though not much room for any other types of peripheral, ie notebook mouse, once my adaptor and power cord went in, as nothing else but my notebook fits in that compartment so they had to go in another, but all in all, really nice case, and not too heavy being leather either. Another good point ladies is that its looks are relatively unisex, not too masculine but not too feminine either. Highly recommended
It's very nice. The iAudio U2 mp3 players were the Editors Choice on CNET.  They've been replaced by newer fancier models, but this works fine for me.  The 1 GB is now less than the 512MB I bought a year ago. It's small, easy to carry, and carries enough enough music to last a few hours - long enough for a couple of work outs. My only complaint is having to work through the menu to correct the settings if the lock slips off while in my pocket.
Great Headset. I have had for a few days now and I can say this headset is very good quality. For the ventrillo problem one person had in a earlier comment, I just adjust the vollume controlls and mic controlls for about 10 mins till and got it to come in clear and without background noise.  Works best with the razer sound card.The Mic is a small little plug in to the left ear part. This may be a small problem for the size so when/if you unplugg it you may loose it so keep it in a good place.  From what I have been told even with the fact its not near my mouth its clear and pressent over vent.The sound is very nice even for the price of the headset. I can easily define the music, game, and vent each seperatly when they are all on at the same time.The comfort is preety decent. Fits over ears well and the strap adjusts just when you put it over your head.There isn't too much to make this better but, I will list some anyways.  With the sound, they could add a driver to have it adjust to even certain music, games, effects and so forth (just fixed with a driver).  With the mic, maybe they could have it able to extend a bit so it comes closer to the mouth and you wouldn't have the adjust the sound properties (if you need to like I did).  Finaly they could cus the cost of this or at least of thier sound card so I can buy to hear the full potential.Over all I would give a 5 of 5 but they still could do better on it, but if you have the cash to dish out by all means get this
Great DVD storage item. I have just purchased my 5th case logic DVD album. This is the greatest way to store DVD's
AWESOME PLAYER!. Don't be put off by Carlos's review. I don't know what the deal is there. This is the first review I've written and it's because this is a killer piece of equipment. After I recieved mine, I threw every kind of disc at it there was for 7 straight hrs and the fan in the back was barely blowing warm air. Picture and audio quality are great via hdmi to my AVR and then to the TV. All the up-conversion hype is for real. I gave away my old player. This is all you need. Besides, you can put it through it's paces for 30 days if you buy though Amazon. If you're in the market for a high-end hd-dvd player this is a great one.Scot
If you are looking for a PDA/Laptop GPA, don't get anything other than this!. This is the most accurate GPS I have ever used.  It states accuracy within 3 meters 95% of the time, and I can vouce for that!  This unit works inside my house, ANYWHERE in my car, including my glovebox, and in my pocket.This unit far exceeds expectations, it is work $399, so at this price it is a steal.If you are looking for a PDA/Laptop gps unit, don't even consider anything else, look no further!  This is the one!The SIRFstarIII is an incredible chipset
Great product,,, Tv not good. The product is pretty well, it desing is well, and it have dolby processor with digital out.The Tv isn't very good with broadcast signal, all is ok with cable tv
It's good. I got this for my palm TX. It's good, meets my expectations and definitely much better than the palm screen protector. My feedback:1) Exact size; no cutting needed2) Sustainable; reusable and can use for a long time3) Grafitti writing recognition is better than the palm version4) Very clearThe only downside is that it's quite expensive but hey...if it's going to help the environment, I'm all for it.
Works good. Got this case so my granddaughter could watch videos on her portable player while going on a long trip in the car.  Straps are a little tricky at first so be sure to follow directions exactly.  Dual head phone jacks are handy for two rear seat passengers.  A good value for the money
Improved Reception. I bought my Mom a small TV/VCR combo for her bedroom.  We first used standard cables (from a well known electric company), and had a drab, mediocre, run-of-the mill picture.                                                      When the MV2F's arrived (4 meter - from Amazon.com, of course), the picture changed dramatically. Better colors, better resolution, better everything.  The reception was so good on the 13 inch bedroom, my parents watched it more than the 32 inch in the family room.    My Mother wanted to know why Monster wasn't on all the TV's in the house.                                                    I did order the MV3F's and Z series for the larger 32 inch set ... which died before the cables arrived. The 32" was replaced by a nice, heavy, 27" Sony Flat.  The cables did arrive in time for the new TV.  The TV man couldn't believe the picture.  It never had a picture that good, in the store, even when playing a DVD.                                         I read other customer reviews, at Amazon.com, before my first Monster purchase.  The best review said, in effect, that Monster will make your TV do all it can do, it won't make it a better TV.  For the new TV's in my parents house...the difference was major.    M
Great speakers but best in a theater. I have the whole set these babys are good but if you want them for 2-channel music either step up to the 750's, subwoofer them or just spend twice as much on infinity.  But if you want a budget theater system buying these with the small 150's for SS, CN550 for center, and whatever sub will hide there small flaws and express there strength.  In combo they sound great better than those crap BOSE (B uy O ther S ound E quipment). Or almost any HTIB even 1500$ ones.  These are sony of canada speakers they are much better than past sonys but they are entry level.  You will not be disapointed
256 MB JumpDrive Secure II. I use this jump drive every day at school. I have all of my class stuff, the ZSNES Super Nintendo Emulator, Games, and the USB version of the Opera web browser on it and it's only a little over 25% full. I have the cap connected to my keychain, so it makes it harder to forget. It's pretty scuffed up from being ground against and thrown around with my keys all day, but it continues to work fine
Quite Nice. Well done, TI!  Purchased for College Statistics, would be doomed without this...  Only occasionally refer to the manual after having practiced the keystrokes for a day or so.
Batteries & Charger. Voltage input can be either 110VAC or 220VAC, which is very important in other countries.  Nickel Metal Hydride batteries are better than old fashioned rechargables because they do not necessarily have to be totally discharged before recharging. Charging units are compact and light
Kingston 1GB SD Card Review. Great value for your money. Kingston has always been a reliable memory chip company and the same goes for this product.
Just what I need. I purchased this based on the reviews of being metal and very sturdy. Well it definitely works well on my Canon A620 and I also purchased the Tiffen 3 filter kit to go along. It is a lot of fun to use and I don't really tell a difference in the quality of the pictures..i.e more softened.You can still use the viewfinder to take pictures but don't use your flash with these or else you will get a black cast on the lower right of every picture. I'm more than happy with this product
It outshines the rest. I just want to let everyone know that I was extremely impressed with this Samsung 1080p TV.  I starting playing PS3 games right away, and boy was I blown away!!! Resistance looked 10x better on this TV than on the regular NTSC TV.  Afterwords hooked up HD Cable and now I'm watching the Dodgers, Lakers and ESPN on HD... The quality is great.  You can't go wrong if you buy this TV. Amazon was great, shipping was excellent (the guys from Eagle Carrier brought the TV up to the third floor were I live at and called me to make sure I was home for delivery.)For the money best buy in the Market, I saw this same TV at Best Buy 3 weeks later for $2199 plus tax and the CA Recycle fee. Whoooooo!!! that's a lot of cash. But not here
Good comfort for 17 inch Laptops. The filling of the handles and the back will make you feel extremely comfortable even when carrying a heavy laptop and a couple of books. There is plenty of space inside and a lot of pockets for pens, mp3player, cell phone, etc. Its large size will cover your entire back even if you are 6'5'' tall. Overall is one of the best backpacks that you can find for 17inch laptops.
100% better then the armband it comes with. This is one ofthose items where simlpe-stupid seems to work best.  The armband that the iRiver comes with is one of the most poorly designed items I have come across.  The hook-and-eye closure limits the range of sizing options and is nearly impossible to secure using one hand! Makes me wonder if anyone at iRiver ever tried it out.  This armband, however, is great!  It is elastic enough to be comfortable when your arm is relaxed or flexed (unlike the included armband, which was made of non-stretching neoprene and can cut off circulation when your bicep is flexed) I am also a big jogger and the elastic is stiff enough that the player won't bounce around or slide down your arm and you don't need to cinch it very tightly to be secure.The case is great - it is a hard-but-rubbery type of material and instead of having a solid loop to attach it to the armband it has a belt clip (much like what you find on cell phone belt clips)  I have found that i'm using the clip more frequently then I would have imagined - on the neck of my shirt, the strap to my backpack, on my back pocket, etc.  Basically, it's convenient that you can pop the player off the armband and just clip it anywhere on your body.This accessory is a great solution to the cumbersome (and fairly unattractive) arm band they included with the players
Great Scanner. The Bearcat BC72XLT arrived promptly. It is easy to use and the reception is really great except my local police have moved to much higher UHF so I cant get those
very good small radio. This is a very good radio, well-built, acceptable reception by considering its size and price. The quality of the sound is great. It also shows time with alarm. It's sleep mode helps to save battery life. I strongly recommend this nice radio.
Nice 'buds, and great customer service. These are nice earbuds for the price -- the sound quality is up there with earbuds costing twice as much. The 'buds do very well blocking outside noise due to the rubber earpieces, which come in three sizes to make it easier to get a good fit.  I did notice that the 'buds sounded tinny if I used the wrong size earpiece, so anyone who is unhappy with the sound might try a different size: you need that good seal to get the best sound.And great customer service - the 'buds I got from Amazon developed a short and stopped working within the first week.  I sent an email to Skull Candy describing the problem (as instructed from their website), and had an RMA number and an address to mail the defective set to in 24 hours.  Cost me less than $1 to mail, and the new pair arrived within a week (and no problems with those so far).Very happy here -- I'll be recommending these earbuds to friends.
Worth every penny and it doesn't cost a lot of pennies!. I purchased this for my daughter who is beginning piano lessons.  We have been very impressed with the sound and feel of the keys.  For practicing, we use the grand piano mode.  This keyboard can do so much more than we need but those extra features are a great incentive for her to practice.  Practice first then play second!  I find myself dabbling at this keyboard almost daily.  This isn't a very technical review.  But from one parent to another, feel confident that this is an excellent purchase.  I'm very glad that I didn't spend $600+ on a digital piano.  I recommend the Yamaha LC3 stand for this keyboard.  It is not listed as an option but after calling Yamaha, they suggested it as well.  It bolts to the bottom and is collapsible as well
Usable but not perfect. I originally bought this for my 20D with the BG-E2 batterygrip and when it arrived found that no instructions on how to safely attach it were included. After a bit of googeling I found those (in the MKIIN manual downloadable from Canons web site) and it felt pretty secure. It certainly helps when you are using larger lenses and its good value for the money. I have now upgraded to a MKIIN and have moved the strap to that body. If you find it hard to use the main dial you have probably tightened the strap too much
awesome stereo mic.. This works great.  Good sound, easy to use.. great purchase.
Audiophile Audio. Seeking an alternative to the Apple OEM earbuds, I ordered a set of these Sennheiser earphones.  Sennheiser products are known for having a particular sound quality that I'll describe as a relatively flat bass curve and an open midrange to highend with excellent dynamics and these fell exactly within my expectations.While some might find the bass response lacking, these were just what I wanted and expected. The open sound of these phones is appropriate for long hours of uninterrupted listening free of discomfort brought on by auditory overload. The in-line volume control was an unexpected bonus and is most welcome, especially if the source music device is tucked away in a pocket or something.
Very good for Statistics. This calculator is great for my intro statistics class. The setup is similar to the TI-83, but there is more memory and more functions. It processes data very quickly and clearly displays results. This calculator is great for statistics
I love the pen. My wife and I bought this product for our iMac and it works just fine.  I like the pen very much and rarely used the mouse.  I just had problems trying to install the software that comes with it.  Photoshop installs, but doesn't run.  Paint Essential works perfect.  Color Efex couldn't install it at all.  Besides the software the Tablet works great, and wouldn't come back to grab a mouse
Works as promised. Bought this to use with my ipod when my wife and I listen together. I like the Shure in ear headphones and she likes the over-your ear type. This allows us to both be plugged in and I don't get too much volume from the in ear headphones by turning down the volume with this device independently
Don't pass up this antenna. After reading lots of mixed reviews on this antenna i decided to give it a try. WOW, am i glad i bought this antenna. Very easy to install. Just follow the directions and make sure you use the amplifier included in the box and make sure you provide power to the amplifier. This antenna worked a lot better than expected. [...] shows me to be 46- 50 miles from the antennas. I used the compass orientation they gave me and pointed the antenna once with a compass, and did not have to go back up on the roof and tweak the direction. Antenna is small and hardly noticeable up on the roof. In my opinion, Works Great !!
Buy this plasma and you won't regret it!. After a year and a half of price watching and comparison, I purchased this plasma from Amazon for $1149.  What a deal.  Eagle shipped and set up in my house within 7 days of completing the order.  I use satellite for my HDTV and recently purchased a UHF amplified antenna for local channels.  I was shocked at the quality of the over the air broadcast.  It is actually equal to the satellite.  The picture is flawless and i don't get any buzzing that some of the other reviewers complained about.  This is the best TV I have ever seen!  Even the channels that don't broadcast in HD look great!  I tried cable HD but canceled and went with satellite when I saw the difference at a friends house.  No comparison.  I recommend setting all of the video to 50.  The vivid setting is just not realistic.  You can move the brightness and contrast up to 60 in a darker room.  Any higher and you do get some pixelation in some darker scenes.  I run my video through the 2 HDMI connections and my audio through my surround sound receiver.  I tried the internal speakers just to get an idea of the quality of sound and it was fine.  Can't really compare to a good 7.1 system though.  The plasmas in the big department stores don't do these screens justice.  With an up converting  1080i DVD player that I also purchased through Amazon, I am totally satisfied.  They say these plasmas will last far longer that the old tube tv's.  I hope so.  The only thing I would change about this Plasma is the gloss black frame.  It looks great until you turn on a light or get sun in the background.  If it was matte finish there wouldn't be any glare at all from the side of the picture but in a dark room that wouldn't matter anyway.  I really can't say enough about this plasma.  Best purchase I ever made
8 IN 1 CARD READER. WORKS FINE FOR ME BUT FOUND IT ON KODAK WEB PAGE FOR ABOUT HALF THE PRICE. THANK YOU
iM716 ..........current bargain amongst iem's. This is not my first InEarMonitor purchase. Prior to the iM716, I have been using Etymotics er-6i (both amped and unamped), which I had considered the absolute best-bang for the buck monitors. My background includes an interest in "hi-fi" since around 1960, and several years with guitar, string bass, piano etc....anyway..........these are the new champs in the under $250 price category, and strongly comparable to Shure E4, and Ety ER-4S. Negative reviews here reflect that some folks have little idea of how iem's are inserted/fit. Insertion is directed to the front and upwards (this is the natural direction of the ear canal). Also, don't be afraid of going too deep with them - you cannot hurt yourself with them and they demand a good seal. The iM716 is very good in presenting the details of a recording (they are derived from Etymotic drivers), but they are also very musical-sounding. My personal choice of tips for them is Shure Softflex (they fit perfectly). If you need foamies, then Comply works very well. The only questionable choice made by Altec Lansing was to put an in-line resistor module with them (giving you a choice of using them unamped from a power-weak player or switching the module to HD position for more refined sound which is best when amped (imo)(module also has a volume control). The downside for having this module is that it adds a bit of weight to the line. While I don't like this module for my usage, I can see where others could rejoice in its' inclusion.The design is very attractive and I sometimes think of getting a second pair of them, simply because they are soo cheap and comfortable to me. These iM716's are now my go-to choice for portable listening.
The best I could find. Before purchasing this case, I researched iPod cases for over a month, and even purchased and later returned a different case. I wanted something that would really protect the iPod--not just from scratches, but really protect it in case of falls, etc.  Also, being an ardent admirer of the simple beauty of Apple's design, I was loathe to purchase a case that would totally obscure the beauty of the iPod.  This case was the clear winner on both counts. I haven't dropped the iPod, but it is certainly well-protected, and, though it doesn't look quite as pretty in the case, the design of the iPod still shows through, and, what's best--my iPod still looks as good as new--unlike skins and other cases, the Showcase won't scratch or dent your iPod in any way. I'm very happy with my purchase
Great TV. We specifically bought based on Consumer Reports rating and it is everything CR said it was
The best Surge Protector I've Ever bought. It is worth the $$$$. I hooked up all my electronics to it. The plugs are held extremely tight, and they will not fall out. The picture on my Monitor is less shaky. Also, the cord on it is extremely long, and the plug is almost flat to the wall. It is also a great deal because it comes with labels for the wires, and locking cable ties. I have bought one for my PC, and TV
RAM DVDs are great -- on suitable players!!!. After only a limited exposure on a new Panasonic DVD recorder, I am a fan of the DVD RAM format.  While I haven't had time to test the stated 100,000 time rewriting capability (and probably won't in my lifetime) I do appreciate the continuous editing capability, including the ability to create and title chapters after the initial recording.  I can see why this is now the prefered format in Japan, and why it is so pervasive in Europe.  I can only hope that it will catch on here. Until it does, be aware that there are only a few newer DVD players--and precious few PCs--that can read this format.
excellent. Great product!  Needed it for my son's class, he loved it.  Reasonably priced.  So much easier to buy it from Amazon (and cheaper!) when everyone needs it for same class, and stores running low on quantities
leather computer case. item recieved in a timely manner. The computer case was exactly as displayed. Very satisified in overall purchase.
Super Light Works Great. Hey.. this phone is super light and it works great.It gets good reception throughout the house and even outback when I go to the garage.  Funny story... but it even has picked up a few of the neighbors phone calls. I have left it off the charger laying all over the house and the locator button beeps really loud and has come in handy on tons of occasions.  It also has great battery life. For the money, I definately would say go ahead and buy this phone
Remanufactured Brother EMFC-8220 Laser Multifunction Center. Black and White laser printer does great job of printing. Everything works. 250 sheet paper tray. Normal text prints at about 18-20 pages a minute.  Intricate print is about 7-10 pages a minute. Would buy again. Paid less than $200.00
too late. The unit was great and has preformed well. The only problem I have is that it is now obsolite.
Its an Inkjet cartridge- high capacity. I always buy this size because it lasts so much longer and sometimes you can find it for the same price as the normal capacity. I've tried the generic variety and all but one has dissapointed me. Its been more rewarding to stick with the original-hi capacity.
These Earphones are Brilliant!. I've gone back and re-ripped all of my songs at 192kps to take full advantage of what these earphones have to offer. I'm going to qualify my post by saying that I listen almost exclusively to an iRiver Clix. Which player you have is IMPORTANT. They each have a unique sound built in. My player has a graphic equalizer, so I am not stuck with factory presets. I'll tell you a little about my odyssey. I bought a Clix and a U10 in December. I am a person of small stature and have very small ear canals, so the earphones that came with the Clix just simply did not fit. So I bought the Sennheiser CX300's. After a day, I noticed that I could not hear the mid or high ranges. I went to Cnet reviews and realized that the V-Moda Bass Frequencies were an editor's choice. They were an improvement over the Sennheiser's, but like the Cnet editors said, They are for bass craving listeners--mostly those who own SanDisks' and Creative products because those products do not have equalizers. Since I could boost the bass on my player, I really did not need added bass. What I found out is that I am an audiophile. I want balanced, rich sound from my earphones. I first bought the Shure E2cs, and then finally the E4gs. I bought the E4gs because the cord is shorter than that of the E4cs. The sound is brilliant--beautiful tenor saxes and lead guitars. Excellent, deep bass. The music I listen to ranges from 1930's blues, 40's-50's rock on up and down the spectrum. Do not expect them to be as bassy as the Sennheiser's or V-Moda's. Those earphones emphasize bass. The emphasis of these headphones is BALANCED sound. Also, Shure's earphones typically requires a 20 hour break-in
Great standard mouse. Very responsive, nice feel, I bought this one to replace an older Kensington optical mouse and I still use the older one on another computer. Built to last
Great TV, had it 2 yrs and still runs great. Ive had this TV for 2 yrs now. Im a college student and bought it coz it was very reasonably priced (Id compared many prices at the time), and also it was a good size. 19" is big enough for home use, and certainly big enough for a dorm room. Its a simple tv, and has audio, video, and earphone jacks. The picture quality is good. The tv has given me no problems at all in these 2 yrs. Its been subject to rough use, such as regular shifting from one dorm to another every semester, and having friends come over and use it too and it is still running fine.  Also its easy to use, menu systems navigable easily with remote control. So overall I think it is a great product, and I am very glad I bought it. I would recommend it to anyone looking for a low cost but good quality tv
Good little receiver. I have several shortwave radios, but this has become the one I use the most because of it's small size, generally good performance and ease of use. To be sure, there are better receivers out there that cost more, but for $30 this little gem offers a lot of value for the money. Sensitivity and selectivity are good, audio quality is better than what you'd expect from its tiny speaker and the digital display makes it easy to find radio stations. All in all it's a neat little package
Quick and easy setup. My customer was looking for a universal docking station to allow for usage with multiple laptops. This was the second universal docking station I tried. The first was connected through the PCMCIA slot. After several attempts to get it working, I resolved to research the manufacturer website only to find that the laptops were not listed as being compatible. So much for 'universal.'The Targus ACP50US connects to the laptop via USB allowing for a quick and easy disconnect. The feature highly favored is the ability to quickly change the display. At the click of a button, the primary display can be either the laptop or an attached monitor. The display can be extended across both monitors or mirrored. When the docking station is disconnected, the display is set to the laptop. When the docking station is reconnected, the display automatically returns to the last setting.Overall, the Targus ACP50US is a great product
Definately Worth Buying. Before buying this antenna, I relied on a small, amplified indoor antenna above my TV.  I live in a rural area about 2-15 miles from the broadcast towers in the Baton Rouge area.  I would often have to move the antenna to pick up different stations.  The combination of a metal roof, chimney, and large trees were hampering my reception.Upon receiving the Terk HDTV, I hooked it up next to my indoor antenna.  The signal strength went from half to full strength.  I did not have to move the antenna to pick up all of the stations and my ice-maker and other electronic devices no longer interfered with the reception.I am so impressed with the difference that I am no longer planning to mount it to my chimney and instead will mount it in my attic to protect it from the elements
Skullcandy SC-CTi Chick Stereo Headphones (Pink). AMAZING headphones. I'm a DJ for a radio station and these are the best headphones I've owned! The sound is crisp and clear. I love the earpieces; they rotate so it will fit your head and it's easier to have one side on your ear and the other off. Very comfortable, the padded head piece is nice. AND it all came with a warranty! If you're looking for a great set of headphones, look no further! (skull candy makes other colors too! this particular type donated a portion of the sale to a breast cancer foundation
Silence is golden. I gave these to my husband for Christmas.  He likes them as he can hear every word spoken and I like them as I don't have to hear his TV shows
Just Grate. 5 Stares I'm Happy nuthing - to say grate Antenna Headphones for Xm and Amazon is grate fast on orde
Solid Performer. We use this in a small business for invoicing and print brochures as well as general office copying.  It is quiet, inexpensive to use and reliable.  This is our 2nd Brother machine and we will continue to recommend them
Good cdr's for the money. I like these cdrs the payback sounds great, only problem I have is that I use nero and I dont know if its nero or the cdr's sometimes they dont burn right, so I will have to assume its the program or my burner.   I like these they take abuse good Cdrs for the money I reccomend i
Excellent Media - works great with NEC-3500A DVD-RW drive. I got this for free (after main-in rebates) when I bought NEC-3500A DVD-rw drive last Xmas time.  I started using these very recently (15 days back or so).  I have burned about 25 DVDs so far and all of them came perfect.  Not a single item is wasted etc.  May be some of the credit goes to NEC DVD-RW drive.  I am very happy with it - so, I got another 50 pack from local Fry's for about $20.00.
Never had a probolem, works great. I have used over 100 of the dics to burn movies and otehr files and have never had a problem with the quiait. they work great
YDS-10 IPOD Doc. I ordered this so that I could play my iPOD music on my new Yamaha AV receiver.  It was easy to install and the receiver remote allow me to do the same control as I do as at the iPOD itself.  Great product!!!
Great. it arrived quickly, intact, it works like it should, and there isn't much more to say. Kingston is a company that I trust and they back up the quality that they advertise
You get what you get. I have to admit, these have one downfall: they are not very durable. They last 2-4 months. But besides that, they are great.These are the ONLY earphones that will stay on your ear while running, biking (be careful, dont let the cord get tangled o_O), etc. And the sound is pretty good.Just one note: be careful with the earphones, since their unique shape can be a blessing or a burden (they will tangle unless you use their shape to your advantage when storing
good for the money. My sisters already had purchased this item so I got one so we could talk together.  I think it does a good job for the money and we have a lot of fun visiting on it.
excellent product, but of course it is monster. If your a serious gamer and want the best quality money can buy, like me, I would highly suggest this product. Sounds are crystal clear, and fiber optics is the next step up in technology. My first question for you would be, "how much do you invest in your gaming?". Once again, if your like me the answer is a lot. My next question would be "how important is your audio experience?" YOu dont know what your missing out on until you actually experience the difference. Very happy with this product
Review. This product is worth every dollar.  It is Audible ready so I can listen to my audio books and listen to my music.  Fantastic!!!
Great Screen Protector, Not so easy to install, though. This is a very helpfull screen protector... it really protects the screen from glares and scratches. Its pretty simple, but I had some problems installing it to my Dell Axim x51, since the screen protector is much more bigger than the screen, so you must "force" it in order to make it perfectly fit, or you could also try to cut the screen protector so it could fit without having to use the "brute force".It does it work, though, for such a cheap price, but sorry I can't give it a 5 stars, since the installation could be a little bit hard because of its size... which could cause the glue it has to get lost and leave bubbles on the corners of the screen, which happened to mine
very easy to use. this printer is great- its easy to use, there is really no need for a manual, prints pictures quickly and the color is excellent.  i love how you can put a jumpdrive or a memory card to it and it will show all of the pictures. you can rotate the pictures, delete them off of your memory card as you go, on the printer, you can turn the pictures black and white, sepia, antique, ect.  you can change the brightness from the printer, crop it... all in all, excellent! i'd reccommend this to anyone :
Good Purchase. Everything works well - I bought this as I needed this as I work with Excel alot and needed the convenience of having a num pad. It works as expected, I just wish the numb pab wasn't so big, also I wish this came without the extra buttons on the num pad - buttons which can be used to load a program or control the volume/mute your speakers. Its a good added feature but can be an added inconvenience at times. Another con - the screen is a little hard to see as I am always leaning over and tilting it to properly read the LCD. Other than that I would say its a great purchase. A+
Good, reliable, and inexpensive. I've had this hub for two months and have had no problems with it. Installation was a snap, as it should be for a basic hub. The hub is small and a bit too light, but it's definitely not for laptop users, as it needs an AC adapter.  The power brick is actually smaller than most other brick-style adapters and rises straight up from the prongs, saving you space on power strips that have the plugs aligned vertically or on wall outlets (a nice touch). I have an iPod and a multifunction printer attached to the hub, and have had no problems with either.  A word of warning, however--as other reviewers have noted, if you plug a USB 1.0 device into the hub, all USB 2.0 devices will slow down to 1.0 speeds
Just what I was looking for!. This is simple to set up and operate. I wanted to transfer some VHS to DVD and this did the job
Perfect. It's hard to critique such a simple item.  It works great, and I've had no problems
Has a phone surge protector on board. The advantage of this surge protector-power strip is that there is a 2 outlet phone jack surge protector on board. I actually had a modem blow out due to a surge, and it came through the telephone line. Now I use a tel-surge protector so I don't have to unplug my phone when a storm is brewing. Note that most surge protectors (baring the kind with huge capacitors) cannot protect against lightning hits, but surges from power problems coming over the lines are common, especially in summer, and these devices can help
Weather alert Monitor. I am pleased with the product and it worked a few nights ago when severe thurderstorms rolled thru.  Wife said volume was a little loud when it awakened her.. Easy to program also
love it!. it's great quality, it takes a little bit of getting used to in terms of use and presentation, but overall is a great music player
A lot of Cd's. A lot of space -- My computer is over 5yrs old so I use these CD's as a  great back up for storing all my old documents, my ebooks, and my pics.
Radio. Like the radio, but at $40.00 it should have come with an AC power cord
Held up for a year and a half after a motorcycle accident. I use this backpack to carry my laptop, books, shoes, lunch, gym clothes, etc. to work and school every day. I was in a motorcyle accident where I rolled five or six times, and the backpack held up. I used it for another year and a half afterwards. It finally gave up the ghost because a zipper that had taken damage in the accident finally broke. I promptly bought another one.Quick Tip: for use with a motorcycle jacket, put the jacket arms through the backpack shoulder straps first, then put both on at once
Good scientific calculator with nice features. This calculator is a good scientific based one with lots of great features for use in just about any engineering discipline.  Overall I like the way the keys are laid out and the dual functionality of having both a solar cell and a battery for use when the light is not quite enough.  The only complaint that I have is that the entry method is not as intuitive as my old Sharp calculator for things like hex conversion.  Other than that, it is a great calculator
It works. I bought 2 bargain recorders that had to be returned for repairs within weeks. Both had frequent burn errors and were real particular about the brand of disk I used. Some disks were unviewable after finalizing. One recorder broke again right after the warranty expired (90 days) and the other had to be sent back again just before the warranty expired. While it was in transit I bought the Sony and put the "bargain" recorder in a closet when it came back. After 100's of recordings and nearly a year of constant use I have had 2 bargain off-brand disks that would not finalize properly . I have tried -R, +R, -RW and +RW of various brands with no problems. I only wish there was an easier way to name the titles. When it wears out I will get another just like it.
Titanium is the way to go. Fast, nifty titanium shell, retractable usb connector.  Sandisk is the best for thumbs - best warranty
Canon Black ink Cartridge. Good price and quick delivery. The product is a Canon original and not a generic which the repairman told me never to use in my Canon printer after repairing it due to ink damage from a Staples generic cartridge. I mean it ruined the print head and the main board. Thanks Amazon.Com for good service and products
quiet, but effective. It fits under my TV perfectly. The dark gray matches the TV so it's practically invisible. And, most important, it swivels smoothly, doing the job it was designed to do.
I'm OBSESSED with vibration!. This headset is amazing. It brings gaming and listening to music to a whole new level of enjoyment that I didn't even know existed. I recommend these headphones to ANYONE.The only thing you need to look out for is that if you have a wireless router really close to where you sit, the headset makes unpleasant clicking noises when the vibration is on. But that is only if its right underneath you. After moving it a few feet away, all is well.But still, 100%, buy these
Very sleek, easy to use, quality throughout. This player is a great value.  It may not be flashy with a nice color screen, but the display it provides is very informative and easy to view.  The features are fantastic, it does a great job of organizing your music by file name or ID tag it would seem.  I automatically breaks it down by artist, or you can make your own playlists.  I use mine in the car for XM and mp3 playback to my car radio, then wear it on my belt while walking into work, then listen to it at my desk with the included home kit.  Transfer is quick from PC to unit.  Only concerns are that you only get 1/2 GB for mp3s and 1/2 GB for XM recording, there is no way to change this to a greater portion for mp3s, I would avoid the Nexus 25, I couldn't imagine much use for only 250 MB of mp3 storage space.  Also, the remote is a bit weak as far as strength of signal, but how far can you get from the player in your car?  Not a bug issue.  The extra $ makes this unit worth it over the Nexus 25.  Overall the device is top notch, I've only had good experiences with Samsung products.
Mini Mac DVI to VGA. Excelent product easy to use, easy to install and great quality of imag
Cheap & Good. These earphones are the best I ever had. I never had to try other pairs of earphone because I absolutely loved these that I keep buying it! After 6 years I buy the same one everytime. Of course I never use the winding case and it just sits there but heck it usually stores my other earphones that I brought but can't seem to throw them out because it costed money. It seems that many people are complaining about the electrical shocks from the earphones and I can answer why thats happening. It's actually static electricity. I experienced it myself a couple of times because I was wearing a wool sweater and the wool peacoat jacket that caused static electricity to form. It's actually not the earphones fault but when your wearing lots of clothes or a scarf with the earphones I suggest you switch to headphones to prevent being shocked. The bass is pretty decent when comparied to panasonic or jvc earphones. Hey for 10 bucks or less you can't except Sony to go all out and improve their cheapest model. I abuse my earphones so for 10 bucks a year I think these are the best rather than buying something thats $100 dollars or over and later regret it because it got either lost, broken or stolen.
HD LCD TV. Didn't appear that I made the right choice when I first installed it out the box. But after a few adjustments I've been very pleased ever sense.Great TV for the price
5 stars for its price!. Nice little Mic. It should have a clip to use it more comfortably
Best all around LCD TV. I spent a long time looking up diffrent LCD TVs. This TV has it all 1080I Pc connection + the speakers are on the bottom not the side, its a space saver. The options they give you to adjust picture quality is great + the HDMI connection is great and the placement of the HDMI port is in a very smart plac
The "almost" perfect GPS-- Garmin GPS 276C. First, I purchased my 276c in September of 04 which means I've been using about 3 months. It was purchased to replace my Garmin GPSIII that I had used for around 6 years.  The GPSIII still works great but has no detail maps available and no turn by turn directions, but for basic Lat/Long it still works perfect.I compared the 276C to the Garmin Quest, Magellan RoadMate 700, and the Garmin Street Pilot Series.I wanted it to be portable. Meaning I could use it in the car, boat, or walking/hiking.  Basically I wanted to be able to use it just about anywhere, just like I used my GPSIII.  This quickly narrowed my search down to the 276C and the quest.  The others mentioned above are strictly automotive GPS units.  Besides size, I couldn't find anything the quest had over the 276C.  The 276C certainly is bigger but I liked the additional Screen Real-estate.The 276C purchased with the automotive adapter does everything I want and it does it well.  However, I have 3 complaints that keep it from getting a perfect score in my book.These are not really in any particular order of importance.#1 Proprietary Memory Stick that Only go up to 256MBThis Memory Stick holds all of the map data that helps you find addresses and specific sites.  The one that comes with the automotive kit is only 128MB.  You can't just go get another one of these anywhere because it is a proprietary design.  The 128MB one I have had enough storage to download all the map data between Austin, Texas and Las Vegas, Nevada.  We drove to Vegas from Austin in November and the 276C worked great.  I wish it wasn't a proprietary design or I wish they at least offered a larger model that would hold the entire US.#2 Cheap, Cheap, Cheap Car adapter.  I read this on another review site before I bought mine. And they were right.  The threading that holds the fuse in place is plastic. Pulling the unit out of the car power plug puts stress on the threads.  Mine broke last week but was quickly replaced by an authorized Garmin dealer.  This is another item you can't just buy anywhere because the car adapter has the built in speaker.  I don't expect the new adapter to last long either.  I move mine between cars several times a week.#3 File this one under being very picky.If the address of your destination is on a one way street the 276C will try to route you around the block so that you can come back down the one way street.  This is fine except when the location is really on the corner of a one way street with an entrance on the side street.  The unit will literally route you right past the side entrance to the next street that will allow you to go up a few blocks so that you can come right back down to the location on the one way street.   I don't know if the automotive only GPS units would handle this situation any better.That's it.We drove over 3000 miles on our trip in November and used the 276C extensively the whole way.Regards,Alan
HP Scanjet 4370 does the job. Scanner is simple to install and use.   The ability to place multiple photos on glass and have each filed as a separate file is grea
Viking vs. Sandisk. First I bought a sandisk and after a month of use got damaged, I tryed to comunicate with them a lot, they have the worst customer service, then i gave up. then i bought this Viking like a year ago, and im still using it
Sylvania 6620LDG 20" Flat Panel LCD TV with Built in DVD player. Light weight, space saving very attractive design. Sharp Picture, Good  sound quality and quick response time. DVD playback also excellent. Only negative is its remote control. It is hard to read the functions of the keys due to color choices. The placement of the keys are almost illogical and you have to look at it carefully before each use. It almost seems like it was designed by an imbecil. The quality, the features and the price still makes this TV an excellent buy
I love it. Very Fastshiping.The item was good and new. i love it.Thank you
Sleek but not small. I was looking for a bag just for the laptop and power source--something I could bring to and from school along with my backpack full of books. This case seemed to be the answer-2.5 inches. When I got it, I knew there was no way that it was 2.5 inches...It is more like 5.5 inches ( I got out the ruler, I know. The 2.5 inches refers to the main chamer that holds the laptop. When you add the outer pockets, it bulks up. However, it is still a very nice, sleek looking bag and I am planning on keeping it. I would recommend it to anyone who basically needs a laptop holder for one of the chunky 15.4 inch Dells out there...it's really nice, comfortable case.
Love It!. Great, and easy to use.  Dvd's look amazing via the HDMI on my Sony 50" SXRD.  Home entertainment at its best
Great little remote. When my Toshiba VCR remote starting giving me problems, I decided to look into a Universal replacement.  I don't care for their usual bulkiness, so this one stood out because of its slim-line design.  The reviews were positive and the price unbelievably low, so I took a chance.It's even nicer than I'd hoped.  It is slim, so it handles easily; it's light, and the buttons are well placed.  Its programmability and learning capability allow it to do about anything that your other remotes are capable of, and you can pretty much place these functions on whatever keys you wish (read the instructions first--it's easy.  I believe that the reviewer who complained that the unit was only controlling a limited number of functions had not fully read the instructions and utilized the programming/learning capability.  I'm impressed at what it can do, which includes everything on my VCR remote).  The keys are reusable between devices; that is, a key that's set up for a particular function on one device is totally free for a new setting when you switch to another device mode.  It isn't backlit, which is not a particular problem for me, but might be a feature someone else needs.I bought a second one.  I purchased the "6 Device", and then bought the "8" as the second, and I can tell you that the only difference between them is the two additional device controls---there are no other added functions on the "8" --- but, it didn't need any (Well, maybe that backlighting thing).I haven't had it long, so I can't speak to durability, although I have dropped it on a couple of occasions and it was unfazed.  It actually seems very sturdy.  I guess I'm trying to figure out why such a low-priced remote is so nice.  I can't.If you're looking for a simple, but effective, Universal remote, or just a replacement or an extra one, you won't be disappointed with this purchase.
Content is king. Pros: Three customizable video profiles (movies, broadcast TV...); Excellent brightness and contrast; good viewing angles L & R of center; Generous input options;Cons: Big, centered on/off button cries out for my toddler to turn it on/off/on/off. Finally put a 35Lb barbell in front of it.The biggest con has not to do with the TV but the dearth of HD content. Others' comments about broadcast TV looking horrible on HD sets cannot be overemphasized. Same for DVDs on SD DVD players. On the latter note, buy a good upcoverting DVD player (&lt;$150); the visual results were simply outstanding.Also note that you will need to run component video at a minimum, HDMI preferred; Using S-Video or composite is a complete waste of money you spent on the TV. So the other 'con' is that you will probably need a new A/V receiver and cables.So to recap, if you want a good experience, you need an HD TV, upconverting DVD player, A/V receiver with component or better yet HDMI connections, and HD broadcast content (cable or satellite). This is not a cheap endeavor
Father's Day Present. My husband told me he would like a Sony RM-AX4000 HomeTheater Remote Control for Father's Day. As Father's Dayapproached, I realized I couldn't remember what it washe'd asked for, so I asked him again.  I was nearly out oftime to locate this product, but I checked Amazon.com andthey had them listed.  I ordered one and had it shippedquickly, but I didn't think it would be in time for him toopen on Father's Day.  The package arrived on Saturday, theday before Father's Day, and Amazon saved the day for me.Thank you Amazon, for all that you do!Kathryn Santos-Ree
Very pleased. First of all, I can't believe I actually replaced my cd drive, but my brother said I could do it. I've made lots of cds with the new Sony drive and it works great -- no problems at all
Great Replacement for Linksys 4-port model. I bought this for a small office LAN which was using a 4-port Linksys router.  I considered wireless for them, but since it is a dentist office, I feared that X-ray and other related machines would interfere.  The setup was very easy, especially since the PCs were already talking to a router.  I also took the liberty of setting up STATIC addresses, and turning off DHCP on the router; seems to make things faster, especially when booting workstations.Overall, Linksys products have not disappointed me, and this was no exception
You get what you pay for. I originally bought this CD case for my car, because I listen to CDs the most while driving.  This was not a good case to bring back and forth at all.  It is very large and heavy (even without CDs!), and the long zipper-tail makes it hard to open with one hand.  I now use it to house computer software and playstation/gamecube games.  For what you pay, it is an excellent buy
Great for College Students. I purchased this item for my college bound boyfriend who is studying music.  He uses it to record himself on drums, then transfers it to the computer (MP3 files for his MP3 player as well!).  Discreet size make this a plus not to mention the digital aspect as well.  Overall, a great buy.  The price tends to fluctuate on Amazon (as do the quantities), therefore I suggest you nab it once the price is resonable.
A portable player with an endless library. Firstly, understand what this player is NOT. It is not a receiver that will allow you to receive Live XM broadcasts when you're out walking around. for that try the Samsung Helix.What it IS, however, is a very good portable player that also has the ability to record ANY XM channel for playback (the player must be docked to record). What this effectively does is allow you to have a near-endless library of songs or talk shows, etc. that you can play on your device.I love and have an iPod, but part of the problem is that I'm stuck listening to the songs that I have in my library. What the Nexus does is allow you to record various XM channels - then you can sort back through the songs and play the ones you like - very cool. You can still use it like an iPod as well and put music from your library onto the Nexus as well.As for the functionality of the device, it's small but has a good build quality and fairly easy to use (albeit not as intuitive as the Ipod). The screen is monochrome with a blue backlight.This unit also utilizes the XM Passport Mini-Tuner, which allows you to use one XM subscription on any Passport-ready hardware such as a factory-ready stereo unit, home tuner, etc. This is a big savings - perviously you had to purchase a new subscription for each separate XM device. Now with the Passport, you can have 1 subscription and simply take the small Passport chip with you and plug it in.Overall, a very useful device and certainly a very good buy for the money
Great Monster Cables @ Low Amazon Prices. I checked out these Ultra Series THX 800 HDMI Video cables at Infinity Electronics, and their low discounted price was $149.99 for exactly the same item (even the blue cable trim) in a blister pack.  I was converting from a high-end Samsung DVD/VCR Combo to a Panasonic "75-Series" combo with HDMI conversion uplink.  It was great to get rid of all the cable clutter, and replace 3-cables with one.  Can I say "Wow?!!!  The performance of Panasonic and monster cable combination blew the doors off the old system.  What picture clarity, and even the sound might have been a smidgeon better.  Would I do this reconfiguration again?  You bet!  Next I'm upgrading my last generation Yamaha - 400 series receiver to an Onkyo 804S - from Amazon.  I'll also order the corresponding appropriate Monster 800 cable
awesome. I originally bought an Acoustic Research AW-811 wireless speaker but the unit wouldn't power up after using it a few times.  Then I bought the Music Sphere and it has been awesome.  The sound quality is better than the AW-811, and the build quality seems much better.  It's very stylish too.I'm using the speaker to listen to music in the kitchen playing from my computer upstairs.  For this purpose it works really well.  I haven't heard any static or interference.  I have an audo splitter on my computer so that I can hear music from the computer speaker and music sphere at the same time.  Some other wireless solutions (saitek A-250 and Logitech Wireless Music System for PC) don't allow you to do this.Another cool feature is that you can mute or adjust the volume using any remote (the speaker has a learning system).  If you opt to mount the speaker on the wall, this comes in very handy.Overall, I think this is the best solution for piping music from your computer or home stereo to another area of your house
Good value. I purchased this joystick and have about 10 to 15 hours in on it at the time of this review.  Overall it's a good stick.  I thought it was drifting at first but noticed that it was actually my hand that was "resting" wrong.  I took my hand off it it stoped the drift.  I've only had to calibrate the stick once so far.I like the stiffness of the stick, and it's uniform throughout the movement (ie not increasing/decreasing as you near the end of it's range).  The grip is a little small for me, and I don't have overly large hands (sorry ladies) so this might be a consideration if you have big hands.The front button above the trigger button presses a little awkwardly at first, but once you get used to it it's not too bad.  The three buttons on the base at the front of the stick are spaced so that you can have 1 finger on each of them without difficulty.I would like to see a pinky button on this stick, but didn't expect one since it wasn't in the picture.All in all it's a good stick, but I can't speak for the life-span, just the out-of-the-box performance
awesome battery booster. This product is, in my opinion, all that anyone could ever want in an iPod external battery.  When I go on long trips via airplane, I can watch video the whole way across the U.S. with this.  The iBoost also allows you to never remove your iPod from it again; you can charge and synchronize your iPod without removing it from the iBoost, just drop the whole package into the iPod Dock.  My iPod Video 5.0G 30GB is held snugly by the retention arms and the foam spacer pad.  The foam spacer pad is removable to fit larger iPods
I love the picture on the Samsung 26" HDTV. The picture is phenomenal!  The TV fits easily in a small space, but has a good size picture even sitting 6 feet away.  The one drawback, which has not been an issue for me, but might be for people who use other digital equipment such as a video recorder, is that the jacks are only on the back of the TV.  Otherwise, it's a great product
Great product, excellent USB performance. This adapter gives us consistently excellent range and signal (at least 80%) anywhere in our 2700 sq ft two-story home.  The adapter also works with our older WRT54G router (which is not an SRX router), but the adapter gave us better performance than our other wireless G adapters already in the house which were hovering around 30-60% signal performance.  Its works great with our laptops and desktops alike
THIS IS A WINNER. THE RANGE OF THIS ROUTER WAS SEVERAL TIMES FURTHUR THAN ANYTHING I HAVE TRIED BEFORE.I WOULD BUY THIS PRODUCT AGAIN.  ..  DIC
Very nice piece of equipment. The other reviews I am reading about this clock do not do it justice.  I just opened it 20 minutes ago, and it's on my desk already synched with the Atomic Clock.  I am very impressed.  The green LED is awesome!  I own a lot of atomic clocks, and this is the first LED one I've seen besides the ... Sangean/Proton one.  This thing is solid, and it looks like it was made in the 60's or 70's when you had heavy, quality electronics in a tight package.  This is worth way more than the selling price
Improvement over stock antenna. Improves reception in Florida for a Stilletto 100. Significantly better cable. Worth the cost
Worth the money. This WorldWide charger is the best that i have ever used. I use this mainly for my camera. Nowadays I don't even bother to charge frequently.But a small drawback would be then can have provide AAA batteries as well in there pack so that we do not buy them individually.
Excellent product that can be used both for business and art. I own several tablets and use them instead of the mouse. The addition of the JustWrite and Ever Notes software in the Graphire 4 version is an excellent addition. This software allows you to add your signature to Word documents as well as edit or make notes on a word document.Those who have problems with the pen generally didn't use the installation software that comes with the product. It is very user freindly and doesn't need a instruction book although one is available in the readmetxt. Once you install the pen the tablet area equals your monitor so  where ever you put the pen on the tablet is where the cursor is. You are also able to adjust the pen sensitivity.This, however  is very fine tuning with the advanced user or long time user in mind. That said  the pen settings can be easily changed so it won't hurt to try making minor adjustments until you find the setting you like. You can always reset the parameters back to default.
Not for metal studs. NOTE: this product will only work on walls with wood studs.  No metal studs.See the sanus website for installation manual and more details
Noticeably Faster!. Just installed it following the directions from a previous review on this site...THANKS. Its fast! The card DOES SUPPORT WPA ENCRYPTION, just don't install or use the Belkin connection utility.  Only install the drivers then cancel and let XP handle the connection. You plug your encryption key back into windows network connection manager when you connect and you are good to go. Have used several newer and supposedly fast adapters and this one smokes them on speed and range. Belkins website says that they were out of stock due to popularity of the product so you would think that they would get the message, pump out more of these and upgrade their software to take advantage of the higher security encryption
No Complaints. If you go slow through the installation instructions and plan ahead for wall clearances and access to your hook ups on the back of the T.V., this bracket does everything. It adjusts in every direction and angle for viewing and pulls far enough from the wall to give you full access for connections. It was worth the money to have this dependable and versatile bracket
This truly deserves a 5 star. It's straightforward... and that is something very TECHNOLOGICAL in contrast to books that give you this mindf*ck*ng edge that makes you want an answer right away. this little fan is the FAN that CAN the CAN CAN
HP Ipaq hx 2495. I had an entry level iPaq - the 1910 - for a couple of years.  Had lots of trouble with it (some of which I believe were created by an aftermarket synch/charging cable).  It finally died, and I replaced it with a Palm TX which I quickly returned.  Windows compatible - yes /work efficiently - no.I replaced that with the iPaq hx2495 and love it.  I would have given it 5 stars rather than 4, but I would need to have the unit function w/o problems for another few months before giving it the fifth star.I have it synched w/2 computers and had no problems loading or using the software.  ActivSynch 4.5 seems to be working w/o flaw.  The connections seem a little better built than my old 1910, and I have been able to use the wifi to access Internet Explorer and email w/o a problem either.Right now, I am very happy with this, but then it cost me $350.00, so it should make me happy!  I'd spend that again just to have something that works this efficiently and is powered by Microsoft rather than just Microsoft "compatible".  Spend the extra bucks - it's worth it
works great as promised. when they say plug and play they are not lying;seamless work; no need for external power....works wel
Excellent tv. We're 100% pleased with this product and with Amazon's delivery. The tv was easy to set up. We do not have high def cable, but the picture is still sharp and clear. I would recommend this product.As to delivery - we were told the tv would be delivered between 8:00 am and noon. It arrived at 8:15. Can't beat that
No magic, but a very good car GPS. I have read many customer reviews before buying this GPS. Now I see that many things mentioned by the reviewers differ from my personal experience. Here is what I have noticed so far:1. Maps: appear to be quite accurate. As of this writing, I did not experience any problems with the maps. I doubt that paper maps would be more accurate, or updated more frequently.2. Updates: I have recently downloaded and installed version 3.11, and had no problems during or after installation.3. Battery: not great, but quite reasonable. After all, it is a car GPS, so most of the time it will be plugged in anyway. If you need an AC adapter, I suggest buying an AC to 12V converter instead. (This is what I have). It is more universal and can be used to power other units (coolers, car phone chargers, etc.) from an AC outlet.4. Satellite reception and tracking: no complains here.5. Menus and other UI: nothing horrible. When you get used to it, it becomes comfortable.6. Music player, photo viewer: IMO absolutely useless. (Same as Bluetooth, which is NOT build into this unit, and some people complain). Do you really have no better way of playing your music or answering your phone calls? Then it's a pity. Honestly, I am not sure why did they even bother building all this functionality into a car GPS unit. Still, it works, and it is not true that you need proprietary software or a specially formatted SD cards for it. I used Windows explorer and a standard SD card to copy MP3 files from my laptop and play it on my GPS (no Magellan software).Summary: good GPS unit, especially for the price (I got mine for under $300). If you need a navigation computer, consider buying a GPS antenna for your laptop, and then carry it with you all the time :). For me, it is enough not to get lost in an unknown city, and finally get where I wanted to be. Plus, it is quite cool to know how far are you from the destination, and how long it will take you to get there, even if you know the route by heart
NICE PRODUCT; OUTSTANDING SERVICE. Hey, it's a floppy drive. Works very well; set-up easy.Best Thing: Great Seller, TigerDirect. Ordered at the height of Christmas Shipping chaos; received in 3 days UPS from Illinois to Oregon. Well Done
Another Great Apple Invention!!. Small, cute design, pretty bright pink mettallic color and suits your music needs.  Easy to use and did I mention cute?  Get one!
Quality discs with great colors. Memorex and other brands tend to be a bit less expensive, but I've found that the build quality of these Sony color minidiscs are better. And since they only are few cents more per disc, why not spend a little more for the quality? The colors allow you to color-code your collection, but you probably would have to buy these minidiscs in bulk for it to be worthwhile. I use these with my portable MD player which can record/transfer up to 6hrs of audio onto each minidisc. The included carrying case is handy and is small enough to fit in a coat pocket. My only complaint is that you probably wouldn't want to cover up these pretty little discs with the mundane labels Sony includes. There's a frosted finish on the face of these minidiscs so that you could write on it with a fine marker, but since many of the discs are dark, they would be hard to read
Great Navigation. I bought this for my daughter for xmas. I researched many before desiding on this one. I think it does a great job navigating and has some cool features my daughter loves. Like being able to put pictures on it. Couldn't be happier with purchase and neither could my daughter
Better than my old Belkin model. It's speedy and space saving and inexpensive. I bought this to replace my Belkin because the Belkin needed to be plugged in. This one is powered by your computer so there's no extra power cords, which is a big plus to me.The only thing I dislike about this is the fact that the Hub takes up two Usb ports instead of just one like the Belkin.
Works fine. A little clunky and annoying to put together, but fine once its set up.  I just use it to keep my keyboard set up in the corner of the room.  Sometimes I actually play it
Great choice for my Nikon D70. I bought this card about 10 months ago to go with my Nikon D70 and I've certainly had no regrets. I haven't tried pushing the card to its limits to see how quickly it can write, but it's been plenty fast enough to keep up with me in single-shot mode. The card is always ready when I am. Downloading from the card to computer via my SanDisk Imagemate is fast too.I like it so much, I'm buying a second one today
Extraordinary Overclocking Potential. This is not the fastest chip on the market by any measure, but it certainly holds its own against chips that cost four times as much money when it's overclocked.  Get a quality 500W+ PSU, an overclock friendly motherboard (I suggest the ASUS P5ND2 SLI), and some decent fast RAM (DDR2 667 or DDR2 800 should do the trick), and you can build yourself a very fast system without spending much money!If overclocking scares you, this chip is not going to provide smoking results in a gaming system compared to other chips in the price range, particularly in games.  You'll want to look at the high end of AMDs single-core budget range for that.  On the other hand, if you're looking to get the most performance you can for the money you spend, you can easily add 1 Ghz or more to the sticker speed without buying an expensive cooling system.This chip works particularly well for audio and video encoding, decoding, and production tasks.  The dual core is like having two CPUs on one chip, and it'll split the load particularly well when you're multi-tasking or running concurrent threads.  It's not so great at load balancing most current games, but the raw horsepower you get from the overclock will be more than enough to post high framerates, and future games might be better optimized for dual-core systems, soon.I should mention that this chip supports 64-bit operating systems, but many people using the 64-bit edition of Windows have experienced problems with low-level software and drivers.  I suggest you stick with a 32-bit operating system for now (i.e., Windows XP Home or Pro) and upgrade later, after manufacturers have had ample time to get their product lines supported.Bottom line: If you're willing to spend $400 or more for a small performance gain, there are faster speed-demons to be found.  However, if you're looking for the best bang for your buck, and you're not afraid to tweak the default clock settings, look no further.  This is it
Great speakers. If you are looking for decent speakers for a common home theater system, these are for you, I have had the Phoenix Gold speaker layout for over a year now and I have no complaints.  Unless you are going for a professional setup with sound barrier walls and $5000 components, this series of speakers is for you, you will spend a heck of alot more money for speakers of lesser quality or that are too good for your room.  Do not let the price tag scare you, YES you can have a quality speaker set up for under $300.  I have a 5.1 system on a Yamaha 980 watt receiver and I will put it on full blast with no hesitation and no distortion.  For the money you can not get a better product
Great upgrade over on-board sound. The last soundblaster I had used was a soundblaster Live a couple of years ago. Since then, I've been relying on onboard sound on Nforce based motherboards. Sound quality was okay, but there always seemed to be issues with the drivers and a fair amount of background noise on the analog outputs. I decided to upgrade to the X-fi when I started to have sound dropouts while playing Oblivion.Sound quality from the X-Fi is great, especially with headphones. I'm only using the Drive bay I/O panel for the headphone jack, but the price of the Platinum version wasn't much more than just the basic card, so it was money well spent. If I had this set up as a media center PC, the remote control functions would make this an even better deal.A few notes:-I had no problems installing this on an NForce4 based motherboard (Asus A8N-SLI Deluxe)-The I/O drive bay only comes in black. If you still have a tan case you're out of luck-There is a digital SPDIF output available on the back of the card. It's a mini 1/8" jack, and unfortunately no adapter to RCA jack is included
It works great, I love it!. At first I was worried about some of the negative reviews I've read about this product. Instead of listening to those reviews, I ignored them and I'm so glad I did. Not only that this product works great, it gave me a chance to have a extra external storage that I can carry around with me. The thumbs drives are awesome, but is limited to the capacity of the storage amount I would be needing in the type of work I do. With the Western Digital 60GB passport, I don't have to worry of needing an extra drive to save all my back-ups. It looks great too. I love it.
Fabulous TV, Fabulous Price. This 32" LCD Aquos is quite possibly the best size/quality/price combination on the market. The picture is clearer than I could ever have hoped, better than the much more expensive (and heavy) plasma screens. Sharp has also managed to get as close to true black as is possible with LCD, and the colors are vivid and true. Setup couldn't be easier, and there are more inputs (6) than most people have devices to input. Importantly, there are two HDMI inputs so digital cable and DVD no longer have to make do with the analog losses from the previous gold standard component inputs. With HDMI, everything that's digital stays digital, all in one cable. Plus your video games can be hooked up to the two component (or two composite) inputs. As for the screen size, those tempted to go larger should remember two things: 1) the resolution on the 37" screen is the same as on the 32", resulting in a larger picture but one which is more pixelated; 2) the picture is so clear, you can view the screen quite clearly from a much farther distance than you would imagine. Combine all this with Sharp's Emmy-winning pixel technology and a refresh rate of only 6ms, as opposed to 8ms for most LCDs in this range--meaning virtually no lag even with the fastest action pics or sports events--and you have a TV with virtually no flaws. And the two 10W speakers are more than adequate until you get your optical Dolby surround system set up
Solid workhorse. We're using this to go from PC audio card to speakers for a small gym.  It works very well.  Simple.  Low price point.  Reliable.Lacks the bells and whistles of a surround sound system, but works great for basic stereo need
Recommended. A very nice case.  It will fit a video 80GB iPod (5th gen), despite the "60" in the name.  It is made of a durable plastic material that's easy to see through, and has rubber on the sides so it's easy to grip.It also has a nice sliding latch that wont accidentally come undone.  To try and describe it further since it's not well illustrated: it's a dual sliding latch on the same side that requires two fingers to lock / unlock (or one finger in two steps).  Picture your index finger and thumb meeting to unlock.  Reverse to unlock.The cons are the are very small crevices around the edges (the case kind of flips open like a book) and around the exposed headphone and sync ports  that a few dust particles can get it, though I'm not sure if that could have been prevented.And don't expect to dock your iPod while it dons this case.  While this case doesn't add a lot of bulk, it wont fit in to a typical dock.Overall I would recommend this case
very good small radio. This is a very good radio, well-built, acceptable reception by considering its size and price. The quality of the sound is great. It also shows time with alarm. It's sleep mode helps to save battery life. I strongly recommend this nice radio.
Excellent Product-Infocus 24 Projector. We are completely satisfied with the Infocus 24 Projector.  We purchased it for to be used for our home theatre and to be honest we are amazed at the picture quality and clarity of this projector at such a low price.  Colors are true and sharp even on low output settings, and the picture is completely detailed even in low light rooms. The projector is very easy to set up and use and wireless remote works great. The price is exceptionally low for the quality of this product.  I would recommend this projector to anyone wanting to use it for work or home.  I can't say enough about it
OUTSTANDING Razor. I have used Braun razors for years, but when my last one finally died, I bought a Panasonic.  What a mistake.  I took it back after trying it a week and bought this Braun Syncro.  I have a heavy beard with lots of swirling whisker directions on my neck and this is the only razor I have found that will give me a very clean shave.  When you buy it, give it a week for you and your beard to get used to it, and always shave "against the grain", even if you have to slide the razor sideways.I actually bought the one with the cleaner base, which I was very skeptical of.  It looked like just another gimmick to take more money out of your pocket.  It probably is, but I must say that it does an amazing job of cleaning and oiling the razor and it shaves like new after every cleaning.  They tell you to clean it after every use.  Now THAT is a marketing gimmick.  However, if you only do it once every couple of weeks, the liquid lasts for months and the razor stays like new (and smells good)  :).Great razor.  The only reason I don't give it 5 stars is because of the price.
excellent receiver, exactly what I expected & more. I have just up-graded to a 40" HD samsung 1080p TV so I had to replace my 2 yr old onkyo 601 "great receiver" with this 674 model mainly for the HDMI switching capabilities, set-up was a little tricky but after an hour I was ready to try the audyssey set up mic. which was very straight forward & accurate Boy was I blown away. This thing has such clarity & separation I couldn't believe the difference over my older onk.rec.I have direct TV hd-dvr & Panasonic 1080i DVD player via HDMI through receiver, don't waste your money on those over priced monster cables, all of mine are 15-20 bucks from amazon. I am so pleased with my purchase I also feel this is a great value 599.00 I know their is not a better receiver out there at this price or even for 200.00 more. I would highly recommend this as the backbone to any quality home theater system. I read another review that expressed that you couldn't turn it up past 60,that is false I can crank mine up to max with with vertually no distortion
Value exceeds the price. Just recently purchased this from amazon, a few hiccups with the shipping but these things happen, and since the price online was great and the shipping was free it doesn't hurt to bad to overlook the mishap.It's hard to begin to praise the quality of sound and picture your going to get for the amount of money that you pay with this HTIB (home theater in box) system.  I am by far no expert but I have worked in the car audio industry for 5 years now and have a few friends with expensive surround systems so I know the difference between quality sound, decent sound and bad sound.  There is a noticable difference in quality between this and the high end stuff which is to be expected, but for the price your paying this sony system can't be beat.  The set up is a breeze and connecting everything is very easy.  The sound is crisp and clear.  I got my 42 LCD tv a few weeks before this and for a while I was watching movies off the Xbox360.  The picture was great but the sound really didn't add up.  This system has provided a sound level with a quality to equal the picture. There have been a few times when I have jumped up while loungin on the couch cause the sound was so real.  Also if your a gamer pick up an optical cable for the 360 and run it through this system it will broadcast games in 5.1 digital which will change your life. If your a gamer and have digital cable, you'll need to pick up a digital coaxial cable as well otherwise you'll have to switch the optical from the 360 to the cable if you want to watch cable in 5.1Picture wise DVDs look great, I can tell a noticable difference in quality with the upscaling vs watching a dvd on a reg. player.  Bear in mind it is not going to look like an HD DVD or a Blu Ray movie does but its pretty close and should satisfy most people.Now for addressing some of the critics out there.It does load really slow and it can be hard keeping track of discs.  My point is why would you have 5 dvds loaded in the first place you only watch one movie at a time, unless your marathoning the sopranos or a sergio leone movie night there is no need.  I've been keeping slots one and two open for dvd and leaving the other 3 for music which seems to divide things up and makes it more easy to keep track of things.The sub is way to loud.  I'm amazed that sony didn't put a control knob on the sub box, as my previous and cheaper phillips system as well as my computer speakers did. This is the reason why its not a five star system.  Contrary to other claims you can adjust the sub.  You have to go to the setup menu and customize the setup (this is after you do the auto cal.)The sound quality for music isn't the greatest, cds sound pretty good but if you hook a laptop up digital music volume is pretty low.When its all said and done, the quality you get for this system is well beyond the price tag.  It has a few kinks and doesn't sound like a ultra high end system, but you really don't need something like that in your house unless you have a huge home theater room anyway.  The styling of this system is retro and pretty cool the speakers look great, and the picture and sound are awesome
Nice Set, High Quality. For the price, it's a deal.  I love the multi colored variety.  These are pefect for computer cables, tv cables or many jobs around the house
There are worse things than death... And buying this failure is one of them.  Using this little bugger to cool yourself off is as smart an idea as is using an airplane to kill a mosquito.  It just doesn't get the job done effectively.  The "breeze" can only be felt two inches beyond the vent.
Sony Walkman MP3. Short and quick.Software is easy to use, but because Sony uses ATRAC, you can't play the songs on another program (Windows etc.) you downloaded or saved from a cd to the SONY program.  But the program is very easy to use.The player itself is very small (including the buttons).  I purchased it strictly for the gym and long plane trips.  It hold a ton of songs (500+) Why you need more that that I don't know.  It also has a FM stereo receiver, so it is cool as well.In total, it is compact and easy to use.  Perfect for the gym, running fanatic
Easy to install, can't beat the Amazon price!!. My dad and I installed it in just an hour!  It was very.  You can't beat this price.  I found the same mount at Best Buy for over $200!!!
Works as advertised and is cheap. Nothing special, works well. No problems. Blue recharging LED is a little too bright for my taste, but no big deal
Excellent alternative to an Ipod. I've had my SanDisk for about 2 months now, and I love it.  I only use it while working out, so I wanted an inexpensive alternative to an Ipod.  Ipods, in my opinion, are over rated and too expensive, especially if, like me, you would only use it less than an hour a day.  I know several people who have had so many problems with their Ipods.  I have had no trouble at all with the SanDisk.  It comes with an armband, and plastic protective case to prevent the screen from getting scratched.  Its a great little player if you can't afford the hype of an Ipod
Does a good job but does have a problem. I got mine on sale for about half-price so I have no complaints about the cost. It works very well and, for me at least, will even works indoors. The battery will work around four hours while listening to satellite broadcasts. I've not tried it just on FM. It's certainly not very heavy as some have claimed, at least in my opinion.The number one problem so far has been removing the Roady receiver after use. The fit is so tight that sometimes it takes all my strength to open the tray. However, I have discovered a solution to that. Get a very thin piece of metal, preferably very strong, such as a fingernail file. In the upper left-hand corner of the audio system the corner is curved. Very gently insert the piece of metal in this corner and very gently pry the radio to the right. You won't have to pry it very far either. So far I haven't damaged the receiver, so be sure and use a gentle touch. I've written Delphi and complained about this problem. They are aware of it, but haven't been able to figure a solution. They say the tight fit is required so the system will work properly
works and seems solid. I have a ATSC settop box, w/DVI and an old 17" analog LCD panel.  I set the ATSC settop for 720p (1080i doesn't work for obvious reasons), connected the VGA with this converter to the DVI and it works fine.  I just had to set the settop to 4:3 aspect ratio, sides are cut off of course.The thumb screws and the connector seem solid overall
Very good device, some "assembly" required. This is my second Harmony (having owned the H688 previously), so I am already familiar with Logitech's (quite improvable) web programming system. It also is my third universal remote, so I have some experience in this regard (not all of them pleasant).First of all, the H1000 is a solid device, and it has a lot of nice touches that show that it's engineers have put their knowledge to good use. For example, the device self-activates as soon as you pick it up or move it about.The device itself looks really, really nice with it's rounded edges, brushed aluminum finish, and perfectly-placed real-button controls (if you are right-handed, which I am). It fits the palm of my hand nicely, combining just the right thickness and heft, placing the buttons naturally under my right thumb. The H1000 combines a color active-matrix LCD with is touch-sensitive (for programmable virtual buttons), and an array of real buttons along the right edge. Using the remote comes natural, with your thumb seeking out the buttons, and using the left index finger for the virtual buttons.The Harmony works by assigning 'activities' that know which devices are required, turning them on, and unneeded devices off when switching to an activity. It remembers which devices are on/off from the current activity. For example, when I switch from 'Listen to music' to 'Watch DVD', the Harmoniy gives the commands to- stop playing in iTunes to my Mac mini- turn on the DVD player- switch to 'DVD in' on the Amplifier- turn on the TV, and switch to SCART2To use this functionality you have to set up the remote first, and this is the step that most people find frustrating. Logitech provides a web interface which works, but is far from user-friendly. The database of supported devices is surprisingly large and complete, and if you can't find your device, the remote can 'learn' the relevant commands from your original remote (provided you still have it). Unfortunately, programming the remote is cumbersome, and involves many program-upload-test cycles that take a *lot* of time. Once set up, the remote works well. Provided, of course, you thought of the many times where you need more than the basic functionality, and have programmed it.The biggets problem many people may face with the remote (and this may be the reason for so many drastically diverging ratings) is that your enjoyment greatly depends on your ability to find a good button layout for your specific needs. Thus, you can either end up with the perfect remote, or a borderline usable device. Few people, however, are prepared to invest the time required to get the Harmony to a level that is really good. In this regard I would like to see Logitech to provide templates for more intelligent layout design.A nice surprise to me was the H1000's ability to re-use most of my H688's programming, cutting down my time to program it a lot. Also, contrary to many reports, the software can be used on a Mac - at least on an (older) PPC-based one. One strange choice was that Logitech chose to implement the USB adapter as a network connector (instead of a peripheral), which can cause problems. I did not encounter any crashing bugs during my set-up phase.As with most touchscreen-based remotes (this is my second remote of that kind, the other one being the venerable Sony Commander), it has the problem that you have to actually look down onto the remote while using it, and then glance back at the TV to see if the command was successfully received. Most people are used to 'feel' their way around a remote and can find the correct button blindly. While this was a big problem on my previous touch-screen remote, Logitech has added the most important buttons next to the touch screen, enabling similar behaviour (provided that you set up the remote that way). If your set-up is smart in that regard, you can use the Harmony blind for most of your needs.An annoying quirk (which I hope I can resolve soon) is that when you place the remote into the provided loading cradle (*nice*), it (falsely) assumes that you are done with all your activities, and commands all devices to power down.Also, the H1000 appears somewhat sluggishly in responding to some commands. While this is less of an issue when giving a 'play' command to the DVD player, it makes volume control somewhat more difficult than it needs to be.Other than that, I can wholeheartedly recommend this device to people, but must caution them that they should only invest in this device if they are prepared to invest the time required to fine-tune it. And the *will* take a few hous
very high quality. This is about the best you can do for a consumer-electronics quality cable.  The picture is excellent.  However, the audio converters in the ps2 are absolutely horrendous.  So, even though the cable is quality, it can't really help to fix the terrible audio.  If you have a optical digital input in your rig, do yourself a favour and get an optical cable.  Your ears will thank you!
A really nice case. I bought this case along with my Vaio SZ and its perfect. My Vaio fits into it nicely and it has lots of pockets on it for storing my CDs and stuff. I'm very pleased with this product
Great!. Great little package with all I needed. Great sound, I don't hear any humming. I like it to have something to work by and it's light-weight to carry around - just wish the handle was a little more comfortable. Excellent value for the price. I highly recommend it
Oh the things you can buy for your iPod. After I bought my iPod a charger, a tape adapter, an FM broadcaster, a case, a  running wheel, and a water bottle, I decided it needed a holder to keep it safe in the car.  These little Belkin numbers are quite nifty.  They hold the iPod in a nice position in my cupholder such that I can glance down at it instead of picking it up when I need to review the playlists/switch songs.  Overall a nifty product - now even better that it's a little cheaper.
completely satisfied. I ordered the TV on the 11th with a promised delivery date about the 21st. It arrived on the 15th in perfect condition.  After plugging it in and turning it on it was the most impressive picture I have seen to date.  I have satellite dish and am in no rush to hook up for HD as the picture is that good. The price was several hundred dollars less than the local large discount house with free shipping and no 8.1% sales tax
Exactly what you'd expect. I bought this for use in my Palm T|X to store files.  I've had it for about a month, but there have been no problems with it, either reading or writing.  There's still that little issue about how gigabytes are counted (this 2 GB card has only about 1.9 GB), but other than that I've been pleased with it.  And the price is pretty darn good too.
A Great Radio. If you are looking for the most bang for your buck, this is it.  In this price-range you just cannot beat the performance and features of this radio.  The compact size is perfect for tight spaces and the modern design looks great.  I highly recomend this CB
Fine Speakers For The Price. These speakers are very fine considering the cost.  Unless you need to blow out your windows with sound and care to spend what a washer and dryer costs,  you will be pleased with the sound they produce. For those with limited space in their home theater system, they are ideal. I would buy these speakers again should the need presents itself, although I now have five of these for my surround sound system
Ge Corded Slimline Phone. It's a good phone, works well. I like the Caller ID & Function buttons being a different color than from the rest of the phone, makes them easier to see & use. It has good sound & a ring tone that doesn't jangle the nerves.The only problem I had with it is that the cord goes directly into the phone & one must use the cord that the phone comes with, rather than one already in use. I purchased an adapter so that I could plug it into an extension phone cord because we needed to put it some distance from the wall jack. Not a big deal in my book but one I didn't learn about until I got the phone.Overall I am pleased with it
It works. Great product to utilize your Microsoft GPS unit into a compact flash slot or your PC slot on a laptop.Comes with extension cord to attach to a window if the unit isn't in direct view of the sky.Product works perfectly, would recommend to anyone trying to use this with a Pocket P
viking jump drive. It works sweet it saves my from dragging around my laptop
Quiet, Simple, Effective. A friend loaned me her Whirlpool for a month before I decided to purchase this one. The Whirlpool unit was very loud and soured my already-skeptical spouse on the notion of dehumidifiers.Despite her reservations, I purchased the Soleus unit. She told me a few days after it arrived that she approved of it. One advantage of this unit is that, unlike the Whirlpool unit, the fins of the heating and cooling coils are protected by the air filter and cannot be easily bent or damaged. I've had no difficulty removing and emptying the bucket full of water. It is incredibly quiet, as compared to the Whirlpool unit. It is also quite portable, though the handle is too low to the ground for the wheels to be useful. A telescoping handle like most airline baggage would have made it easier to transport from room to room. It takes approximately a day for the reservoir to fill up in my house, which has a typical relative humidity in the range of 50-65%. I've found that the unit works well for removing the humidity in one room, but due to a lack of air circulation in my home, must be moved from room to room to dry out the whole house. The air intake is in the back, so I often face the unit backwards in an attempt to promote more air flow through the unit. My spouse was concerned about the energy consumption of this unit, but it is roughly half of other 40-pint units - approximately 330 W. If you combine this with the quiet operation, compact size, and tolerable aesthetics, this unit is tough to beat. I would purchase it again.One odd thing occurred with the shipping. When the unit arrived, there were roughly a dozen wood screws embedded in the cardboard box underneath the shipping straps. Fortunately, none of them damaged the unit so I didn't complain to Amazon, but it was a strange occurrence.
The best is now bigger and faster!. I've had smaller XD cards for my Fuji S5000, but now with my S9000, I need something that won't full up quickly. Besides being a super-fast media format for your digital cameras, it is a convenient size for vacations and travelling.Why fill up small cards & miss a shot, or have to carry around a pocket full of smaller capacity cards? Plus, the price per meg beats getting a bunch of the smaller cards.Do take care, though, in handling, as the card is delicate & only about the size of a postage stamp.
Great case. I was skeptical when I ordered this case.  I had used Rhinoskin products in the past with much success, so I took a leap of faith on this one.  I am not disappointed.Before I inserted my iPod Nano, I used Q-tips and alcohol to clean the inside of the clear plastic, and I made sure the face of my nano was clean.  I carefully slid the nano inside the case.I did not get any scratches on the ipod.I was afraid the nano would fall out since there is nothing strapped along the bottom.  However, the rubber pads inside hold the nano very snuggly.  I even held the case by the clip and shook it, yet the nano did not even budge a millimeter.I also like that the clip is removeable.I use the Bose iPod speaker dock with this nano.  The one negative is the case needs to either be taken off, or the adapter that fits over the docking opening needs to be removed.  I chose to remove the adapter.I have no regrets with this product thus far
Best Ni-Mih rechargeable batteries. These battries live up to what Sanyo says.  This is the first time ever that I don't feel I may run out of batteries or that the batteries that I have put away are not going to respond.Each re-charge will allow me to take a lot more pictures than regular alkaline batteries yet they behave like alkaline batteries with regards to the discharge rate.The only "Cons" is that they are still expensive compared with the price of alkaline batteries.In summaary, Eneloop batteries is the way to go, not only for efficiency but for conservation of resources.
You Will Like This !. Works great for storing music collections. I have 60 CDs in mine and will buy another when it is full.CDs are safe and secure. The database can be searched for a particular CD,title or file. Can also search what is on a disc by the database instead of pulling out CD and reading it through the computer.Excellent delivery on this product also
Good price, great inter-operability. I bought this receiver as a replacement for my college-era one.Besides having surround sound, I also needed a receiver which could accept Monster-type cables. My old one simply could not accept the larger diameter copper wiring of said cables.Besides the usually modernistic Sony look, this receiver also controls all my other Sony devices (TV, DVD, etc) with the single remote.The receiver also has the normal bells and whistles associated with any such reasonable product: optical connectivity, full assortment of normal A/V and audio wiring capability, multiple device support, digital signal processing for audio, etc.I also tried the receiver's built-in self setup capability.I am not certain how well this worked given the unusual configuration of the room it is in, but it is a well intentioned feature.The only negative (hence the 4 stars instead of 5) is that the receiver appears to have a monitoring signal sent to all connected speakers.This manifests as a 'tick' every 10 seconds when speakers are not being used and the receiver is on.I have removed all electrical attachments to the receiver as well as turned off all electrical devices in a 20 foot radius - without being able to remove this tick hence my suspicion that it is produced by the receiver itself
Works Fine For My Needs. I was concerned about the mixed reviews of this product, but considering this scanner was so inexpensive I decided to try it myself.  An instruction manual and quick start guide is included, but for more thorough instructions check the Documentation folder on the CD.  After following the directions, I could not get the device to communicate with my computer.  The documentation and website advise trying to change the Baud Rate on the device and on the PC, but that still didn't help.  I finally got the connection to work after changing the COM Port number in the Advanced settings in Device Manager. For some reason the device is not a normal USB device, but can be found under Ports(Com&LPT) - Prolific USB-to-Serial Comm Port on Windows XP.Anyway, I now use the device to highlight key passages in my everyday reading, which are typically only one or two sentences long at a time and from both magazines and books.  I have good success with this device, but have not tried the optional image scanner or the infrared capability.  I have no experience with any other pen scanner, but this is the most inexpensive one I found and includes USB connectivity and works great for casual highlighting.  Once you get the connection working, and beyond the fact that this device is an ugly red, this is a good product to have.  The only issue I have with it now is that I wish it was a little smaller, especially since I don't have the need for the big display to see what I just scanned
Really nice travel case for an ultra slim laptop. What can I say, its a really nice case!  It fits the Vaio VGN-TXN15P perfectly!  It has numerous pockets and it's nicely padded.  It has a padded, detachable shoulder strap.  It's the perfect size carry case for the TXN series.  Very impressive.  Highly recommended
Peace of mind for the MacBook owners/lovers !!!. Hi there,I am writing this review after having used the product for almost 2 months now. From the moment I bought my MacBook, I was looking for a case that would protect my macbook without sacrificing it's look. The very reason many people buy a mac is for it's beautiful design and who in the world would want to spoil that look and how would you actually do that without hurting it by day to day use? Voila! I came across this product. The case is pretty hard plastic and has some nice cuts that gives good grip while holding/carrying the macbook. It covers the macbook completely at the top and at the bottom with openings on the sides for the different ports. There are fin like openings on the bottom case for heat to dissipate. That way you wouldn't have to worry about the macbook overheating.The only thing bothers me with this product is that once you put it in on your mac, it is difficult to remove it. I sometimes feel that I might damage the egdes when trying to open. This may also be because I am not doing it the right way ;-)But anyways, I would recommend this product for any macbook lover that wants to protect it from being scratched or damaged.Lok
Mom with Lots of Toys. As a mom whose children have A TON of electronic toys...these batteries are a godsend.  In the past, I have been able to fill up a gallon size ziploc bag with my "drained" alkaline batteries.  Now, I just throw the Eneloop batteries into any toy that needs one.  I started using them because I was curious about the fact that they are fully charged right out of the wrapping.  It is true, and they work like a charm.Now, I don't have to tell the kids that they need to wait while I "charge up some batteries", and I am no longer having to lug bags of old batteries to be disposed of as hazardous waste.  Happy kids + happy environment = happy mommy!
Performs as a monitor too!!. This TV/Monitor rocks!!I've been looking for a combo computer monitor and TV that I could use in my office. This LCD does both very well. I'm writing this review with the LNS4696D installed and everything on the screen is very large (what I wanted) even at 1600x1200 and the resolution is far better than I expected!! (hint: sharpen the image and set high energy saving mode)
great little monitors. These are affordable, great-sounding monitors, ideal for a beginning home studio on a budget.  The first pair I bought had disturbing problems: one channel not functioning, and the volume button improperly attached, so that it recessed into the cabinet, and I almost went for the refund rather than the exchange, but I was patient, and Amazon sent the new pair immediately.  I'm happy with them.  I'm a singer songwriter, and they're perfect for what I do.  You get what you're paying for here: dubious manufacturing quality, but great sound.  We'll see how they hold up.
This is the greatest gadget in the world. I love it.  Turn that nasty box off!!  Best of all, it works almost everywhere!!!
The best Ipod case out there. I never give out 5 star reviews, because I never feel any product is perfect, or complete. But I have to say, this is definetely the best Ipod case out there. My first case was the Agent 17 (or is it 18?) for the Ipod photo, which I "thought" I liked alot until I opened the case and found the Ipod screen all scratched.Since I bought the video Ipod, I have gone through at least 3 cases, read extensive reviews on at least a half dozen. What convinced me to buy this were these: (1) It is currently the top rated at the Apple store , (2) The myriad of color options , (3) It is Belkin, which is a very respectable company, and one of the first to jump on the wagon for Ipod accessories since its revolution.I am glad I bought it, even though most reviews hint on the natural scratching of the outer case. Well, I don't really care as long as the Ipod itself is protected. That's the reason why I bought it in the first place.The case comes ready for both 30GB and 80GB sizes (they supply an extra bigger back case for the 80GB, which is what i have). The case fits perfectly, and even protects the wheel (an option not available in most cases), and there are gaps for every single outlet (hold, earphones, and dock) so that you needn't take the Ipod out unless necessary. The color is awesome, which is tempting me to go ahead and buy another case to switch  between the two. And it being sold via J&R is a huge plus. Their shipping time is excellent. A couple of days at the latest. Go get yours. You will not be disappointed.
No problems, great cable. I've had this cable for years now with no problems.  Great price, great quality.  Strongly recommend and don't fall for the Monster Cable hype
Excellent!!!!. Great service, great product.If you need massive storage for your camera buy this product, i didn't need to download my pictures during my last vacation, i took 350 pictures and i had 200 left, i was impresed
i buy every built product i see... ...so, unobjectively speaking, i like it.  i have a 15.5" widescreen, and i think i was supposed to get the 15" sleeve because it stretches to fit, but there is room for my power cord in the 17" sleeve.  at airport security they really slam your computer around.  the texture is agreeable, it's washable, and it really hugs your computer--but is still slim enough to fit inside a carry-on bag with other stuff.it's expensive for what it is, but they all are, and this size is sold out everywhere except on amazon.  it's also got style, which most other ones haven't, and it's still practical.
Good motherboard. So far this motherboard has been working just fine. The only problem I had is that it appears Amazon opened the box before shipping, breaking the anti-tamper seals. When I saw this, I requested a replacement because the box was opened. Well my replacement motherboard had been opened also when I got it. I called Amazon and asked what the deal was and they couldn't positively tell me that they open the box before shipping. It appears to me that they do to make sure everything is there. I have no problem with that, but they need to put in a note saying they did this check before shipping.As for the motherboard, it is working like I hoped no problems what so ever. The 4 stars becuase of the hassle with the open boxes
Bought for my husband and he uses more than he and I thought he would. Works great for us!  My husband takes pictures of troubled sites for work.  He videotapes the kids at skating events.  Has all his phone contacts stored.  Plays music he downloads.
Okay for the price. They are okay for eight or so dollars, but they don't last very long.  Then again, I used these for a digital camera so maybe that's why they get drained so quickly.  However, for the price I still would buy them again
Up and running in 10 minutes. This couldn't be easier to install, or use.  My wife, who looks at any new technology with a combination of fear and distrust, took the Sonos controller in her hands and set up a music queue in seconds.  The system is intuitive and user-friendly.  The setup took all of 10 minutes - it actually took longer for the system to index my 43,000 song collection than it did to set up the hardware.When I had a couple of tech support questions (nothing wrong with the system, just curious about a couple of things) I e-mailed Sonos and received a non-automated response in about an hour from customer support saying I'd be hearing from Tech Support, and a couple of hours later a friendly answer to my questions.I have nothing but great things to say about the system.  It's costly, but it's worth it.
Terk 15db broadband cable amplifier. Exactly what I needed.  After trying other amps, which did not improve my reception significantly, I installed this one and now my entire cable experience is perfect.  ALL the digital channels and premium movie channels have no more block noise and [audio / video] dropouts.Also, not in the manual, the unit may be powered through a "power injector" downstream from the amp.  This really simplifies the installation, as the power supply does not have to be local to the amp.Overall, a very fine product.
Good product and solid. Well, I got this product two days ago from ANTOnline.I immediately plug all my stuffs into this power console. The first thing I turn on my Plasma TV and found out the quality improved a little bit. Second thing I turn on is my audio system such as my vacuum tube amp and my Cary CD-308 CD player. I found out the sound quality improved but not much as all the people mentioned above. Although this console didn't help me much but I really like it because the console is solid and compare the price to the Monster's product, it is worth to buy it to protect my av systems. Thanks Belkin
A lot of space at a great price. This is a great buy because I have a lot of space. I use the card on my Digital Camera and I take a lot of pictures without download to the computer. I can go on la large weekend trip and take my pictures and download it until I`m back home.It's a great card at a very good price
LOVE it!  Fast, quiet, does it all!. This is definitely the best laser AIO machine that I've ever used.  It is quick, robust, feature-rich, and networkable. Let me break it up to the different areas and give you my impression of each:Printer - From the printer's sleep mode to the time first page is printed is only around 4 seconds, which is just simply amazing. One small thing to complain about the printing aspect is the print driver. I have a couple other computers on my network that I want to set up to be able to print to this printer, but won't need the scanning feature. Well, the software that came with the printer is 250mb! The "minimum" installation is still 150mb. I figured there had to be a "driver only" option. After talking to HP, they showed me a 10mb executable that installs a wizard onto your computer to help you set up the network printer. After it is done setting it up, I can safely uninstall the wizard. They really should have included this wizard along with the installation disk, so minus 1/2 a star for that.Copier - This copier has all the features of an office copier, like auto document feed, priority paper feed tray, enlargement/reduction, dark/light, and of course number of pages. The ADF feature is awesome and fast, as it can quickly scan all your pages into memory before printing.  One down side (same "problem" as the scanner feature) is that it takes a few seconds for the bulb to warm up (about 20 seconds).  Once the bulb is warmed up, it can continue without any delay.  I wish this part is faster, but it's understandable, so no star deduction here.Scanner - Works great.  You can set it up so that by pressing the "Scan to" button on the scanner, it will automatically scan and optionally bring up the scanner program on your computer, which will allow you to do many things, such as cropping, adjusting color/saturation, resolution, and many others.  The bad part about this is that it takes a bit of playing around before I can find the option of bringing up this program.  By default, the scanner will only scan and allow you to save the results to a file or send in an email.  However, I discovered you can add a new target, and that can give you the option to bring up the scanner program.Of course this printer has no fax.  However, aside from that, it is the identical printer as the one with fax (3055).  That printer is highly praised as well.One more thing I like about this printer... actually, this is so for all HP and Canon printers.  The printer cartridge contains both the toner as well as the drum.  When you replace the one cartridge, you are replacing both units.  If you buy non-OEM cartridges, the price is only around thirty-something.  With other brands, you will need to change the toner when it runs out and then change the drum separately roughly around ever three toner changes.  The price of this can certainly add up, as it is an additional component.  Traditionally, drums are fairly expensive, so be sure to calculate that cost when trying to decide between brands.  As for me, I think I have found a winner.  Very happy
Nice, need boxing in for base if you ceiling mount. I got these for rear speakers over the stadium seating in the basement home theater, but you still want a little base out of them, so you have to box in  a cavity with 2x4's in order to get enough lower frequency response.  Mids and highs are fine, the cutting template was spot on, and the installation was a breeze.  Also consider their rectangular speakers - a bit more punch, if you have the space
crisp sound. with these nice thick audio wires u get great sound from this high quality connecter
HP 4890 Scanjet. I purchased the HP 4890 for a project I was starting archiving approximately 2000 35 mm transparencies. The resolution of scanner is exceptional and the archiving of the slides has resulted in a product that was better than the original slides. I am now using it for general scanning. It is easy to use and the interface with my iMac is flawless
1 GB card. I'm afraid I don't know a lot about this technology.  I went for economy and I am getting very good quality photos.  I think I would have liked more speed in taking successive shots and I really don't know if a different flash card would have made a difference or if the camera is slow.  Its still faster than my old one so I'm generally happy.  Hope this is some hel
Good with cable/satellite, but not with antenna. This product works great for cable/satellite direct connection, but it does not work well with an antenna.  I purchased the best antenna from radio shack to use and the resulting picture was bad.  I believe this unit does not have signal locking/tracking features like regular TVs.  Otherwise good
Real nice. Took me a little time getting used to the pen as an input device but works great.  Nice to have the option of using the mouse with the tablet too
JUST GREAT. I INSTALLED THIS IN MY RV, IT WAS LIGHT WEIGHT, GOOD CONECTORS SO YOU DON'T SEE THE WIRES.  THE PICTURE IS GREAT AND I HAVE THE SOUND WIRED TO MY SURROUND SYSTEM.  BETTER THEN I HAVE AT HOME
Best DVD/CD repair system. I was skeptical when I first purchased this repair machine as I considered it expensive, but I bought it for business purposes. I had previously bought a cheap DVD repair device that actually made my DVDs worse. I usually watch DVDs on my PC and unfortunately my PC's DVD drive is very sensitive to scratches. I used the Simotech repair unit on the worst of my DVDs. After performing the scratch repair and polishing, which was very easy and quick - the DVD not only worked perfectly - the surface looked brand new. I tested on several other DVDs and again it brought them back to like new condition
Good to have mp3 capability, but sound quality is an issue. It works fine with my Camry.  The sound quality, however, is just so-so (considerably worse than the CD player in the built-in deck)
cobra radio. cobra cb radios are the best radios i think. amazon again beat all others on price@easy deals. i'll be back to buy more stuff,you can bet on that
Great kit!. Great kit! makes installation very easy. seller doesn't specify Qty. per kit, I found out the hard way that every kit is for a pair of speakers and not one
DVD Ram Disks. What can I say they work great.Amazon shipped them great.Never had a problem here
Great for Crusing. I picked this up to use on a Mediterranean cruise since the outlets in cruise ship cabins are scarce and usually located right at the edge of a vanity.  It worked great for charging 2 digital camera batteries which wouldn't fit in the normal outlet at the same time.  It's small, rugged and light so it's easy to pack
Good for the money. I have had this for about a month now.  I must say, for the price it isn't that bad.  It has a lot of settings that you would need to constantly play with because of all the choices and some spl setting you might want to set for some movies, regular channels etc..All in all it does the job.
Works!. Bought it.  Looks to be very high quality.  Lower price than Canon's.  All camera should have a uv filter to protect the lens.  This is a MUST!  I take lots of pictures near the ocean so salt spray will end up on the camera's lens.  You should avoid cleaning the camera's lens as much as possible to prevent lens scratches.  Clean only the filter.  You can also hold on to the housing as sort of an handle when moving about.Cons:  except for telephoto, adapter blocks the flash on bottom right portion of picture.  If sunlight should get into the adapter, you could end up seeing the metal part of the camera's lens reflected off of the filter on your pictures.  Maybe a lens hood would help... but they don't make one for this adapter.  Maybe painting the adapter black on the inside would help reduce flare.Amazingly good quality for the price.  All cameras should have provisions for installing a lens filter.  It's a crime that almost no camera manufacturer do this.  Guess they want you to replace the camera rather than the filter
High quality cable. If you're looking for a nice audio cable, this is it (gold-plated contacts, shielding, and very flexible housing).  I'm currently using it to route the audio from my laptop to a lcd television.  It works great
Fun and Useful. Ok, the first turntable did not turn on - oh no!  Called Customer Service, got a return number, sent it back (prepaid, drop off at my local UPS store) and a new one came back pronto.  This one works - easy to setup and use. Took us more time to unpack it than to set it up.  My Luddite hubby (its his birthday gift)is having a great time dusting off vinyl favorites and ripping them for his USB mp3 player (no Ipod for him - it's drag and drop only).  Sound quality is terrific
Expensive ink..... I got this printer to replace an Epson that just took too dern long to warm up and print a page. It was taking forever....This is not much better. Still a lot of ink charging and jyrating before I get a page. The color seems to be good but not that much more remarkable than the old slow Epson. No off market ink cartridges for this model so far which makes it $$$$ to operate. Next printer I'll check the ink situation before buying
A wonderful view that you can monitor. A real nice large, clear, crisp monitor right out of the box.  Colors are rich and true, unlike some I've owned.  Price is very reasonable now too for something this large and good.  Seems to refresh very quickly which is good in some of the games that you can play and watch on this. Sorry I can't get into the specs game about this monitor, and thanks to other reviewers for giving that info for those that need it, but it's just these here eyes that pass along their message that this was a good buy. That's my ultimate test.As I've said before, I have no financial or employment interest in the manufacturer or anyone else involved in anything I rate. I just rate the product without hidden (or unhidden) motives. While nothing to do with any of the other reviewers on this product, maybe sometime I can standardize the wording of this disclaimer to ensure others that there's no conflict of interest in what I say, and then get everyone to add a similar disclosure to their reviews when that's true for them. Maybe.  Anyway, this is a good unit at a good price and I'm happy with it.
buy it now. I'm going to keep this short and sweet.  This is a fantastic TV.  great picture, superior color and more brightness than i will ever use.  I've had this TV for 5 months and have not regretted one day.  Pair this with a directv or dish system and you will see things in regular and hi-def broadcasts that you've never seen before.Better yet, a nice HD-DVD or bluray player or at least an upcoding dvd player will make your movie experience like no other.  If you have the space and like the "movie theater" effect, then this is the TV for you.FWIW- I could see the 'rainbow effect' on older generation DLP tvs but i have not seen it yet on this tv.If you have a tiny room or need to hang your tv on a wall then get a plasma or LCD, otherwise GO BIG
Very happy. After having a Harmon Kardon receiver for almost 20 years that died a graceful death, my purchase before this TEAC was only about 2 years ago  (big mistake was the latest purchase - a "refurbished" product from another vendor. Within 2 years it had a significant background hum). I really like this TEAC unit for several reasons. I have never had a receiver with a remote, and it is nice to not have to keep opening and closing the audio center doors to operate it. More importantly to me is the fact that I have seen very few audio receivers that support a turntable, and I have a great collection of old vinyl - sometimes I like to reminisce! For those interested, my needs are for more background music, so I can't comment on how it sounds amped up full tilt, but overall, I think this was a great value and suits my needs just fine
Koss Rules!. I purchased two sets of headphones. One is a Sony and the other is a Koss, of the two I think that Koss is the better value, they provide an extra pairs of ear cushions which need replacement after about a years use
Works in Kentucky!. Works great for me - this is my 2nd one, my first one was the larger square one
Best Mousepad Ever. Seriously.  While it is essentially just a plain black mousepad, the surface is almost ridiculously evenly textured and the sheer size of the thing is amazing.  I can rest my entire forearm on it while mousing!  w00t
San Disk Memory Card. The price on this product was cheaper than I could have bought anywhere.  Even with the 6.00 shipping.  Well worth it
Wonderful pocket radio. A small, no frills, conservatively styled, functional, and sturdy pocket radio of high quality. Good reception and sound, about as good as my portable (and expensive) Grundig AM/FM shortwave with digital tuner. Tuning is a little difficult if used in an area with a crowded bandwidth. My wife takes it around the house during daytime listening. Gets long "mileage" from  batteries. The external FM antenna is easily replaced if broken by removing a screw on the back cover. Nice feature. I've never been disappointed with a product from Panasonic. Can't say the same for the other guys like Sony. Real value considering the price. I don't believe there's a comparable product on the market at this price. For instance, the Sony pocket radio doesn't include the 1610-1710 AM width that began in 1993. At this price buy several for family and friends.
Like little Hard Drives....100,000  rewrites possible. Considered better than RW's.....1000 rewrites.Panasonic recorders are highly rated along with their Plasmas.I have a Panasonic EH80 (workhorse) 80g Hard Drive and I like these ie.my Hard Drive is full (meaning it's time to erase)For the budget minded this is the way to go.Not every recorder uses DVD-RAM.Well priced at Amazon.Check out the good deals on Panasonic recorders
Well Satisfied. Excellent product. All my VCRs are dying of old age. I am converting my home library to DVD with very good results. Once you figure our ULEAD and WinDVD, conversion is just a matter of time spent running each video
Very reliable. Before I could use these I had to update my drive's firmware, but since then I've had no problems. After forty burns or so, the failure rate's about one in twelve, no worse than with other media I use. I'm satisfied enough with these discs that I've already ordered another spindle
Good news and bad news. The color ink in these cartridges seems excellent to me, a  non-specialist in colored ink. The good news is that you only replace just the ink color that runs out in your Epson printer, avoiding the need to throw away unused ink in single cartridges that hold 3 colors, and maybe even black, too.  It is also very easy to replace cartridges.The bad news is that, in Epson (and other) printers, you can't print even just black text if any one of these colors runs out.  So you are forced to keep supplies of all four colors installed in your Epson printer at all times if you want to use it at all, even if you have no prospect of printing in color in the near future.These little cartridges are expensive, and it is obvious that Epson is making its profits on ink cartridges and not on the cheap printers most people use. The whole system is inherently unfriendly to the environment, as there is such a lot of waste in disposing of these complex little electronic cartridges once the ink is gone from them.The obvious thing to do would be for Epson to sell just replacement ink to pour in to recepticles for each color when they are empty or nearly so.  Some environmentally friendly way of keeping the ink channels unclogged would be needed then, but hey, they'd still make a lot of money selling ink and ink channel cleaner.  Is this rocket science
Great for notebook computer. It is very small, but comfortable to use.  I don't have really big hands so I don't know how a man would feel.  I hate the touch mouse on the notebook computer so this is great for me, it helps me do things much faster
Great speakers for the price!. I put these speakers in my garage, they sound great.  I'm not sure I would recommend them for home theater speakers, but they are great for a little music outside.  I'm considering getting a second set for my porch
Works just like it promises. It's nice to know that I'm not the only one who finds those compressed air can things completely useless in cleaning crap out of my electronics.  It's bad enough taht they're bad for the environment, they also don't work as well as the price tag says they should.  Thank goodness for this attachment set!All hype aside, this product works exactly as the makers claim.  Use the power of your vacuum to get all the crap out of your keyboard, CPU, stereo and anywhere else.  I particularly like the brushes.I've also found that the dust I'm after is stubborn.  You really do need the full power of a vacuum to get at it.  So forget those handheld deals that hook into your USB port or whatever.  This product is cheaper than a lot of them and works better than all of them
A really great mouse!. I'm a grad student and use a laptop every day at school. I got this little mouse at Staples over 2 years ago and it is STILL going strong! It is very compact and fits easily into my accessory pouch. You can't go wrong with this one
Perfect for my old B&amp;W!. I love this item; it fits my cabin B/W TV to a tee
Works Great Including With Wireless Keyboard/Mouse. Works just as expected.  Switches quickly among two desktop machines and a laptop (all running WinXP).  Each machine takes &lt; 1 min to recognize, same as when plugging in any new USB device.  Very durable cables.  Was concerned about using wireless keyboard/mouse, but works great with the Microsoft Wireless Desktop, including the multimedia function keys.  Version of the switch that I received is black, not white as pictured
Excellent condition. The stick came in an excellent condition, and works perfectly. I recommend this product.
MOtorola expandable cordless telephone system. Sound quality excellent, distance capabilities good, hand set speaker phone good, not excellent. Set up easy if you read the instructions. Registering each phone to the base unit became easy once I re-read the instructions and found the registration button on the base unit (and not in the menus). Has adequate ring tones on board. These handsets are meant to be kept in the cradle. Otherwise, talk time before battery expiration can become short. Battery installation wire connector gets in the way of the cover. Compared to whats out there, you wont do better for the price
Noise factor = trivial. I don't know what the fuss is all about about this unit's "fan noise"... After the firmware update, if one bothers to do o it, the fan noise level is really trivial compared to advantages of HUGE storage space (or data redundancy if one should choose to use RAID 1). The sound of the fan is about as loud as a fan from a PC workstation (one of those DELL Precisions or MacPro/PowerMacs).One of the things I wish could be different about the unit is if the RAID configuration could be more easily managed by using Apple's Disk Utility instead of using WD's own proprietary software (which requires a reboot... an annoying thing on Mac OSX.4 which I almost NEVER EVER have to reboot). And then the button manager requires yet another reboot before the functionality can be fully utilized... HELLO, Western Digital... Mac is no Microsoft Windows where users are used to rebooting often! If you want more of Mac users' business, write your apps like a true OSX app... At most I should be able to just log out and then log back in to use the functionalities...Other than that, the unit is a work horse. I use SuperDuper to backup my Mac and so far have had no issues at all with it...
Perfect Shredder...Couldn't ask for better!!. This shredder works wonderful and looks great.  I really like the tuck away garbage can.  It cut up my credit cards with NO PROBLEMS!! WONDERFUL product.  If you are considering this shredder...IT'S THE BEST FOR THE MONEY!  Very sleek looking.  WONDERFUL!!!!!!!A++++++++++++!!!!!
gorgeous looking set. The color of the illuminated ring around the dial is selectable:  seven fixed colors, including three shades of blue, two of green, one each of red and violet; also, my favorite option, is to have the color vary (never does red though); the illumination can also be powered off.
Good price, good product. Good TV, great picture, combined DVD player really saves space.  Very much worth the price
Compact versatile travel power. iGo  has adapters for car/boat and every in-seat airplane power that I've run across.  It comes with a reasonable selection of adapters, but if needed you can get more obscure ones from the company or at Radio Shack.It is packaged in a compact case and runs cool.I love this thing
very good... but slow. windows 2003 with a bunch of accessories, great battery life, comes with a nice cradle, and the GPS capability works very well. Too bad it's really too slow when calculating the route, specially when it's recalculating the route. You almost have to stop the car for 1minute
Awesome fast shipping!. Great seller, couldn't have asked for anything faster, better and more reliable! Thank
Lots of storage, and fast too. I purchased the Lexar 1GB 80x Pro CF card for use with my Canon EOS Digital Rebel XT 8 mega pixel DSLR camera. I also have a SanDisk 1GB CF card which I also use with the DSLR. Of the two cards the Lexar is far and away the fastest in recording & reading, I can take multiple shots at the camera's highest resolution (8 Mega Pixels)yet never have to wait for the shots to be saved before shooting more. There are also no compatibility problems.To be fair to the Sandisk, it's an older model I purchased a few years ago for a MP3 player, however I now use it only as a backup to the Lexar.I plan on buying a couple more of these cards in the near future
I have fallen in love with this little jewel. I am using it with a plug in mini plug to the pod on a Bose Computer Sound System. It works beautifully.(Thanks Amazon for the upgraded shipping.) This unit's heft shows heritage of design along the lines of expensive car deluxe CD players. Size is perfect and sits inconspicuously on my small bookcase. The fluorescent display is great,no way it could be improved.  The player loads and plays the disk automatically.Slick. The remote is a coup d'etat of just the right size and easy to read symbols. Important, else you would be hard pressed to see and fumble for the function keys on the unit if you are not eagle eyed.(This is an industry design thing that aint never going to go way) Summary: I think Tivoli put their money and value in this one. And recommend it,even if you don't use it w the Tivoli radio. The 12 Volt option is one I may explore. That would mean getting a back seat amp to the rear of my VW wagen. But it remains possible,so that is a design plus for this company. Hats off to Tivoli, my garden spot for small discrete audio gear...with minimum of glitz and faddishness. G
Kingston 256 MB SD Card. I bought this card with my Canon Powershot SD200. The card holds a lot of pictures, more than I expected even with a high resolution setting
Great value, just like Sennheiser PMX60 Headphones. These headphones are very comfortable to wear for long periods of time. The behind the head band does not pinch. The sound quality is very good, with crisp treble and fairly strong base for lightweight headphones.Creative HQ-140 headphones are nearly identical to Sennheiser PMX60 headphones, which are my favorites. Switching back and forth between the two, I cannot detect any difference in the audio quality of these and the slightly more expensive Sennheisers. I own over 5 sets of lightweight headphones, and these are as good as any of those. I give the cheap headphones to my kids
I love it. I have the 60GB black video iPod and it's awesome. Sleek, well-designed, sexy and built like a little tank. I love iTunes, and the latest version is great
LCD BARGAIN. My first concern was hearing many owners complained of DEAD PIXELS.  I searched and found NIKO's website (nikotronics.com) and learned that they have been in the LDC panel business for 17 years.  (They must have supplied panels to big name brands before started selling their own in 2005).  But the fact that they are headquartered in California and provide customer service 24/7 was the deciding factor.Originally thought about buying a Tatung or Ilo from Walmart but read many reports of their lack of customer support in the US.I ordered it, got it very fast.  And NO DEAD PIXELS!!!!  Picture quality is great, especially from a progressive scan DVD signal source.  (Cable picture quality was a little noisy).  But, at this price I may get another one
Testing of the XE103-100NAS. I like hard data as well as opinions, and could not find much on this device.  I tested these units for my own benefit, and provide the test, analysis, and my opinion to assist you.Description/Test Setup/NotesDescription:Determine Netgear XE103 throughput in real life situation.Comparison with 802.11B wireless throughput in the same test situation.Test Setup:Two Windows XP SP2 endpoints with intervening switch.XE103 Route - Computer1:Switch:XE103:Power Wiring:XE103:Computer2802.11B Route - Computer1:Switch:802.11B AP:Air:802.11B PCMCIA:Computer2Test based upon transfer of folder from Computer1 to Computer2.Size of transfer = 376 MB (395,129,843 bytes).No other devices on network, except those described.No other activity on test computers, other than transfer monitoring.Test results will be time of transfer.Transfer monitored by network bandwidth monitoring software.Netgear Encyption Utility, supplied with XE103, displays connection rates.The XE103 devices are using maximum encryption supported, 56-bit.The 802.11B devices are using maimum encryption supported, 128-bit.All values recorded for comparison and analysis.Notes:The XE103 devices are affected by household wiring.Quoted 85Mbps rate will only be found where devices in very close proximity.Computer2 is located close to AP for 802.11B maximum rate and signalreliability.Computer2 is not located in same room as Computer1, power line routingunknown, but not a great physical distance.The XE103 provides extra security and network partitioning by using anetwork identifier.  All devices that will communicate together areconfigured by the user to use the same network identifier.Special Notes:When comparing bps and Bps, there are some general rules of thumb.In wired LAN environments, rule of thumb is 10 bits per byte, resulting in a 10:1 ratio between bps (bits-per-second) and Bps (bytes-per-second).In wireless LAN environments, rule of thumb is 20 bits per byte (extra framing overhead, encryption), resulting in a 20:1 ratio.Though not exact, you may find these values useful in comparing products.In both wired and wireless cases, manufacturers quote highest rate possible at the lowest communications level.Test Results:XE103Netgear Utility displayed rate between XE103 devices = 42 MbpsBandwidth Monitor displayed rate = 1.2 MBpsTransfer time = 372 seconds = 1,062,177 Bps802.11BDevice setup utility displayed maximum signal and rate = 11 MbpsBandwidth Monitor displayed rate = 462 KBpsTransfer time = 985 seconds = 401,147 BpsTest Analysis:The XE103 performed 2.65 faster over the 802.11B in a timed comparison.Product Opinion:I have noticed that the Netgear Utility shows flunctuating rate values during different time periods.  The lowest rate has been 18 Mbps, highest 45 Mbps.The XE103 is at a premium price when compared with other powerline models.If similar test data can be found, it may be more cost effective to use a less expensive model (manufacturer quoted as 14 Mbps).If Internet surfing is main desire for the remote computer, then comparison of ISP provider rate to these tests results should be done.For highest security and speed, nothing will surpass a wired network.Powerline and wireless are a great convenience.Judge which is best by comparing your needs and desires for speed andsecurity.I hope that this helps in your research.
Pleased. I looked for about a month and a half looking for the best flat screen moniter at a reasonable price. I looked various places online and at box stores. I found this with the rebate to be a great deal!! This included looking at various reviews and prior customer comments. I am extremely pleased with the performance it has provided. I started by looking at regular flat screen monitors but was happy to find this widescreen. The brightness issue some have mentioned is not a problem for me but I suspect those who have play games without the lights on. Then it may seem too bright. I would recommend this to anyone
HD Radio easy to use. This Sangean HD tuner came as advertised.  Easy to hook up to existing system and simple enough to use.  As with all tuners, the reception is limited by where the antennae are placed - reception never seems to be where we house our stereo - but on a good day, with the right station, it's a beautiful thing
Fine, but not without problems. There are an awful lot of people fawning over any Bose product. Do Bose employ people to give their products uncritical reviews? I sense a conspiracy.There are also a large amount of reviews panning Bose products out of hand. Do rival companies employ people to rubbish Bose's name? Again, perhaps a conspiracy surrounds these pages.Anyway, I am just someone who is obsessive about music, on too tight a budget to call themselves an 'audiophile', but I nethertheless aim for the the best sound I can afford. Essentially I am very satisfied with these speakers (which I use with an emac or an iPod Mini), and I think the price Amazon sells them for is a fair price. I paid perhaps twice that amount, and do suspect I have paid for a name.No matter, I am generally pleased, and in my small room they do, to my ears, sound very good indeed. I think the term is 'live' - they have a nice, open sound, crisp with good range. They are also very well built - sturdy and quite heavy.One trouble: bass. It's not that there is not enough bass - there is, for a non-sub woofer system, plenty of the stuff. It is the fact that, with certain songs, they distort at even low volumes. For instance, try, say, Massive Attack on these and you'll see what I mean. It's not, perhaps, a distortion as such, but it is certainly muddy and ill-defined. I suspect this is a problem for a lot of speakers without a sub, so I don't feel like I made the wrong choice. It is simply an annoyance.The other thing is, like other people say, the lack of an 'on/off' switch is a bit silly. I don't really like the idea of these things constantly guzzling power, but I'm simply too lazy to keep unplugging them. I know that makes me a bad person, but couldn't Bose have prevented my laziness
A Must Buy. I just received the transmitter today and it works great.  I bought it to be able to listen to my music on my computer through out my apartment without throwing hundreds of dollars away on wireless speakers.  I couldn't find anything that didn't have problems or interference.  This solved all my problems, easily.  I've been having fun with this product all day.  I have my own radio station through out my apartment.  I recommend this to any one looking for the same thing.  Also, it came quick and in good condition.  This is a great buy for anyone who is looking for the same setup in their hom
This unit really works well. The blue light is kind of bright.  The unit does really work well
Great Notebook Case. The only reason I didn't give this item 5 stars is because I have only taken it on the road once, so as of yet I can't call it a worthy 'road warrior.' However, it is certainly a great case. Proportioned well and good design, with space for essentials. Would recommend for anyone looking for a good case for their 17" widescreen notebook
Even Better Than The USB Link. If you are debating between buying a USB or Serial Connector for your ti-calc always choose the Serial connector, its compatable with absolutly everything!
I love my baby. Sweet sweet sounds come out of such a tiny speaker.  It's incredible.  This is the best record player you're sure to come across at this price.  The audio outputs all work like a dream, and the sound modulating knobs are fun.  I love it.  Go buy one
Kingston 1GB SD Card Review. Great value for your money. Kingston has always been a reliable memory chip company and the same goes for this product.
perfect. long battery life!! the long lasting battery life makes it's capacity worth a while.  Unlike all other AA rechargeable, although some of them marked 2700mah, but you are actually getting less than what you are using because charges often fade out by time.  For example, I have a set of Panasonic 2600mah AA, they often allow me more than 700+ of shots on my digital camera. However, if I fully charged them, and use them 2 days after I've charged, I often only getting around 500+ shots.On the other hand, eneloop allows me constant 700+ shoots every charge. Very well done technology.  Now! What if we have eneloop batteries on our electric cars? that would be awesome!!
Works great!. One of the least expensive ways out there to raise your computer screen to eye level. I am 6'3, so when I sit I am still pretty high in the air. With this stand I am able to sit with great posture and look straight ahead to my screen. I would definitely suggest getting one of these if you've ever thought about raising your monitor up off the desk
Good tapes. I`m a musician and I record almost everyday . These tapes is an excelent way to check my self. Very clean recordings and excelent playback.Good tape
Great printer for the price!!. We love this printer! We have only had HP printers in the past which gave us nothing but trouble. We kept trying them because they came highly recommended. After the third one clunked out on us, we did our own research. God bless the folks who reviewed this item before. Because they did not steer us wrong! It is a little slow "warming up" at times, but when it does it is wonderful. We are 100% happy with this little gem for such a reasonable price.
Lexar no more... I have always used Lexar Compact Flash cards in the past, I have had major problems in the last year with them, and Scott Robert Lim recommends the Transcend 4GB cards on his website..so I thought, if its good enough for him, I know its good enough for me...the price had me a little concerned...it was ALLOT cheaper than I was used to paying for a lexar...but I have loved it since the day I got it, and I always use my Transend card, never the Lexar...I would recommend the Transend Card to everyone!!  Thanks for having an affordable, yet GREAT product!
nice device for both younger and older users. very user friendly and easy to use.  great for those on the go who want to transfer & view their favorites shows, video clips, etc onto their video I-Pods. i know some older users/retirees who are non-tech savvy but have used this device to transfer VHS-formatted family and baby videos to bring along on their travels.  would be great if a future version was a little more 'stylish', but functionally this is a very useful device
Excellent product. I tried Magellan before -- not happy until I switched to this. No complaint -- Just relax & enjoy the product did its tricks!! U will do the same if u own one
Nice tape player... If you like to listen to audio tapes you will like this one. Replacing the provided headphones is a good idea. FM reception a little weak, but the tape play time on ONE AA battery is amazing. Lightweight and good quality for the price
Works great. I thought I would this receiver would suffer a lot of interference considering I have wireless internet, multiple 58 ghz cordless phones and a mirowave nearby but this product works great considering all the wireless gadgets I have at home
I LIKE THIS PHONE SYSTEM. I have three handsets and have programmed different ring sounds for each one,e.g., then one in my home office rings with the Three Stooges singing, "Hello, hello, hello!"Phone works very well
Purchased IH6 - Great Radio, but won't dock with my Ipod? NEED HELP!. I purchased the IH6 white.  Everything about it is fine, except that it won't dock with my Ipod.  I'm not sure what generation Ipod it is - it's about 3 years old - 20GB - click wheel - 4 horizonal buttons on top of click wheel.  Can someone offer me some advice?  Thanks
The best memory around. As always, my kingston memory has been flawless, it's the only memory that I would use in my PC
Plasma TV. Excellant price, mush better then in any of my local stores. The shipping, which was free, was great. Two men delivered it, carried it in, unpacked it and took the packaging with them. The TV it self delivers an awsome picture better then I had expected
No more OPC ERROR. When the package arrived and I took the CD's out,I didn't see any record speed on the cd's or the package,so I was concerned.I have a Philips CDR775 dual tray recorder/player and haven't been able to make any recordings lately.I kept getting "OPC ERRORS".I put the first of these discs in the tray and expected to see another OPC ERROR,but the player accepted it right away! I've made three recordings in a row with no problem.I'm convinced that my player is fine.I just haven't found any newer discs it'll accept,not even the new white label TDK 32x CD-R's
Articulating LCD wall mount. This is a great product and is easy to install.  I mounted a new Samsung 32 in LCD tv to a bedroom wall.  Did not need any assistence to hang the tv onto the mount but, if another person is available, two would make it that mush easier
Cool-It Beverage Chiller Review. Product works well.  Seller shipped quickly.  Very pleased with the product and seller.  Would do business with the seller again
Hubby loves it!. I bought this for my husbands birthday.  He was very excited.  He had been looking at bags at a local store and hadn't found anything as nice as this, especially for the price.  Plenty of room for his laptop and pens, notebooks, extra books, etc.  Very durable, highly recommend
The most comfortable headphones I've ever owned. My ears are really sensitive and I can't use the insertable earbuds or anything with foam.  I ordered these headphones because they looked like they would be really comfortable, and they are.I don't think they would be very good for wearing while jogging or doing aerobics but I mostly listen while I am doing housework or going for a walk, and they stay on fine.The sound quality is fine for radio, podcasts, and music.  If you are an audiophile, they are not for you either, but just for daily listening, they seem good.Every other pair of headphones I've ever had either irritates my ears or gives me a headache from pressing on my head, but I could wear these all day and not be bothered by them
Comfy!. I love this mouse, it scrolls smoothly, accurately, and is very comfortable.It would get five starts from me, but for the scroll wheel.  I much prefer a "clicky" scroll, as opposed the smooth (feels mushy to me) action of this one
Sanus TV Turntable. This product does exactly what it's supposed to do.  I can easily swivel my tv around with one finger, and it doesn't damage the tabletop (don't forget to stick the rubber tips that come with the turntable on the bottom).  Yes, I'm very happy with this purchase
EASY to use and WONDERFUL to replace 6 remotes!. I didn't have 6 remotes; I had 4 one had died (DVD Player) and the others were a pain to find all the time and remember which one did what. So I bought this one. I ran into a problem with the TV right off the bat. My TV isn't brand name but is a wonderful TV. I sent the remote to the universal remote company and they programmed the code I was missing into the remote for free and shipped it back to me for free. The turn around time was very quick about a week and a half with USPS. It now works really well and I am so glad I got it. It's made TV, Cable, DVD and VCR viewing much better. It was very easy to set up only down side I see is there is no eject button for your VCR or DVD players. It is very well worth the money though and I would defiantly buy it again
thrilled. I bought this calculator for my boyfriend, a chemist. He is absolutely THRILLED with it. It has 10 rolling memories. That is 2 more than his old calculator had. Plus it has all the bells and whistles that his little scientist heart desired. The item was as described. It arrived VERY quickly after I placed the order. I would use this seller again.
READ THIS!!. After considering the dock as an accessory for a future ipod, I realised that it was not as I thought, a way of charging the ipod away from a computer, but a simple device made for specific use to improve the quality of charging only. A sort of lip liner of makeups: not essential, but a nice addition.If you are looking for something to charge your ipod with away from your computer I reccomend the Apple iPod USB Power Adapter M9837LL/A as, from reading it seems this is the device I was looking for in the first place! I give this dock five stars because in theory it does what it does. May I add this is all in theory, as I am considering buying an ipod mini and I am looking up essentials for it. If you are interested my list includes:mini ipod skin (in green)Apple iPod USB Power Adapter M9837LL/Amini ipod (in green - duh)
These mounts roll real hard!. I bought the VP mounts to use with my Bose AM3 cubes in my kitchen.  I couldn't be happier.  They fit my speakers perfectly, have solid construction, and look great (and by great, I mean totally awesome).  You hardly notice them!  Furthermore, the price of 2 mounts was equal to the price of 1 Bose mount.  Like I said, they roll real REAL hard
A great small system. For a small, inexpensive system, this one is excellent.  It has many features and good sound quality.  The basic functions are easy to use.  If you are thinking about a small system in this price range, I highly recommend it
DVD Burner. This is my first DVD Burner and the first time I used one of Amazons merchants.  I had some concerns about ordering, but everything went very smoothly.  Its a good way of purchasing a bargain and I'm very happy with the Sony DVD Burner
Great value. I use a Minolta DiMAGE G500 and this was an excellent memory upgrade. Spent a week in Hawaii taking pictures and 30-sec movies. Never ran out of memory! The G500 is an older 5 Mp camera. If you have a higher res camera, you may opt for higher speed memory. The memory speed for this card worked very well for casual photography
Just loved it....... Cute and very useful. I bought this cute little speaker from Walmart (14$) and it is so compact and very useful. It also matches with my other speakers of Sony Dream system.This has 4 USB ports (So good when they stay on your desktop rather than on your pC sitiing down the table.). They are lighted, so that you can plug them in even night. Speaker is good quality and it has one USB connection and One DC connection.Quality of sound is good if not excellent. Overall It is a great buy for the price.
Best Buy Computer Backpack. This backpack is great it is my 3rd time purchasing it. The 1st was for a friend the second my dog ended up eating and this one is working great. I can hold all of my College books as well as my computer and whatever else I need to carry for that day. This is a great bag for a good buy
IPOD KILLER!!! THIS THING RULZZZ GET ONE. THIS IS THE GREATEST MP3 I HAVE EVER OWNED I LOVE IT!!!!!!!!!!! It is way better than the ipod. I know this because my friend owns a ipod and i like my Zen much much better. Not only is this Zen cheaper it stores more music and dont worry about how thick it is. It make the Zen more durrable because I have dropped mine many many times and it works perfect. The only problem I have ever had with this product is. That after 3 months the left earphone would not work so i sent it back and its perfect now. It also has Great sound qualiy. Also I am a kid and NOT hello kitty Mommy im her son lol
Works well with Yamaha YPT 300. Stand came promptly, well-packaged, with clear directions, and it is sturdy enough for the YPT300.  This was the stand recommended by Yamaha for this model.  I spent less than 20 minutes putting it together
Love satellite radio. I got this for hubby and me over the summer.   We used it for our trip to Rehoboth beach and we loved every minute of it.   WE have a tape deck in the car and used it w/ a cassette adaptor.  We had not problems whatsoever, in fact it sounds much better thru the cassette adaptor than over the fm transmitter.I did try it thru the fm transmitter and it was a pain to switch from one station to the next, but i don't think anybody can improve upon that.  I had the same problem w/ my itrip.We chose sirius for several reasons...i liked the classic vinyl station, my dad introduced me to that and hubby likes nascar and this is switching over in 2007.The only problem i had was i couldn't read the red lettering in the daylight w/ the sunglasses on, but i didn't give them less than 5 stars because of this.this is the way to go, plus it has a suction mount, not a permanent mount.also, if you look on ebay, someone is selling something to adapt your mount to the bolt on your car seat!!definitely go satellite, the music is great and little/ no commercials depending on the stations.
Sweet. Very nice player. HDMI works perfectly and the 6 disc changer is handy. Blue light lets you see the disc's and looks very cool. 1080i with upscaling on all my DVDs.
Great Product. After a few initial problems with the clarity of the setup instructions I found this to be a wonderful complement to my laptop. As a CPA, I need to use the calculator keypad constantly. Having the ability to switch between the regular numeric pad for spreadsheet number entry and the smart calculator function is really a timesaver. Love the size. The rubber feet keep it in place on slick desk surfaces and the size is perfect for easy use. I really like having the protective cover, but it is a little hard to remove. If you have bad arthritis it would be a problem.The mouse is the right size for ease of storage and also for use. I like having the zipper cushion case for the mouse, but would have liked to also have the mouse bottom with a molded surface to store the PS-2 connector rather than a pocket in the storage case. Really a minor irritant rather than a substantive complaint
High Class Product. Just enough bells and wistles to protect my electronics. Design is perfect to manage todays plugs. Highly recommended
Zune Car Pack. I needed a mechanism to play my Zune through the car stereo and this product did the trick!  It came with all the required accessories and was a snap to figure out.  I highly recommend this car pack if you love to listen to your tunes while driving
Took some getting used to, but they sound great!. I recently started a new job, and was happy to learn that my employer offers its developers reimbursement for up to $300 to buy headphones or earphones in order to help us concentrate in our open floor-plan environment. After doing a lot of research, I decided on this set, and I'm glad I did.At first, I did find them a little uncomfortable; the silicon cups sometimes created painful suction in my ears. After experimenting with different ear tips, I eventually realized that the way I was inserting them into my ears was the problem, and I ended up switching back to the medium-sized silicon tips that are attached out-of-the-box. Watching the movie they have on their website helped me figure out the right way to insert them, but it takes a little bit of practice and experimentation.When correctly inserted, the sound isolation is fantastic! When I have them in at my desk and music is playing, I can't hear a thing around me, much to the chagrin of coworkers with questions. (I tell them to IM me!) I used to be unable to listen to music on my commute to and from work; the San Francisco BART must be the loudest subway I've ever been on. Now the noise has been reduced to a low rumbling in the background.The earphones have a very clear sound. I can finally hear the bass in my music when wearing earphones. The bass isn't overwhelming, however, and they do make another version of these for people who do want extra low end. I'm not really a high-end gear audiophile, but I do love listening to music, and these are the best way to do that portably that I've ever tried
Great accessory for Sandisk MP3 player. I purchased this unit for my daughter as a birthday present.  She received the Sandisk Sansa 4 gig MP3 player for Christmas and she wanted a speaker docking station to keep in her room.  The unit has performed better than I expected.  The dock emits a rich sound that belies it's small size and inexpensive price.And an added feature is that she can connect her laptop to it to play music she has residing on her hard drive!  She loves it.And her younger brother now wants one to go with his MP3 player.  So I will soon be ordering another speaker dock.I highly recommend this unit for the Sandisk MP3 players is is made for.
Extremely Satisfied. I bought this printer to print my shipping labels faster. It's easy to use! It prints very fast.Print quality is excellent. Changing diferent type of labels is easy too. I highly recommend this printer
worth the price. Very sturdy, Very good features although there is rooom for improvement, quite heavy, but I suppose that should be expected for the sturdiness, and overall worth it, especially at only (...
from the Tripp-Lite site:. Tripp Lite's INTERNETOFFICE700 standby UPS system offers surge suppression and long lasting battery support for personal computers, internetworking equipment and other sensitive electronics. Internal UPS circuits support entry level PC systems for up to 45 minutes during power failures and brownouts so that connected equipment can be shutdown without data loss. Offers complete desktop power protection in an attractive gray tower configuration. Includes 3 battery supported outlets for computer, monitor and one vital system peripheral, plus 3 additional surge suppression-only outlets for printers and other system accessories not requiring battery support. USB port enables optional unattended system shutdown without data loss in the case of extended power failure, USB cable included. PowerAlert software available via free download from www.tripplite.com. Built-in RJ11 phone suppression jacks protect modem, fax machine, cordless phone or other peripheral with a standard single line dialup/DSL phone connection. Built-in audible alarm and 3 front panel LEDs indicate line power status, battery power status and battery low/replace status. 700VA / 425 watt power handling ability supports entry-level PCs, network workstations, point-of-sale equipment, small business phone systems, audio/video equipment and home theater systems. Offers 5 minutes battery runtime with a full load of 700VA and 17 minutes with a half load of 350VA. Supports user battery replacement via built-in access panel. 2 year warranty. $150,000 connected equipment insurance (USA & Canada only)
HP Ipaq 2795. An outstanding platform for Windows mobile operating system.  Flawless syncing with home/office desktop.  Clear, high resolution screen is a joy compared to my previous Palm based PDA's.  Wireless functioning is reliable and seamless.  Ergonomics are excellent.  Good to above average batery life with power saver options.  Would highly recommend this product
GREAT PROCESSOR. I DECIDED TO DO A SOCKET 939 BUILD WITH THIS PROCESSOR AFTER USEING INTEL CPU'S FOR YEARS AND I HAVE TO SAY I AM VERY PLEASED SO FAR.I MANAGED TO OVERCLOCK THIS VENICE CORE CPU TO 2500 MHZ STABLE WITH A ARTIC COOLING FREEZER 64 PRO CPU COOLER ON A JETWAY 939GT4-SLI BOARD WITH PROPER BIOS TUNEINGPERFORMACE IS NOTHING LESS THAN IMPRESSIVE BLOWS AWAY COMPARABLE CLOCK SPEED INTEL CPU IN BENCHMARK
Awesome gift. This was a great gift for my husband.  It works really well.  I want one for myself
A Great Experience. This is a great product, not olny that combines technology and sports, also gives new meaning to running..just buy it and hit the road
Perfect. These boxes are half the size of regular cases, just right--not too bulky like the regular ones
Great Headphones. After enduring the so-so performance of my stock ipod headphones, I figured it was time to step up.  As I travel constantly, I wanted something that would would block out exterior noise; as a music freak I wanted something that would sound great.  After countless hours of research and even more time debating on what brand of headphones to get (UE vs. Shure vs. Etymotics) I bought the Super.fi 5 pros.  In the end it was the price, Amazon was selling then for $90 less than the MSRP. Can't beat that.As soon as they were delivered I hooked them up and put them on.  They aren't kidding when they tell you to turn your audio device way down.  I keep the volume on my ipod way down, a fraction of what I kept it at with the stock headphones.  The room I was in faces a major road and we had the windows wide open, so to say there was plenty of ambient noise would be an understatement.  With the UEs on, it was just me and the music.  A fire engine thundered by, normally a painfully annoying experience.  Again, the UEs reduced it to the point that I didn't realize the fire engine was coming until I saw it drive by.As for the music.  I first played a couple of tracks by Jenny Lewis and the Watson Twins.  I immediately noticed elements to the music I never even heard with my other headphones.  Jenny Lewis' angelic voice came through so beautifully clear it was like I was listening to them for the first time.  Next I put on some Ray Charles.  With the UEs, it was like I was there in the front row.  The horn section nearly kicked me out of me chair while I discovered that there was indeed a woodwind section.  I've read complaints that in ear headphones don't produce enough bass, so I decided to see for myself and played a couple of tracks from Siamese Twin by The Smashing Pumpkins.  While I'm not by any means a bass head, I need some bass to enjoy rock albums.  I couldn't have been happier with how the UEs performed.  The drums in the album (which I've always considered some of the best) came alive.  The guitars actually had some balls, but didn't overpower the singing or drums.As is the case when you stick things in your ears for a period of time, your ears are bound to hurt a little.  I found this to be the case only for a day or two, after that the UEs fit snugly without any complaint.  The only weird thing I encountered had to do with ear wax.  My wife, an audiologist, forbids the family from using Q-tips.  So after taking the UEs off for the first couple of times, there was a nice deposit left on the tips of the headphones.  Like the discomfort, this earwax experience only lasted for the first couple of times I used the UEs, and with the supplied earwax cleaner it was really a non issue.When there are so many excellent products out there, finding the perfect headphones becomes extremely challenging.  I've never tried on Shures or Etymotics, so I can't compare the performance of those headphones and the UEs.  What I do know is that I got a really great deal on the best headphones I've ever had.  Without a doubt these are the last pair of headphones I will buy for some time.
Worth every penny. For the money you are paying, these speakers are excellent. If you dont want to spend hundreds on high-end and need speakers for general listening, this is your best bet
Excellent Phone. My wife's grandmother (the person this was bought for) LOVES this phone..."it's easy to use with large buttons & friendly "controls".  I loved the price & ease of setup...  Answering machine is flawless & the handset gets great reception.  Perfect all around:
ahead of curve. This seems like the best buy currently or at least at the time I purchased (Jan, 2007). The key is the high definition (1280x720) and ease of use. I use it as a second monitor for my home computer to display graphics etc--the graphic colours don't quite match with the other screen but I can get them pretty close.  I watch DVDs on it--this is probably what it was really meant to do.  I'm completely happy with it
Awesome Receiver. Can't ask for more, clear sound, nicely finished, easy to use and the best part is the iPlug just plug it and you are done, your ipod doesn't get power from the 12v oultlet of the car (better for ipod's helth) no interferience like FM modulators. It doesn't get any better for the price
Excellent adapter. I bought this adapter form Eforcity, I was very surprise how well for this item and the seller. The delivery time is very excellent. Moreover, the item comes with the instruction which let me follow the process easily. And it doesn't have software to work with AOL's Phone services. I can dial and receive calls via Skype/VOIP without the need to buy a SKYPE phone.
Must have for dig. camera. They last and last, but get two pairs so you have some spares.  Need to recharge every week whether or not you use them.  A great product
Just what I was looking for!. I had been looking for months for an audio rack for my new gear and wanted to wait till I found the perfect piece. This one holds everything I own, and with the perforated steel door panel, it keeps my system ventilated. I purchased an extended rear panel too, which makes room for a larger component, and the casters I bought make it easy to move. It's functionality and sleek design were just what I was looking for.
can't go wrong with batteries. Seems nowadays everything uses AAA batteries or AA batteries making this pack perfect for just about anyone that needs them. You know who you are. The ones with the video games, remote controls, clocks, and whatever else you need. Expecially good to get during the holidays, you should never be without
Ipod accessories. Love this band.  It stays secure and is very unobtrusive.  I bought the bullet shields to use with this and feel my ipod is very protected.  I wear it in the gym and when I run.  No problems whatsoever - really stays in place
Exactly what it says it is. Which turned out to be a problem for me since thats not what I wanted (I was looking for a compact flash card reader for the older compact flash cards, and just assumed that SD and CF were the same.)  Luckily I also has some TransFlash cards that I am using it with and it works great.  I especially like the small design with no cords like a lot of other flash readers have
Ipod nano speakers. I ordered these speakers for my son for christmas.  I couldn't find themanywhere but JLab.  They delivered exactly when promised and gave GREATcustomer service.  A++++++++++
Eton FR400 Hand Crank Radio and Power Generator (Red). This works fine - got it in the time promised.  The only difficulty is that there is not much of an instruction manual
A must for GAMING. This my second pair. I use them for playing BF2 mainly. Sound is great for 5.1 suround. You will always know where the action is. The only down fall with these is the wires are very fine and tend to break near where they enter the earphones. I had probably near 2000 hours of gaming before I broke down and bought a new pair
Great Turntable CD Player w/Remote. Recently bought this CD changer to replace the broken one that was so old it didn't even have a remote.  After everything was plugged in I tried to open the CD tray and nothing happened; had to give it a little tug to get it to release the first time.  Has worked beautifully ever since.  Seems to be a good quality product
Great quality headphones from Sony. If you're looking for a pair of headphones that won't break down on you, these are the ones.  You can always count on Sony to make quality audio equipment, and that's no exception here with these behind-the-head style headphones that are well-designed not to slip off your ears.  The sound is nice and crisp, with a deep bass and a high treble, ideal for any type of audio.  The cord is nice and long at about 6 feet, but it's not too long that it will get in your way.  Overall, this is a great pair of headphones from Sony that I would recommend to anyone
Great Product. I was thinking about buying a 1G card, but after reading one of the reviews,I bought two 512 card,just in case that somethingwent wrong. Which to me made a lot of sense. I'm please
Perfect Sound for a fantastic service!!. With the optical output hookup there is absolutely perfect sound!! Unit is very easy to use, hookup, and is great looking. Satellite radio has everything and is the future of radio. Anybody that doesn't like this receiver is crazy and/or doesn't know how to use technology. A must have for those serious about satellite radio, music or high quality sound!! (If you don't have a good sounding stereo with a stereo receiver that has an optical input this unit is not needed!
Great printer. I have had this printer for several months now and have printed a wide variety of material from plain paper, to cardstock, envelopes and labels.  All work perfectly without misfeeds.  The only trick is to set the paper type in Properties when printing so it will go slower for thick stock.It's not photo quality, but great for brochures, marketing material, etc.It's quiet and fast.  The duplexing works amazingly well.I recommend this printer highly
Better than more expensive Bose. If you think that the Bose are good sound and good looking, think again. They may be good looking but their sound does not even come close to this JBL.Listen to everything else, then this. You will be amazed by the clarity delivered by this value / low cost speaker.Perfect for home threater use (rear), cause it may lack some base, a sub-roofer will do it.Do not get the flat Bose......
Pretty useful product. You will appreciate this product only if you don't have enough USB ports. In my case, I had plenty of ports, but needed an extension cable, which would help me in plugging the flash drives, whithout bending down and plunging into the cave of wires(I keep my CPU, under the table).The only complaint I have is the the wire lenght is not long enough.Overall good value for price
Excellent cables. As soon as i hooked up the cables, i saw a huge difference in the picture quality.  I didn't notice any loss of picture quality when i switch to these component cables from HDMI
Excellent and approachable. I've always preferred a matte finish as opposed to glossy. While the Canon Paper Pro glossy paper is excellent, I think I'm one of the few out there who is less than impressed with their matte paper. However, when I discovered the semi-gloss line, I wanted to try it right away. The results were outstanding! The images were sharp and bright. The colors did not bleed unnecessarily like the matte paper. The semi-glossy finish gives it an inviting look, perfect for black and white photos, postcards, or sharing snapshots
B A. This thing is awsome, i have had warnings long in advance to seeing a cop. This is handy fella
Extremely Pleased. I am really amazed at the quality of this product and the value for the money.  Looks good and sounds great at a price that I have found to be very affordable
Great holder for Sony mp3s. When I received my new Sony mp3 player I was surprised to find that it did not include a belt clip like the previous one I owned.  I saw this holder and thought I would give it a try.  I love it!  I rated this product 4 stars instead of 5 because the belt clip attachment is not so great.  In contrast, the arm strap is perfect.  It is just the right size and offers great support without being too restrictive
practical and pretty. This product is a good solution to personalizing and protecting the delicate case of your white macbook.  I had the white ibook and after a year it became scratched and worn.  With this speck case I know that in a year the white computer shell will still have its original shine
Great TV. A great set.  Good sold picture, the sound is nothing to write home about but certainly more than enough for most TV.  Hard core movie buffs will want to pick up a surround sound anyway.The "Buzz" that you will read about in the other posts.  It is there.  I also use mine as a PC monitor and when there isn't any volume I do here it.  It is very low and I didn't even notice it until I read about it here.I think I'm going to keep this one for a VERY long time
Works fine. Wish the unit had a separate online/offline light.  When power to the unit is missing, the single red light turns off only when the warning sounds.  The warning sound is like a lot of sounds you hear in the house so it isn't always easy to tell what is happening
Kinamax Kicks A**. This is a great and easy way to get data from your cards to your PC.Also this is far cheaper than the cable that goes with the PSP
Absolute Recommendation. I LOVE this player. I have the 512MB version but it's the same thing. I'm buying the 1GB version today.Pros:1. USB interface. No cords to connect, just plug 'n play.2. Battery. A real battery. Not the internal, rechargeable kind. The quick-swap, good-to-go-in-10-seconds AAA kind.3. Size. Less than three inches. Perfect size for a shirt pocket.4. Durability. I have dropped this player onto concrete 20+ times, sent it through the wash, left it in the car in -25C temperatures, slammed it in a car door, and lost it in the snow for 3 days. Yet, it still works great. (Looks like crap, but WORKS great)Cons:Maybe...1. No hold/lock button (if you care about that)2. Smaller style screen.3. Sometimes while fast-forwarding, I accidentally skip the song instead. (Probably just big fingers)Overall, this is one great player for the price
Solid Product For Price - Immediately Impressed. Flying to Asia I wanted noise canceling headphones for the flight.  I researched different options and was reluctant to spend a lot, seeing many poor user reviews on much higher priced products.  I read a couple solid reviews for these and thought the risk was low for the price.These are very solid on the airplane and I highly recommend them!  They reduce a significant amount of airpline engine noise and make listening to your ipod, a movie, or just relaxing significantly more enjoyable.  While they do not reduce the noise on the air plane 100% they make a very significant dent.They don't seem to work as well for non-airplane noises, however, for the price and for airplane usage I highly highly recomment these.-Smart design-Durable-Comfortable even for long hours-Good battery lifeYou can't go wrong for the price!
Nothing Plays the Beatles Better than Bose. Every morning I'm up with the dawn. A quick cup of coffee, then I'm at my iBook tap, tap, taping on the keys, writing away, slaving over that novel that one day is going to propel me to the stars. And while I'm doing this, I've got Billy Holiday or the Beatles playing low, so that I don't wake the woman I love or the baby.And though Billie was meant to be played with the volumn soft and the lights turned down low, the Beatles were not. They were meant to be played loud. They were, they really were. But if you're up before the sun and you crank it up, not only will you be at trouble at home, but your neighboors might not appreciate it either.So what to do, what to do?Get a Bose Acoustimas speaker system, that's answer. In all of my listening experience, nothing handles the Beatles better when you can't turn it up than Bose. The reflecting sound fills the room without rocking down the house. And your hear it all, every lickin' stichin' bit of the music. John, Paul, George and Ringo never sounded better on a quiet morning. And as an added benifit, later on, when everybody is up, you can turn the music up too and it sounds super. And on the special occasion, when you are home alone, you can rock out and play it loud, loud enough so that the neighbors might call the cops if you don't watch out.Jack Priest, a Sailor Home from the Se
Loud but I only use it for backing-up. This drive has performed well so far and I have no complaints. The fan is loud as described by other comments, but since I only use it to back up my PowerBook and 4 other FireWire drives I only have to put-up with it once a month
great portable speakers. I have been a live sound engineer for 30 years and music is is an important part of my life. I needed a set of portable, reasonable sounding speakers for my laptop. This is the second set I bought (the first ending up not being very portable at all) and I am extremely happy with them. They are clean and clear and the perfect size for a hotel or dorm room, unless you want to shake the place. The packaging is very compact and since they are USB powered the lack of AC wire is refreshing. The case is very well designed and all the wires fit neatly inside with the speakers. All possible wires and adapters are included and the speaker wire is also the stand, nice design.  I would highly recommend this product
Tiny. I bought this as a gift for a friend.  It is very small.  This is her first USB flash drive and she is really thrilled with it.  I am only giving 4 stars because I wish it had an attachment for a lanyard or key chain.  It is so small it could get lost unless you keep it inside something
Very good but room for improvement. PRO:Sound is excellent! Custom equalizer actually works and doesn't distort sound much (unlike, say, Windows Media Player).Easy drag & drop file transfer! I wouldn't never buy a device that doesn't have this feature. And transfers are quite speedy.Good battery life.Wide range of file types (partially) supported.Supports WinAmp playlists.Can use as a very primitive mono voice recorder.CON:Terrible user interface, poor file navigation.This is partly due to the limited physical controls, namely the single (noisy) joystick/button, which does not feel robust and is bound to break since it gets so much use as you try to navigate the interface.You MUST use the little "subpack" to charge the unit and transfer files.  Very poor choice.  This thing WILL get lost. Unit should ship with 3 of them. They could easily have designed this hardware into the unit with a small increase in size.If you transfer jpegs from your camera (which you probably won't, since it's awkward) the files will be too big for the X5 to actually display, since it is limited to filessmaller than 2.5megs.  So, unless you like to shoot photos at a smaller resolution than your camera supports, all you get, in practice, is the ability to store the files on the drive.In other words, it's useless for a photographer, and, needless to say, it doesn't support raw files of any kind.  The best solution for this is a Jobo unit that's huge and expensive.Cannot delete or move files on the unit itself, must use computer.Limited ability to create a playlist on the device itself.One of the worst user manuals I've ever seen.Anyone motivated to reformat, transfer and then watch a video on a screen this small should probably try to develop some wider interests, perhaps even start interacting with the world around them..
Olympus 202049 USB 200 Media Reader/writer. I bought this in lieu of the Fuji counterpart which was out of stock in Amazon. Since the Fuji Finepix E900 runs on AA batteries and its AC powercord/supply is an option one has to buy, this reader is a cheap, quick and even more portable alternative for downloading pix to my Mac
Couldn't get batteries to work. Otherwise great!. I couldn't get it to work with brand new Maxell batteries, so I ordered a replacement keyboard, only to find that it too didn't run on batteries (the instruction manual clearly states that it should be able to).  I found an AC power adapter to use and it works great.  I have yet to try some higher powered batteries, but will happily keep using it with the power cord regardless.Other than the initial battery issues, this keyboard works great for the price I paid! ($30)
Simple, cheap DivX player. I bought this to play DivX movies, and needless to say, I wasn't expecting a whole lot; this is an extremely inexpensive piece of hardware. All-in-all, I've been pleasantly surprised, for it has been the perfect solution for playing DivX movies through my home theater. It has even gone beyond the call of duty regarding storage media, for even though the manual states that the DivX files need to be read from a CD-R or CD+R, I've been using DVD-R discs without any issues at all (this lets me store 5-6 DivX movies on one DVD disc instead of 1 movie on a CD disc). I haven't tried using a DVD+R yet - I'll update this if I can remember to do so. Hope this helps. (Five stars for the function to price ratio)**Update 2/2/07I used a DVD+R with the unit today, and it worked just fine. The media manufacturer was Verbatim, and I used Nero v6 to make the disc. Hope this is helpful
Great Protection for IPOD. This Iskin totally protects the Ipod from scratches and the navigation wheel responds without any problems.  I wish the clear cover didn't scratch so easily and the lock button had a coutout to enable the lock button to function better.
Love this flash card... I usually purchase Lexar cards for my 20D.   The sandisk was a better price so I decided to try it.   It is fast with its write speed.   I can pop off a number of images without having to wait for it to write to the card.   The image quality is excellent...I think that the colors may be a little more vibrant than the ones I have on the Lexar cards.   I think that I am going to switch to Sandisk
IM3 IS AS IM3c. When I bought it couple weeks ago. I look out side the box is IM3, But inside the box speaker is IM3c. I call the company, they told me IM3 is as IM3c. They said someone on the internet sell the IM3 is all same with the IM3c, And IM3c also support the Ipod video too
Fits like a glove. High quality bag that should withstand some significant abuse. Not much room for other things, but then the bag would only be bigger. As is, it fits the iM7 and some cables
Samsung DVD-V9700 DVD/VHS Combo Player w- UPCONVERSION!. Samsung DVD-V9700, DVD/VCR combo with upconversion, is GREAT...!ProsExcellent Upconversion & Progressive scan DVD pictures! VCR is great too!ConsSometimes VCR auto-tracking, takes a little manual tweaking. No biggee!The Bottom LineDVD- This is a great DVD/VCR combo!VCR- I still prefer the easy playability of VCR (restart...), and easier recording...! I'd buy this, just for the hi quality HiFi VCR!I don't know about recording, as I had to hook it up separate from my cable box?Full ReviewI am "NOW" VERY HAPPY with it (learning curve!)...!-I recently upgraded to a new VIZIO 47" HD LCD TV (ALL TV signals will be HD, by 2009!).The TV's analog/digital pictures are GREAT (sooo much more!ENJOYABLE! than my old very good 32"!)!- I LOVE MY NEW TV!The DVD/VCR viewing from my old/standard 480i DVD/VCR (480 lines per inch), going to my new HD TV's HD 1080i- was FUZZY/not sharp...???-I called VIZIO support?- They explained that the problem was in going from an old technology 480i DVD to the new 1080i HD TV, which means that every other line is BLANK!Support recommended that I get a DVD player with Upconversion & Progressive Scan&, and a GOOD HiFi VCR player (no VCR has upconversion!). They recommended the Samsung DVD-V9700's features!Support then explained Upconversion (480i converted to 1080i)-The DVD player uses some high-tech method...?, and fills in the next 480i blank line with the closest image- now it's not bi-blank... & sharp 1080i!Support also recommended that I get GOOD "HDMI" DVD cables (they are designed for BEST HD TV!)! Note- The inexpensive HDMI cables I tried, gave a weaker picture than the RCA brand! The included "thin" Component cables also had poorer picture.Support also explained Progressive Scan (only works with digital)- Progressive scan cleans up the jaggies..., where analog only paints the original picture.As for the 480i (only) HiFi VCR- It plays with a very good picture (1080i DVD/TV is somewhat better).MY new TV plays 480i output, in AV mode, so picture is sharp with VCR!Sound is excellent!Support also recommended that I get GOOD RCA (style/model) cables, for the VCR.You MUST use RCA style cables- as HDMI..., is for DVD only. I got the RCA brand/style cables with a much thicker Yellow wire, than what comes with it.Recommended:Yes
very good. my compact flash card works just fine & good here very fast.a very happy custome
yeah. I love it it rocks.What sucks is that you really need a nice sound card to really enjoy it.I am using my onboard Nvdia sound drivers with digital optical. I can hear the pc noise in it sometimes. Basically to really enjoy it I would have to buy a nice Sound card that can do Dolby encoded signal.For the priceBuy it
Great headphones. I was looking for a good simple set for at work that didnt require any hassle when co-workers needed to talk to me and this seemed to fit the bill.And it did.  Great audio, the best for any headphone that doesnt encompass the entire ear (such as the more expensive Sennheiser's and Sony's).  Great bang for the buck
Review of VHS Video Tapes. The tapes are exactly what I had searched the web for.  Thanks to Amaxon.com for listing the seler
best set for the money. After seeing this set (Olevia 542I) next to a Sony 42"p, there is no wayI would pay 800 to $1,000 more for the Sony. There is virtually no difference between the clarity of the Olevia's picture and the picture of the Sony.I purchased the 542I two months ago, and am completely satisfied. Also,I purchased an "OPPO" DVD player which works beautifully with the 542.I have recommended the Olevia to several people.
Olympus 2 GB Type M Xd memory card. Amazon had the best price by far that I could find on a 2 Gb Xd card, so I couldn't resist.  I'm using it in my sp-550uz camera. You must use an Olympus card in this camera in order to use certain premium functions.  Nice card...nice price.  Thanks, Amazon
very good joystick. Bought this joystick about 2 months now and am still very impressed. I did not want to write review too eary after buying as I wanted some time to test product. Well i can say i like this product very much, its very accurate, reliable, has all the buttons you need and it feels comfortable overal
Great Speakers for Surround. I use these speaker for surrounds in my 5.1 Home Theater system, they are paired with JBL E30 front satellites, JBL E C35 center, JBL E 250P sub, and a Yamaha RX-V767 AV receiver/amp.Great highs - treble is detailed, clear and crisp, midbass is punchy for 4" woolfer, and the midrange is clear and clean; imaging is also good. I have a JBL E250 sub and have not listened to these on their own (full range) so I don't know about bass response/output.I bought these to match (timbre) the rest of JBL Northridge E speakers in my 5.1 surround system and becuase of the off-white color to make them blend in more with walls/celling, plus they come with mounting hardware.  These make great surround sound speakers if you have other JBL speakers or not.Bottom line - These speakers sound good, look good (indoors or out), and are easy to mount.  A great buy
Loads of Power. I'm not sure how long this will last. Had it on for nearly ten hours straight and never saw the battery bar on the iPod dip below full charge. Used it for the next three days on and off for a total of maybe 6 hours and still didn't see any change in battery level. Would be nice if it came with a car charger if your traveling to the outdoors and won't have a pc to charge it through
Great hadware, software could be better. I love my new iPod. I bought this one after my 60GB iPod Photo was "misplaced". I had a library of about 6,000 songs (small for what this thing can hold) and the first time I updated the new iPod with the library I got error messages every 700 songs or so. I had to restart the whole updating process about 9 times until I finally got al my songs into the iPod. This was problem number one (which I don't expect to happen again unless I update the iPod whith more than 700 songs at a time).Problem number two: if I'm searching for a song by artist, it won't display all the songs I have by that artist in the iPod. Say I have like 20 songs by Madonna, and I search for Madonna on the artists menu, I only get like 5 of the 20 songs there are. That didn't happen with my old iPod.But all in all, it's a great product and I would buy it all over again if I had to
NOW a great value in speakers. Several years ago when these first came on the market they were totally novelty priced, ie. more expensive than warranted. But now at 399. they are a great value and I say this not only because I own them and I'm thrilled but also I know several people who have them in various sized rooms and varying placements, and these speakers simply kick it!! With all due respect to the naysayers, unless you're an ardent audiophile, these speakers will make you very happy
excellent product. As advertised and reviewed by others.  This is Garmin's top of the line in this type GPS unit.  Good product
Fantastic Picture!. I bought this tv after seeing my father-in-law's Samsung HDTV (he has the LNS3251D).  I have seen a bunch of HDTV's but I really liked the crisp, clear, bright picture of the Samsung.  I also loved how light it was in comparison to my 80lb. tube TV.  This model was a little bit cheaper than my father-in-law's, but offers the same terrific picture (I believe the only difference is that his comes in "piano black").I ordered through Amazon (great price!  free shipping!) and picked up the TV from Eagle USA instead of taking a day off of work to wait for them to drop it off.  They were very helpful and friendly.When I first got the TV I thought something might've been wrong with it since my picture was worse than my previous TV using the same DirecTV box.  As much as I adjusted it the picture was blurry, moving objects left trails and the picture seemed to scroll.  However, ever since DirecTV came and gave me the HD box (optomized for widescreen picture) and installed the HD satellite I have been able to appreciate this TV.  A must-have for any sports fan with poor eyesight
Get the speakers off the furniture. Treat yourself to a more theatre like atmosphere and fill your room with sound.  These are great mounts, a bit more expensive than some, but worth it for SAFE wall mounting of your speakers
Does the job and good looking. This CD / DVD holder does double duty.  This item has the capacity to hold 96 cd's or dvd's.  I have purchased both the brown/tan 'pleather'suede for myself and the black 'pleather' for a relative.  They are both nice.  There is enough room on the inside to fill the holder so it can close properly. As others I have purchased, once filled, fan out, look overstuffed and do not look nice and neat. They look much nicer than the travel cases that are out there and greatly reduce the space needed to house your collection.If you want your place to be organized and cut the clutter this is a great product.  All the leftover cd and dvd jackets were put into a clear box and are stored in the garage
Great Product. I was very pleased with the Sony ECM-F01 Boundary Effect Microphone.  This product works great for the meetings I attend and the clarity and volume are the best.  Even though the size of this product is small, the range and pick-up is exceptional.  Very good product and a very good price for the features it offers
Works with BOSE Lifestyle Cube Speakers. Installation was quick and easy, and hardware provided for the BOSE cube speakers.
The best brand nobody ever heard of. Not wanting to upset the balance of the universe, I was a good Nikon user and used only the brands/types of CF memory cards the manufacturer recommended, thinking that stepping an inch off this list meant stepping off the edge of the world. But seeing the price of the cards on this list, and running the risk of getting one of those infamous counterfeits on eBay, put me in a quandry: I needed more memory (who doesn't?) but I didn't have the money (who does?). I decided to risk the unthinkable and looked beyond 'the list'.I did an open-ended 'net search on price vs. features in a CF card, sat back, and let the web do my walking. The best combination was the Transcend line, which I had never heard of. I narrowed my next search to the brand, and learned that this company had been making memory modules for a wide variety of applications for years, and had engineered a product capable of working under extended temperatures and other environmental conditions. Their reputation among industry professionals was golden.So I figured what's the worst that can happen? Would putting one of their CF cards in my camera leave me with a pile of D70 ashes? I closed my eyes, gritted my teeth, rolled the dice and hit a 7: no compatibility issues, excellent performance, and lots of pretty pictures. (And my camera is still in one piece.)I took over a thousand pictures in three days (Arnold Classic) on that chip. Every one of them recorded and transferred flawlessly.Methinks Nikon needs to update their list
HP Photosmart Deluxe Carrying Case. Nice case, perfect for compact HP Photosmart printers. The price that I found on Amazon was less than half of what I found on other sites. Great buy
512MB DDR SDRAM Desktop Memory (KVR400/512R) (KVR400/512R). quick shipment.. product works great, fantastic wxperience.  Thank you
So much memory so little speed... If storage space is what you need this is the C.F. type two card for you hands down... If speed is what you need look elsewhere. Downloading from the camera to Mac to like forever. I bought a Type two card reader and the process of transfering picts to my iMac was greatly improved and moved in to the decent range. Even with the type two card reader it wasn't as fast as i would have liked but it it acceptable considering the storage space and the price. The only problem I have discovered with this product is it's speed. For that reason i gave it 4 of 5 stars rating. Aside from the speed issue it is an awesome piece of technology
SANGEAN WR 2. WOW!  WHERE DO I START ?  A SUPERB RADIO.  SHINY DARTH VADER BLACK.  FLAWLESS IN EVERY DETAIL.  MUDDY BASE CLEARS UP IF YOU DECREASE IT.FRONT PHONE JACK AND A REMOTE MAKE UP FOR WHAT I THINK IS POOR LOCATION FOR CONTROLS.  ON MY SONY THEY ARE ON TOP AND ALLOW FOR EASY USE WHEN IN BED LISTENING AT NIGHT.  CONNECTIONS ON THE BACK FOR EXTERNAL ANTENNAS. A TERK TOWER IS COMING FROM UNIVERSAL RADIO.  12 VOLT POWER JACK TOO! JUST FROM A SIMPLE WIRE ANTENNA I GET FM STATIONS A HUNDRED MILES AWAY.  AM NEEDS SOME TINKERING WITH ANTENNAS TO WORK I THINK...FIVE STARS ALL THE WAY. SIX WHEN I JUICE THE AM SECTION FOR BETTER RECEPTION
KVM Switch Easy to Use. I read all of the reviews associated with this product before I purchased it. Some complained of screen problems (blinking and clarity) with the switch. I have had a tiny bit of this problem, but not to the point of being bothersome.  Many stated,however, that it was easy to install and loved the single key switching. They were correct! This has been super easy to use and the price was right. I'll be happy if it lasts more than a year, as some complained it stopped working. So far so good
Great product regardless of others lack of understanding. I'm a techno dweeb too !  Others that have whinned about speed issues just don't understand what the technology is capable of without paying $1500 for a HD Server.  Bottomline is that this is a fast device for it's class and price point.  It appears to have better features than the Maxtor Unit...  and I am a MAXTOR FIRST FAN whenever possible.  I've even plugged in other USB based HDs, printers and additional accessories to network other non network capable devices.  You'll save $10 to $20 per month just in electricity by shutting down those other computers in the house that you leave running because they have a printer attached to them
Excellent slimline addon. This was the first adapter I purchased after taking the huge dvr station with me on a couple trips. If your thinking about buying the Helmet camera; it comes with this exact base. (so now I have two).
Love it!. I just love this cd burner/dvd rom!!!!I bought it for my kid so she could play a dvd-rom game but I had always wanted to try burning my own music cds.Well I am soooo pleased. Sony has made this so EASY.  It was easy to install and plenty of instructions and with diagrams for the mechanically uninclined.  I was intimidated but I got it in, and it worked right away.Sony gives you some free music downloads so I went there right away to try it out.  You have to download their software which took me a long time because I have a dial up connection, but it was worth it.  You pick your song and download, which takes 15 minutes at dialup speed.  Then you transfer it right to the cd.  Bam!  I got in a hurry and used a cd-r (which is not erasable) and only put two songs on the cd.  After I took it out and played the songs it wouldn't let me put any more on the cd. So I need to wait until I have all my songs downloaded before I burn them to cd. I still have some things to learn.Sony gives you software so that you can make jacket covers for the cd and to make a track listing.  Nothing fancy but I liked it.You can watch dvd's on your computer and you can drag and drop information on your hard drive to a cd so that your info is backed up.  I love that too, having a way to back up my photos and other info.You can also create video CDs.(...)I'm very happy with my Sony products
Superlative. This is a mono system whose sound outstrips many stereo systems. One of the finest protables I've ever seen. Buy one
THIS IS SOOO CUTE!!!!!!. I LOVE THIS CLOCK RADIO! I LOVE HELLO KITTY AND I LOVE!! THE COLOR PINK. (IT'S MY FAVORITE!) SO I THINK THIS CLOCK ROCKS!! I AM ADDING IT TO MY CHRISTMAS WISH LIST. I GIVE IT 5 + STARS. IF IT'S HALF AS NICE AS IT LOOKS HERE IT'S WORTH IT. NOW IF AMAZON WOULD JUST GET SOME MORE IN STOCK! COME ON AMAZON!!!! ORDER SOME MORE!!!!! PLEASE!!!!!!
Great mouse for gamers. The mouse is perfect for games. I use it to play ET and is great. The software provided by Logitech is configurable in all ways
Adorable Hello Kitty CD Boombox. I purchased this item for my 3yr old granddaughter. She loves Hello Kitty. The sound quality is great. I rate this as easy for kids to operate with lots of fun times ahead
Magnificent. If you've never played flight simulator with one of these, prepare for a whole 'nother world!  It's durable, high quality, precise and FUN
Bose on a Budget. You may think spending this much on PC speakers with no subwoofer is a bit steep, but when you hear these you will be glad you spent the extra money.  Personally, I am a professional and listen to music at work as much as possible and I wanted to upgrade to attain the best sound possible without a mess of speakers everywhere.  Initially I put these on top of the desk, but the sound was so good that I found it too distracting to concentrate on my work.  So I put them under the desk where my old set had been.  The sound is still great.  The best thing about Bose is the clarity and bass response.  I don't know how they packed it into this small set, but they did.  Literally I can shake the desk if I want to.  But the clarity and enjoyment at low volume is what I am most happy about
Very good with a great price. I was looking for an affordable DVD player and found this one. It has been working very well for nearly a month and I am very satisfied. It cannot play absolutely everything but it is a bargain especially if you don't play too different DVD formats. Recommended
excellent. this is the 2nd time i have purchased this from Amazon.  great product and quick delilvery
Great TV. This is a great TV, with super HD quality.  The regular TV picture is not great but it's hard to tell how much of that is just the difference from the HDTV.  You get spoiled pretty fast.  Still, I did a lot of comparing and am happy with this purchase
Cruzer Mini 256 MB Flash Drive. It's little. It holds a bunch of data. It's so easy to use even my copilot can understand it. It's the perfect way to transport lots of data in a really small package. Throw those floppy disks away forever! If North Korea could make missiles the way SanDisk makes flash drives, we'd all be in deep kimchee
Wonderful item. Works great, but drains battery life rather quickly I think. Very handy to have around when you need a usb flash drive
Excellent for my purposes!. I was trying to find a small unit for the bedroom to replace a previous unit. The NEZ30 model (30 watts, not the NEZ3) fits the bill. The sound is incredible and loud for a small unit. It sounds better than the bigger unit I had. The design of the speakers with the special bass produces a very rich and round sound. And that's without the DSG activated. The bass and treble can be adjusted (-3 to +3) but only with the remote. If you buy a unit used be sure it has the remote. Also I needed something with a tape player like another reviewer
Best Mouse for the buck hands down. I just got my mouse today I was ecstatic about the performance I had initial problems installing the mouse but after I unplugged it and plugged it in again the problems went away. I have to agree with my other comrades from this site this is the best mouse for the price and I have no problems whatsoever except for the look which I thought was the result from damage from shipping but it was designed like that so I have no complaints
Great sound card. Everything I have tried to do with the sound card has been easy to do.  Great sound, great hardware and good software.
Works Great!. I've had it for almost a year now and I haven't had any problems whatsoever. Sound and picture quality is great! Controls are really easy to use and remote sure comes in handy
Good for what it is. This machine has fulfilled everything I wanted--speedy scanner, speedy copies, fax and computer printer.The outfit I bought it from through Amazon sent the wrong one and were very easy to work with in rectifying the error.The original ink cartridge only lasted one month, or  about 1000 pages; jury is out on that.There are only three things that are drawbacks for my usage. One, the paper trays' limit to 250 is very very slightly annoying--not a big deal normally except when producing volume.Second, the document feeder is noisier than my 1999 commercial-volume machine I got spoiled by. The noise of this one is probably no worse than any other in its product and price range. However, I now try to avoid phone conversation when the doc feeder is in use and audible through the phone. No big deal if you don't sit next to it, but I do.Third, I have not been able to get it really dark or high contrast when copying a faint document (like pencil-written ones). If you plan to use it that way there might be some frustration; however, I have not sought customer service assistance with it yet.I rate it a 4 and not a 5 simply because the doc feeder noise bothers me when I am on the phone nearby
Convenient But.. Very handy idea works good but connect is not secure (iPAQ 3630). On an older lap top it shuts down and pops up an error that the iPAQ was drawing too much power. All in all it beats the bulky cradle
One of the best portable radios  ever. One of the best radios, very clear reception of local stations, high quality  sound.I use it also to listen to music  stations. Picks up a lot of shortwave frequencies, although  some of them not as clear.  Digital tuning makes it easy to find stations. The price was good also, some stores charge like $50 more
Great for the price. I use this to power my subwoofer and home theater speakers.It does the trick
Nice. Never owned computer speakers before, but these sound great with CDs or iTunes radio. Look nice with my white Mac, too
USB to Serial Adapter. Does what it is suppose to do.  No problem, reasonable price
Complete satisfaction. I recommend this item to all them who intend to buy 1 gb memory stick for their cameras and cells.
Great addition to any home audio setup. I have had three other home audio servers in the past and this one is by far the best of them all.  The setup was a snap in only 10 minutes and the integration with Rhapsody makes it simply outstanding.Party mode is also great, linking all the rooms together.The only downside is the controller will go to sleep and it takes it about 30 seconds to wake up.  Not a big deal really.Excellent unit!
Does the job; good price!. The card works well in my camera and was purchased at a good price compared to several other sources.  No problems with delivery
Great Item. Performs perfectly.  Looks great and charges quickly.  Prongs fold in - great for charging when traveling
Was worried about the "over the ear". I wont add anything about the sound, they sound fine to me.I never had an over the ear and was worried they would not be comfortable, and besides, they look strange.They take a bit of getting used to, but I love them now (about 2 months, 1-2 hours a day). I work in a lab, and need the wires out of the way of my stuff; the behind the ear helps the wire stay closer to my body and not dangle in front, especialy in front of my face and neck/upper chest area. (Lower, the wire is tucked behind my lab-coat leading down to the Zen on my belt.)I feel much more secure than with my older regular earbuds.
Great. Worked like a charm, wish I would have taken the time to get this long ago, would have saved me alot of money on ink
AWESOME!!. This product is absolutely one of the best products Kensington has created.  Not only is the functionality seamless and simple, the product is beautiful.  I bring it to work to use on my Mac and take it home to use with my Powerbook and  I love it most because of the two-click--right and left(which us Mac users aren't always used to).  I've only been using it for a week now and everyone in the office wants one!  The two ladies on either side of me already bought theirs!!  Great product for a great cause!  Go get one...NOW.  I guarantee you will love it as much as I do:
THE BEST MP3 PLAYER. MY SISTER BROUGHT A CREATIVE ZEN FOR HERSELF AND DID NOT KNOW HOW TO WORK IT SHE GAVE IT TO ME ,LOVED IT THEN WENT ON AMAZON AND PURCHASE ONE FOR MY HUSBAND. MY SON HAS A APPLE IPOD BUT THE ZEN SOUND IS AWSOME MORE BASE THEN THE IPOD HAS
Great piece at a great price. When I was shopping for a flash drive, I saw that someone complained about the slow speed of this drive. It almost scared me away from buying it, but now I'm glad I don't believe everything I hear. This is the fastest media I've ever used, and if someone has one that doesn't run fast, the problem is with their own system or files. A hundred megs in the blink of an eye is plenty fast enough for me. I'm a hands down believer in the SanDisk Cruzer Mini 2GB USB 2.0 Flash Drive. Stop looking, cause you just found the best buy
Great Surge Plug. This is the 3rd surge plug that I have purchased.  The first one met an untimely death do to a major water spill from a fish aquarium, but all the equipment attached to it survived.  All in all, these plugs are the best.  Each plug is labled and you get tags to label your cords (a nice feature if all your plugs are same color and style).  the added area for power packs is a nice touch as those take up so much room
NICE plastic item. So I was looking for a frim book holder that could support large books with up to 800 pages... could not find a nice one in a good price range and good quality... So i gave a shot for this peace of plastic for 11$. AND it works, I used it for two weeks now and I am pretty satisfied. Just like there is one more review on this item... and it says that it is strong and sturdy.. I AGREE.It is a great item for the money.Vitalijus Stony
Pleased so far with the Cyberpad. I just got the Cyberpad last week and I have used it for a few days.  The product is just as I expected, thin and lightweight.  The software was easy to install although I agree with an earlier reviewer that they could have done a better job with the documentation (in fact they need to correct major typos in the "manual" such as change from "lunch" to "launch"!).  The pen is indeed a bit bigger than what I'd like and I hope they will come up with a thinner replacement.  The notes are captured very well eventhough my handwriting is not very good (specially in fast paced meetings).  For me one of the biggest benefits is the Evernotes software package which comes with Cyberpad.  With Evernotes, I can catalog and organize all the notes taken and assign tags for specific categories which makes it a breeze to find my notes later on (which was a problem I was trying to solve with the Cyberpad). So, I would rank it a 5-star except for the pen size
Great DVD player. I absolutely love this DVD player because it plays MPEG format and it can read all types of disks (DVD-R, DVD+R, DVD+RW, DVD-RW.)  I transfer all my television programs from my TIVO to my PC and then burn them as MPEG files onto a re-writable DVD.  Then means that when I am done watching my shows I can erase the disk and re-record it.  I am able to fit between 3 and 5 hours of programing onto each DVD.  The picture quality is great and the battery life is also very good.  I take the DVD player to the gym with me so I can watch my favorite shows while I run on the treadmill.  The size of the player is perfect for this purpose and the small remote control is an added bonus.  I'll definately get another if this one ever breaks.If you have any questions you can email me at [...
Maxell blank audio tapes are great. First off, any idiot who uses these fine blank music quality cassetts for speech recording, as is suggested in the lame desctiption, deserves to pay so much. Setiously, I have used these tapes for years to record music and I am still listening to some I had recorded over 15 years ago. I can't say I have ever had a "lemon" tape; all have been up to the highest performance. P.S.: If you are looking for speech or "normal" bias tapes, go for the Maxell UR tapes
~Excellent Product. At an excellent price! Tiny 1GB holds a lot of music, pictures and documents. Just click & drag. Fast data transfer speed. Super-easy to use. Lanyard keeps it at the ready.
Enoormous!!!. I have been using the same 17 inch CRT that came with a computer that died over 4 years ago, it had a 1280 x 1024 resolution and flickered quite a bit. finally i decided to upgrade to this to go with my new mac pro, let me just say that i am more than satisfied.This thing is humongous, you don't really realize how big it is until you get it set up! the extra screen real-estate is incredible, i can have two normal size browser windows open side by side, or one absolutely enormous browser window.this is also very thin, i save so much desktop space with this monitor, finally my small desk is no long cluttered due to a enormous monitor that took up half the desk. also, the stand is kinda flimsy and non-adjustable, but is can be removed and replaced with a mount, but the one that comes with it will suffice until that day comes.I played lots of world of warcraft on my crt, it doesn't look as crisp on this monitor, but not only am i willing to trade image sharpness for the sheer size of this thing, but one must also realize that a crt will always look sharper and crisper than a LCD.much like other reviewers state, the backlight does bleed through on the top and bottom of the screen but i hardly ever notice it. I also have not noticed any ghosting on this monitor since i got it. the colors are also very bright and vibrant.i was skeptical about this upgrade at first, mainly considering that i could have squeezed another couple months out of my old crt, but let me tell you, if you are thinking about upgrading to this monitor...DO IT, for the price you will not be disappointed!!!
Great HDTV with HDMI. This 23" LCD HDTV has excellent image quality and looks really stylish, too.  It also comes with HDMI so you can hook up the latest HD video source such as HD-DVD or Blue-ray hi-def DVD players.  The LCD panel itself displays vivid, evenly-lit images, and ghosting appears to not be a problem on this model.I personally ended up opting for the Sharp LD-23SH1U HDTV LCD monitor because the Sharp works as PC/Mac monitor (plus J&R started offering a $[...]rebate).  But I think this Panasonic is a great choice, too, no doubt about that
Don't install Mouseworks if you use Breeze!. After using non-optical Orbit trackballs for years, I just got this new optical one. I like the hardware. The great thing about the Orbit is that you can use it with either hand. I switch if one hand starts getting sore.My one gripe is that the Kensington software, Mouseworks, broke Macromedia Breeze. But once I uninstalled Mouseworks and just used whatever driver Windows XP decided I needed, Breeze worked again, and I actually liked the cursor movement better than with Mouseworks
The best deal on Amazon!. After using this set, I cannot believe how inexpensive they are.  The microphone provides crystal clear recording and the headphones are great.  I have even used the headphones with my Ipod and the sound is really impressive.  If you are even half-way thinking about buying it, I strongly recommend it
Great Card. I used this card to for my Beyond TV 4.6 program that I am running on my PC.I am running Digital Cable and it is running great with that. If you are thinking about getting one, make the jump and do it
It is definitely worth the upgrade. I bought the Garmin 201 about 2 years ago. What a great watch. I love it. It is so good that it took me a good 6 months to decide to go for the 201. Why did I change? Well I was training for the marathon and I wanted to have as much accuracy as possible in my actual pace as I tend to get excited in the beguinning of my runs so I need to control myself. The 201 bounces around a lot, depending on tree cover and buildings. The 205 does a great job! On the other hand with the 201 I would have to set the watch outside for a minute before I got a GPS fix, with the 205 I set the watch by the window and it gets a fix from inside the house! I just love gadgets and this is one of my favorite ones. By the way, I have had it for 4 months now and no problems
Watching out for the man. Well here goes. This unit is very, very easy to set up just make sure to turn everything on in the menu it helps out a little bit. its so easy to set up a caveman can do it. Anyways it detects every cop that i have come into contact with even when they are hiding, love when they do that. Anyways yes the cord is short but if you strecth it out all the way for a few hours you get a little bit more length. And believe me people this gadget works take it from a man who has delt with the cops alot and they know i have this unit but they cant do nothing about it poor cops oh well enjoy its worth the money and your freedom from the ma
Good value. My car is a piece of junk- but does not Sound like it! For 50$ i got 4 great sounding speakers. Good decisio
No Problems with this Software on an iMac. I recently purchased this labelmaker system for use on my iMac, and have had no problems at all. I printed out my CD labels on an Epson CX5200. The quality of the printouts isn't as clear as I'd like (most likely due to the quality of the paper), but it's not bad for a home system that cost under $20. It's easy, quick, and has lots of cool graphics
works with newer sonyericsson phones. I got this card, received WednesdayI don't have much word on the feedback, just say:it works on newer sonyericsson phonesZ710K550K790even W810 and PSP with included plug adaptor (the video on PSP is smooth, no hiccups at all)just notify that, the card adaptor on the pic is INCORRECT, the included card adaptro is PSP (pro duo) typ
does a great job. It is holding a 23 inch tv on the wall and seems stable and easy to adjust. Emily Stewar
Great except toner. The little machine does all that could reasonably be asked of it.  My only complaint is similar to that of another owner who noted that the toner doesn't seem to last long.Paper Port 9 for scanner software is great.  Its OCR function is as good as any I've worked with, even converting faxes faxed twice with pretty good results.  I read some negative reviews of Paper Port 10 so if you do get a machine and have the option of Paper Port 9 or 10, you might want to stick with the 9
AWESOME-another great H-K product. I am totally satisfied, just make sure you run the EZ set up (auto set-up for the speakers). Make sure you push in mic jack all the way. Before sound is terrible, but afterwards-watch out you will be AMAZED-Its AMAZING, the sound detail is incredible. You will herre things in movies you never noticed before. This is my 2nd H-K receiver and i couldnt go wrong. My first was an AVR20 which is over 10 years old and still thumping strong- just replacing cuz it is only Dolby 2.
Stilus/pen for Lifedrive. So you buy a lifedrive so you can have A LOT of memory to store eeeeverything; Then when you are used to carry it eeeeverywhere, you happen to loose the stilus and recurr to pathetic substitutes like I did, (in my case a pair of wooden matches- they are small enough to fit in the case, do not scratch the surface, are pointy enough, etc).Don't.Trust me. Just buy these when you buy your device.
Cobra LI6000-2 WX VP 2 Way Radio. These 2 way radios are simple to operate, have great range and are small in size!   We used them to communicate from vehicle-to-vehicle during a 1800 mile trip, and on the ski hill.  Pricing, delivery and packaging from Amazon was excellent
Wish it Connected Directly. This SanDisk CF Type I/II ImageMate USB 2.0 Reader/Writer is a neat little device.  I just pull the Compact Flash card out of my camera, stick it in the ImageMate, plug the USB cable in and grab my pictures without having to mess with a camera/computer transfer or worry about draining the camera's battery.  I'm running XP SP2 and didn't need to install a thing.  I just plugged it into the USB port and XP found and recognized it.  The only reason for giving it 4 stars instead of 5 is that I wish it plugged directly into the USB port itself (like the Simple Tech BONZAI USB 2.0 CARD READER -- though that uses SD/MMC cards instead of CF) instead of having to use the separate (included) USB cable
Great little product!. I read a lot and I was always annoying of having to hold the book open to a certain page.  I also hated having to try to type something from a book while having to hold the book open to a certain page.  Well, I finally decide to try this nice little invention, and let me tell you, it's definitely worth it!  It's cheap, but the plastic works fine and does the job well.  It stands up and holds the book to a certain page just as promised.  The stand is adjustable.  It's great, it makes my life so much easier, and I'm sure glad I bought it
Great little printer. I've had this printer for almost a month and just love it.  I've already printed over 130 photos on it and they look great.  The things I like about this printer are:-small & light (I took it to my parents one day and printed out photos we took right there and then for them.)-can print 3 ways: directly from printer with memory card, by attaching the camera to it or hooking up the printer to the computer-great quality prints-allows you to add borders and print wallet size photos-print packs come with paper and ink so you are not running out of one or the otherThis is a great printer for scrapbookers since you can print the photos you need right away.  I use it to print pictures of my son that I send to family and friends.The only negative experience I had with this printer was after I used the intial cartridge that came with it and replaced it with a new one.  The first few pictures I printed came out with lines so I had to clean the print heads.  I ended up having to clean them 3 times in a row before it started printing correctly.  I was a little disappointed since at that time I had only used it for 2 days and printed about 20 photos on it.  I haven't had any issues since and I've printed quite a bit on it and plan to do alot more.  This is a great little printer that prints excellent quality prints.
This is an AWESOME Mic. I purchased 2 of these. One for myself the other for my mom so we could do the Video phone calls with my daughter. The Mic is excellent. There is no software to install, it's just plug and play. You can talk to it at a normal distance from you mouth. It does a decent job of eliminating background noise. Overall, I am very happy. I would highly recommend this mic
Yea its as good as Monster but half the price. Use this to connect your iPOD to your home theater.Its a high quality cable that is reinforced and will last many years unlike the cheapie cable going for $8.The Belkin has 24K gold-plated connectorsThe Purest Sound*	Connects your portable CD or digital audio players to your portable speakers or AV receiver*	Provides maximum conductivity and prevents corrosion with 24k gold-plated connectors and contacts*	Ensures easy identification and proper connection with integrated color-coding on connectors*	Allows consistent signal between components using high-quality copper*	Produces cleaner sound by reducing EM/RF interference using an aluminum undermold shield and a braid-and-foil shield reduces EM/RF interferenc
Philips 23PF5320 23" Flat Panel Widescreen LCD TV. I picked this model up over the weekend for $499, after researching for a good six months. We already own a 34" HD widescreen Panasonic that we use in the living room.  Needed something smaller and less expensive for the bedroom.My review is based on using the set over the weekend. I will update if warrented in a few weeks.The set is a flat panel LCD, very attractive. Setup was fairly easy and intuitive.  I have mine hooked up to an HD Cable box using component cables, and a standard set of audio cables. The manul does not make it clear, but the coax-in is located on a detachable cover on the rear side of the TV.  I do not use the provided remote, as I programmed cablevision's remote to change channels & volume.As for PQ, there are several pre-set modes and one "personal" mode. The "personal" mode lets you choose your desired PQ settings for bightness, color, contrast, and Tint. I find the presets to push way too much red, and way too bright. I used my own settings and will calibrate with my DVE disk down the road.The audio is good, with adjustments available for bass and treble.  HOWEVER, I cannot change the tint as it is grayed out on the screen. I called Phillips this morn, and they told me I have to disconnect the cable box to make the adjustments. Will try that tonight. All in all, I am happy with the set so far. Hope the tint issue can be resolved.
needs longer cord. The unit itself works fine, but it could usea longer cord. The cord only reaches fromthe back seat window to front console.If you have a large SUV, forget about runningit up from the back, it won't reach.Otherwise, the unit is great
Many new features make the CP710 a must. I've used the Canon CP330 for a couple of years now, and it's been great, but the new Selphy CP710 takes picture printing performance to the next level.The 710 uses the same paper and ink cartridge system, but prints faster than the older model. It also adds a memory card reader, and an LCD display for picture selection and minor editing. Finally, it includes a retractable connecting cable that pulls out for connection to a PictBridge compatible Canon camera for direct print capability without fumbling with the memory card.I'm very pleased with this litte printer, and will likely get the rechargeable battery pack that makes it truly portable
Lexar Professional CF cards. I'm a working photographer who has been, after several years use, getting write errors on my Lexar Professional CF cards 1 Gb and 2 Gb. I contacted Lexar about what to do and was told that the professional cards have a lifetime warranty and they are now in the process of replacing my cards, after 40K to 50K exposures on each. Quite happy with them
Excellent!. Excellent! Many people use phones with all kinds of features, such as photo cameras and iPAQ capabilities. Not for me! A camera is a camera and a phone is a phone. I cannot sit with a phone at my ear and look at the screen at the same time.This iPAQ does what it needs to do and I am happy with it
2GB SD card. Took longer than the Camera to arrive but very good so fa
Maybe a little smaller... This tablet is just great. The only problem is that it's a little to big. When i want the cursor to cross the screen i have to move my entire arm (not only my hand). Maybe 6x8 inches would be the best size
Better than iPod earbuds,but... While these earhook/buds are much superior to the one earbuds that came with my iPod, I still am having trouble keeping them on my ears.  The sound is excellent ,they are quite comfortable, and the cost moderate. If you don't have really hard to fit ears these are an excellent product. I think I'm going to have to go for the classic headband -type earphones because nothing else seems to stay in or on my ears
Perfect. The gadget is just perfect. It is very fast and easy to install. I did not epxperience any problem. I can easily get full signals even from downstairs rooms.The delivery was also done without delay. It arrived earlier than I expected it
Good and sleek. nice sounding, looks nice, small footprint.  Speakers detach or mount to the unit.  Remote is great because it is very thin and encased in a plastic guard which is good for kids when droped or thrown!  I bought this for the baby's room. Aux input and a USB for mp3 , ipod, etc.
Good idea, the extra charger bases. Easy set up, beautiful clarity. What's not to like
a decent router, a decent price. Let me first start by saying I'm not all that savvy when it comes to routers.  I found this one easy to follow the operating instructions for...with a few idiosyncracies.  First, my computer didn't work exactly as the instructions said it should.  I had a hard time getting the computer to recognize the router.  I searched for my problem online and found the same issue where someone essentially said "just try again", and I did, and it worked!  Second, whenever I turn the router off or unplug it, I am required to boot up the base computer, plug the modem directly into the computer, open the internet, and then plug the cord back into the router in order for a satelite computer to get a signal.  Very odd but it works every time.  Like I said, I'm not that savvy about this sort of thing so there is probably an easy way to fix it but I don't know what it is.Overall, I'd say it's a decent item.  I live in a 850 sq ft condo and never have an issue getting a signal
I love gumy headphones. When i was looking to buy a new set of headphones for my ipod.. i def was considering these however the reviews were mixed emotions... Well I'm writing a review so i must have bought them :) I have now had these headphones for over a month and i absolutly love them. They fit comfortably in my ears and the sound is so much better than the ones that comes with the ipod. It also matches my pink cover i have for my ipod too :) So if your not looking to spend like 50 or 60 dollars on headphones, Which i dont know why you would spend that much on headphones in the first place, These headphones would be perfect!
Great Printer, Slow Burner. There are two aspects to this printer that really need reviewed separately...Printer vs. Burner.Printer: 4The printer itself prints as well or better than any small photo printer out there.  The print speed is average printing in the highest quality print (Up to 2 min. per photo in Photo quality.)  It does print faster in Normal mode, and still, the picture is good enough quality if just being stored in an album.  The auto-enhance feature works really well.  It doesn't over saturate colors as many computer programs even do.  The enhanced photos print in a warmer / richer tone.  The red eye feature really doesn't fix your problems.  You're better off adjusting camera flash intensity and trying to prevent red eye without relying on the printer to detect and remove it.  It does fair on wide angle group shots but hardly noticeable on close-up shots.  Overall functionality is well designed.  Printer does take a while to boot up...like a computer.  Buy an extra ink kit as the one included goes really quick!Burning: Depending on your camera usage and quality, you can't just burn your 70 photos to the CD.  If using medium resolution photos, do not expect to be able to burn more than 10 - 15 photos at a time.  Copy 10 to the CD, then 10 more, then 10 more...and so on.  Tech support said it writes in only 2X speed and is intended for home use...not designed for burning high quantity / quality photos.  If planning to burn 100 photos...just use the computer.  The index page it prints is a great feature.  You can print the index of a CD and/or card.Great printer for those who don't have a computer and want burning capabilities.  There's nothing like it out there now but I expect that this idea will fill the market rather quickly.  I'm also sure that any drawbacks will be improved in future models.
jeff "electronics junkie". I don't see whatis wrong with the unhit like some people are saying.  It is great and really locks in the dialog.  It is low so it does not block the tv screen.  Maybe it is like the other guy said and you have to balance out your system.  I used the Avia dvd and now all the speakers sound great
Awesome - it's got it all! Great for camping, power outages. I can't believe how much you can get for $39 these days. Thsi thing has a TV, Radio, has recharging circuits (doesn't come with rechargeable batteries) BUT the best, really nifty feature is that unlike other versions, the flashlight POPS OUT of the "face" of the product and you can walk around with it. Very cool for camping..
Serves its' purpose. The bench is sturdy and comfortable.  The rubber slip grip caps on the feet come off easily though
Loving It. This storage rack is the best I've ever had and I have gone through several.  Its not difficult to assemble unlike some of the others I have had.  The dividers are easy to move as your collection gets bigger.  It also fits well into narrow spaces.  And I think the very best thing about it is that it looks great in my living room.  When I have filled it up and need another one, I would definately by this same one again.
Here's what I think and what you should do... Straight forward: you should buy this.Here's the pro's and consPro's:1 It has a nice screen, even though it is B&W, that would never get in the way. The screen is nice and large, perfect for the ebook-type person. With 3 different font sizes, you can see it in your way.2 It has a lot of features. It has a book reader (Mobipocket Reader, a nice program), MP3 player, Date Book, To-Do, Calculater, Audio Book Player, and Address Book. Plus, you can download programs from places such as Windows Market Place or C Net downloads.com3 It has handwriting recignition (or a touch screen keyboard). I always found this handy and while it's not always right, the people at Franklin really got this down.4 The whole thing is touch screen. This means you can play games on it and not be restricted to only a certian area. I had this problem with my last PDA. This also means you can download games.5 MMC cababilty. You can have gigabytes plus the 8mb on the RAM. The ebookman also allows you to back up data, a handy feature for battery drainage.6 The software is easy to use. The simple drag and drop-download system is a breeze. While some people say that downloading the OS (operating system) from the site is a pain, they didn't mention that the CD already comes with the OS.7 Convienient side scroll wheel with push in ability. You can use this instead of the scroll bars, and you can push the wheel in to enter. It's cool!Con's:1 The batteries go fast! I advise to have a spare set, and back up the data on an MMC. Don't use the backlight, that is what burns it up. The handy thing is that it has a battery indicator, so you know when it is time to change up.2 Limited file types. The ebookman allows mostly its own versions of files, such as audio books and ebooks. However, it does accept .txt (Notepad) and .MP3 (music), plus a bunch more.3 While it has a speaker, if you plan to lisen to something you should bring some headphones. The speaker is nice, yet quiet.4 The date book's alarm is very quick. What is cool about the alarms is that there is over 20 alarms that you can choose. However, the alarm only does one cycle, and then it stops. It uses an internal speaker, so you can barely here it while it is in a pocket.Otherwise, the ebookman is pretty good. While I got this from my aunt and didn't pay a penny, I think that if this is your first PDA, it's a good choice to get it for your money. And if it is true that this is your first time, you also want to get a case, screen protectors, and MMC cards (for more memory). This won't total up to more than $20.Many say the batteries are drained quickly. This is true (in about 2 weeks for frequent users), however if you do not use the backlight much you will be ok. The backlight for the 7 inch screen is the burner of all batteries. Watch the convienient battery power indicator, and you should be ok. That's what I think; the desision is up to you
Great on Mac, have not tried on Windows yet. I tried the Maxtor Mini III because we like our bigger desktop external drive (Maxtor one touch) which works great...but the mini did not do so well...all kinds of problems...so I researched and found this LaCie Rugged to be just what I needed and it is great! Nice design...I like the rubber on the edges of it...grips a table better rather than being slippery metal and sliding off. Fast on the Firewire 800, have not tried the 400 or USB for this yet. I plugged the LaCie into MacBook Pro and it was right there on desktop ready for files to be dragged to it. No install of software, just ready! The 800 firewire cable to it is on the short side so I did accidently drop it already when I went to move my laptop a little bit. The fall was not far and it was on a rug but handled it well. No probs.Quiet but it does vibrate...if you set it on a tv tray and put your hand on the surface of the tv tray , you can feel quite a vibration...but it must be a good thing...the drive is rotating/spinning well :
Does the job well. This remote is versatile and easy to program. I'm using it to control my Panasonic 42-inch plasma TV, Memorex DVD player (which came with a tiny remote that had hard-to read labels), a JVC receiver and a Motorola digital cable box. The learning feature works great. I programmed the keys I use most so that I don't have to switch from one device to another. Why spend over a $100 for a programmable remote when this does the job for $25
very practical bag. It fits my 15.4in widescreen laptop really well.  There are a ton of pockets for whatever you're carrying.  I haven't really used it yet but it seems pretty practical.  It has a lot of padding. I am just wondering about getting the notebook in and out when I have other things in there.Overall it's a pretty good bag
HDMI Difference. With my new LCD television, the hook-up was a snap and what a difference with the new HDMI compatible up-scale DVD I installed.  The audio and visual difference for DVD and HD television programing is amazing with the cost at half the price at retail stores.  Very happy and highly recommended
Lightweight and compact. Very good speakers. Except.I use them with PowerPoint with small groups. The volume is OK but I bought a second unit and found the computer would only run one speaker at a time.Dan Poynter, Author, Publisher, Speaker.Author of The Self-Publishing Manual.DanPoynter@ParaPublishing.com
50 Pack Slim Jewel Cases. An exceptional value.  I have not been able to find any better cases for lower price anywhere else.  I used to purchase 100 pak slim jewel cases from BJ's that are of equal quality but, even with a BJ's membership, they were $2 more per 50 cases... plus I had to drive to the store and back.  Amazon delivers them directly to my home with NO shipping charge (as I order more than $25 at a time) Thank you, Amazon
GPSMAP 76 great value. With the rest of the GPS devices shifting to color, the large b&w screen on this unit means money well spent. It's fast enough for practically any use. I've been using it in South East La. post-Katrina, Where those piney back woods were often blocked by debris. In New Orleans I used it to avoid blocked roads and to mark entry points into closed areas. I live hear, and the suroundings were so disturbed and displaced that even my own home-town was very disorienting. The backtrack  and routemaking features are  lifesavers. The screen is easy to read. The low draining B&W screen also allows longer battery life compared with other color units I've used. Looking for a dashboard mount and auto power adapter right now. A photojournalist, I keep it in my camera bag
Solid Buy. I've have this tv for about a week and I love it.  The image quality is great and the setup wasn't as bad as I thought it would be.  I've read comments elsewhere stating that the setup is tricky however if you have cable all you have to do is split the signal and attach the split signal to the digital and analog coax inputs then let the set walk you through the setup and you're done.  The QAM tuner this set comes with means you don't have to pay your cable provider for HD channels as long as they're unencripted.  You also don't have to buy an antenna.  I live in Fort Lauderdale and subscribe to Comcast.  I don't even have digital cable but the set is able to pick up all the major networks, ESPN 1 and 2, and Discovery HD.  It's a beautiful things.P.S. I recommoned using the favorites feature for your HD channels as the setup seems to include every digital channel even if nothing is being broadcast on it
TiVo3. Easy to use, convenient and a must buy for TV fanatics who don't have the time to watch every program when aired. It is nice that you can record 2 programs and watch a 3rd!! I hate their recording "recommended programs" that don't interest me and I don't know how to stop it from recording
works like a charm. This is my 2nd adapter for use with my Suunto X6HR watch.  My first -- the CP-03 or whatever its called -- worked unreliably at best and then eventually died.  This one works like a charm, every time.  It doesn't matter which USB port I plug it into
Great picture, average sound. I have owned this TV for over six weeks. The picture was great right out of the box. I simply attached the stand, made the connections, and turned it on. I suggest leaving the OPC off, or the picture gets quite dark as it tries to adjust for ambient light.The sound quality of the speakers is marginal. This was not an issue for me, as I connect directly to my receiver.I find myself watching almost anything on HD, even things I never seemed to care about before. The HD picture is amazing and lifelike.Some additional HDMI and component connections would be helpful, especially connecting a cable box, DVD player, video games, etc.All in all, a great TV
Good product. I have two of these to store my DVDs and am quite satisfied with them. The compartments hold the discs firmly in place, so they do not slip out. The removable sleeves make organizing easier and I have not had any problems with the metal binders becoming loose and bending, even with the one that I have already filled to capacity. My only complaint is that the handles are not very sturdy, as one of them snapped after only a few weeks of using it. Overall, though, it's a handy storage device, and I'll likely be buying another one
assessment of lifecam vx-1000. I was extremely satisfied with this camera;it was good value for money and performed well in use.The only point I felt it lacked,was a hook bracket to fit it to the top edge of my monitor screen.However as I had a shelf conveniently situated above my monitor,this didn't matter.The promptness of the delivery was also a large plus in its favour.All in all I felt it was a very good buy and would recommend the product and the supplier to anyone thinking of purchasing such an item.
A great buy!. I purchased this product 2 years back and it is still working without any problem. I use the batteries mostly for my digital camera and have no complaints so far. Highly recommend this product
Great Shower Radio. The only reason this doesn't get a 5 is because it isn't very loud.  I honestly didn't expect it to be, especially with a single speaker.Everything else works as advertised.  I can get TV/AM/FM/Weather stations well.  The old Curtis shower radio I had was very spotty.  Digital tuning is awesome.  The old one was analog and a real pain to lock on to stations that had a great signal.  The presets work wonderfully, and the timer feature was an added bonus.Only time will tell if it lasts though.  The Curtis died after a year and a half.  If the Sony lasts that long I will be more than happy
great wall mount. took some time to get everything on the wall but price was right and so was the produc
Excelente Producto. justo lo que necesitaba y a un buen precio, todo lo esencial para llevar tu lapto
Extremely happy!!!. This product was a corporate gift and the recepient loves the gift. I selected this product based on the recommendation of from other reviews. The product is easy to use, holds nearly 200 songs and great for exercising or use in the car.
epson workhorse. I originally purchased this printer for our phone server at work. I was hoping a newer design would install without making me reboot the system (it didn't) . The picture quality is typical Epson ,and I'm very happy with it.I just print an occasional color graph or chart ,and it rocks. It's quiet ,it's small ,and it takes readily available ink. The cartridges are the newer sepperate component type cartridge . It doesn't like cheap copy paper ,and will jam eventually. It was easy to unjam and clear however ,i was able to slip my ape like hands down into the printer ,without having to curse ,scream or apply a band-aid.
Easy to use product....exactly what I was looking for!!. If you are tired of downloading multiple shareware programs and other buggy software to make your PSP perform as God intended, this is the product for you.Works great right out of the box.  I was up and running in 15 minutes.  Easy, clear instructions and reliable hardware make this a real winner, imho.Nothing is quite as cool as unlocking the true potential of my PSP.  Now that I can watch the tv and movies I want to watch, instead of the couple of dozen psp titles on release, I can never go back
Works great with Pioneer 710. This is my first Double Layer DVDR purchase.I used with my Emprex burner(says support dl, even Nero infotool says it support), it did not work.  I then bought Pioneer 710 from Fry's for like $45, and burned a disc with no problem.Now if you want to make a backup of your DVD, all you have to do is read iso in dvd decryptor, then write iso out to this dl dvd+R.  no more ifoedit, disk split and all that.The burned disk plays on both Sony and Panasonic s52 player(which was also bought here at amazon), but not on my Apex(I didn't expect it either, it's among the earliest dvd players)
Fantastic. I received the Tivoli Model CD Player as a Christmas gift to add to my Tivoli Satellite (Sirius) radio.  I also own the extra Tivoli speaker which makes the system truly stereo.  The CD player attached easily and was working in a matter of minutes.  Overall, the controls are simple and easy to use.  I especially like using the remote control since it's convenient and easy to read.  The sound from this system is amazing.  The clarity, depth and richness of sound from this little system is worth every penny.  And, it's beautiful to look at.  I have the system in my office and often receive compliments on its appearance.  If you're looking for a compact, attractive, easy to assemble and use system, the Tivoli is perfect for you.
The Best Case I've Found!. After much exploration, I landed on this case model and could not be more pleased.***Please note that the initial images that Amazon has posted are not actually this case - I've posted additional customer images from CaseLogic to show this model, which actually is much nicer.***With this model, you get a nice solid case which will reportedly hold up to a 10" display portable.  I am using mine with the Philips PET824 8.5", and it has a bit of room to spare.  Internal velcro straps secure the player and attached battery pack well.  The finish is a synthetic leatherette, decent for the price, with sufficient cushioning to protect from minor bumps and such.  One very nice feature is the adapter to split the audio to two headphone jacks so two viewers can use the player in private.  Great for the kids when the adults want a bit of silence, whew!There are two generous side accessory pockets for power cords, A/V cable, headphones, remote, etc; while the back pocket will handle six DVDs without cases in integrated sleeves, and an additional two DVDs in cases.  Sufficient for a bit of choice along your journey.The straps for securing the case inside a vehicle (either to one seat, or suspended between two) are sufficient.  It will never be as easy as having a built-in unit, but this sure makes it nice to be able to have a player in that car you bought before you were thinking "family", or in a vacation rental, etc.Overall, this was a great bang for the buck purchase, and kudos to CaseLogic for another quality product
A great laser mouse. I have found this 'laser mouse' made by Iogear to be an excellent product, easy to use and a great price
This is my 3rd ipod. I had a 1st generation shuffle and upgraded to a 60gb video which I adore! However, I found that whenever I went running I was stealing my old shuffle back from my daughter.  I bought this shuffle for my husband and fell in instant love with it.  I really like how portable it is and you can't beat being able to just clip it onto your clothing.  No arm straps, no more lanyards.  So now I have the 60 gig for my entire library of music and videos and the shuffle for exercise
Good Inexpensive Monitors. I've had these for a couple months now and I can't really complain.  The volume is slightly limited but the range is nice and I feel like they do give you an accurate feel for the sound mix.  Seeing as they are some of the most inexpensive monitors available I expected less and was impressed.It seems like most of the reviewers here are using them as speakers, which I personally think is a waste.  If you are just looking to find good speakers to watch movies and listen to music on your computer you'd probably be much better off looking for a good set of computer speakers, which will cost the same if not less.  I mean at that point your definately not going to be taking advantage of the 1/4 inch inputs and that's one of the reason that these cost more than computer speakers.
Cascio Gsdx Deluxe keyboard stand. I think the product works great. It is very sturdy. I did have a problem putting it together. The directions were hard to follow.  I had to take it a part a couple of times and put it back together by looking at the picture on the box. Once assembled it is easy to adjust the height. Just make sure you have some patience before opening the box
Excellent scanner. I bought this item, since I always make a lot of notes from books and other papers, and don't want to type it in manually anymore. This scanner, probably like any other model, needs a little training to get it right over the paper, but once done, it really works and faster than typing!I dont use the addressbook or options with your GSM but they are no doubt very handy.I just scan in from papers, and beam it to my laptop. Both Infrared and the cable work. The cable is especially great for using the scanner 'live'on the screen: the scanned text appears on the pc as you type!The dictionary also comes in very handy.It must be a very complex product, but just like the Ipod or ZenXtra mp3 players: they work!So buy one and save some time! Excellent and recommended for anyone that needs to make notes, or studies, or just wants to stop cutting out pages in newspapers in a train e.g
What is and ain't in the box - surprise, y'all!. Needed this to find some survey markers on some land I just bought.  It came 21Mar2007, I unpacked it, and surprise, NO AC CHARGER IN THE BOX, only a piece of paper to mail in for a "free" AC charger.  This despite Amazon saying there's an AC charger in the box and the box itself saying there's an "AC Cable" inside (as well as a "USB Cable").What IS in the box is:1 Explorist 4001 oddball "USB to Magellan GPS non-standard connector" with a doodad half way up to plug in power supply from a real AC adaptor.1 Lithium Ion Battery1 battery carrier doodad which accept 3 AAA batteries and fits where the Lithium Ion battery would go IF you could ever charge that sucker up.2 manuals and a "Read Me First" sheet all of which assume you have a proper AC adaptor and make no mention of the doodad which accepts the 3 AAA cells.2 CD's, one with software and one with maps you can't use unless you buy an "unlock" from Magellans website.A piece of paper to mail in for a "free" AC adaptor that connects to the oddball USB cable half way up.Also, on the box (underneath a peel-off sticker) and not properly in it, is a coupon code and instructions for getting 3D Topo maps of the continental USA at a big discount(apparently Magellan doesn't think Alaska is US territory).Got on the phone with Magellan, berated the customer service rep, and was promised a "free" charger via UPS in a week or so (not good enough for me because I needed it NOW to do what I need in enchanted New Mexico before leaving next week).I put 3 AAA's in the battery carrier doodad, installed that instead of the Lithium Ion battery, hit the on switch and the thing lit up.Next step, connect the USB cable plug one standard end into laptop and clamp the oddball 6-contact connector on the other end to the GPS unit.  This connector is NOT foolproof and CAN be clamped on 180 degrees out of proper alignment.  Found that out when the laptop wouldn't find the GPS unit.  The cable goes backwards from the direction a mouse cable goes, back under the unit instead of out away from your hand, even though there's a catch on the connector which might (but does not) engage a recess on the GPS unit when you connect the cable like a mouse would like it's cable connected.  Admittedly the manual DOES show how the cable should properly (but not obviously) be connected backwards from how a mouse cable would be.Finally got the thing to communicate with the laptop.  File transfer works fine, with the usual "your GPS unit (or camera or cell phone or whatever) appears as an external disk drive" behavior.Bought the unlock for the 3D topo map at the discount price from Magellan over the web for the discounted $9.95, subsequently discovered the map software expects a COM serial connection and doesn't recognize the Explorist's perfectly good presence at the end of the USB wire.  Put that problem away for later.Whomped up some coordinates for survey stakes from county maps, USGS maps, USGS aerial photos, Google Earth sat-photos, etc, etc, starting from township corner on the USGS map and matching trees on the USGS aerial and the Google sat-photos to locate the corner in Google Earth.  Measured from the township corner to locate a slew of lot corners in Google Earth.Went to transfer the coordinates to Magellan GPS data files and found that the Magellan files use a quirky coordinate encoding.  Here's a sample file:------------$PMGNWPL,3551.817,N,10638.598,W,0002411,M,JOE'S GRAVE,,a*17$PMGNWPL,3551.827,N,10638.629,W,0002398,M,DAVE'S CHAIR,,a*5B$PMGNCMD,END*3D------------Turns out the algorithm is 100 times the degrees plus the minutes expressed as a decimal number, so "3551.817" means "35 degrees 51.817 minutes".  I put together a spreadsheet to convert degrees-as-decimal-numbers to the Magellan format and after some cut-and-paste fork and file switching I had a nice rectangular array of property corner location-estimate POI's showing on the Explorist 400 screen.Drove ~100 miles to the property area (Buckman, NM) and zeroed in on the township corner  with the GPS unit within 10 feet LIKE A CHAMP!!!  Found another survey marker, then the AAA batteries (depleted by hours of experimentation and learning exercises) went south and the display locked up and the buttons stopped working.  Put in fresh batteries, pushed the on button, NOTHING!  Howled at desert sky and cursed Magellan roundly.  Enlisted the help of Paul the friendly hippy hermit, the ONLY resident of Buckman, NM, and with his  magnetic compass and knowledge of the land, pacing off distances, we found some more BLM survey markers.  As daylight waned Paul went one way and I went another midst the cactus and the pinon trees.  Sat down, checked the batteries in the GPS unit, reversed them (the battery carrier is NOT marked with polarity indications) and IT CAME BACK TO LIFE with no data loss!!!Paul hollered he had found a marker 2 lots away from my lot.  I marked it's coordinates with the GPS unit, set the cursor to the estimated true location of the NW corner of Lot 180 of Section 31 of T19NR18E township, and the GPS unit took us to the old (1961) BLM marker (hiding under a Pinon tree with no flagging or lathe to keep it company, just south of where I estimated the night before) within 10 feet!  BINGO!!!I am currently trying to figure out whether the Lithium Ion Battery can be charged using the power provided by the laptop through the USB cable.  The unit's batery charged indicator says the thing is connected to external power when the USB cable is hooked up.  So far the results are inconclusive, I'll check again in the morning. (Checked in the morning - the thing CAN be charged off PC power via the USB cable!  See my comment to this review.)In summary, what is in the box is not what you may expect, you may get a unit with no charger, lots of stuff is NOT covered in the manuals, the battery indicator ALWAYS says 100% when running on AAA cells and polarity is not marked on the AAA carrier, the built in base map shows only major roads (freeways, etc), and the map software Magellan sells/unlocks is not obviously compatible with USB devices (although there may be a way to solve this, just not an OBVIOUS one).OK, given all of that, when you get the hang of it, this thing works very, VERY well.  As long as the battery lasts, anyway
Great but Needs Battery Charger. Acoustically and ergonomically, the MDR-IF3000 is all that Sony claims it is. Unfortunately, it can be recharged only on the base station: no separate battery charger is available for it. With prolonged use and/or many headphones, juggling multiple headphones on one charger is sure to fail. If you need multiple headphones, perhaps a product line that provides extra battery chargers as well as extra headphones would be preferable
Beautiful. HD looks gorgeous. I pick up 3 or 4 channels in the cambridge area. No problems with regular cable TV input either. Works very well with windows media cente
Got it to work with Vista. With help from Sherrie at Linksys online chat customer service we got this to work with Windows Vista.  It was the the same work around that I used to get it to work with XP.  Its a bit messy.  Utility does not work well but printing is fine
Super Fast. Excellent product!  Holds thousands of pictures and I can shoot all day without changing the card.  If I needed another one I wouldn't look any further than the Transcend 120X
Very Satisfied  and HD Cable / HD 'Over the air "solution. After thoroughly researching, I walked into Circuit City expecting to buy a Sony 26" model KDL-26S2010. However, after comparing the 26" KDL-26S2010 to the 32" KDL-32S2010, the 32" model was a better value. Another consideration is a feature called WCG-CCFL as described in the spec section. After a side by side comparison between the 32" KDL-32S2010 (no WCG-CCFL) and the 32" KDLV32XBR2 (has WCG-CCFL), the WCG-CCFL produced a  noticeably superior picture, mainly due to the higher contrast ratio and deeper blacks. I didn't mind paying the slightly higher price for an improved picture. Also, the salesman suggested I compare the Sony to a comparable Samsung that was several hundred dollars less expensive. The Samsung picture did appear slightly better to me, but the sound was a little thin compared to the Sony and I also liked the Sony aesthetics much better.One other point that others might find helpful... I get cable service but they only offer 2 of the 4 major networks in HD. So, I purchased a Philips HD Antenna(Model PHDTV3) for apx $50 and an AB switch to alternate between cable and air sources. After autoprogramming the two sources separately, I now receive 17 HD stations over the air... FREE. Switching between cable and air is a 3 step process that involves selecting input as A or B on the AB switch, selecting between cable or air from menu settings and then selecting between digital/analog from the remote control. This sounds a little confusing, but it was actually easy. Worth the effort as I can now view HD programming from all 4 networks, 2 from cable and 2 over the air (not to mention the other 15 "air" HD channels). Finally, I strongly suggest hooking up to a surround sound system so your ears are just as entertained as your eyes.
Best investment for traveling!. We always tried to use our laptop's dvd player to watch movies on long road trips, but it was a huge pain to change a movie, start a movie, or make sure all 3 kids had a good view.This dual dvd player is the one!!! Very lightweight so if you don't have the moveable headrest to velcro it to (our suv has the one piece driver/passenger seat) you can be creative so it will attach and it doesn't fall down.  The one piece cord to link both screens together is long enough to put one screen behind the driver/passenger seat and the other screen behind the middle row's seat--and you can tuck the cord in between the seats so its not in the way.  The volume is okay--they could hear it comfortably when it was all the way up but you can also listen to it through your car stereo and the problem is solved (if you need it louder)  One simple button to change a movie, PLUS it has a parental control feature to edit foul language in movies+++++++, comes with a car adapter and an a/c adapter to plug in anywhere.  Haven't tried the built in games.The price was unbeatable, all 3 kids (toddlers) are happy, traveling is great again.
The best (Targus) with the best (Dell). After having used a Targus Notebook Case for two years, with excellent results,with a NEC laptop, I decided that the next Leather Case would be a Targus. The CLN5 is outstanding and it goes very well with my Dell Inspiron 5100 which I just acquired. After spending around $2,000.00 plus for the Dell 5100, I could not buy just any case. It had to be the best(Targus) in order to go with the best(Dell 5100). Needless to say, when I saw the Amazon.com price of [price] I knew this was what I was looking for. No if's and but's about it. I just bought it knowing that Amazon sells only the best. Highly recommend it to anyone,specially if you have an expensive Dell Notebook. Through Amazon.com of course
One of the best cordless phones on the market. Having lived in Europe I soon realized in the US that the majority of cordless phones sold here are of poor quality. The Siemens S455 is a pleasant surprise, which may be due to the fact that this phone is designed and manufactured in Germany.Briefly, I have only had this phone for 3 days - but this is my experience so far:- Voice quality both by handset and speakerphone is outstanding- DECT is the new emerging phone standard in the US works very well and provides excellent range without any Wifi interference. It is nice to see this standard  now in the US and I suspect that it will take over the prime spot from 2.4 and 5.8Ghz phones. It is also secure- The colour screen is beautiful with a good resolution (128*128), bright, and easily legible- The user interface is good; it resembles that of a cell phone; once you get used to it is excellent. All functions are done via the headset.- The design is sleek with a platinum-metallic finish (it is plastic though under it); the headset is light, and ergonimically lies in your hand- Standard NiMH rechargable batteries are used, which makes it easy to replace.-Furthermore one can add 5 headsets (total of 6 phones), but in order cover a larger range there can be up to 4 base stations to connect additional headsets, which should satisfy even a warehouse with coverage.Things I don't know yet:- I have not yet used the answering machine, so no comment.- In other parts of the world Siemens sells USB M34 adapter for the computer, which acts as a additional base station and provides access to VOIP services like Skype in addition to the landline. This is not (yet?) available in the US, and I don't know how well it works. This could though be a nice addition especially for oversea calls.Overall I give this phone 5 stars, because I have not seen any other phone of such quality in the US. It's sleek, good coverage and sound quality, and is well built. Certainly worth the extra $20-30 in comparison to other brands.Lastly I would prefer this phone over the more expensive E45 series. It's the same phone but the S45 series is nicer, costs slightly less, and uses standard batteries (E45 uses Siemens proprietary - $$ if need to replace). Only if you need the extra rubberized and sturdy built I would consider the E45
Great. Does All and more.  If you dont have a burner on your pc buy thi
Very good MP3 player, missing only little things. Very good MP3 player, can do everything you need, good for sport, joging. The only thing I miss a little bit is RDS feature. Also if you upload songs on it, you can download it back to PC (e.g. to friends PC), so can't be used as a USB key (well, i guess it's not the main feature, but would be nice)
It Works. I have an older IBM computer running XP. I plugged the card in to an available IDE slot, restarted the computer twice (for some reason it took two reboots for the card to come fully to life) and it works. No sweat.
Not a Home Theater projector, but can be used as such. First, for home theater use, I would give this projector 4 stars. I gave it 5 as this is a business projector, and should not be penalized for not having home theater features.I am very happy with this item. Out of the box, the colors were a mess. This, again, may be because it is not calibrated as a home theater projector. I highly suggest using the Avia video calibration DVD (with color filters to look through). It took me 5 minutes, and the colors are more natural than any of my CRT tvs!In high power mode, I can watch TV shows during the day with my blinds closed. Movies are a bit hard to watch. Once the sun is no longer on that size of my house, it works great. At night, I can watch a movie in low power mode (and the fan is very quiet), but I prefer the regular mode as colors look more vibrant with that extra boost. I sit with my head about 6 inches from the projector, so I can hear the fan, but it isn't noticable with sound system speakers at a decent volume.As stated in a prior review, the image is 4:3. If you don't have a 4:3 screen, 4:3 images wont fit. Not the projector's fault.My biggest concern is the connections, which again is due to this not actually being a home theater projector. For the best image, you need to use a component connection. As stated in a prior review, an adapter must be purchases seperatly to connect component through the VGA port. This was not specified on the spec sheet where I bought this item, and the box itself has NO info about the specs.One other thing to note...I have read that the color wheels on business projectors are different than on home theater projectors. I am not familiar enough with this to comment, but this is something prospective buyers may want to look into.Overall, I am very happy with this item. 5/5 as an overall product, 4/5 as a home theater projector
Great Television!!. This TV is everything we wanted it to be.  Very happy with it
An excellent low cost high-speed laser printer. After a couple of weeks of use, this printer exceeds my expectations.  It is a truly an excellent low cost high-speed laser printer. The quality of printing is superb.  My only negative is the high wattage of electricity that it draws when it awakes from the sleep mode.  Each time it awakes,it causes my battery backup to beep.
Plextor PX-760A. This is my second Plextor & I think they are top of the line
1 GB card. I'm afraid I don't know a lot about this technology.  I went for economy and I am getting very good quality photos.  I think I would have liked more speed in taking successive shots and I really don't know if a different flash card would have made a difference or if the camera is slow.  Its still faster than my old one so I'm generally happy.  Hope this is some hel
Works Flawlessly. This item works flawlessly in the Motorola L7 unlike those from other companies.  I highly recommend this item
Great for In-Car Navigation. I bought this for in-car navigation and couldn't be happier. It's literally the size of a flash drive and holds a charge for eight hours, which means that I can velcro it to my dashboard when I need to use it and not have any wires hanging in front of me when I'm driving.The USB-power source is convenient as well, because it can be charged from any USB port--a huge plus for me when I'm traveling.As far as technological performance, I can't offer any complaints. It finds satellites almost instantly and holds them very well.Easiest five stars I could give
Question. First of all, let me say that I LOVE this stereo.  Have had it for a year or two.  I don't think you can do any better with this price range, and more. I highly recommend it.I have a question - does anyone know whether this stereo plays dvd's of all regions?  I tried to write JVC an email but didn't get any response.Hopefully somebody has the answer!Thanks
Good quality, but you can run out very quickly. When you get these cartridges right out of the box they work great, but after you start to print out a lot of pictures you really notice the quality deteriorate. It really seems to run out of one color much quicker  than the others. Personally its usually red. It has caught me with my pants  down a couple times, going to print out a project the night before its due,  only to run out of red or blue ink. I would definetly suggest to always  have an extra one around just in case
it's no Sandisk, but for the money.. Sandisk has a benchmark test that relates NNNx to time. It is 150KB/sec = 1x. It follows that 120x is equal to 18MB/sec. I see no real advantage to spending twice the price for a small improvement in speed, especially when I'm not taking photos like a model photog. "That's it, Baby. Pout for me; work with me. Make the camera believe." Click...Click...Click. I mean really, how many of us are going to take bursts of photos? Even the few times I've used burst, I haven't saturated the buffer.I've seen no degredation in performance, color, recyle, or download time over other more expensive CF cards. There are probably other cards that can out perform this one, but with what advantage
most comfortable fit, better isolation. I don't know why Shure doesn't provide at least 1 pair of the EA306 triple-flange sleeves with their products. In short, they provide the most comfortable fit and best sound isolation. We own a pair of E3C's and E5C's. I would recommend them more for the E5C's than the E3Cs and I'll tell you why. The E5C is much larger in your ear and the stem that comes out from them is proportionatly shorter than the stem comming out of the E3Cs. I liked the foam inserts for the E3C. With the E5C, the triple flange provides a more comfortable fit and a better seal in the ear which means better sound! I had to really take a chance when I bought these - being that I paid over $500 for the E5Cs, I was reluctant to spend the $10 for the sleeves but am glad that I did. They do what they are designed to do. I was very pleased with the isolation and greater sound. Before, I used the foam sleeves with the E5Cs and found myself trying to push them further in my ears to hear the sound better! These give the E5cs a better, more stable fit in the ear which is also more comfortable. I was a bit disappointed with the E5C ear buds until I purchased these sleeves. I highly recommend them and wish Shure would consider adding a pair of these to the 12 ear pieces that come with the E5Cs
LOVE IT!. WOW!.....yea that pretty much sums it up! Picture quality is AMAZING in HD. SD is also very nice as well.  At the price that this tv is at right, if your looking for a phenomenal tv then buy this one NOW!  Thumbs up to Eagle too for having the TV here 3 days after ordering it! Ordered on Sunday and it was here on Wednesday!  Great job to everyone involved
Works as promised. I ordered this product to improve on the static that was always driving me nuts with my Roady II. I was constantly changing the tune to station to avoid the cross talk.  It works great and is nearly perfect. Just a slight bit of background noise during quiet passages. I am ordering another one for my dad's Sky Fi IITom
Professional order process and quick delivery. I am very pleased with my order and highly recommend doing biz with this company
Great  Little Product for the iPod. Just purchased this inexpensive little unit and am amazed at the sound quality for such small speakers. It does just what it's intended to do - produce a very reasonable quality of sound from a portable unit. I had no trouble at all with the remote - it turns the unit on and off and controlled the volume and the iPod from a good 10 feet away. My only real complaint is that the instructions are woeful! Altec Lansing could do well to improve their in-box instructions which are far below the quality of the unit itself. I was almost ready to return my unit initially when I discovered - only by accessing Altec Lansing's web page for the iM3 - that I had to remove the not-too-obvious plastic dock adaptor that was already in place to put in my iPod 4G 60GB photo. Otherwise it is an excellent buy in my opinion and would be extremely hard to beat for the price
As described. This is such a great solution for me.  I was looking for one of those tablet PC's, but they're just so cost prohibitive right now.  So for 5% of the cost, this does what I need to do.  It's really easy to use and carry around.  The carrying case is bulky for me, so I just throw it in with my tote bag.  The only thing that would make this even better is if they either made the pen thinner so it's easier to write with or make it compatible with a regular pen
The BEST wheel I have EVER used!. Over the past 25 years of gaming, I have used many different steering wheels for lots of different systems. I always buy a new wheel when it comes out, and most of the time it is only used a few times. But, when I bought THIS wheel, it was different. THIS WHEEL IS GREAT! It doesn't emulate the controller like some wheels do. The GAMES are MADE to work with this controller! I've tried most of the supported games, and they are great! Except Super Mario Kart DD is easier with the standard controller, but it is still MORE FUN with the wheel. I would also get the Gas & brake pedal kit. It adds an unbelievable amount of fun to the game! You will have a great time with this product!These are some of the games that are made for this wheel.4x4 Evolution(tm) 2 by Universal Interactive, Inc.NASCAR Thunder(tm) 2003 by Electronic ArtsNeed For Speed(tm): Hot Pursuit 2 by Electronic ArtsHot Wheels(tm): Velocity X by THQPRO RALLY 2002 by Ubi Soft EntertainmentBurnout 2: Point of Impact (tm) by AcclaimDakar 2: The World's Ultimate Rally By AcclaimF-Zero GX by NintendoMario Kart Double Dash(tm) by NintendoNASCAR HEAT 2: Dirt to Daytona by AtariNASCAR Thunder(tm) by Electronic ArtsNeed For Speed(tm) Underground by Electronic ArtsNeed For Speed(tm) Underground 2 by Electronic ArtsR: Racing Evolution by NamcoRally Championship by SCi Games Ltd.Street Racing Syndicate by NamcoThe Simpsons(tm) Hit & Run by Vivendi UniversalV-Rally(tm) 3 by Atari
Memory card purchase. This memory card has not given us any trouble.  Very reliable product.  Highly recommend
zenner. I researched various MP3 players and chose Zen for recording capability, FM radio, replacable battery and format compatability. I came across complaints from people about the headphone thing, but I have not had that issue. As for battery life...I played it throught my home stereo, it lasted about 8 hours before I turned it off, it may have lasted another hour or so looking at the battery hourglass monitor. As for the battery lasting 2 hours...I think the volume people play their MP3 players affects how must the battery is eaten up, but 2 hours is odd. I think like any product,some will have success, others will have misery. It's a crap shoot.PS: I had issues with Rhapsody too. Now  I use Yahoo with no problems
Great radio, Fantastic price!. This review is for the silver model @ $35.00. I could not belive the price & had to get one & see what was up. I think mine is a floor demo as the tape sealing the box had been broken.The radio is in perfect condition, all functions work fine, all origonal packaging. I recommend this buy for as long as it will last, it is a great price. I enjoy this radio more than my other portables as the sound is much better & I like twisting knobs.
Unparalleled quality. A review of literature available on the internet convinces me that the fabrication of MAM-A disks is not exceeded anywhere else.  The Phthalocyanin dye is the highest performance dye available.  The gold refelective layer is as good as it gets, and the Diamond Coat Finish provides resistance to scratches.  So, how well do they work?  I have a pretty standard computer with DVD burner.  The disks have been flawless.  I haven't lost a single disk and they play on everything I've got.  This is an outstanding product.  Just use some common sense in where you store them.  It's a small price to pay for knowing that your critical data/pictures/music will be there many many years into the future
Excellent Documentation, easy install. I am not a career computer builder but I have built several of my own machines over the years.  The manual with this motherboard, by far, had the most clear documentation and install process of any I've seen.The board was shipped with accessories including SATA cables, standard ATA133 IDE cables and more.Bios has lots of customization/tweak options for geeks (I am sometimes one) but works easily with a default install and letting settings auto set and auto detect.The board layout seemes to not have any "gotchas" like this cable blocks access to that slot/plug, etc.This purchase was to replace a malfunctioning motherboard. I used the same hard drives(Maxtor SATA160GB's), memory (corsair)and processor-- AMD 64 X2 3800 (not sure about the 3800). Using the serial ata raid stripe, I saw major performance improvements by just going to this motherboard and the sata raid stripe.  I didn't realize that setting up raid for windows xp requires you have a "floppy disk" to give it the specific driver unless you slipstream it onto the xp install. I had to buy a floppy drive just for this, and made the driver disk from the included driver cd.Overall, a great product with desirable features, and great documentation.
Great product for mobile sound... Considering its small size, this unit puts out some pretty good sound included a good level of bass.  Although its not meant to lead an outdoor party, it is great for a small gathering, out at the beach, or in the backyard while you work in the garden.  I love that it can easily store my iPod as well, making it a nice single unit to carry around (assuming its been charged!). After charging, I've never had it die on me and I've been outside for a few hours with music playing the whole time.  The rugged case is also great.  It feels very sturdy and the case wont likely ever become scratched or damaged because of its tough exterior material.  All in all, a good buy considering the quality of the build AND ESPECIALLY the awesome sound
Delivered on time and a product worth its value. I was excited when I received the Kingston 256MB digital card on the scheduled date. It sure has a good packaging and works great.An item worth having in your electronics line
Replacement for old sony CD player. My daughter needed a replacement for her old sony D-NE319 and this one works good with the old software as this was all loaded in the computer and set up how she wanted
Toner is Toner. This is a toner for a great printer the HP LaserJet 5MP.  The toner arrived on time and was what I ordered.  I am very happy with it
great radio from a great seller. I listen mostly to AM and this radio deliver with ease, great reception easy to use very compact, good battery life. very nice, recommended
Dropped Temps Fast. Excellent Product. First time to install is a little tricky, but well worth it. It allowed me to overclock my Intel Core 2 Extreme Quad-Core and STILL dropped 15c
g3 logitech mouse as a gaming mouse. Compared to my logitech mouseman dual optical from 2000, this mouse blows it away by far in accuracy, precision.  What I find to be a drawback is the mouse's light weight and small size.  The size comes in handy if I need to flick, but be sure to keep the wire out of the way - as the mouse is so light if you have the wire in a bad spot, it will push the mouse and affect your aim at crucial moments. The "change sensitivity" button is in a strange spot (at least if u have large hands) located in the center of the mouse where you will need to reach far back and almost touch the pad of your palm of the finger you're reaching with - not an efficient movement, therefore not applicable in games (you can assign a sensitivity script to perhaps one of the side mouse buttons if necessary).  These are only minor itches when compared to the outstanding precision and I would highly recommend it
Endless Music. I got this for my husband for Christmas, It was a huge hit! The price was amazing, and it is like having a juke box for a stereo. It holds 25 cd's, we hit random play when we get up in the monring and never have to touch it again for the rest of the day. Worth every penny! I really thought that there was a typo on the price the deal was so good. If you love music, you can't go wrong with this item
Parts Express is great!. These connectors are very well-made, heavy, and high-quality.  They don't come with instructions, so I'm not sure if I put the wire in correctly for rear-entry.  It seems that typically one sticks the wire in the side hole.  That wouldn't really work for me, as there are about 99 banana jacks on the back of my Sony receiver.About Parts Express, and Dayton Audio... everything I've gotten from them has been very high-quality, and very reasonable prices.  I highly recommend them.  btw, even if it sounds like it, I don't work for them, nor am I getting any compensation for this review. :-
I like it. I think this is a good boombox for the price. It is easy to use and has good sound.
Great value!. This card works great and is significantly less expensive than it is at local retail stores.  As a matter of fact, I just ordered another one yesterday
Loved the iTV link. The product does what it is supposed to do, and does it well. The quality of the audio and video is superb, and this is a good alternative to buying an expensive iPOD speaker system if you have already invested in a hi-fi stereo or a home theatre.
It's all Worth it... Bought this beautiful tv in Saudi Arabia..To be honest.. I really would like to go with the Bravia.. but with the price tag that goes with it.. I think it is really too much..  so when I saw this machine.. a 46"full HD 1920x1080.. at half the the prices versus the Bravia.. I do jump in..The TV is so beautiful.. i hooked it with my existing cable... and the pictures is not that bad.. the lines (of the text) are so clear.. the black color is ok..I havent seen this tv with a blue ray machine or with HDDVD.. I will save more money for that..But as for now... I love it.. and having a grand time.. watching T
excellent rugged quality but overall: oddly sized. this uber-sleeve or micro-attache is sound, good looking and ruugedly constructed - no complaints there.  However, as an attache it comes up short.  It is so perfectly sized for my macbook pro 15.4" laptop, that there is virtually no room in there for anything else.  Some papers, and maybe a dvd or two, but that's it.  There is not even close to enough space to bring along my power supply.  Once already once i have left with my bag all packed, only to discover i also eft my power supply behind.  Ok, so maybe it is just a sleeve... except it is ever so slightly too big to comfortably fit inside my oversized messenger bag!  What up that!!  I find i wind up going places with two bags, and that feels a bit silly.  The nice included (but uneeded) padded sholder-strap went straight to my binoculars.  Of all the alternatives i found shopping around online, this one still seems to be the best, but there was one  futuristic black? and orange molded neoprene skin-snug case that merits deeper inspection.   Perhaps that case (also designed specificaly for the MacBook Pro) is more streamlined in its exterior dimensions.  The good news is with the Brenthaven Edge II, i know my gear is well protected.    Conclusion: nothing is perfect
Great for an IRIVER. The little sports case and arm bands that comes with the IRiver are a pain.  This is great.  The arm band is comfortable and easy to use with one hand.  The case is very solid and protects the IRiver. Only draw-backs: you have to take the IRiver out of the case to plug in the USB cable (didn't have to in the original one), the clip has come undone (but not during exercise), and the arm band is almost too big for my arm (probably won't work at all for children).  Other than that...perfect.
Don't forget the network. No complaint about the printer, but a warning that if you are going to use this in an office where you need to network it, you'll need the additional hardware for that, which is another $150 or so. I found out the hard way. Otherwise, so far the printer is operating well and is much easier on ink than my old inkjet, making it a real money-saver for us. Also, this is a black & white printer, so don't be misled by the fact that it has color scan.
Keeps the Dirt Out. I bought this item for my husband's laptop and it seems to be doing really well. It sticks to the keys and is pretty easy to use while typing. You have to give a little bit of effort when pressing but I think you will get use to it and find the iSkin to be worth it
Fantastic Scanner. I purchased this scanner after doing much research on the different tech websites. This scanner is amazing. I have been scanning old slides,  photos, and negatives, and am constantly amazed at the quality. The scanner is extremely easy to use either with Photoshop Elements or the included software. I have been working on putting together digital scrapbooks for my kids, and this scanner has made the job much easier, and fun. I thought the scan speeds were more than acceptable. I scanned several negatives at the same time, and while it was a little slower, the quality (which I feel is more important) was great!
Good but not the best. I am not a networking pro, but just wanted to use Wireless as I got my office laptop in addition to my personal laptop at home, as I needed an IP splitter anyway. This device, being a combo and at a decent price immeidately caught my attention and I bought it inspite of my friedns' warnings against D-link.The setup of the base unit was easy but as soon as I installed the card, I figured that something went wrong. After a 2 hours discussion with cust-support, I was told that I would have to use Static IP addresses on both PCs to connect to internet, as the DNS server of the Base unit had some issues. That is fine as long as my both pcs are used at home, but I have to change my network setting everytime (to autodetect an IP address) whenever I have to take my PC out or if someone bring another device to my home. I happened to change my service provider and discovered that the TCP/IP setting of my main PC had corrupted and needed reinstallation.Other than that, its been working fine since last 2-3 months. Not a single dropped connection. It works at a consistent high speed. I would say its a good value for money if, unlike me, you know how to use it
Roller Carrying Case has lots of pockets. This case is really nice however, I thought I was buying a black case and it came in as a dark green.  In all the pictures it looked black and I didn't even think to check the color of it.  Oh well, all else is good with the carrying case.  I serves the purpose
good product for the price. this was a gift for a teen.great sound on sansa's and priced well for 2gb and a good brand. the teen likes it
Great RAM for the value. I originally bought this product to put in a computer I had that wasn't running smoothly but that I didn't want to dump a lot of money into.  I was immediately glad I did.  The computer runs much better now, and I feel I got a very good value for the performance.  Since then I've purchased and installed several more sticks of this exact product for computers for family members.This isn't, of course, the best RAM out there (the subtitle of the product is "Value RAM").  It is, however, an inexpensive way to juice up a computer.  To me this is the ideal product for someone who has a cheap computer and wants to improve performance without investing too much money into it.  For normal computing (Windows, internet surfing, etc), this RAM is more than sufficient, but it works for gaming as well.  Of course you won't get the same caliber of performance you'd get from more expensive RAM, but you'll be amazed at the time and headache this product can save
Good for Linksys products the same size bad for smaller products. Had no problems for the most part with these brackets.  Some reviewers were concerned about the brackets not fitting some linksys swithces and routers.  This is true for the small ones like the EXXS88W 8-port switch. For those you have to use the little notches built into the bracket, which are not that deep and if your wall mounting the switch could fall off.  For the larger Linksys routers like the WRT54G it works perfectly
Great stuff!!. I actually bought icleaner ultra pro and I must say I love this stuff.... as my iPod nano is back to new condition. I takes a few applications, but it  works A++
Its good. I am enjoying the scanner - only wish I knew more about how it functions so I could get the most out of it.
Best 5 in 1 I've every owned. Easy to use, Easy Setup, Fast printing, Faxing, Photocopying - I love it!  Best electronic purchase I've boughten in a long time
Western Dig 120GB IDE Hard Drive. So far no problems.  Western Digital has always been one of the best of Hard Disc Manufacturers and continues to be so.  It's working the way it's supposed to.The only reason I rate it a 4 instead of a 5 is that an ATA drive is always going to be better.Otherwise, no complaints
exactly like it says. no issues, works well. I wish I didn't get blue though. Takes away from the beauty of the ipod. great product!
Good product. Installed drivers and it worked ok on win2k and winxp computers. network speed significantly increased
Fantastic performance for the money. In the 4+ months I've owned this router it's handled everything I've thrown at it, without even a hiccup.  DSL, VPNs, QoS, heavily configured SPI firewall & filtering, Bittorrent, XBox Live etc etc.  And unlike some other manufacturers I could mention, D-Link continues to release regular firmware updates/improvements for their products.The DGL-4100 has a very small footprint, generates next to no heat and its LEDs are blue and very bright.  I guess the only word of caution I'd give is that it lacks a CLI.  Administration is done via a set of built-in HTTP/Flash pages, accessible from any web browser.  Personally I much prefer this GUI interface (no cryptic command lines to learn), but more hardcore network/telnet types may object to it.And BTW, if someone is having the exact same problem with three different brands of routers, their routers obviously aren't the problem
Just what we wanted. Consumer reports didn't let me down with their review of this TV. Great picture, east to use set up screens....I did adjust the contrast and color a bit as people looked a bit too red...now the picture is Perfect. I wanted to get the next size bigger, but my wife did not want that big of a TV and I must say...the 26" is perfect for a bedroom. I took the stand off and mounted it to the wall...love the wall moun
garmin forerunner bike mount. if you're going to us any garmin GPS watch for riding your bike then it should be a manditory purchase
Has worked every time so far. I've used this to repair several music CDs and a couple of DVDs with 100% success.  It's easy and fast to use.  I love it - and it's saved me, easily, $50 because I haven't had to replace CDs or DVDs
great speakers and radio. this was bought jsut to be able to pluug inipod 30gig.  it worked great, sound was full and nice, reception on radio was excellent and the remote worked great.  surprised by other reviews, we're using the remote anyway .  it also is a nice compact size and looks nic
Perfect for 2+ years under heavy use. I have nothing to report, that is, the device has performed flawlessly in the 2+ years I have owned it.  I subjected this thing to almost every scenario except Mac.  Read on...I used it at my office (at a major research university) where I connected, among other things, a vintage (circa 1999) Windows XP desktop, a Dell Inspiron 6000 laptop with XP, two variants of the Dell dual XEON workstations running RedHat 8+/-1 and Fedore Core, an IBM Thinkpad laptop running XP, a custom built AMD Athlon 2800+ running every major linux distribution except Debian as well as XP, and a custom built AMD 4400+ dual core machine running Suse 10.  Network cards ranged from motherboard-based to 0 and 4 year old Netgear cards.I used cables from 3 to 30 feet long and connected this to both a brand new wall jack and a retrofitted jack in a Cold War era building.  Finally, the room this equipment operated in was subjected to temperatures from 55 F to 110 F, as my office was not air conditioned during the summer and it was colder outside at 100 degrees (the above computers made a lot of heat).We had major power outage/surge problems which didn't faze this thing one bit, but were able to ruin more than one expensive APC UPS unit.Oh, and I downloaded at least 100 GB through this card during this period
Skeptical at first but now Love it!!. For the longest time I really didnt think $12 a month was worth this kind of radio but after buying the sr-2000 and getting it all hooked up in my car I soon changed my mind.Biggest thing for me is hardly any DJ talking, they really keep the music going. I noticed on a couple other reviews this was not the case, I listen to only the rock stations so I cant comment on other stations. I live in the Seattle area and using the FM modulator really sucked, every station had static. I found an audio input cable online to fit my car stereo for a direct connection and oh man what a difference!!  Crystal Clear!  I did have to play with the bass and treble a bit to get the best sound and since I have a sub-woofer I used the fader a couple of clicks to the front (away from the sub) and really got it sounding great.It doesnt sound as good as a CD but much better than regular Radio. So I bought another car kit and I have the boom box for in the house. I did notice the unit getting a little warm but nowhere near hot
What is all the fuss about??. I almost didn't purchase this CD player because of all the bad reviews it had been getting, but I decided to go for it! I am glad I did, I am very happy with this Sony Walkman! I use it for walking, listening to meditating CDs, audio books, everything and have not had one single problem with it. I am so glad I did not let the few negative reviews sway my decision! As mentioned in another review, I love that if you have to stop playing whatever your listening to it will pick up on the same track when you press play again, it also fits in my back pocket so I can walk around the house listening to anything while doing chores, the earpieces fit well, there is absolutley nothing wrong with this walkman! Those of you who seemed to have this walkman break in 2-3 weeks must not take care of your things. I love it, the price was great, so don't let the negative reviews stop you on this purchase!
Atlantic Multimedia Cabinet (DRA280MM03). Good and sturdy product.  I wish the cabinet were a little bigger, but otherwise, it's great
Works Great. This projector was very easy to install and does a fine job for the price.  Note: all projectors are ambient light sensitive.  Make sure that you have a dark room. And an HDMI connection from your receiver to the projector(the wires are a little pricy). Our screen is a floor-standing 100" Da-Lite.  It is a 14' throw from projector to screen.  The picture is stunning especially on animated films like 'Monster House'.  Nice LBX feature allows for the picture to fill the screen.  If you have a good surround system, you will get a movie theater experience at your convenience(without the $5 sodas!)
Pros and cons. I have three of these CD towers, and in general I'm very pleased with them.  I like the wave design, and they hold a LOT of CDs.  I don't mind having to take off a whole stack of CDs to get to the one on the bottom, and as long as you balance the distribution of CDs properly, they don't tip that easily.  I always place mine next to a wall, anyway.  My biggest problem is that they are sometimes very difficult to put together.  Of course, that is only a temporary issue, although an incredibly vexing one.
D-Link DGS-2208 8-Port 10/100/1000 Desktop Switch. Switch was simple to install to my existing network, just plug and go. I used this switch to separate some CPUs off of the 100mb network and put them on the gig highway. Worked just as planned and was seamless. I actually added two of these and saved big jack over a 16 port gig switch. Network speed and response time increased even for those CPUs w/out a gig nic. I like the idea of having a switch with capacity that far exceeds network traffic. Highly recommend
Great product. Well, i bought this sd mini card for my motoQ. Now I am using it a lot and it is not disappointing me. Functioning very well. I always have couple movie now. Good staf
Versatile and powerful. I like that this came with both a plug for the cigarette lighter and clips to attach directly to the battery -- very versatile.  I don't know what else to say about it; it's a power inverter, its ability to invert power met my expectations.As a point of reference, this inverter will handle the load from a video projector, 50-watt speaker and PlayStation 2 effectively
Great mouse. I lovet his mouse.  The ball never gets stuck and runs smooth.  The picture is clear and bright, it doesnt fade.  It is so adorable, any HK lover should have it
Excellent - Best EarPhones you can ever get or dream of. This item is the greatest, Bass is excellent, suround,... i never got like this purity of sound from other headsets or earphones, although i have another sony headset (sports headset) its good but its nothing like this, and this one is only for 10$ or less!!!
Very Good!. This mouse is of very good quality. The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because the range is very limited, but if you are using it with a laptop, then it shouldn't be a problem.  The buttons are easy to push and the scroll wheel is very nice. The laser sensor works on a number of surfaces with no problem. Once the USB adapter is plugged in, the mouse is connected in seconds. Plus, the price is very good
Nice mount. I bought this mount for my 42".  Well built and strudy....once bolted to the wall, I had no reservations about doing chin-ups from one of the cross bars.  I weigh 185lbs.  In a nut shell, a solid, no nonsense flat panel mount.  I also bought one for my 32".  Would purchase again if I need another.
great bargain. the overall apperance is good and the keys feel firm (not cheap as i feared) the mouse lights up also wich my daughter really liked. i would recomend this keyboard.the cons are the mouse is a little small (great for a teenager) and it is shipped without an adapter so you will need 2 free usb ports
iPod Nano 2 GB. Overall, very enjoyable, sleek design and easy to use.  Wish I had waited for next generation release (a month or so after purchase) to get lower price during transition.  Could get a few more things included for the cost, but the value is good.
these last and last. I bought a 4 pack of AA batteries for my GPS about a month ago.  As advertised, they were fully charged right out of the package.  I can't believe how long these batteries are lasting me on one charge.  I have left them in for two weeks and used the GPS each day for walks, hikes and car trips.  They just don't discharge like the normal NiMH batteries I have used (and been disappointed by) in the past.The only downside is the price, but in the long run I think they will be worth the money.
I LIKE. This mouse was my first wireless of my own, but I have used others and this one is the best so far.
Works fine, but not really needed. My review of this is based on my rating for the Forerunner 201 unit itself. This is just the bracket, and it works fine. However, you don't really need it if you don't mind simply wearing the 201 on your wrist. The one caveat is that it is, of course, easier to see the unit when you are riding if it is mounted on the bike versus strapped to your wrist.My recommendation is that if you are going to use the 201 for both running and biking, don't buy this bracket because you can simply wear the 201, plus then you don't have to deal with trying to remove the wristband or making a tight squeeze fit into the bike bracket. But, if you are buying the 201 only for biking, this may be useful because then you could simply ditch the wrist strap and keep this mounted to the bike at all times.
Love It. I have started to use this with my new gaming computer and i have found it a very nice product.  I got it for $340 making it cheaper then the others and also making it a very good buy after spending so much on other things.I would highly recomend this and hope you get it for as good a deal as I did from this site
good things come in small packages. The Garmin eTrex Venture Cx has variously been described as a stripped unit, or as a GPS for someone who wants just the basics.  In truth, it is a Legend Cx in a different color.  It's perfect for someone who already has Garmin software and a USB cable.  No memory card comes with it, but the Legend Cx only comes with a 64Mb card, and virtually everyone will want a much larger card, so why pay for the small card to begin with.  Bottom line is that the Venture Cx is a flat out bargain, just about the best "do-all" GPS unit for someone who needs power and portability
Great Pad. This pad is the best I've used thus far. HUGE, so make sure you have the space for it. Great feel with little to no drag.
Works beautifully. I love this memory card.  It is faster for uploads and downloads.  It works in my Sony Cybershot, my PSP, and my Epson printer unlike another reviewer.  I have had no problems with it
Good Value. Nice Inverter at a good price.  This inverter is fairly large, but it is also much more powerful than the ones that can only be plugged into the cigarette lighter.
No need for monster cables. This otpical cable is a bargain especially for 12' long. There's really no need to spend a ton of money on an optical cable such as the Monster cable brand. Either the digital bits go through or they don't and this cable does just fine transferring those optical bits into my receiver
pretty nifty. sound quality pretty decent.  not adjustable, so i hope you have a large skull.  be careful with the little plastic clasps that allow the headphones to collapse.  they don't have any markings that indicate which way to push to collapse, and they give a little both ways, so you want to be extra careful to not snap them right off... seriously.  i'm that strong.OK - SO I'M THAT STRONG.  BROKEN AFTER A FEW SHORT MONTHS.  DON'T BOTHER.  THEY LOOKED COOL, BUT THEY LET ME DOWN.  KOSS AND I ARE OFFICIALLY BROKEN UP.  I WANT MY CLASS RING BACK, KOSS.  IT'S OVER ;-)
i buy every built product i see... ...so, unobjectively speaking, i like it.  i have a 15.5" widescreen, and i think i was supposed to get the 15" sleeve because it stretches to fit, but there is room for my power cord in the 17" sleeve.  at airport security they really slam your computer around.  the texture is agreeable, it's washable, and it really hugs your computer--but is still slim enough to fit inside a carry-on bag with other stuff.it's expensive for what it is, but they all are, and this size is sold out everywhere except on amazon.  it's also got style, which most other ones haven't, and it's still practical.
Great Portable DVD Player. I had already gotten a portable DVD player but after I saw this one I took it back.  For a cheaper price I got this one.  The screen is larger and the battery life is longer.  My husband and son LOVE it.  We haven't experienced any problems with it.  Great Buy
Works for me. This is my second digital recorder and I'm very happy with it. My first one,(from radio shack) was barely audible even turned all the way up but this one is very loud and clear. It even records clearly in noisy rooms. I'd recommend this recorder since it records and sounds perfect.
All the features you really need. I used this little GPS for a recent trip to California (I live in Boston, where it also works great - I've learned several new routes to work thanks to this thing) and it was a lifesaver!  Everyone's first reaction when they see this is, "It's so cute!"  And it really is.  Petey, as it is affectionately called, works great stuck to my window (great suction cup mounting system)in the corner where my view is already obscured by the plastic sideview mirror mount on my Ford Focus.  It also sits very comfortably in the cupholder for states like CA that don't like GPSs stuck to windshields and windows.The screen is pretty small, but has exactly the right amount of information to keep me on track.  Despite being monochrome it is very clear and easy to read.  Additionally, the voice instructions are clear enough that I never really have to look at the screen anyway.Accurracy has been surprisingly good!  It's amazing to watch it update as I'm driving, and it knows exactly the moment when I pass an exit on the highway or make a turn.We also laugh at Petey's ability to save face.  Rather than "wrong turn, stupid!" it simply says, "recalculating..." and gets you where you're going anyway.  Sometimes it takes a few seconds (5-10), but it's definitely fast enough.It's also great that you can save your current location just by holding down the scroll wheel, look up nearby points of interest, zoom in and out on the map view, and review your route while enroute.The one drawback was that it was a little tedious entering all of the addresses using only the scroll wheel, but it does a great job of narrowing down your options quickly.  If they added an option to do it while connected to the computer it would be a real plus though.  (And if they already have that option, someone tell me! =))Overall I highly recommend this product.  It chooses routes better than online maps do, and tells you where you are along the way!  Then, if you need gas or food, it can help you find that too.  Who needs anything more from a GPS?  And it's 1/2 the price of other units!  A great value in my opinion.
Just plug it in and it works. Finally! Something high-tech that basically installs itself. No hassle. No user-hostile experience. Why did I buy this? I had two LinkSys routers at home over three years and finally got fed up! With any network hiccup, I'd have to reboot the LinkSys routers and sometimes re-install the configuration software.I tried another router with the same user-hostile experience. I bought this product -- the Netgear FR114P -- based on reviews. I wanted "plug-and-play" or as close as I could get. I didn't want the hassle of installing software that ultimately fought with me. Yes, I can read and follow directions. But for Pete's sake, humans played golf on the moon 35 years ago. Why can't they invent a router that just plain works out of the box?I plugged the router into my network and had all my home PCs online in just a few minutes. It comes with software, but not necessary for basic functions.For the money, this was bargain for the trouble it saves in installation
These are great remotes. This is a wonderful remote that you can get to function exactly as you want it to.  It learns any key you want and if a device isn't in the codes, the company will search for a code or capture the code from the original remote.  This 6 Device remote I bought as a present.  I use the 8 and 10 device around my home.I bought a harmony remote and the One for All shortly after.  The harmony had to be tweeked several times and never quite worked all the components right.  Also the company monitors and saves all your information and the software is constantly running on your computer.  The Harmony's buttons at first were hyper sensitive then they wouldn't respond at all.  I had to replace the harmony (under warranty) because the screen went out.  The second, although the screen hasn't gone out, has the same problems, it turns off my TV when I try to switch from DVD to TiVo yet it doesn't the other way (makes no sense).  To be fair, my TV wasn't in the data base so I still had to use the original remote and point it at the harmony to set it up.  It constantly got the inputs wrong, I tried several different methods, all but call the company (I hear they have great customer support), but finally I would change the inputs manually.  It doesn't give you that choice at first.  It was a lot of computer to  TV- computer to TV time.  This remote, the One for All, is so much better.With the harmony you didn't have the option of picking one of the seldomly used keys and reassigning a function that you use more frequently (zoom of the TV or Live TV for Tivo) they decide for you which functions are the frequent and assigned to main keys and which you will have to scroll for.  I would use the the Live TV and the input for SV frequently so on the ONE 4 ALL I could assign any key I wanted to do those function.The One 4 All remotes are less expensive and the same quality if not better (no screen to go out, buttons push better) than the Hamony. All for Ones customer support will search for new codes and capture your code if they can't find it to upgrade immediately.You can program any key you want to do what you want.  You want to control the fan in the room, the space heater or a/c, whatever has a remote as long as it isn't Radio Frequency, most are remotes are IR.  If you want RF also you can get the One for All URC 9910 and then you can send signals through the walls and change the channels from other rooms in the house.  Want your Tivo to control two different TV in different rooms of your house, its RF to IR converter would do that.  Personally I only need the IR remote part so this remote, here at amazon under $20 today, is the best.  The One for All Learning Upgradeble Remotes 6 Device, 8 Device and 10 has literally taken the place of all of my old remotes.  I use ONE remote for all the devices in my house with remotes.  I have bought extra remotes of this brand to have at my couch, my bedroom, my computer.  I have bought these remotes as presents for family at this point.They are great remotes and I'm glad I found them
A must have!. This is an excellent product for business travellers. It really prevents others to watch you. The view/clarity is excellent. I should have purchased this product sooner
Better and cheaper than a generator. This is such a neat device. It works great for those times with the power goes out and it does double duty for camping, etc. There's no nead to mess with a large loud expensive generator. I highly recommend this inverter instead. I connected it to heavy duty jumper cables and I store it in a padded Aluminum tool case. See the pictures at http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/customer-images/B000930F0S/ref=cm_ciu_pdp_images_all/103-2768348-3851014?%5Fencoding=UTF8&s=electronics#gallery .Steve Smit
Great inexpensive phone. I have two GE cordless phone: both were inexpensive and work great
AWESOME!!!. I recently started karaoke at a friend's house.  She has the same machine so when I decided to buy one for my house I searched and searched.  There are many out there but I wanted the whole pedestal and everything.  I found this particular machine at a few places but Amazon had the best price!!  It was just as expected and we really love using it.  It also has a radio feature so when cleaning the basement I just put the radio on and the speaker on the pedestal is great!!!The kids love the camera so they can see themselves on the tv while singing.  It is really great!!!! I highly recommend!!
Very good. Goods- Four Additional USB Ports in one PCMCI slot.- No additional driver, s/w installs required (I used it on Win XP Pro- SP2)- Comes with an additional Power chord for the USBup. This is a must, if you   are planning to use the USB for external device which take power (External hard-disk, iPod, Zunes etc.). My Dell laptop's mother board started acting crazy because I made the mistake of using power consuming devieces on the original USBs. But with Micros Innovations I can trust the external power source to take care of these devices- Great service by Amazon - My first package throuugh UPS was sent to my previous address and even thought it was partly my fault, Amazon immediately shipped a replacement.Bad- Like any other PCMCI card, it portrudes outside the laptop, so one has to be careful in moving the laptop around when it is plugged in
great product, lite weight. I love this product.  Unfortunately, I blew mine up in West Africa (my computer was not damaged), so when I returned I ordered another right away.  I wish that it were a little thinner, but I suppose you can't have everything....at least right now
Great Radio and Great Service!. If you read my review a month ago I guess I was a bit too hard on Sangean Radio but since then a very nice man from Sangean has called me and talked to me and he is right every once in a while one comes off the line with a minor defect,he is sending me a new radio and I thank him for calling me and I will buy from them again and recommend anyone else to do the same , a great little radio and great Service after the sale ! thank youD. Butler
worthy alternative for cd/dvd printing. I needed a printer for printing on DVD's, and wanted something other than HP or Epson (Epson's cartridges are said to show "empty" before they are; and I didn't like the HP reviews).This printer, when sold in Europe is capable of prining on cd's but doesn't have the feature when sold in the US..but it's the same printer, just missing the cd tray. You can buy the cd tray at pe-labs.com (they also sell on Amazon). You also need to configure your printer so that it "thinks" it's in Europe...the pe-labs's site tells you how to do this. Then you just download the free cd printing software from Canon's European site.I'm very satisfied with the quality and ease of use of the software. You do have to store the cd tray seperate from the printer between uses, which is a minor inconvenience. But that is minor, and I still give it 5 stars
GREAT SOUND. THE SURROUNDBAR PRODUCES GREAT SOUND. LIKE ALL THE OTHER REVIEWS I READ IT DOES NOT PRODUCE A 360 DEGREE AFFECT. BUT IT DOES GET THE SOUNDS TO THE SIDES OF THE ROOM. THE QUALITY OF THE SOUND IS GREAT, EVEN WHEN LISTENING TO MUSIC. I WOULD BUY IT AGAIN AS THE SOUND AFFECT IS GOOD ENOUGH CONSIDERING, I DON'T HAVE TO RUN WIRES, WHICH WAS IMPOSSIBLE IN THE ROOM IT IS IN
Really like it!. I have used this printer for photos, cards and regular printing.  I have been pleased with all that I have done so far.  I will probably upgrade it to 5 stars as I continue to learn more about all it's capabilities.Must mention too, Amazon was extremely fast in getting this delivered.
Great timely shipping. I ordered this item and I received it in only a few days with the cheapest shipping methods possible.  The produce was new (as advertised) and represented a good deal to me as a buyer
Excellent Radio. I am completely pleased with this radio.  It brings in quite clearly several FM stations in my area that my other radios cannot receive and the reception on the Tivoli is always clear  with a pleasing and well-balanced tone.  There is no distortion even when the volume is turned to full!  I've recommended this radio to friends and they have been very pleased as well.  This is a great value for such a small radio that is both beautiful in its design simplicity as well as providing the fidelity of receivers that are much larger and far more expensive.  This beats the Bose and others hands down
Color most true. I was first introduced to a Huey by the senior most photographer in our office, a man with nearly over 40 years experience in the field.  As soon as I could, I added one to my home system and have never stopped using it.  I now have two, carrying one with my laptop
A good tool for lecture recording. I purchased this for recording lectures in seminary, and thus far it works quite well.  The sound is muddy for sure, but understandable.I record most lectures on the high mic setting, and 'SP.'  The other, higher recording settings are easier to hear/understand but aren't worth the extra storage space.Even though the player holds 64 mb, it takes up more space on your PC after converted.  I would like to try the recorder with a mic attachment to see the quality increase.The batteries are said to last about 25 hours, and I can't say either way how long mine lasted.  If it was shorter it didn't seem like it.The functions are intuitive (to me) and I figured out most all of the functions in about 15 minutes.This is the first digital recorder I've purchased or used, but I like it and would recommend it to anyone wishing to record lectures or conversations or whatever.  I think you would need an external mic if you wanted to record music.  I did so on the highest setting and it was pretty muddled.  Not really worth listening to again.
reliable, and I like the rubber cover. I've had this drive for over two years. I've had one minor problem (I loaned it to someone, and they corrupted it - don't know how), but I transfer regularly back and forth from Mac to PC (I use it formatted FAT), and I've had no problems. I've only formatted it once (after it was corrupted, see above).The rubber cover is an opinion thing. I personally think it's a great feature. I can throw this thing around without worrying about it at all. I don't use it as a keyring, but I know a friend who does. Once nice little feature is a white space to write (w/ permanent marker)
Simple and Inexpensive. I have a 30GB Ipod, and it fits well. You can't get the bubbles out of the screen shield, but videos look good, and the touchwheel works just as well as without the shield.Note that there is also a belt clip included with the kit!
An interesting tuner with outstanding selectivity. The HDT-1 is certainly an interesting and somewhat versatile product.  The interior chassis is composed of two modules, one for signal processing and the other for power - taking about 1/10 the volume inside the empty cabinet. The exterior has a bluish-purple lcd display which is not dimmable and has a  digital clock which does not keep accurate time as it is not locked to the 60HZ line frequency. There are direct entry buttons and 20 memory presets for AM and 20 for FM.The signal strength meter is almost useless as it varies with modulation on the analog stations.The C/N ratio feature on digital FM is a valuable feature and works well to determine antenna placement. The remote is very small and thin but can easily become lost in the chair cushion.Now to the actual performance. There is a very strong blend imposed on any but the best signals which causes a great loss in separation but a clear signal which approaches mono in analog. The sensitivity is good but the unit definitely overloads easily in the presence of strong local signals - correctable with a variable L-pad but at a loss of ultimate sensitivity. The selectivity is simply outstanding as a very weak distant station can easily be heard just .2 MHZ or adjacent to a local. If you are looking to receive a weak station in a crowded station environment then this tuner is for you. I can receive a station 300 miles away with NO interference by an adjacent local. This is more than I can do with my two professional tuners on very narrow bandwith. This feature alone has sold me on this tuner.The audio output is VERY high, far above the 600mv standard and it might overload some preamps. This makes comparison difficult as the audio is 2-3X louder than other components. The tuner automatically indicates the presence of HD signal on AM and FM but requires several seconds to load the digital buffer. The HD signal is better on some stations with improved separation and upper frequencies but on a few it is worse. It would be assumed that broadcasting quality in HD varies a great deal among stations but that the tuner is doing a good job in the expansion process. It definitely sounds better than satellite radio but it does not  reflect the ads which indicate CD quality. Long distance stations frequently do not stay locked in HD, and if you are on HD-2 or HD-3 station, it falls back to analog and reloads on HD-1 - a great annoyance. The tuner  has  many display options and even an audio spectrum. None of the features have a detailed explanation in the instructions.What would I like to see on this unit? I would like an optical output, a blend and high cut switch so I could make that decision on a weaker signal, a clock that keeps time or no time display at all, a more normal size remote, 30 presets on FM and 10 on AM if I am limited to a number and an AM stereo HD that really works - this one sounds poorly. DO not try to listen to a digital unit and a regular tuner at the same time as there is always delay in the digital processing.I believe this tuner has many good features for the price of $199.00. It is definitely the most selective tuner I own - better than my Kenwood KT-9900 and Yamaha TX-950. Sure, there are always changes we would like but I am sure that a low price point was important to Sangean and I believe they made wise compromises except for the non-defeatable auto blend.
Excellent printer. First of all, I rated this printer at four stars only because its an ink hog. To be fair, I print high resolution photos so I suppose thats to be expected. As for the quality of prints, my friends ooh and ahh over them. I like the way it handles high-key landscape photos. In all, an excellent printer. Now, if they just made bulk magazine cartridges...
Excellent universal. Overall this is a very good remote.  It replaced 5 of my remotes, which is all except my Bose, which is RF controlled.  It even replaced my Windows Media Center Edition remote and works with my PS2 with no problems.My negatives for this device are that the layout is a little less comfortable and intuitive than some of my other remotes and the default functions aren't necessarily the most used functions therefore requiring additional time to set-up.  These negative however are more than acceptable when you remember that it works with so many devices.  I am definitely happy with this remote and would undoubtably purchase again
Great for the Price. This is a very good (not great) case for storing your CDs with jewel cases.  It only holds 57 store bought CDs and it is a bad fit in the corners for that extra CD that you what to stuff in.  It is EXCELLENT for CDs that you burned that do not have store bought cover art and jewel cases.  It will hold hundreds this way.  It is not as solid as it looks in the picture, but it looks like it will take a fairly good hit and still protect your CDs and it is fairly light weight.  All in all it is a great product for the price.
Great for the price. If you aren't looking to spend a lot, this is a great deal. Sounds great; and where can you find 7.1 receiver for $170??? Plus I got $30 off for signing up for the Amazon credit card.... so I got it for $140, which is less than what I payed for the older generation 5.1 Pioneer I used to have
Kind Of Important. This is what connects your Zen Vision: M to the charger or USB cable.  So it's a very important little piece of plastic.  I'd recommend buying a back up just in case you lose one!
Excellent Remote. This is an excellent remote for an excellent price. I have a stereo system in my basement attached to a computer which uses Foobar2000 to play music. Before this remote, I always had to walk up to the computer and use the mouse to change songs, adjust the volume, pause songs, or shutdown the computer; this remote changed that and now I am able to change the songs from anywhere in my (large) basement. The software is easy to configure and the macro buttons make life much easier. This remote is an excellent addition to any media setup
good value. Just purchased this handy little item as I wanted to test the PDA waters before jumping in on a more expensive model.  It works great for what I use it for, phonebook, scheduling, notes, etc...  Would be nice if you didn't have to scroll to see entire address lines and if it had a search mode for the scheduler, but very good value overall.  If you don't need email, video, phone, etc., then this is definitely worth checking out.  Touchpad screen is remarkably accurate and easy to use.
Great Product - Especially for the Price. I purchased this to connect my computer and my kids computer to the same flat panel monitor, keyboard and mouse.  Being able to switch between computers with a simple stroke of the keyboard is fabulous! There is no software to install, just hook it up and use it.  Great product, and you can't beat the price!
Amazing Customer Service though.... I bought the 128MB card 8-9 mnths ago. At first didnt notice it but the usable memory kept getting smaller! Finally it gave a 'Error Reading Card'  message and stopped working. Customer service at Viking was very very helpful and prompt. They replaced the card is 7 days. They also tried to retrieve some of the images that I had considered 'lost' in the card and sent me a CD with the images on it! I was impressed with the excellent support, but not too impressed that the card died so early in its life. Would I buy it again? Yes but likely go for keeping a backup card on hand at all times as well
Solid trouble free products from Transcend again. Generally I've been quite happy with any flash memory product from Transcend, I work retail and have to sell their products off my shelf and both their memory sticks, countless sticks of ram and memory cards such as this have so far not come back on returns or failures or such.It's a good manufacturer to buy memory from, period
It wears is name - ToughSkin. ...and it fit very well with my NANO. Just love it. I have no worries to carry my iPod without thinking I could scratch the screen or break it. I just throw my iPod in my pockets or in my bag. It is protected by a Tough Skin. Your NANO become only one piece. No separate case, you don't have to pull the NANO in or out, it's a Skin. I like it and it has a great look. So I recommend it - stop looking just get one, you'll like it
It does have force feedback, but weak in my opinion. I bought two of these wheels last month and I'm about to order 2 more (I'm setting up a little company picnic racing rally). I played Midnight Run II (windows) with these wheels and didn't experience the force feedback either. However, when I played NASCAR 3 with these wheels, then I got vibrations in the steering wheel when taking turns too tight, but nothing when bumping the wall or another car. The force feedback amounts to a 'humming' vibration and is actually annoying. btw - there's an option in NASCAR 3 you have to turn on for the force feedback to work. The force feedback was just a 'nice' feature for me, but I really got it for the USB connection and table top design. I have a couple of the Interact V3 racing wheels and their 'sit nestled between your legs' design is awkward to deal with and it's too tall to effectively use them on a table. But the LogiTech wheels work great on a table top! The LogiTech connectors are a little more reliable too. The pin connector housing on the V3 snapped off pretty easily on one of the wheels. However, I do prefer V3's full size pedals to the LogiTech smaller pedals... but it's satisfactory
It's Exciting. The portable color TV was the perfect gift. Clear picture and sound. Great reception. The person I gave this to really enjoys caring it around, convenient size. Thinking about purchasing one for myself
Very good, no problems thus far. I've only had this phone for a week, but thus far it's been great! I like that there is no antenna to fall out of the top of the phone, and the base unit and phone are a nice looking addition to my office. Sound quality has been fine and I have no complaints about this one. It arrived the next day, too!
Better than my old Belkin model. It's speedy and space saving and inexpensive. I bought this to replace my Belkin because the Belkin needed to be plugged in. This one is powered by your computer so there's no extra power cords, which is a big plus to me.The only thing I dislike about this is the fact that the Hub takes up two Usb ports instead of just one like the Belkin.
It's a cable... If you need this, it's inexpensive and works just fine.  'nough said
Great Picture, 1 missing feature, 1 side effect. Overall this TV has a great picture and sound.  We use it for OTA HD broadcasts and my original intent was to hook it up to a Media Center PC.  I did get this to work with an DVI - HDMI cable, but the problem (missing feature)is this model was not intended to be hooked up to a PC.  (The D41U, D42U D43U and D50U all are) At 1280x720 (720p) the screen looks good with the exception of all the edges are missing/off-screen.  So I can't see the time in the bottom right, and most of the start button is missing on the bottom left, the X is missing from a maximized program in the top Right, etc... The Media center interface doesn't really care, since you use a remote and navigate around just fine, but checking email is a bit of a challenge.The only side effect is the back-light feature (which I wanted to turn down in a dim bedroom) causes a humming noise when set to 10 or less.  I called sharp support and their suggestion was to adjust the brightness to offset needing to have the backlight up to 11+
head phones were great. Very nicely packaged and in great condition. Love the interchangeable cap
90% Great 10% Bad. Bottomline regarding the Samsung 1080p 52" is that I am quite pleased. The only LCD I saw that may be better is the Sony but it is my personal feeling that you are just paying for the name. I was also told that the screen on the Samsung and the Sony are made by the same manufacturer so the only difference is asthetics and extra features. The Sony however comes with a stiff price increase.I have a very bright room and I am energy concious so a plasma was not a good option for me since they catch a lot of glare and use more power. The picture quality you get out of a plasma in the right setting still is superior to LCD but only in certain instances. The Samsung LCD picture is awesome 90% of the time, where it falls short is in very dark scenes. There is a problem with what I found from other blog sites and reviews (based on the Sony with the same screen) of "light leaking". In very dark scenes the picture is sometimes not totally black you can see what appear to be shadows or pixel movements. Now most people don't even notice it but if you're a perfectionist geek like me it is an annoyance. However, for me the LCD is still the better choice than plasma and I would not change my decision the picture quality is excellent most of the time so it is not a big deal. Of all the LCD's that I have seen this one along with the Sony have the best picture quality hands down. Although, Sharp's new box is getting close. Don't be fooled by low end manufactured products claiming to be as good. Carefully, look at the specs and the picture quality particuarly during fast moving scenes where you may catch bluring.I have not had the opportunity to see how the 1080p resolution looks yet (Blu-Ray, HD-DVD) but I'm sure it is as breath-taking as HD.I bought this TV recently after years of watching, reading and waiting for pricing to get to a point where I thought it would be the right time. Whatever you thing pricing will do it seems the fact of the matter is that technology will always be better and pricing better the next year, you just have to jump in at some point. Pricing has taken a significant drop in the last 2 years on such items
They are great!!. These premium earphones are amazing! The only problem I have with them is that they wont stay in because my ears are kinda small and oily... other than that they are amazing! Great Sound, compact design and all over amazing
Excellent Item Great Deal!. Bought this item 3 weeks ago and had it installed at circuit city.  Item Is authentic and works great! Works up to 1 mile without any obstructions in the way and 2 way confirmation tells you the status ie car started armed, disarmed, sensors triggered, Shock sensor sensor 1 or 1 additional optional sensor 2 either glass breakage or dual motion sensor.  I recommend getting the 508d Dual motion sensor where it warns at a distance and then alarms if someone comes too close to your car. This the the Best same thing as the python 990 top of the line security and remote start they sell at circuit city for more.  This unit also will require a bypass if your car has a transponder in its key
So far ...  cool, silent, and reliable. Over the last two years I purchased six Segate USB2 160-GB.   This is my first Seagate USB2 250-GB, now over one month old.   They all run cool and silently.    So far, no errors detected by Scandisk or Defrag.   All CRC compares have been successful.    I do not run them through an USB2 hub, but directly from an USB2 port on the motherboard, or from an USB2 port on an USB2 adapter plugged into the motherboard bus.The 250-GB has a new "multi-funtion" button (instead of the two buttons on the 160-GB) ...  Read the manual on how to use this "multi-function" button.   My previous six USB2 120-GB from another vendor are all dead, except for one
Lots of power in a small package. I really thought the reviews for this item were probably a little over-blown, but the speakers have proven me wrong. As someone who primarily uses their laptop on the go, I have been looking for a set of small, easily transportable, decent sounding speakers. These fit into all three categories. I am pleasantly surprised by the fullness of the sound that they put out. If you're strictly an audiophile, you'd be better off investing in a good set of Bose headphones, but if you need something to quickly and efficeintly plug and play so other people can hear what is on your laptop, then you won't find a better buy for your money.
Great shredder!. This is a great shredder for home office use.  I've had smaller, less durable shredder and they seemed to jam constantly.  But, this particular shredder works well.  I cleared up 6 months of papers that needed shredding in little time.  I would highly recommend it to anyone
It is a good PDA. I feel well with my Ppc it is that I was looking fo
iPod Mini Lanyard. I really like this lanyard as it is from Apple and cheaper than their website.  It works great too
HP Pavilion 8000 17" notebook. Excellent case with a great deal of storage space.  The separate pocket case for the computer is especially nice for extra protection and carrying the computer by itself when not carrying the extra power supply and mouse
Great from beginning to end. Ordering a big screen TV online was definitely a new experience for me, but having read the other reviews about delivery service with Amazon, I was much more comfortable with trying it.... and I am so glad I did.  To say I love the TV would be an understatement!  The picture clarity is fascinating!  We had to wait for the cable company to set up the new connection, but in the mean time, we tried a rabbit ear connection and the picture we got with rabbit ears was unbelievable!  The TV came when it was supposed to be delivered and Eagle set up the TV - wouldn't leave until they saw the TV come on to its menu screen and they carried out of the packaging.  I definitely recommend both Amazon and the TV - both were better than I could have imagined!!
No complaints. Items were as advertised, arrived ahead of schedule and undamaged.In short, the sort of product and service one should expect from any retailer
Hubby loves it!. I bought this for my husbands birthday.  He was very excited.  He had been looking at bags at a local store and hadn't found anything as nice as this, especially for the price.  Plenty of room for his laptop and pens, notebooks, extra books, etc.  Very durable, highly recommend
Just Fine. The sound quality isn't brilliant, but it suits my purpose for listening to audiobooks.  It would be perfect for a youngster.  The only drawback is that there is no option for headphones, but you can't go wrong for the price
Skip wireless. Tired of wireless not working in your house?  Just get this and be done with it.Easily get 6+ Mbps in every outlet
Ipod takes another blow. Well, to begin with, I am a complete iPOD hater. The whole idea of wasting an buttload of money on something with limited features doesn't sit right with me. But after robbing my bro of his for so long, since I had none, it was time to get something of my own. I chose this Walkman Bean player. The size is sick! Fits between a few fingers. Also, it is Sony, a trusted company, unlike Apple who will give you the runaround. The navigation and menu is so simple. I didn't read the manual and I figured it out. The only thing I read the manual for was to figue how to change the station on the radio, but that is negligible. Anyhow, I looooove it. Great bargain, sound investment
Excellent Product. Rich sound, convenient remote. Not a Bose product, but very, very good quality for the price.Only issue is the volume is rather startling when using this as an alarm clock...but it sure wakes you up in the morning!Highly recommended.
Great buy. I purchased three of these for three Kodak easyshare camerasI gave as gifts. It was a great buy for much less than whatyou can get at any local stores
GSC 10 Cadence Sensor. based on previous reviews of this product, I went ahead and changed the battery before even trying to install it.Installed it in tandem with my current wired cateye computer(used the cateye crank sensor, and just installed a second wheel magnet), worked on the first try with my FR 305...works great for capturing speed/cadence data on indoor trainer
Canon S830D Photo Printer. I have the digital camera Canon Powershot S200 and just purchased this printer. Set it up last night without any difficulty and the photos I printed were fantastic. I am very pleased with this purchase. Would highly recommend this printer. I did use generic photo paper to start out with and it worked just fine. I am hoping that in the long run this printer will pay for itself and cut the costs of having pics developed at the store
Good but Sluggish. I love my tooldial and its' software.  My only complaint is that you must have a very large proccessor to run it effectively.  I frequently find that it gums up photoshop and in-design a little.  Overall great product and I expect them to have some updates to work out the bugs.  Works very well in tandem with a WACOM tablet
Great AM Reception & FM Sound. I got this radio when Amazon had a special for $35.00; although they noted that it was discontinued, they started to sell it again. Pro's - Great AM DX reception, even during the day. I am able to pick up WBZ in Boston very clear during the early afternoon hours. None of my other radios will even come close. Has a nice back-lit LCD than can stay on all the time. Uses either 4 D cell batteries or 4 AA batteries (nice idea). Light weight with plenty of buttons and knobs. Con's- Does not have preset function or search/scan. You have to use the tuning dial, which can go over or under the frequency; however, the frequency lock works great. A great radio for $35.00; however, I would not pay over $50.00 for it.
A slick little device. Glad I bought it. Had it out of the box and working in about half an hour.  I did hit one little snag that required a call to the D-Link tech support center, and I was DELIGHTED to hear an American voice... no off-shore outsourcing for these guys!  With their help I had the problem quickly solved.I'm not overly thrilled with the signal strength, but at least I can connect from anywhere in the house.  I've heard other people voice the same complaint.NOTE: With this and any other wireless router, make sure you ENCRYPT YOUR CONNECTION.  If not, anyone can drive by your house and login to your network.Enjoy
The Best. Even though     it is expensve, it is a palm pilot. You can plug it in via USB. It is a good PDA
Not for the impatient... I've had my G820 for about a year, and it has worked well on my Xbox. But make no mistake, it is VERY difficult to configure, especially if you have any kind of security on your wireless. It took me multiple hours of trial and error to get it on my network. However, once I finally got it right, I've had no problems at all. The bottom side of the unit does run extremely hot. I just flip it upside down to help vent the heat. I rarely remember to unplug it, so it is usually left on for days at time. So far, no lockups (or fires) in my experience
Reasonably easy to use, but a caveat. It only took one hard disk crash to make me pay attention to the need to back up. I back up all files and folders at least daily to an external HD; I bought Acronis to create a disk image backup so that I could restore everything as it was to a new HD in case of a crash; I create a new disk image backup at least monthly. Warnings: run checkdisk /f before creating the disk image, to be sure there are no file errors; and veriy the backup. I tried to restore the disk image, only to discover it wouldn't restore because of file errors. Fortunately, restoring the disk image turned out not to be necessary, and I was still able to restore an important file from the backup
Sister loves it!. I bought this case for my sister to go along with the iPod that I gave her for Christmas and she absolutely loves it. It is lightweight, gives her mp3 player a cool look so that it doesn't look like everyone elses, and the cord allows for easy handling of the iPod while keeping the other hand free...It's definitely a buy, especially for the price
A great player. This item was rated 5 stars before I bought it, and the reviews were right on the money. The price is the clincher, but also the fact that it has television tuning helped me to decide to buy this.
The 3 C's "Crisp Clean Clear". I use this phone as a VOIP and it has a crisp, clean and clear sound.  When I first set up the phone system I discovered if the base is to close to any electronic equipment then an echo is heard.  Once I discovered this and made the necessary changes the sound has remained "Crisp, Clean and Clear!
Couldn't be happier with this ... I just wanted to be able to listen to my iPod at the office withour putting on headphones - is that too much to ask?  A friend of mine had one of these sweet little stereos and she LOVED it, so I figured I'd try it out - and I'm glad I did.  It's delivers great sound, but is small enough that it can sit on my desk at work and not draw any unwanted attention (don't want someone noticing it and walking away with it).It's compatible with *all* dockable iPods.Volume control is a breeze with these small silver buttons that you simply touch.  No pressing buttons, no twisting dials ... it's kinda cool.I've recommended this stereo to all my friends and family who hae iPods who are looking for a really nice "second" stereo option to listen to their tunes ...Oh ... and I thought the price was right
I own this and got exactly what was described. I got two headphones unlike the other reviewer.  It came with everything described.  The screen is 5 inches and it is an excellent  product for my 3 year old to view in the car.  She controls it with the remote that accompanies it.  My 14 year old charges the rechargeable battery up and brings it to "away" soccer games on the school bus!  No problems after 3 months of HEAVY useage
Great Style and Quality, but Overpriced. Very nice style, durable heavy quality construction, easy-to-follow assembly instructions, good for concealing A/V wiring.  This stand serves well for putting various audio components on the shelves and a turntable on the top.  Also can be used for a TV on top and VCR/cable/DVD on shelves.  Although it's a very nice product, the price is much too high for what you get.  Design is modern and a very nice additional piece of &quot;furniture&quot; for an image-concious consumer
Great Helmet Cam!!!. The "Archos Helmet Camcorder" is a great tool! I bought it to film my Motorcycle rides and my Haitian Carnival 2007 experience! Using the ARCHOS 504. It worked great and I'm mostly pleased with the motorcycle rides because being on a motorcycle you can't move your head too much so the images were clear...-When walking and recording keep your head from moving too fast-Don't record in front of the light source-Record away from the light sourceGreat Product
a good purchase. This fan isn't as quiet as it seems in store, but overall it gives good performance. There's no AC at the place I rent and the 2nd floor gets super hot in this southern cal summer. This fan saved me and the remote control provides great convenience
SIEMPRE CONFIABLES. TENGO YA MUCHO TIEMPO UTILIZANDO LOS DISCOS MEMOREX, TANTO DVD COMO CD, Y SIEMPRE HAN RESULTADO SER MUY BUENOS.POR LO GENERAL LOS COMPRO EN EL MOMENTO EN QUE ESTAN EN OFERTA, QUE EN AMAZON CASI SIEMPRE ASI ES.LOS RECOMIENDO AMPLIAMENTE, LOS QUE TIENEN MALOS COMENTARIOS AL RESPECTO POSIBLEMENTE SE DEBIO AL PROCESO DE QUEMADO, PROGRAMA O QUEMADOR
Adept. This particular unit has been around awhile (I also have one from London branded "number puzzle"), now rebranded by Franklin for an American release.First, there is no backlight.Second, some of the puzzles end where two answers are both correct, which drives some Sudoku purists nuts.But these are the Only drawbacks.The unit fits well in the hand, and is easy to use.  You can put in your own puzzles, pause, Undo, and toggle sound.I cannot imagine having a Sudoku handheld game whose screen isn't fully a touchpad, and which doesn't have the ability to put in puzzles from your favorite source!  And I can't imagine I'm the only one either
Will this thing ever die?. Just thought I'd stop/shop by and look at what was available from Sangean.  I might as well say it, I've had my current Sangean radio (DT-300-VW) for 7 years - that's 7 years of extensive use 8-12 hours a day x 4-5 days+ a week.  While all other radios I've owned within this size range have long since 'given-up-the-ghost' (over 7 years ago), this puppy just keeps on working with the same reliability as day 1!  AM/FM/TV reception is quite remarkable as it always has.  Weather band has always been a little weak in some areas of Colorado - you can pick up several different stations if you are in the right area, which is pretty cool actually.  I would not give up this radio for anything else out there.  Just one question still haunts me - will this thing EVER die?  I hope not, but if it does, I'll get another Sangean
Fit My PDA and Then Some!. It is large, so don't think it will fit in a small purse, but it can fit more than just the PDA. I can put papers and receipts, etc., which is useful. It is made well, protects the PDA. If I could find a product that fit the PDA with the external keyboard, that would have been better
Worth buying even if you only have 20 LP's to convert. The excitement and joy in  my husband's face after hearing the converted french-canadian LP's was just priceless.  These recordings can never be found in cds since they're not  commercial success and yet they're part of my husband's past.Ion iTTUSB is pretty easy to use although it's not as "plug and play" as I thought it would be.  Still, after a few tinkering, I was recording  the LPs to digital.  The software that came with is not the best but it does the job.  The hiss and crackling in the background adds charm to the final product. Despite the noise in the background, one can still hear new sounds (ei. voices and instruments) that is just not obvious in the LPs.  It's like listening to a new recording with added feature (ei. voices and instruments).Over all, it's really worth buying.
ridata dvd's. very good quality dvd's i was able to use them in ever one of my dvd players
Espectacular. Compre este, mi primer LCD TV hace tan solo 3 dias. Habia oido del prestigio del Sharp Aquos, en particular algunos modelos que no son precisamente el LC37D43U. No se si existe alguno mas espectacular, pero este lo es. Ademas del precio, la calidad y nitidez de imagen y la elegancia del disenio hacen que valga la pena la compra. El sonido no es bueno, en particular con los canales analogos, pero con la television satelite y los DVD, el sonido es aceptable. No imagino como se ve la television digital. Recomiendo un sistema de audio alterno, con lo cual el sonido se torna "de pelicula".En fin, recomiendo este tv de Sharp.No he podido configurar o programar el control remoto para operar mis otros equipos de sonido (Home Theater, DVD player, SAT Receiver). Las instrucciones del manual son imprecisas e incompletas. Alguien me ayuda
Get a NiMH battery. I agree with those who have had battery problems. I replaced all the original handset batteries with NiMH batteries about a year ago and haven't had any problems whatsoever since! I used Energizer ER-P511 batteries that I bought at the local Best Buy. Panasonic makes NiMH batteries for this phone now as well, but they are not included with the new phones. I highly recommend anyone with this phone switch batteries... major improvement!
Very good for the price. Pros: Excellent tone from the large speaker, accurate analog tuning dial with large numerals to guide you, great plug in adapter that isn't one of those ugly "wall warts" (a box with a plug that goes into your wall), LED tuning light, good handle that folds back completely, battery compartment cover is attached so you won't lose it.Cons: Selectivity is off a bit on FM - stations that are very close together may bleed into each other, the antennae doesn't swivel 360 degrees - only sideways.For this price, this is a very good value. I like this radio - mostly because it has such a large speaker for such an inexpensive radio and produces a nice sound. Well worth 20
Great Stereo - Almost Perfect For an Office Environment. The most important thing I was looking for in a small stereo was an auxiliary audio input so that I could plug an iPod dock (or even just an iPod) directly into the system. This system does have one RCA (left and right) auxiliary input on the back, near the speaker and antenna connections (good luck trying to find that information in any of the specs or product descriptions online).This unit looks great, it's a sleek, shiny, silver piece of art. The circular LCD screen has a great blue backlight when the system power is turned on, and there is a blue LED that shines on the CD compartment, that you can see through the transparent door.I don't plan on using this as my main home entertainment system, I bought this for use in my office, so I don't need a powerful sound system. This unit delivers very good sound at the low levels throughout all of the functions (CD, Tuner, and my iPod through the Aux). The only problem that I've come across, is that the lowest volume setting (1, on a scale of 1-20), may be just a touch too loud for a quiet office environment.Another consideration to keep in mind, is that a lot of reviews here say that this unit has a tendency to break down in one way or another. To get around this possibility, I ended up buying this unit from Circuit City for $60-something, and popping down another $19 for the 3-year service plan. So in all, I still spent less than $80-$90 total for this stereo and 3 years worth of insurance... not bad. Also, I spent $20 for a cable to connect my iPod on one side, to the RCA AUX jacks on the stereo. So, for $100, I have a system that plays CDs, AM/FM radio bands, and my iPod, for less than most iPod-only speaker systems.If you are looking for a stylish stereo system for an office, or a 2nd system for your home, I'd consider giving this one a try, for the price, you can't go wrong. Also, since it does have the AUX input, you can plug in any number of components, from a VCR/DVD player to an iPod.I've only owned this system for a few hours, so I can't speak to its durability, but like I said, if you throw on a $20 service plan, you're still only spending around $80-$90 for a great little system
couldn't be more pleased.... I wanted a receiver to play music in my den.Period.Little portable unit wasn't cutting it,needed enough "juice" to power two Infinity bookshelfs and a powered subwoofer.Wow.This delivers the goods!So,if you are in the market for a quality receiver to listen to music,and your listening room is modest sized,I don't know how you could do any better.Really.At under 200 bucks this is a no-brainer
Great value. I use a Minolta DiMAGE G500 and this was an excellent memory upgrade. Spent a week in Hawaii taking pictures and 30-sec movies. Never ran out of memory! The G500 is an older 5 Mp camera. If you have a higher res camera, you may opt for higher speed memory. The memory speed for this card worked very well for casual photography
Good basic phone. Works great and is at a reasonable rate. Would recommend for basic use, although for users needing speaker phone and mute options, this may not be it
Lexmark High Yield Print Cartridge. I love that I can get twice the yield (printed pages) from one cartridge for much less than twice the price of the regular cartridge!  This high yield cartridge costs only 33% more than the regular cartridge but you get 100% more production.In case you don't realize the regular cartridge gives you about 200 printed sheets.  The high yield gives you about 400 printed sheets.I didn't realize the Lexmark #34 was for my printer until I checked the guide on site.  Now it is the only one I will buy.  And don't forget to get the high yield color cartridge too.
An effortless USB hub. No matter how many USB port I had, I always seemed to need more. I had ports on my computer, more on my monitor, even two on my keyboard, and still I needed more.After researching a number of hubs I chose this one and it is great.I am not good at the technical workings of a computer, so I was worried that the installation would be hard or that there would be conflicts with other hardware. Nothing like that happened.I followed the set up instructions; it took 10 minutes at most, and I was in business. Right now I have four USB devices plugged into the hub and all work just as they should. I have not had trouble with anything I added to the hub. And miraculously, I have three open ports to use later.This hub does exactly what it should with no fuss or bother
Worked well for me. These labels are good quality and scored for easy trimming by hand after printing.   I had no real problems with the included software.   It isn't what I would call commercial quality, but it worked fine for my needs.  I liked the fact that it could take any image off my hard drive and automatically scale it to fit the label - I didn't have to scale the image manually.  It also allowed me to print a calibration page to align the software to my printer (a simple process that it walks you through step-by-step), so that I wouldn't have to waste a label to align the printer.  One thing to be aware of, though, is that these labels are size A4, not your standard 8-1/2 by 11 size.  As long as your printer can be set to use A4 paper, you shouldn't have any problems.
swiss gear rolling computer case. I love the case, it is large enough for my medical textbooks and it also easily converts into an overnight bag.  The handle is a bit of a pain, but it is easily slid down and back up to the full height.  I am a 6' woman, and it matches my stride without hitting my heels when fully extended.
A &quot;Smart&quot; Inkjet Cartridge with Great Print Quality. I have had inkjet printers and laser printers and other kinds too.  But this is the first time I have had a printer that sports an ink cartridge that actually warns me in advance when it is getting low in ink!  The  software connected with the printer and ink cartridge will give you a  message on your screen that your ink level is low, and even shows you a  graphic picture of approximately how low it is, and tells you what will  happen when the ink totally runs out (that is, it will stop printing  altogether -- unlike other printers that continue to spit out blank pages).   The print quality is great, and the cartridge seems to last a good long  time.  It is easy to replace and install. Who could ask for more
Great Case. The case is made of good quality clear plastic.  It has a soft silicon plug in the bottom to protect the 2 jacks but allows you to easily access the headphone jack without removing the plug. It fits the second generation nano like a glove.  There is an optional soft silicon cover for the wheel that works very nicely to protect from scratches
Great Antenna wish I purchased it sooner.. For starters, the Terk HDTVa is the amplified version of the Terk HDTVi.  Let me make this short and brief, not all antennas (I realize antenna is already in the plural form but it just doesn't sound right) are created equal.Although I'm not far from our local towers (about 12 miles) the line of view is covered with trees and buildings.  I was previously using a RCA amplified indoor antenna given to me by a coworker who opted for a Channel Master 4228 outdoor antenna because he was 50 miles from the tower.  The RCA gave me all the channels from my local tower but with very weak signal strength.  The difference with this Terk is night and day.  I no longer have to get up to adjust the antenna when watching my favorite shows.
My son is very happy with it. Works well, not problems with downloading.  No cords, just plugs in.Works great.
Excellent product!. This is a great pack of photo paper/ink. My only complaint is that the paper is post card sized and has post card mailing lines across the back of the paper. Other than that it is great
Best mouse ever. I have been using this mouse for almost 2 years now. I have not had any problem with it. It is small to carry around. I like it a lot. I will recommend it.I give 5 stars
Best deal from Haliburton. This is the best deal from Haliburton that the government ever got.  Now I want my $800,000 toilet seat for that $18.99
Good Looks Great performance. AM sensitivity is very good on this model. AM frequency lock is a little difficult to master, however it makes the set drift free. I own two of these. I use one as my bedside reciever and alarm clock. Great battery life and a good all round FM reciever. Shortwave is sensitive for the casual SW buff. Serious SW listeners may want to look at models that include sideband reception. This set does not have it
Excellence TV. This 52" Sharp LCD TV is a nice TV.  It looks really good with HD signal.  I connect my Oppo (1080p) to that TV and picture quality is amazing.  I have that TV for about 2 weeks and really enjoy watching it.  I only have complaint about the remote control that came with the TV.  It looks really cheap and did not give me an expensive feel.  I have another Sharp LCD (Made in Japan) and that remote has more functions than LC52D62U and it gives me a better feel that I own an expensive TV.  Overall, it is a great TV.  I would give 5 stars if they have a better remote
great bang for the buck. Great price, good speed on nikon d200 and hp hx4700 pda. nothing bad, all good
Wonderful Picture. After researching several portable DVD player I decided to purchase the Phillips PET1000 10.2 Portable DVD Player and have been very pleased with this purchase.  The is hands down the best picture of any of the available portable DVD players.  The battery is a bit bulky but not a problem.  The remote is great.  The sound from the speakers is adequate but then you don't expect home theater quality sound in a portable player.  Overall, this is an excellent product.  At the current price this is an excellent deal and I would highly recommended it to anyone looking for a quality portable DVD unit.
Energizer ER-P290 2.4-Volt Cordless Phone Battery. Good price.  Timely delivery.  Shipping and handling quite high for single item.  Glad I ordered three at the same time
Recommended by SONY. By using this double-sided miniDVD media, I save space for it case. Just need one case instead two. Usually Sony DVDcam showing warning if it detect DVD media unless SONY product. I have try Verbatim's, Memorex's, Melody's, that the message always shown-up. With this JVC products, the message never appear as like SONY DVD media
Great document/receipt scanner for Windows and Linux. I've used the Canon CanoScan LiDE 60 under Microsoft Windows Vista and Ubuntu GNU/Linux 6.10, and it works great in both. I purchased this product for scanning documents and receipts, and it does its job very well.With Windows Vista, you need to download the drivers from Canon's website (they're not included with Vista). The drivers are very minimal, lightweight, and easy to use; in about 5 minutes I was scanning documents straight into Adobe Acrobat.The LiDE has to be one of the easiest hardware installs I've ever done in Linux. I plugged the scanner in, and started xsane. It detected my scanner and I was scanning immediately--that's it, no having to install or configure anything!I've a few complaints:* Noisy: the motor that draws the scanning head makes a very high pitched screech when moving. When I first received the device I thought I'd be able to use it in a library--not happening unless the library is deserted.* Adequate color reproduction/photo scanning: The color reproduction on my Epson 2450 is leaps and bounds better. The LiDE however is easily 1.5-2x faster, a fraction of the price when comparing MSRP, and has much nicer drivers.* Too lightweight to scan books easily: The scanner being featherweight is a good thing, except if you have to scan books or anything bound/stapled of more than a couple pages. Stuff shifts easily if you do not hold the scanner and book while scanning
Excellent Phone. I have read reviews complaining about this phone.  I disagree.  It serves its purpose very well.  I have not had problems getting over 2 hours of talk time from this phone.  I made sure my initial charge was 12 hours before I used it the first time.  Since then, I can use the phone all day without any problems.  I use skype a lot as I have family in Europe and South America.  I wonder why this phone is not readily available in large electronic stores.It is an excellent phone I highly recommend it.  I bought mine from Amazon via Beach Audio and the phone arrived on time and in good condition.I use an 802.11G router with wep128 encription and have had not problems with linking.  True it will not work at hotspots that require web based identification, but the truth is hotspots are still not ubiquitous enough to consider it a realistic option.  As a skype phone at home that does not require you to have the computer on, I find this a very impressive first attempt.  SMC should be applauded, and place this phone on more retail shelves.Dr. Houman Javeda
Outstanding backpack with room for everything!. This is simply an outstanding, sturdy backpack that has been well thought out to store your 17" laptop, books, and all other necessities for school or when you're on the road for work.  The tiered top zippers make it very easy to get at anything, and it has ample side pockets needed to store your laptop power cord, bottle of water, etc.  It's not bulky at all, stands upright well and looks very sharp.  You can't go wrong with this bag
A first time DigiArtist. I love this Tablet, It's just like working with the real thing with out all that mess, just got to get used to it, I never thought I woulde use the modern art tech but I gave it a chance and I love it.
Worked like a champ. I purchased this cable for my wife's MP3 player.  The original cable had met an unfortunate demise on I-520 here in GA.  This cable worked perfectly.  No issues.  I was also able to use the cable to transfer information to my brand new PSP with this same cable.  Highly recommend - no issues - high speed transfers no problem
Most comfortable gamer headset yet. After doing much reading of personal reviews on forums I narrowed it down to this and the icemat headset. What put this one above the icemat's was it's retractable microphone and the fact that it had been redesigned to be sturdier.I was also worried about them making my ears too hot, as I have experienced with other headsets, but to my surprise they do not get hot and they have super soft padding around the earphones and the headband. I can wear them for as long as I want without any discomfort.The only thing I didn't like was the software that came with it. It made the bass/sound crackly for some reason. I found out that it works just fine on it's own without the software installed. So when you do get it, don't bother installing the "drivers" and software, it works perfect as is. Just plug and play.
Samsung HP-S4253 42" Plasma HDTV. We are very happy with our new TV.  The picture quality is great and was very easy to set up and use.  This was by far the most TV for the money, you won't be disappointed
huh. "Works with the following models: CTK-431, CTK-451, CTK-471, CTK-481, CTK-491, CTK-496, CTK-551, CTK-571, CTK-573, CTK-591, CTK-651, CTK-671, CTK-691, CTK-731, LK-40, LK-42, LK-43, LK-45, LK-50, LK-55, LK-73, LK-90TV, MZ-2000, WK-1200, WK-1250, WK-1300, WK-1350, WK-1500, WK-1600, WK-1630, WK-1800, WK-3000, WK-3000DX,..."I dare you to name one type of keyboard that this bench isn't compatable with.  Nay, I dare you to name one thing period that a bench isn't going to work with.  I gave it five stars.  Because it's a bench and you can sit on it
Sandisk Micro SD 2 GB. Purchased for an MP3 player and it works like a charm
Wonderful. I saw the small size of this case and was in love.  It has plenty of space for dvds and cords (though it wont hold large headphones unless they fold).  It is padded enough for protection but not too padded to be too bulky.  It's Great.  You wont regret it.
Bring the bass!. These were replacements for the V-Moda Vibes, a nice pair of cans but a little weak in the bass for me and almost no sound isolation.PROS:  Massive bass.  Highs are kept intact and are smooth.  Best price for dual drivers on the market.  Good sound isolation.  Love the over-ear memory wire, no mircophonics (exterior sounds traveling through wires).  Replaceable cord. Very high sensitivity (119 dB).  Love the double-flanged and foam ear buds.CONS:  A little big and a little ugly (okay with me, they work like hell!).  Cord about 6 inches too short.  Tight squeeze in carrying case.OVERALL:  If you love bass you will regret getting anything else.  They are easily driven by portable players and just make me smile when I turn it up.  Would definitely buy again
there just batteries. theyre friggin' batteries.  what else can I say.  they last ok and cost  ok.  no big deal
great Little IPOD. I now own an IPOD nano and this IPOD shuffle both are awesome.  The Shuffle is great for jogs and long trips when you have to move around and such, the clip desin is great. 10/1
Yamaha YPT-200AD 61 Key Electric Portable Grand Piano with Yamaha Education Suite and AC Adapter. Great gift for 10 year son.Likes it and is growing to love learning how to use it.I like messing around with it myself.Now I just have to figure out how to get Karouke on it.;?
Very good sound. This player is small and fits in my pocket.The sound is really good (althougth I prefer using my own headphones because the ones that come with it are not very comfortable).Operating the menu is a little difficult (it is a wheel) and sometimes you get in the wrong place because you didn't turn it just right.Battery life seems to be pretty good.Overall, I am happy to have a player, so I am happy with it.
It's like having a new music collection. I don't know how they do it.  I am so amazed and impressed by the sound quality of these speakers.  You can hear the music around you as if it's 3-dimensional.  Using iTunes, I played an epsiode of Battlestar Galactica and during a dramatic sequence, I was almost knocked out of my chair by the sound.  I never considered my iMac a home theater system but hey, I think I have it now.  The bass adjustments on the back, coupled with iTunes and iDVD equalizers have enhanced my digital experience.  The closest thing to a negative was losing a USB port to it (I have a hub so not too big a deal).If quality is more important than money, I heartily suggest these speakers.  I formerly used Klipsch ProMedia 5.1 and they pale in comparison.   And don't get me started on the junk that is JBL Creature II speakers.Bose Companion 5.  Feel the music.  No kidding.
Ridiculously Fantastic. I have a number of toys in my older age, and the Apple I-Pod is clearly a favorite! I use it in the car. I use it with my high-end home system. I use it for music enjoyment first and then and occasional audio book. I also use it during a workout. When I travel or get stuck waiting somewhere for something I will use the video. All the functions work great. It's easy to use and it does so much it's just about ridiculous. It's the Mother of all gadgets. If you buy one (and you will be glad) I recommend getting a protective case for it just to keep it looking like new. This compact wonder is one of the few things in life that will give me my moneys worth (and more).
Very good monitor and the stand is very handy. I have been using this monitor for about a week now.  It does require a video card with driver that supports its max. resolution.  Picture quality is very good and the back light breeding is not noticeable under regular conditions.  Text is not as sharp as my Apple powerbook or Sony laptop but acceptable.  The stand is really handy and it is not very big when it is placed on the desk.  A very good buy
sounds awsome!. they sound great and looks cool and goes loud but, the cord is too long. you can just stick in your pocket but it can fall out of your pocket so just tape around the extra cord and it'll sound awsome.
Solid. First off it worked great and is very nice looking (small). This is the cheapest HDMI switch with 5-port I found, but also the most expense video switch I ever bought also. Component switch only run between 20-50 buck. I use this to switch between the PS3 and DVD up-converter and it is very responsive. Got quick delivery from lusopc.The manufacture is Monoprice and HDMI Switcher is just the product name. A couple of other manufactures use this same hardware, just slapping their own brand on it. My TV is a 32" Vizio displaying 1080i and see no image lost at all.  HDMI 1.3 cable and switch are compatible with older version.  Only the devices (PS3, stero reciever) that output that need to be 1.3 compatible.  This is not like the USB upgrade to USB2.
If You Can Have Only One Radio. Every house should have a Grundig S350 Deluxe. Big, brawny, "grabbing" in all the hard-to-get stations with ease, championing a big antenna that says this radio means serious business, the Grundig S350 Deluxe version, is a bigger, better version of the old Grundig S350, eliminating some of the "drift" problems of the earlier model. The speaker on the Deluxe is bigger and brighter. Whereas your fancy digital preset radios often sound like tin, the Grundig S350 DL has depth. Is it a perfect radio? No. You don't have presets in spite of the digital read-out. You get a little AM overload. Here in Los Angeles I get overload on 1150 so that I'm listening to two shows at once. Also the cheaper (and cheaper built) GE Superradio boasts an internal AM ferrite antenna twice the size and as a result gets slightly better AM.If you're looking for a radio with similar features as the Grundig S350 DL but erases its weakness--no presets and AM overload, then you might want to check out the Grundig G4000A. It's the same price as the S350 and its speaker is surprisingly good for a digital preset shortwave radio. Or you might look at the stunning Kaito 1103 or its more expensive cousin the Eton E5. But even if you get a fancy preset radio, every house should have the big easy-to-use Grundig S350 Deluxe.Update: Comparing the S350 to the same-priced G4000 for several months, it becomes clear that the G4000 is a better buy: superior AM, superior separation of AM stations, presets, same warm speaker, and smaller.
If you can tap out a rhythm with your fingers... Tried this after using (and returning) an Akai MPD16, which looks pretty similar - but this feels better, responds better, has more features and is easier to use. And unlike the previous reviewer, I didn't have any problems whatsoever with hooking it up: I just plugged in the USB cable, it worked, no drivers needed, end of story. Great with Ableton Live, and just amazing when hooked up to percussion instruments like StormDrum. Highly recommended.
Great Product. I use this card scanner all the time now.  It works perfectly and is small enough to be unobtrusive on my desk
SDHC Card Reader. Got this to keep WITH my camera at all times for download to PCs.  Works GREAT with SDHC and has an nice rear door that stays on the reader (can't misplace it) to keep the SDHC card area clean.  Very slick design.  Reads all my new SDHC cards and small enough to keep in camera case to alway have handy for downloading.  If you are using the cable that came with your camera...STOP today!  THis way is WAYYYYY faster to download pics
What a great HDTV for the price!. I've been looking at HDTV's for 2 years now.  I looked at DLP's and Plasma's first.  However, I must say I love this 40" LCD best!  The picture is great in HDTV and very good on non HD channels too. With the price it's at now I don't think you will be disappointed.  The only negative is fast scrolling letters across the screen ex. espn news flashs are a little blury. I think you will have a hard time buying a better TV.  Amazon also had great prices on Monster cables and surge protectors too.  I plan to put on 15lbs this year with this TV!!!!!
Good Service. CD player arrived in excellent shape and as promised; extra care taken in packaging.  Very nice product
Seems Pretty Good to Me - But Watchout for the "OLD" Platinum Version. I agree that the build quality on the Platinum is slightly lower than the original 10c series I remember from the 80s (keys and case seem more "plasticy").  However, everything else that matters about this new version is positive.  As far as speed goes, I can't really see any difference.  I tried the interest rate calculation suggested by another reviewer, and my 12cP returned the answer in about 1 second.  How much faster do you want?  It's a CALCULATOR, not a PC!===Update: Because of the many contradictory comments here, I decided to do some further research on the Platinum. For example, my 12cP does the TVM calculation specified by another reviewer in about 1 second, whereas that reviewer was experiencing upwards of 30 seconds for the same calculation. Well, it turns out there is a FIXED version of the 12cP out there that addresses this speed issue, as well as keyboard problems, lack of parenthesis, and other issues. Unfortunately, there's really no way to tell what you're going to get if you order on-line. The model number is the same and the only visible difference that I know of is open/close parenthesis symbols on the STO/RCL keys. This should be visible without opening the retail package. I'm guessing the poor reviews here are by unfortunate folks that have the OLD version, while the positive reviews are being put in by us lucky ones
it simply works after all. this little baby is just hook up my desktop, wireless AP, wired router togetherit just works, nothing elsetips: if you'd like to use overseas, buy nokia AC adaptor (auto-volt model), it just works with nokia phone chargerthat's all, no question aske
Canon Pixma IP1700. The printer was easy to set up and get operating. It is a lot quieter and faster than the Epson model 820 that it's replacing.The only short coming that I have found to date is that will not accept envelope templates for odd sized envelopes that I had set up for the Epson.Ink usage is better managed by the Canon than the Epson. Also, heads do not need to be cleaned as often.I am waiting for Canon to provide an update to re-activate their "Easy-WebPrint" format. The new Explorer 7 will not accept it
intuos 6x11. I bought the intuos 6x11 pen tablet couple weeks ago and I use italmost every day so far so good, I don't expect to have any problems with it.I used to have a small wacom graphire and I used for years then unfortunately the pen broke so now I own a new onethe only advice I can give to you is to keep it clean, wipe it out every now and then with a wet clothjo
I'd be lost without it. The TomTom GO 300 did a great job navigating me around an unfamiliar city.  I'd be lost without it for sure.  I would recommend anyone getting this.  It saved so much time I would have devoted to reading maps had I not had it
He sure is... There's no such thing as a 1 and 0 on a wire... just high frequency analog signals that need to be passed well enough that they can be deciphered as 1's and 0's by the receiver.  Guy from Providence is absolutely right - it has to be the right cable.   A cable for digital audio has to be balanced and have low enough loss that it can pass high bandwidth (ie - digital) without attenuating or causing excessive jitter, etc.  If the cheaper cable sounds no worse in your setup, maybe it's not so bad... or maybe the bit error rate was higher and just not enough to be noticeable
Need to purchase good headphones seperately!. Good product, except for the headphones that are included. Also, check in the manual for the site to download the MP3 software for ripping and burning... Only needs one battery
It's fine!. Mixed reviews from people on this. I think it's fine. I got 2 as gifts for friends in Africa and were there when they arrived. They work great and both people are very satisfied with them. For the money, they can't be beat
Excellent Lock!. The Kensington Microsaver DS lock is really good. Right out of the box you can tell its very strong and i feel confident this lock could stop all but the most determined thief from walking away with my laptop. (Given a good amount of time and the right tools - any lock can be broken) Notebook locks are, in effect, a visual deterrent. You're average pick up and go with your laptop thief wont bother with trying at it, they'll just move onto something easier. The lock design is really good, much better then the classic design that has videos all over the internet showing how it can be picked with such high-end objects as a piece of cardboard from a toilet roll or a hollowed out ball point pen. The rubber surface where the lock comes in contact with the notebook is definitely a plus, won't be doing any damage to your notebook. The lock itself again, feels and is strong. Definately something you want to look into, I spent a lot of time comparing this to the regular Microsaver one as well. The DS is worth that extra $8 I paid for
I keep coming back to this one. I owned this before for several years.  It finally gave up after water got into it through a small rip in the top, but it gave us alot of good use.  This new one has the weather band button, which we also like.  I have tried others, but none have really compared to this one.  It looks nice, is easy to use, has the timer and the clock.  Overall a great product
Generally OK. I have owned 3 of these phones for over 2 years. They were very reasonably priced and have worked OK for the time I have had them. Last week we had a power outage. After about 10 minutes I decided to phone a friend and found all three phones were dead. Something about the outage discharged them immediatly. This is not acceptable & even though they recharged I am now looking for new phones
power charger. gives me charged cells in quick time..added advantage is the world wide voltage capabilit
Very well worth the money. I ordered these because of their sound isolation feature.  These come with a small carry case that I like to bring around along with my iPod.  And they also come with 9 different earplugs for you to customize.  They have 3 different kinds of plugs each with 3 sizes.  They have clear plastic ones, soft black plugs, and foam plugs.  I find the clear plastic ones to be way too hard so i tried the black ones which i used for a while and then tried the foam ones.  Boy can I tell you, the foam earplugs are genius.  They don't look as cool but they work exactly like earplugs.  you roll them up and then put them in your ear and they expand to fill your earhole and you pretty much don't hear anything except for your music.  The foam ear pieces are by far the best ones they have to offer in my opinion.  Other than the superior sound isolation, the sound quality from these are amazing.  I own sennheiser pc150s paired with x-fi sound card and they aren't nearly as good as the e2g's with my ipod.  If you have the money, buy this and you won't be disappointed.  these work for jogging too, its really hard for them to fall out but easy to take off when you need to
Improved Satellite Radio Reception. This antenna definitely improved the signal for Sirius radio.  We still get some "dropouts" around noon to 2 PM Pacific time, so we may still need to optimize the antenna position
Very Good Batteries, Questionable Value. The batteries worked well directly out of the package.Recharging time is commensurate with other rechargeable batteries of the same mAh rating.The price premium for these batteries is questionable.
Good quality webcam. I found no problem installing the software. And the quality is much much better compared to my old legitech webcam. Even in the dark room, the picture is still bright. I love this camera
Great Sound and Functionality. I play games and listen to music, and this is one fine system for doing both. I especially wanted this system for its architecture (wireless surround-sound speakers, powered by an electrical outlet instead of batteries). The surround-sound wireless connection is flawless, and the setup is nice and neat with no cables getting in the way--and of course, the sound quality is superb. The one problem I have, which took me a while to figure out, is not really a problem with this system in itself. I use a Linksys wireless router and network card, which both run at the same frequency (2.4 GHz) as the wireless speaker connection. Turns out when I have the speakers on, my wireless connection to my router gets blocked most of the time. I verified this several times by switching my speakers on and off. So just one thing to consider. Hopefully, I can fix this by playing around with different channels on my wi-fi network
Love it!. Love the double screens, this was the best investment that we have made in a long time.The great thing about this DVD player is that you can use it anywhere - hook it to the TV, use it in the car, or just in the house for an extra player when two kids are fighting over what move to watch!Glad we bought it
Great price and it works!. Just picked this up for my older desktop and had it installed and running within 5 minutes.  I had previously tried a Linksys card but I could not get it to identify my IP address or stay connected.  The D-Link software/driver install was much quicker and I don't have any unnecessary programs running in the background slowing my machine down.  I swear that my wireless connection is even faster than my wired connection.  Perhaps my standard ethernet card needs replacing as well!For the price, this one is tough to beat!
NOW a great value in speakers. Several years ago when these first came on the market they were totally novelty priced, ie. more expensive than warranted. But now at 399. they are a great value and I say this not only because I own them and I'm thrilled but also I know several people who have them in various sized rooms and varying placements, and these speakers simply kick it!! With all due respect to the naysayers, unless you're an ardent audiophile, these speakers will make you very happy
WARNING: No Razer mouse, you better test before you buy. I was looking at this mouse pad already at CompUSA where it was far higher prized but I wanted it.  As soon as I came home I ordered in and waited at the door.  As soon as I got it in my hand all kind of things started flying of my desk to make room for it, but well worth it!The first mouse I tested was a Microsoft laser mouse and it miserably failed!  I could not get it to work at all (PANIC) but once I tested my Razer Copperhead everything work fine and (no surprise here) my Logitech Mouse also worked great!  WARNING: In case you do not plan to use a Razer mouse you may want to test your mouse before you buy.Its wrist support and unique dual sided design works very well for me, one of the guys that sit thousands of hours a year in front of my computer.  In addition I switched over to using my Razer Copperhead as my full time mouse for both gaming and my actual job writing code.  Because of it size I never had to lift the mouse of the mouse pad, even while running dual 20" wide screen LCD monitors.Looking at its price it may be overkill for a thin, stamped-out sheet of aluminum with two different surface codlings, 8 rubber feel and a wrist rest.  Looking at the price maybe, but I love it and would buy it again!
Great mounting kit. The kit was easy to install and looks great.  I used the mounting brackets for Polk Audio Speakers and was able to successfully install both on the ceiling and a 45 degree mounting service.  You can obtain virtually any angle with the three dimensions of movement in the mounts
great product/ makes life easier. This one of those products your girlfriend wonders why you are wasting your money on, that turns out to make life so much easier.  It has allowed me to leave my ipod in my backpack on my way to work, and go through security to get into work, all without having to open my bag.  The remote has a velcro strap that I use to attach to the shoulder strap of my back pack.  I am able to start and stop tunes and change the volume without needing to pull the ipod out.  My only complaint was that the headphone jack should have a strap or something to help keep the headphones in all the way and the device could also have a strap.  As the device is made for active people it would be nice to know that everything would stay connected, because when things do come undone, you do have to open your bag and put it all back together and that defeats the point of having the air click.
Great product!!. I'm using this with my Samsung BlackJack and it works fantastic with Google Maps/ Windows Live Search. GPS signal acquisition can take up to about a minute sometimes but then it just works. To anybody considering the combo with a Window Mobile phone please be aware that you'll need to "hack" the registry to get the phone to recognize the GPS. Not hard  - they are plenty of WebSites describing the process but definately not out of the box. Not a fault of this devise though
I got what I wanted. I've been wanting one of these for years.  It is so very handy as I can take it with me to any room or to my vehicle, as we only have a CD player in it.  I listen to a lot of tapes and my regular tape deck just wasn't cutting it.  Thank you for still carrying a tape player that I don't have to wear head phones to
Very good SD Card. I like it very much, I use it in an outdoor trail camera for wild game and it hold several pictures and has been in the camera in all kinds of weather. I would buy Kingston again
Love it!. I bought this for my 4 year old instead of the FP keyboard.  Such a good move.  It sounds great and keeps his interest (and his parents love to play it too!).  I love how the display shows the notes.  The ONLY minor complaint so far is that it defaults to the loudest setting.  If it defaulted to the lowest setting it'd be perfect
Uniden TRU8885-2 5.8 GHz Cordless Phone. I've gone through many cordless phones and the change to this one was due to interference on my wireless network from a 2.4GHz phone. The interface is the most user friendly of all the phones I've had. Especially simple is accessing call waiting and creating a conference call. The bright orange display is easy to read and it's a cinch to program in numbers. The answering machine, self-contained in each handset and on the base station, is easy to program and has a very clear sound. Highly recommended
This thing is great!. It's simple, easy to use, versitile and unobtrusive.  Instead of carrying a big folder of CDs, I have a tiny folder of SD chips with ALL of my 4000 songs of music. I like have different chips better than an ipod in the car since its easier to deal with
superb case.... I recently bought a second gen nano, and was looking for an acrylic case to keep it safe.  It is sturdy, and the clickwheel covering is awesome (it's thin molded acrylic so no dirt can get in).  This is an absolute must-have if you use the ipod+nike running attachment.  It plugs easily into the nano without having to take the cover off.  Sure, there is no armband or beltclip but I just tuck it into the front pocket of my winter shell. The caribiner clip is a nice touch.  Overall, it's $20 well spent
Great remote for TIVO units!. I bought this to replace a lost Tivo series 2 remote control. Worked right out of the environmentally unfriendly plastic packaging
Monster Ultra High Capacity Batteries. This is a great purchase.  I'm very happy with the performance, quality and time to charge.
Great headphones!. I bought these because I was trying to find some headphones that would not fall out of my ears.  These are the only ones that I have found that will stay in my ears while I am running.  They are also very durable.  When my last pair fell out of my ears and hit the pavement, they broke instantly.  While running with my new Jensens the other day, a neighborhood dog ran out to greet me.  He jumped up on me (affectionately) and accidentally yanked them out of my ears.  They got jerked around by the dog as he was tangled in them and they hit the pavement, but they still work perfectly!  I definitely recommend them!
Great memroy card, very cheap for its enormous capacity. i got this minisd for 1 month now and its working like a charm.buy it it the best choice for the best price
Good Deal for The $$$, Works Great Overall. We purchased these to replace a forever defective Motorola set. Initially we had issues with the phones cutting out in the middle of calls - but that seems to have subsided and they work just fine. We use vonage - Voice Over IP and they work great with that. A great deal for the money!!
Great Bluetooth Headset. I purchased the system because I wanted a headset that would work with my office phone as well as with my Treo 650.  Installation was fairly straightforward.  I also purchased the online indicator light, which is helpful when someone walks into your office unaware that you are on the phone and starts talking to you.The system has clear sound, plenty of volume, excellent range for Bluetooth, and the headset is comfortable to wear.  I wear it all day long (except when I'm in a client meeting or otherwise do not wish to look like a geek), and charge it for about half an hour or so with the included A/C charger when I get home.Be aware that there are limitations to using the headset with the cell phone.  The Bluetooth radio of the Treo isn't as powerful as the Plantronics base unit, so the range and ability to communicate through solid objects are reduced.  Also, answering an incoming call using the phone works well, but I haven't quite mastered the process of answering the call with the headset button yet.  Still, I'm pleased with the overall performance of this headset with the Treo, and it's smart enough to be able to use with both phones at the same time
Great value for a sturdy, easy-to-install mount. I read the Amazon customer reviews on this wall mount, and decided to check it out. I am glad I did! I have a 32" WinBook LCD, and installation was a snap. The tv looks great, and I am really happy with the articulation. I installed it at night and kept waiting to hear a crash before morning, but this arm is extremely sturdy. It is also adjustable for leveling the display; this is good because even though it is perfectly level on the wall, apparently the plate that mounts to the display is not squared, but I was able to easily compensate. I recommend this to anyone who wants to be as cool as me
XM Antenna. I have two of these antenna's. I have two different XM radios in my house and these antenn'a work great. In my location I didn't have to get to the South side of my house to get good reception. Great product at a great price
D-Link is tops. I had been using a Belkin F5U021 4-Port hub. My computer was constantly reporting Low USB power, I'd have to unplug something to get something else working. Since I replaced it with the D-link. No more Low USB messages; No more un-plugging.As a matter of fact I had previously replaced my LinkSys router (which I had to reset from time to time) with a D-Link. I've never had to reset the D-Link.Obviously, D-Link makes very good products.I highly recommend D-Link products
Pretty good... I just got this device a few days ago.  I have to agree with the reviewer that you will need to put up with a little hiss/pop on occasion but I'm ok with this.  I love the size and the ability to just unplug it and take it in the house.I too use a Sirius FM transmitter and love the quality.  I guess I never noticed how good it was till it was mentioned here.  I do, however, wish it had the same "preset" features that the Belkin TuneFM does, that's a fantastic feature.One small annoyance I had with the Belkin is when you sometimes press a button on the device, it causes the audio on your ipod to pause for a second.  It's not a big deal, just something I noticed.Overall I like it.  I've only had it for 2 days though, we'll have to see how well it holds up
Very Very good Sound. First of all, I have been an audiophile since age 8. I am 51 now. I own a 35K Krell audio system, for those in the know. I cannot tolerate sound that is not accurate and I must say, these spealers are very accurate for two channel. I would give them  5 stars if it were not for the price. The surround is just a plus for me as music in my main concern. When I connected this up per instrution, I was up all night listning to  jazz.Don't get me worong, in no way can this system sound as good as my Krell setup, but I can at least listen to them, which is more than I can say for most computer speakers I have hears with their boomy bass
Great value for cost. You can't go wrong with this little adapter.  I am using it on my iBook G4, for audio input (microphone).  It works just fine.  I looked at a number of other items which were more pricey and had cords to mess with.  This adapter plugs right into the usb port and you mic or headphones plug into it.  It works great for my needs.  I've also checked it out with headphones, and it works fine.  I recommend this item.
Works well - may need to order another tip for your device. Excellent robust design.  If going to a no-electricity place, this is an ideal way to charge your electrical device (provided there is access to sunlight).  It's a bit expensive but the quality is obvious.  My unit did not have the tip for my cell phone so it had to be ordered (more expense).  Folds up and easy to carry.  If going on an extended trip to the woods and you need your radio, phone, or gps, this is the ticket
Not a bad piece of hardware. I was given a Zune as a gift, recently. This isn't the first MP3 player I've owned but it's the one with the largest capacity to store data that I've owned. Up front I'll tell you that I'm not a hardcore iPod junkie, nor am I an Apple kiss-butt. I believe in products that work. That being said I can see why people prefer the iPod over the Zune, though I will say that the Zune isn't deserving of some of the bashing I've read on these boards from people who believe it's cool to bash Microsoft products just because they were made by Microsoft.The Good1. The Zune has a large, bright LCD screen that can be easily seen in sunlight. Video and picture quality are good.2. The sound quality is good. The factory earphones are adequate in delivering music though I have a pair of Philips earphones that are far superior and only cost $20.3. The box includes a data cable you need for syncing.4. The interface is super easy to use and it is easy to get around in the Zune environment and I've not had any of the music skipping problems with the 1.3 firmware that was automatically downloaded when I synced to my PC.5. The unit itself feels solid when held, and slightly heavy though not too heavy.6. The software loaded without a problem on my WinXP SP2 system and I had no problem syncing to the machine when connected to a USB port at the rear of the PC. I had all of my non-ITunes songs added to the player within minutes.7. The Zune allows you to beam songs, pictures and movies to other Zune players in range.For a first generation player, it gets the job done nicely and I look forward to seeing what generation 2 will bring.The Not So Good1. When I connected the Zune to a 4 port USB hub the PC didn't recognize it was there. I had to connect it to the back of the PC to a USB 2.0 port in order to get it to work. Maybe that's by design, though I'm not sure. Once I did this I had no syncing problems at all.2. I've never found another Zune in range to share anything. Leaving the wireless on seems to drain the battery faster. I'd recommend turning this feature off until more people buy the Zune (if that happens).3. You can't buy music or movies wirelessly.4. Although the Zune has wireless it is not compatible with your home or business wireless LAN.5. You can't browse the internet with the Zune.6. The Zune software has no problem getting your music onto the device, though the Zune Marketplace is vastly understocked compared to the ITunes music store.7. The Zune cannot get music purchased through ITunes (this is nitpicky, I know, but would be so nice). There is a way to work around this - you can burn your ITunes songs to a disc and then turn around and rip the disc to the PC as MP3s and then import them to the Zune, which I would rather do than pay money to re-purchase music I've already bought once.8. There's no way to re-organize files on your Zune once they are uploaded to the device. Say for example I want to throw a couple of pictures into a picture folder so that when I view my pics I don't have to scroll down forever and a day to see them. I have to delete the pic from the Zune through the PC software, add the pic to the folder I want and then sync the PC to the player. The folder had to have been added to the Zune library in order for the update to occur.9. There's no way to change the orientation of photos or movies when viewed. I would like to be able to flip them counterclockwise or clockwise 90 degrees to view them in portrait view instead of turning the player on its side to view in landscape mode. One reason why this is important is when I set one of my pics as my Zune background, I'd like to be able to see just how much of the pic will be cut off since the Zune doesn't resize the pic to fit. Oh yeah, that's another thing...10. Pics used for the Zune background don't have an option to be re-sized to fit the screen.What I Would Like to See Change on the Zune (more for Microsoft than anyone else)1. Options for re-sizing pics to fit the Zune screen2. Options for changing the orientation of pics and movies3. The ability to organize my files in the Zune without having to delete the file and re-sync. I'd like to be able to do this from the player and from the software both.4. Since I have to use the USB port on the back of my PC a longer sync cable would be nice.5. Put the built-in wireless to good use. Slap in compact Internet Explorer and allow viewing of web pages and email! You don't need a keyboard to view read-only content like weather, news and sports and it would really add to the player's value6. Allow the Zune to be able to buy music, pics and video without having to connect to the PC. Again, make use of the wireless capability of the Zune.7. Do something about the Zune Marketplace - it just needs an overhaul. It needs additional music, movies and a definite bump in the cool factor.8. Make it easier to customize the outside of the Zune. You did this with additional and customizeable faceplates for the XBox 360 - do the same for this player. If you hadn't noticed - individuality is in and is here to stay
Handy little gadget. My workspace lighting is not ideal. I found that my desk lamp cast some shadows and glare, so I picked up this notebook light to cast a more even light on my keyboard.The one downside is the "spotlight" effect. Most of the light is concentrated right below the fixture, but it still greatly improves my view.It rolls into a neat little coil I can tuck inside my computer bag.Buy it, you'll like it..
Kanguru MP3- 2GB. this took me a while to figure out but now that i know how to use it i like i
very good quality.....easy clean..... nice item..... very good item , special designed for bose products,i like it,looks fine..
CLASSY - PERFECT FIT. LOVE IT... it fits ipod 30gb perfectly.works great in bose also. will keep your ipod safer.highly recommend this product.
These Earbuds Are The Best. I took my MP3 player into the store with me to check out earbuds.Eveyone I tried was terrible; so I ended up buying online.I read all the reviews, especially Amazon reviews; because the people know what they are talking about.I have bought 5 pair altogether for friends, and they love these buds too.The music I listen to ranges from Tupac to Vivaldi, and everything in between. My MP3 player has 9 EQ settings; I keep it on new age most of the time.The price is right, and the sound is the best.
Texas Instrument TI-84 Plus Grafting Calculator. This calculator has provided my daughter with all the functions needed to do her school work  If you're looking for something small, this is not for you
Olympus 202049 USB 200 Media Reader. EXCELLENT PIECE OF EQUIPMENT. SHOULD BE STANDARD ISSUE WITH CAMERAS USING AN XD CARD.  MAKES REVIEWING PICTURES A SNAP
Gets the job done with no hassle. It's a basic printer that prints. I have no problem with using it. So far, no hassle no breakdowns
THE Universal Remote. Wonderful upgrade from the 890.  The touch screen works beautifully and is able to utilize all functions perfectly.  Still easy to use and considerably durable given what it is.  It doesn't come with the wireless expansion unit which is a must to purchase separately.  I used mine from the 890 remote and it works just fine.
Quality @ Reasonable price. I have two sets of these speakers, each set on seperate floors! They are small, compact, and produce a nice, big sound for a varity of stereo attachments.A very good value
awesome flashdrive. i disagree with all the negagtive comments twords the lexar's line of lightning flash drives.i keep mine attached to a messanger bag at all times, i toss it around all the time and never have i had mine get distroyed. if you treat your electronics with alittle bit of care (when pluging into the computer and taking out), keeping this flash drive in one piece should be fine.its extremely fast to put  music on, almost as soon as you drag a single file will it be on the flash drive. Its also alot nicer looking than most flash drives that are out right now for the price. and all the applications they make for usb drives work amazing on it.
Pretty good for Ipod Photo. screen and dial protectors are great! Cute design and looks nice in clear white. Worth i
the sound needs work... I got these headphones and they fit great and they don't fall out, but there is a little bit of a static sound when I use them. It isn't loud, but there is one and when nothing is playing, you can hear it. It might have been defective when I got it, but I'm not sure. Overall, I will stick with them
Great cheap cord. Used it to hook up my Apple Airport Express to my 5.1 Samsung sound system to play my iTunes music wirelessly to it. Auesome
Good cassettes in good soft plastic boxes. I've purchased these cassettes 1.5 years ago and now I am contemplating to purchase either between 10 or 20 more. I love their soft plastic boxes (shells) that don't crack if it is accidentally dropped.The quality of the tape looks good. I worked with TDK cassettes in the past and trust their magnetic media
Best of current crop. I think this is about the best of the current crop (end of year 2005) of dual tuner video cards. However, I am still looking forward to the next generation as this card and many in the same category have somewhat "mushy" video, slightly washed out color. This particular model has audio problems on some channels about 5% of the time, so recorded shows are sometimes not watchable. New drivers did not help. You can only use one type of video input at a time: either the 2 tuner coax inputs or the 2 A/V inputs (this is probably a limitation of MCE, not the card itself). It installed flawlessly and setup in Windows MCE was effortless -- perfect score on this count. The FM tuner works well, however for some reason you can't listen to FM while tuning a channel/recording (could be an MCE limitation again). Overall I love this card, but as I said, very anxious to see what the next gen offers
Hard to remove. It's a flash memory card used in a LG cell phone.  It works.  It is, however, difficult to remove from the adapter necessary to use it in a card reader.  I have a card of another brand that is much easier to remove from its adapter
Perfect phone for the Princess in your life. My daughter could not have been more pleased to receive this princess phone for her birthday!  It is quite large and does not fit on a nightstand very well, so be prepared to have some space available.  It also goes through batteries pretty quickly, but that could be because my princess loves to play the Demo in which the 4 princesses swirl around the tower to classic Disney music and talk to you
Shipping Charges. Excellent product but why are your shipping charges 10 times higher than Epson
Better then iPOD's arm band!. I LOVE this arm band. I have had it for about 6 months now. You dont have to take your iPOD out of the arm band to charge it or to hook it up to your computer. I also only use my iPOD for the gym, so its nice that this arm band provides great protection (better than iPOD's armbands because it fits snugly and wont scratch it when you put it on) as well as not coming off while working out.
Smooth upgrade. Installing the Belkin USB card has been the easiest upgrade in recent memory. I put it into a 4-year-old Dell tower running Windows 2000. The card was automatically detected and software installed -- it never asked me for a thing
Portable Cassette Recorder. I love this recorder. It is smaller and more light weight than others that I have purchased. Unfortunately, it is more and more difficult to find a cassette player with decent quality sound. I don't use it for recording, just play back.  The motor does run a little loud, so it may not be as good as another type for actual recording purposes.  It has auto stop (kind of loud) and can be powered with either batteries or the power adapter that is included with it. I liked this model so well, I ordered a second one
Unconfortable. The product is well made and nice, but it is difficult to put a 15" notebook in it. It fit so tight that I think it was made for another size, but not, it is for 13" to 15" notebook
good dvd labels. i used them with cover xp which has preset templates for this paper.Get the covers from cvdcovers.cc and drag and drop from internet explorer to cover xp, press print and you get great labels.Now my daughter (3 1/2 y.o.) stops asking me to read them the labels for her movies, you can choose on her own what she wants to watch (i did not give her the real dvd as she tends to put peanut butter on them
Kingston 1 GB - DIMM 240-pin - DDR II ( KVR533D2N4/1G. My opinion is based on the service provided by Amazon.com.  The service was great no negative feed back to offer.  The Product Kingston ValueRAM memory - 1 GB - DIMM 240-pin - DDR II ( KVR533D2N4/1G ) is also positive.  I will offer a word of wisdom from experience in the IT industry. Select memory that is faster then the minimum required by your motherboard and a Chip set type that is known to work on your motherboard. It pays for it self with no frustration.
Great value!. If your are looking for a big mouse this is for you, I'm using for my laptop, the thing is I really don't like those mini mouse for laptop or even the standard ones for that matter, ergonomically perfect for big sizes, and size does matter when it comes to mouses, to its very painfull for my wrist when I have to use little mouses, so this one is GREA
Good product. Dog walking and sports news a good combination. Bought a sony and a panasonic from amazon, one of each hangs by the front and back doors.  Top pocket no earphones allows me to remain alert to street noises and hear sport shows. Both work equally well
Great for music, but what did she say?. Having owned this system now for a couple of years I have had my ups and downs but overall I am pretty happy with it. For the price you are getting a system that produces excellent clarity of sound with very small speakers. Yeah! On the negative, I don't really understand why they skimp out on the DVD side of things- I mean my $200 pioneer handles the range of DVD's much better. Of greatest concern for me though has been voice re-production. Voices are generally much softer than the other types of sounds, and while bose has a setting to try to rectify this problem, it doesn't do a very good job. Consequently, it can be difficult to hear words when watching tv and DVD's. Also, just a small note, to get the surround sound effect you have to turn the machine up pretty loud (so if you don't care too much for neighbours that won't be a problem). Overall, my music sounds crisp and I love hearing every little noise in my music, so I still have a smile on my face.
Good Investment. I puchased this jumpdrive over 2 years ago and I have no complaints in fact I would like to purchase the 1 GB jumpdrive
Great Product. I purchased the cassette player to listen to audiobooks.  I think it is a excellent product for the price.  The sound quality is very good.  The size is very convient for a shirt pocket so you can listen while walking and doing other things.  The radio plays very well also.  Very pleased with the product
Perfect PDA case. I love this case.  It protects my Palm and also allows me a space to carry my sync cable.  I sync between the Palm, my computer at home and my computer at work.  The cable is always where I need it.  The case looks nice and does exactly what you want it to do.  Only irritation is that a wireless Palm keyboard will NOT fit into the second compartment if you want to zip it all the way up
Got it with new PC. I went and customized a new Gateway PC and you know thought the L2 cache would help me out here...and it does....It's a good cool processor....runs quiet on my PCIt's a good gaming CPU....beats most of what AMD has out right now.If you are a basic user (e-mail, internet only), get the E4300 it's very good and overclockable (go see the benchmark tests) very economical choiceI run this CPU with XP...very very fast....
Very pleased. I wanted a wireless speaker for our deck. I decided on this one based on the reviews and the company that makes it. It is very easy to set up and very good quality.  I used it in the garage all afternoon which is about 30 feet from the transmitter.  The sound quality is good and I programmed my ipod dock remote to work along with it. Very cool.  I like that you can plug it in or use batteries for "true" wireless. I don't know how long 6 c's will last and will probably plug it in most of the time. All in all, I am very pleased with this speaker system
Nice bag. I gave it five stars b/c I got exactly what I expected to get.  Everything fits in it but there is very little extra room, I wanted that.  The ergonomic handle is comfortable.  I would not have chosen this bag when I was executive because it doesn't have the professional polished look.  It is a casual looking bag, which is also what I wanted.  I like the orange detail - it is not too much.  The only thing I'm not crazy about is that it seems heavy to me when everything is in it.  Since my new laptop is lighter/smaller than the previous one, I do suspect it's the bag that adds the weight.  I am overall very happy with the bag though
great TV card and easy to use software. I use this card to record DIY channels and hockey games. The picture quality is pretty good. I used to have it on windows XP pro but now it's running on Media Center Edition. I still use the WinTV2000 sw... don't ask why :)If you plan to use WinTV2000 on MCE, make sure you disable Media Center Receiver Service. Otherwise, you'll get an error, "Failed to create TV Window. hTV=0x3fa1f8 Err=8". Your hex address might be different than mine.I hook up a VCR to convert VHS into digital as well.The only negative thing about this card is the picture gets super white when content is bright in a large area. Watching ice hockey would be an example since the ice is really white, the details such as the puck and players would get "brighten" up as well and blend into the ice. So to fix that, you have to lower the brightness and contrast but that would effect other viewings like movies and shows
Good compact flash card. This is a good compact flash card.  This is faster than most cameras can handle so there was no real reason to go with faster cards that are much more expensive.
Headphones. I am a computer teacher and may of the applications that we use in my classroom involve audio.  After the first few weeks of school, I decided that 38 computers all making noise was simply not working for me or for my students.  I knew that headphones were the answer.  I pay for these items out of my own pocket and needed something inexpensive, but reliable.  These headphones fit the bill.  It is much quieter in my classroom now, and the students can actually hear their own computer, not all 38 of them
excellent memory card. I have 3 different cell phones, each one uses different memory card, (MMS, SDmicro & now MSM) I use to keep music, when I play it's fast to seek, no drain battery power and my music sounds great with earbuds.
Magellan Roadmate 6000T. Great product.  It has worked like a charm.  Large display and easy to use buttons.  Software update was fast and easy.  Traffic alerts and detours have saved me a number of hours sitting in traffic.  I bought an extra cradle and power supply to make it easier to swap in and out of my vehicles.  Currently my wife has hijacked my GPS and uses it more than I do.
I Love This Table !. I certainly don't know what the other reviewers expected...it's a T.V. Tray for Chrissake ! That said, I love this thing. First the basics: Pros: Lightweight, Very easy to adjust, Folds flat for easy storage. Cons: Ugly. Wish it came in "designer colors." A bit expensive given the materials and design...Actually I just bought my second Tablemate II (at Bed, Bath & Beyond) after having my first one about a year. This way I can put a large art book on one and my laptop on the other and angle them accordingly for easy reference. The TMII places my laptop at the perfect angle for writing long essays and now, my dissertation. Some people here complain that it bends after heavy use, but I haven't encountered this despite setting various very heavy things on it over the course of a year. I really like it more than I thought I would (It looked pretty cheesy on T.V. and even in person at BB&B). I gave it a try and am more than satisfied. It slides up very close to me even if I am sitting in a deep chair. I tried a similar tray from Walgreens but it was super heavy and had a profile that did not allow it to be pulled in as close. Plus, the Walgreens' one was made of out pressboard coated with contact paper that looked very cheap and like it would disintegrate with the first good cleaning. Also, it would only support 15 pounds. The Tablemate II is very easy to clean, and thus, I bet it would be great for kids too. In short it works for all of my needs and I can only imagine that the other people here thought they were buying something more high-fallutin than a T.V. Tray. It is what it is. And it is a huge improvement design-wise over those trays of yore with their bad, pseudo-Fantin-Latour flower stencils and spindley, X-crossed, faux-gold-toned aluminum legs my parents had! I am in my comfy chair and using it as a support for my laptop right now as I type this !
PNY does it again!. My family is one of avid gamers.  NCsoft had an update to their City of Heroes Game(which we love) that was more graphically intense for my old PNY Geforce4 Ti 4200 could handle (a great workhorse of a card).I thought I was going to have to update my motherboard to go to the new PCI-e slot to get a graphics card that would be able to handle the demands of the game.I saw this and decided it was worth the try and with no remorse what so ever this card weas bought and is working so beautifully that my desktop that is 4 years old still performs as good if not better than the Dell XPS notebook I purchased for portable game play.To say the least this card can breath life into older systems still running the AGP GPU configuration.  Highly recommended.  The drivers were a little tricky to install from the nVidia website. You will need to unpack them.  The Autoexec. for the nvida Drivers didn't detect the card so using the Device manager update the drivers telling Windows where the folder created by the nVidia drivers is located and you are running up to speed.Graphics a beautiful and fast.  Workiing across 2 monitors is nice as well. I am able to play a DVD on the TV and game at the same time without so much as a hickup.GO for this card
great product for great price. It works realy great, I red some other reviews before buying this product and I can only say that this product is preaty fast and does realy works and for the price I paid its even more than enought to say that its just awsome. great delivery time.
this is the product you are looking for. if you don't want to spend a ton of money and you want the  best quality possible.  i am using the ADS Tech DVD Express 2.0 mainly as tool to put shows that i have recorded on my DirecTV DVR onto DVD.  The quality is outstanding.2 quick complaints, but really these are only minor things:1)  setting up was slightly difficult because i kept getting an error message saying that it wasn't receiving a signal and the plugs needed to be more secure.  the message should have said...."MAKE SURE THE USB CABLE IS PLUGGED IN DIRECTLY TO YOUR MOTHER BOARD"....in other words, in the back of your computer and with a USB port that came with your computer instead of an add on.  easy enough fix, but frustrating to get to that point and realize it was something that simple.2)  on recordings i have found a slightly fuzzy gray line at the top of the video.  This has no impact on the sound or the video quality otherwise, but i wish there was a way to get rid of it to make a 100% pure video with no errors.this is a great product....don't look any where else
Very good reception and easy to operate. I am reasonably impressed with the reception abilities of this radio, especially after reading some of the reviews here.  I live in the SW burbs of Omaha and can get 13 HD stations (one of them is even AM).The radio is very easy to operate, in fact I have yet to unseal the manual.  Comes with a standard FM dipole antenna and an AM loop antenna, which I am using for my antennas.I haven't used it as a clock radio very long yet, so I can't comment on the long term accuracy of the clock section, but it seems to be good so far.The only two features I would would have liked to find and did not on this radio are an equalizer for the radio sound and a scan / auto-station load into preset feature.  Other than those two (minor IMHO) additions, I think the radio performs well and is priced accordingly
the coolest cd player!!!. i am a hello kitty fan and when i this i begged my mom to take me 2 get it. the cd player is very cool and the headphones are so cute but they are not very durable.the anti-skip thing works very well beacause i droped this on the floor nothing happend! most of my freinds think it's ''funny'' that i LOVE hello kitty but i don't care. anyway you should really buy this 4 your daughter or 4 youself!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Well worth it. I have been using a Minolta S414 digital camera. The batteries that came with it were only 1600 mAmps. I never got through an entire ballgame without having the batteries run dry. Of course I carried a spare set, but this was less than ideal. I got these 2000 mAmp Monsters and I must say they deliver what they promise. As a result, I've really not needed the backup set, even when shooting games that went into extra innings! The charger is well made, very quick and has easy LEDs to see the charge status from across the room. Overall, this has been a great purchase
great after you figure it out. i read all the reviews about this one and was prepared for a tough software install.  It isn't tough so much as a bit of a drudgery until you get everything JUST EXACTLY RIGHT.  I have a Samsung 40" lcd, older AV system (stereo only not surround), DVD recorder that I also use as a 2nd channel for PIP and to play movies of course, Motorola STB, 50 disc Sony CD changer, and a optoma projector i use maybe twice a month for movies or something on the 8 ft. screen.Anyway, in 20 minutes I had it all working, OK, but just OK.  The software allows you to do things like turn volumes up and down on devices, decide on the starting channel, pick your own shortcuts for the LCD screen and much much more. After about two hours I had it about perfect.  The next day i tweaked some of my shortcuts based on my experience.  So the ease of installation was only about a 4 (and I'm a technical gadget guy).  But the performance is astounding.  I put 5 old remotes in a drawer and it's just as advertised.  A fanastic purchase at $104 and worth the steep, one time only, learning curve
great to have spare battery!!. The camera goes through battery like crazy, so I got a spare one and I keep one charged at all times and it has came in handy several times. If you have this type of battery I highly recommend that you have a 2cd one. Its well worth it!
Great Deal. Cheaper than most sites ive been to and the product works great with no problems so far
Satellite's Best Friend !. With DVRs requiring multiple tuners, a 3 LNB satellite still needs some assistance.  I installed this Eagle Aspen 4X8 and can now supply both tuners on 2 DVRs as well as 4 additional single tuner recievers without diminishing picture quality.  Make sure you run all 4 outputs from your satellite into the multiswitch, otherwise you will not be able to acquire all channels.  This switch can be mounted indoors or outdoors and cost about $100 less than the ones available at the big box stores and the install instructions include a Technical HelpDesk Phone Number.
This is what HP told me in a Email. the printer will not stop functioning when the ink expire. Would of did copy and paste here but amazon stops you from doing that some how
It does what it says... In no place does it state that you can directly load data from a flash card to the iPod. It is a card reader through USB2.0 and a docking station for your iPod. It works great. The only reason it isn't listed higher is because the driver doesn't appear to be optimal (there is a glitch with iTunes, although it occurs rarely).
Great dictionary/Thesaurus. I purchased the sharp PW-E550 electronic dictionary after reading all the great reviews. English is my second language, so I needed something portable to take with me in college. The thesaurus is been of great help when writing essays. I highly recommend this product. Also, it is pretty well-made, it doesn't look or feel flimsy
Highly Reccomended. Very comfortable.  I have small ears and still have no problems with these guys staying on while I'm working out.  I'm very picky about my headphones at the gym and I am very pleased with these.  Can't beat the price either
Exactly what I needed for working out... I did plenty of research before buying this item.  I was looking for a holder for my iPod specifically for working out and this works great.  My arms are not huge by any means and you can adjust the size easily with the velcro strap.  It has never slipped off or gotten loose on me yet.  The plastic overlay has never given me any trouble when adjusting volume or changing menus while working out on an elliptical machine.  The ONLY problem I have with it is the headphone jack.  I had to take a knife to the armband to cut a small hole so it matches up to where the jack is on the iPOD.  Even that has not torn, ripped or fraid from the incision I made.  Highly recommended it
Excellant buy. I love my Nikon CoolScan V. It set up just great and started cranking out excellent scans right away. I think they must of fixed the problem with scanning Kodachrome in the Nikon Scan software because most my scans are Kodachrome dating back to the late sixties. There are a few inconvenient software items but nothing you can't deal with. Kodachrome slides can't use the dust and scratch eliminator. For the price there is nothing as good as the Nikon CoolScan V. I am running the scanner on a PC with Windows XP Pro.
Good Webcam for the price. Purchased this webcam about 9 months ago. It was difficult to setup but once I got it working it is really quite amazing. I also experienced the frequent lock ups which would require unplugging the webcam in order to reset it - a problem if you have this installed in a remote location. DLink has released a new downloadable (www.dlink.com) firmware upgrade for the webcam. Since I have installed this firmware release (ver 1.02), I have not had any lock up problems. For the price, this webcam has the best feature set out there
Nice and quiet. LaCie has been one of my most favorite brands, since I have done numerous Lab reimaging annually and they keep on going. If you do not have a backup of your data, get this NOW and do it. Lately I've seen 15+ drive failures (clickers and screechers) at work, Dell, hp/compact, gateway, all the same ... None of the owners had a backup. Drives must be reaching their MTTF (Mean Time To Failure).The drive has been working well so far and is part of my backup (S)torage (A)rea (N)etwork. Works well under windows & linux ~[Ubuntu].There might be bigger drivers for the same price, but don't be coaxed by it.-TLU studen
Great Phones, Great Price. Very happy with this purchase. They work great in a big old house that has no phone jacks
Fab. Does the job and has great sound as an addition to the clock radio by Tivoli. The cherry cabinet matches the furniture nicely. The clock itself: not the best, probably, but it does what it should... keeps time well!  The light does not bother me at all. It is dim enough
Excellent... Work great!Just install drivers before hardware.I actualy have a wireless network and with a hawking antenna (HAO9SI) and WAP54GX access point my neiborhood connect to my from 400 meters more o less
Para mi las mejores.. He usado varias marcas de cintas miniDV y estas son las que mejor resultado me han dado. Son muy estables aun en condiciones de mucha vibracion en la camara. Y las puedo usar uno y otra ves son que sufra daos o deterioro
A "Must Have" Addition to Your Sketchup Workstation. I bought this gizmo specifically for use with Sketchup. I am happy to report that the SpaceNavigator's "six degrees of freedom" functionality truly augments and extends SU's navigation commands. My favorite feature is *roll*, which enables you to make your SU model pirouette like a ballerina. Try doing that with SU's *orbit* command! However, be forewarned: if you use SU 6 you'll have to download the latest driver. Also, SU elements such as trees that have a high polygon count do tend to create significant lag in the SpaceNav's screen rendering. But, hey - when I turn my trees off, SpaceNav simply flies! Last, but not least, this input device is well crafted, handles well, and will look great on your desk. :
Great for travel!. This is a great flash reader for travel. If your camera takes an xD card, I would highly recommend this, and with Free SuperSaver Shipping, you can't get much better. Although a large xD card is cheap and I don't usually fill it up on my travels, that doesn't stop my wife from wanting to review the pictures on our computer almost nightly. It's nice not to have to pull out a multi-card reader with separate cable and everything else. This beauty is actually small enough to fit in my small camera bag! Another thing I don't have to worry about forgetting on our trips! If anything, this piece is actually faster than my larger multi-card reader.
Simple and Effective. This thing is really easy to install and mount a flat-screen TV.  The only piece of advice I'll pass on is to get a #3 Phillips screwdriver for driving those bad-boy screws into the studs.  If you're not sure what a #3 is, it's probably one size bigger than what you have
My Belkin Nano Case. I got this case today,November 28th 2005, and I love it. The clip even has a place on the belt clip to put your headphones, but it wont fit if your head phones are too long.The button that holds the flap up is magnetized. The clip wont turn or come off the case, but the clip stays on your belt very tightly. The flap that covers the front is the part that has the clip on it so that you can use your nano while its clipped onto your belt. Anyway, I'll recomend this case to anyone who has a nano, white or black
Decent card for your budget. Installing the card is a bit tricky. You have to install the driver first, then insert the card into the PCI slot. For some reason, the first PCI slot didn't work on my computer. I had to uninstall it and try another PCI slot, and the card was recognized by Windows. However, the monitor port on my computer is right above the antenna jack, so the antenna can't assume the upright position that is required for this card to work! Imagine that! After much agony, I decided to buy a flexible external antenna and replace the tiny antenna that comes with the card. It finally worked. Now I think about it, I may need a third-party external antenna anyway, because the AP is really very far from my computer. After all, this card works like it should and is really inexpensive, despite all the hassels I had to go through
Nice Purchase. Great sound in a small box. Easy to use. Very good AM reception, with antenna use. Like the easy "AUX" input for MP3 player. Solid feel
Great phone with modern design. I'm not really a techie but this phone came with great reviews of interference free calling, so I thought I'd try it out.  The reception is very clear and the design is very modern and simple.  I often lose the phone around the house now because of it's shape, but there is a button you can press to locate it.  The polyphonic ringtones are nice and the answering machine is easy to use.  It doesn't beep to let you know if there is a message but it blinks.  I think it would have looked nicer to have a green digital display instead of an amber one but overall, a great phone
Works great with Canon 350D (Rebel Xt). I'm not beholden to the SanDisk brand, and did quite a bit of research, and the overall reviews tend to point to this product as a great value. In fact, the "Ultra II" title does live up to its name, and am very happy with the performance of this product.  Canon 350D takes 3 frames per second in a continuous shooting mode, and this card had no problem keeping up with the pace, even at the highest resolution.  Download is speedy, too.I went for two 512MB cards instead of a single 1GB card, for redundancy (keep one in the camera and process the other on a computer), and for extra insurance if one card fails for some reason.Highly recommended
An ok holder. This product is [retty good, but don't even try putting a bood on it, the holder will tip over and it doesn't clip the pages of a book very well. But for papers it's good and it's adjustable, which is convient. It did hold my notebook very well, but for books it sucks.
Kensington 62348 Contour Roller Carrying Case. This is my third roller case for my new 17" laptop.  Works like a charm
Right size. I was so glad to run across this product. I always have such trouble when I travel connecting all of my devices in hotel rooms. I can easy fit all 6 of my devices with their big AC plugs into it. Wish it came in black like the "Outlets to go power Strip 4" does...oh well.
Bose Rules. I am sorry to see the negative reviews on this board.  I have had Bose speakers for more than thirty years.  My first set, a pair of 601's is still functioning in a friends house.  My 901 series VI blow away any home theater systems I've heard.  With the direct reflecting sound, there is no need for center channel, rear channel.  You just get realism in the listening experience that is unmatched.  I have two sets of Acoustimas AM-5's and I am totally satisfied.  I've had one set since 1991 and that is a tribute to the quality and longevity of the product.  I purchased a second set when I finished my basement and they are nothing short of awesome.  When I entertain, I almost always get a compliment on the sound of the speakers.  Other reviewers have commented on the lack of bass.  I would just say that you really do have to pay attention to the placement of the subwoofer.  Bose intends for the subwoofer to use the floor as a platform to send the bass throughout the room.  Placing the subwoofer nearer to the corner of the room sometimes will increase the bass.  I have both of my systems set up with the subwoofer in a corner firing out at a 45 degree angle and the rooms are totally filled with deep rich bass.I have always preached the gospel of putting your money in a good set of speakers.  While your other equipment is important, the speaker system will make or break the quality of your sound.  But with any speaker system, you have to finesse the placement for optimal results.
Bought this for my 3 year old grand daughter. This has the clearest picture I have seen on anything in a long time.  My grand daughter watches Cinderella III and Swan Lake Barbie on it and they really come to life.  The only complaint I have is that when the dvd loads it makes an noise but it doesnt have any other problems and that is probably just part of the whole loading process.  It is pretty easy to operate and we keep it in the box it came in while she watches it (just leave the screen open and slide it back into the box, I made a little slit for the cord) that way she cant play with the buttons or put her feet on it. :-)  All in all, so far so good and it was a good price
Works with the 80GB iPod. This charger works fine with my 80GB iPod. After checking the specs on this one and the other one by MacAlly which they sell specifically for the iPod, I'm convinced they're exactly the same. This charger is also ~$12 cheaper than Apple's charger
Love it... As a reporter, I decided to buy this keyboard because I was always taking notes at meetings.  I would highly recommend it.  I used it w/ my IPAQ, and it's lasted two years without ever having to replace the battery.  After using it for a couple years, I've found it easier to type on then a regular keyboard.  Takes a little getting used to at first.My only complaint is that it just randomly stopped working a couple times.  Considering it happened only three times in two years, it's not too bad.  Like I said, I really love mine and would recommend it to anyone else
A great value in a $1000 HDTV. I have owned this TV now for about one week. I was going to wait longer to post a review, but since there are none up here, I thought it would be useful to potential buyers to have it now.I bought this TV for my mother as a gift and my budget was $1000. For that amount of money the HDTV choices were: 27" to 37" 720p LCD; 32" to 35" CRT- based sets; and a few 40-42" DLP sets. Given that the set was for a living room, size was an important priority. So that meant examining most seriously the DLP options.Most DLP sets I looked at in the stores had a pretty decent image when viewed straight on, but like most other rear-projection TVs, rapidly fell off in brightness when viewed off axis. One exception was a 56" Toshiba DLP set which looked better than the others. Try as I might, I was unable to find the 42HM66 in a store, but what finally convinced me to buy it sight-unseen, was the Consumer Reports article which had Toshiba sets taking all of the top positions in the December 2006 ratings of DLP TVs. Though Consumer Reports did not evaluate DLP TVs smaller than 50", I noted that the 42HM66 was of the same series number as one of the best-rated Toshiba sets. So I decided to take a chance. Next the results.Having viewed it about 20 hours I have to say the picture is truly excellent for a 720p set. Colors are bright and the screen has a difficult-to-describe luminous liveliness absent from my new 40" Samsung LCD. Outdoor HD nature programming is particularly stunning. A nice surprise was the good off-axis performance. Though straight-on is still best, the image is quite bright out to about 45 degrees from perpendicular, much better than most other DLPs I have seen! Consumer Reports rated the larger Toshiba DLP sets with their highest picture quality rating. I would second that high rating for the 42HM66, it truly delivers the goods. I prefer its picture to that of my new Samsung LCD, which is also 720p, not the latest 1080p, and the Samsung cost 40% more. Image quality = a well-deserved 5 stars.Where the 42HM66 shows its limitations is in the sound subsystem. The speakers are weak with little bass response. When using digital input sources one needs to turn it up nearly all the way. Analog channels don't seem to have this problem. So when switching between analog and digital sources, one often needs to step the volume up and down, a recurring annoyance. I think most would find the sound performance seriously lacking, but this is easy to fix if you have a stereo receiver or AV sound system to plug into using the available line-out jacks. Sound quality = 2 stars.Now for convenience and user-friendliness. It is equipped with only one HDMI jack, so if you want to plug in 2 digital sources, like an upconverting DVD player and an HD cable box, you will have to plug one into the component or S-video input; but for a price of only $1000 this is not surprising.The TV was also not quite as simple to setup as my recently purchased Samsung. The auto-program feature was difficult to find, so if you are giving it as a gift to a technically-challenged person, make sure they get some help. I found the remote disappointing for it had small equally-sized buttons and the control layout was not very intuitive. But once you learn how to get into the menus and where things are, it becomes acceptable. Sadly it could be so much better with just a few minor changes. Kudos to Samsung for their excellent remotes. User friendliness = 3 stars.Now for the bottom line. I didn't expect the 42HM66 to be perfect all around, but in the one area which counts most... picture quality... it is a top-notch performer. Weak sound is easily remedied and the remote works OK once you learn it, but a bad picture cannot be fixed in any way. This is a GREAT choice if you need 40+" in screen size and don't want to sacrifice image quality on a budget of only $1000. My mother is simply blown away by the picture and I am VERY happy with this purchase... and Amazon's free shipping made it just that much better. The set has yet to accumulate serious viewing hours, so I will not comment on its reliability, but if I run into problems down the road I will revisit this review. For now... my bottom line overall rating: A solid 4-1/2 stars.P.S. The free Amazon shipping via Eagle was great. They called in advance,  came when they said they would, were courteous, and the package was delivered in excellent condition. Kudos. I felt like giving them a tip :)
Great little printer, BUT... My mother in law bought one of these printers for each of her kids.  She also bought a jump drive for us to use with it.  Unfortunately, it doesn't work with it.  We are really disappointed about that, I'm even going to see if there are some special drivers we need to load or something to get the jump drive to work.  So make sure your jump drive works with it BEFORE you buy it.  Also, it doesn't work with my sister in law's smart media card.  That was a bummer too. Other than that, we are very pleased with the photo quality and I'm excited to play around with all the fun software that's on it.  We will be taking it with us on all our trips.  I would've given it 5 stars if it worked with my jump drive
Mac compatible. I just want to confirm that this camera is indeed compatible with a Mac, and works reasonably well with Skype. My set up: 1.5 GHz Powerbook G4, Mac OS X 10.4.8, Skype 2.5.0.85, macam 0.9.1 driver. The refresh rate is not that high, subjectively at about 10 fps. Mic on the camera does not work, but the Powerbook built-in mic works very well. Headphones are not necessary but desirable to eliminate echo. The camera produces good focus and depth of field, and auto adjusts to different lighting conditions. Overall, video quality is not outstanding, but pretty decent and quite usable with Skype
Excellent DVDs. So far..., the ones I burnt i.e. almost more than half of the DVD's, have held up the company's name. I would recommend to buy 'em if you get a cheap deal
Very Good!!!. Just like every other review about this radio.  It's packed with all the features that listeners need to have like PLL tuning, direct keypad frequency entry, scan tuning, memories tuning, LCD backlid,....and the powerful Synchronous Detection Circuit.  This AM mode feature would LOWER the distortion due to fading from weak receptions and EXTRACT the adjacent broadcast stations to get a clear/better reception, using the SYNC mode and either LSB/USB switch.EX: I am listening to Voice of Vietnam at 6175 kHz, using a Kaito KA2100 or the Mini Kaito KA11. Sometimes I'd get a clear reception, but most of the time I have a mixing reception with beats, and the 2 adjacent stations are the Radio Netherland at 6165 kHz and the Radio Havanna Cuba at 6180 kHz.  These 2 stations are so strong to interfere the reception of the Voice of Vietnam station even if they are not tuned in on the display, and even if I use PLL tuning (no drifting). Now, With the Sync Detection feature on the Sony 7600GR, I can easily eliminate those interferences by switching to Sync and LSB or USB, and I can enjoy listening again.Way to go, Sony!
thumbs up. this is a great little printer especially for its size and price ($40)prints a little dark often, but that can be adjusted on the software sideit has never jammed or otherwise messed up a pi
Great For Cell Phones. I purchased the Mini SD 512 MB flash memory card for my LG 8100 to enhance the memory in the phone.  It was easy to install and I could use it right away.  Also it came with an adapter for the larger SD, so I can take the card to develop the pictures from the phone if I so desired
Durable. I got this headphone from my sister which means that it was used already, and I have been using it for around 3 years, the last 2 years at he gym that means drops and humidity, and it looks like nothing breaks this headphone down.If you want a durable headphone and you don't care about the best sound quality (again if you are not an expert you won't tell the difference) I recommend you this product
A really nice portable DVD player. I have owned this player for over a month now, and have had no problems with it. Battery life is ok too. We took it on a long drive, and my son was able to watch a full Harry Potter movie on a single battery charge.  The brightness of the screen was sufficient for watching the movie in a bright van with full sunlight coming in. The audio output of the unit is also impressive for its size.
Replacing your old cables worth every penny!. If you want to get the very best out of your video equipment, definitely upgrade your cable to Monster cables. We couldn't figure out why our picture on our 52&quot; TV looked so inferior, despite having satellite -- turned out to be nothing more than inferior cables that came with the set! Even if you have new equipment, it may come with cheaply made cables.  Monster cables are excellent -- worth every penny! I also bought some to connect one VCR to another when copying tapes. If you have older equipment and aren't happy with the quality of the picture, this is an inexpensive fix!  You'll be glad you did it
Superb, unique, Treo 650 + Deskphone Bluetooth Solution!. I talk on a landline or on a Treo 650 all day from my home office.  I've been using a Palm Treo headset for Treo calls, and my Treo wired headset for landline calls on a 5.8 Ghz Panasonic cordless phone, surrounded by 2.4 Ghz wireless internet signals.  While this setup works, issues are (a) I am tethered to the desk (and often tangled and dropping the cordless handset), (b) switching headsets is a hassle (I did not try wearing both headsets on separate ears--too confusing and I want one ear available for the local environment), (c) landline callers often complain that they hear an "echo" of their voice on the Treo wired headset, (d) and the extra step of having to plug my Palm headset into its charger (and its lack of a low battery indicator) results in having to recharge it when I need to be using it.My ideal solution would enable me to answer calls on either phone with a single headset, keeping my hands free for working on my computer, un-tether/untangle me so I can move around my office and home, and provide a convenient recharging stand for the headset (like the Jabra JX10).  My functional priorities:  (1) 2-way voice clarity, (2) wearing comfort and stability to stay on my ear, (3) range.  Cool style/design is not a significant factor.I stumbled on the Plantronics 510 headset, which has a seemingly unique "multi-point" technology enabling it to pair to two phones at the same time.  On-line research revealed a seemingly well-designed desk phone adapter with an integrated a headset holder/charger. The value of the optional "handset lifter" was hard to assess without seeing it working.  But the entire system is expensive ($399 list on the Plantronics site, $300 at other retailers), and it requires a wired desk phone--it's not compatible with a cordless, due to the way it connects to a wired handset.  However, I know Plantronics is a manufacturer of serious office headset solutions, so I figure you get what you pay for.  I read some reviews (few available, not even listed on the Treonauts site), found it on the web for $210, and ordered it to test it out.Well, I've only been using it 3 days, but it is superb!  I dusted off an old wired desk phone (keeping the cordless with programmed numbers to place calls), plugged everything together, paired to my Treo easily, kept all the default hear/talk volume settings, charged the headset - and started placing/answering calls -- flawlessly!On talk quality, even my critical, hard-of-hearing friend had no complaints.  On listen quality, I raised the hear volume switch on the base one notch, and now it's perfect.  And the handset lifter is awesome!  I dial the call on the cordless, then press the call button on the headset; the handset lifts and you hear the call going through; I hang up the cordless.  Range-wise, I can walk upstairs to the kitchen to refill my coffee, step outside to greet the fedex man, and *almost* get the mail - which is about 70 feet from the base station!  Conservatively it looks like I will get a good solid 30 feet, through walls, with no quality loss (though still only about 10 feet if I'm talking on the Treo).  And a nice feature:  if I *do* go out of range, a low tone indicates this--without dropping the call--and a high tone let's me know I am back in range and resumes the call!To receive a call on either the Treo of the landline, I just touch the call button on the headset, which is conveniently centered on my ear.  Once you set the listen volume to a good level, this is the only button you really need to touch, and it is easy to "find".  And comfort-wise:  VERY comfortable!  The over-the-ear design keeps the headset feeling solidly in place; the smallest earpiece fits snugly in my ear, but absent is the pressure of other earpieces I've used (gels & 'hard' earbuds) .  I can hardly feel its weight on my ear, and there is *no* pressure inside my ear; I can easily wear it all day.  When I take it off, I stick it right into its holder/charge - so it's always charged up!The packaging could use one very small improvement:  the headset eartip guide could use some verbal description, to complement the diagrams, for selecting/fitting the right eartips, and for removing them from the headset as you try on the 3 different sizes.I am a careful, discerning technology consumer, and am aware that the real proof of satisfaction comes after weeks of use--not hours or even days.  I save all packaging to return a product that does not perform to expectations.  I can tell you that I am already confident that the 510SL is a keeper!  I will post updates to this initial review in a couple of weeks
Great buy!. I purchased the Mobile Edge 14.1" Neoprene Sleeve Black from Amazon.com and was very pleased.The delivery was fast, and more importantly, the sleeve is a great buy! It's easy to carry around, looks nice, protects my computer and has a front pocket in which I can place my computer wires and other such things
Excellent well thought out product. This is a well thought-out design for a power strip.  I can fix 4-5 power adapters without wasting any other points.  Good build quality and sturdy cord to the wall.  The wall plug is 'bent' so that the thick wire runs parallel (instead of perpendicular) to the wall socket
Good Sound!!!. Great sound quality for the price.  You could buy the Sony MDR earphones for around $50, but this gives you the same sound quality for much less!!
Couldn't be happier!. I was unable to even find any male/female extension USB cables at my local bricks & mortar stores, and the male/male cables available cost an arm and a leg.These cables are extraordinarily low priced, arrived in the blink of an eye, fit perfectly, are of heavy construction, and work like a charm.I couldn't be happier
Great product. Software needs a bit improvement. I bought this a few months back, and I use it mostly for playing WoW.PROS: Very high quality product, strong enough to endure long keyboard-smashing combat sessions. The LCD is very useful if [like me] you enjoy playing your own music while you play a game, because it allows me to control iTunes whithout alt-tabbing out of the full-screen game. Macro keys open up a huge array of possibilites, and they are particularly helpful if you can arrange your in-game action buttons to duplicate their positioning on your keyboard (I use flexbar with WoW).CONS: The software needs a bit of improvement: If I put my computer to hybernate, the software seems to hang when I bring it back up, and I can't use the macro keys, so I have to reboot or kill the software's process and restart it manually. The interface used to configure the macro keys lacks a bit of usability (it forces me to use the mouse a lot, and i like being able to use the keyboard). Even though the LCD offers other posibilities [like displaying available ammo], I don't use most of them, because I can get most of these values from my game's UI and I dont have to look away from the monitor to do so.Overall a very good product if you enjoy keyboard based computer gaming. Wouldn't go back to a regular keyboard for gaming
Pretty frikin' sweet. I have them hooked up to 2 of the whiteboards in the office. It is great
Works with Linux. Works out of the box with Ubuntu Linux 6.10. Kernel is 2.6.17. I don't have to compile anything. It is OHCI compliant for the firewire port. The USB uses the EHCI module. It frees up a PCMCIA slot for other card
Fantastic. I love these.  Everybody always asks me where I got my cool earbuds.  I have bought pairs for my husband and several coworkers.  Everyone loves theirs
memory stick. the 1 gb card took all the pictures on a trip to hawaii, over 300
Good unit... is Up-Converting what you think it is?. I purchased this receiver for two reasons.  First HDMI in/out, and second for the ability to 'up-convert' non-hd components such as a TiVo Series 1 or 2 or a VCR.  While the receiver works great, I was sadly surprised that it doesn't actually upscale the signal from 480i to 1080i, which is what I really wanted.  Up-converting is basically the ability to change the cable output from S-Video or composite video to HDMI. I only just figured out that what I really wanted was an 'Upscaling' receiver (which is more $$$ of course). The quality out via HDMI at 480i is the same as if I had just kept an S-Video cable attached to the TV
Iogear KVM switch. This is my second Iogear KVM switch and both have worked perfectly. It is a great way to work between two computers with a single monitor , mouse and keyboard. Other brands have been very slow when switching between computers and have a difficult time with my 24" Dell monitor (I would have to disconnect the KVM and connect the keyboard and mouse dirrectly to one of the computers, then reset the screen resolution and rehook up the KVM), but the Iogears are very fast with no glitches. Highly recommend
No Problems for the last 2 Years. I purchased this product over 2 years ago and have used it quite often in that time.  Initially, we used it in the car utilizing the headphone splitter so our two daughters could watch movies during our longer car drives.  No problems whatsoever.  After we upgraded our car to an SUV which included a built in DVD player, I began to use the player on my business trips which occur nearly every week.  I packed this player in my suitcase every week for over a year and have had no problems.  We have utilized the ability to send the video signal to a project about a dozen times, including my wife's parents anniversary party out of state and it has worked flawlessly every time.  Once in a while I will have to re-insert the DVD before the player "sees" it but this is no big inconvenience.  I also play various types of media, including DVD -R and CD's.  It is bizarre that so many reviews include such real problems
An excellent choice. I bought one of these in 1/07 and then another in 3/07 because I liked it that much. On its highest setting its too bright for working with text so there is a text setting and other modes to quickly adjust how bright and the screen is and the contrast for various modes of operation. It was an excellent choice at the time of purchase but Samsung has come out with their 2X6 series which seem to have better numbers at a steeper price. At the time I purchase the Acer it was between the 225WB. With the 226 replacing the 225 at the same price as 225w I would have looked into that. I would not use this monitor for anything other than horizontal viewing. I do not play games and movies are alright. The speakers are not worth the material they are made out of but its not something to consider when buying a monitor. The stand is as basic as you can get but putting a book under the stand works to raise it, though ghastly to look at.
Really Makes A Difference. I purchased this oil with the Fellowes Powershred PS-77Cs 12 sheet Confetti Cut Shredder, and throw some in every other week or so ... it really works!  Assuming it extends the shredder life (as is claimed), it's well worth the extra $6
High expectaions. I have regained my respect of Panasonic in recent years. Thier electronics were the first brand I ever owned. Thier plasma monitors are fantastic. I purchased this unit to upconvert by DVD output to my HD montior. However, it appears the electronics in my plasma monitor are just not compatible with the HDMI technology, just a year too old. The unit itself is surprisingly small and has ample connections. It produces a nice picture. A couple of things I find annoying: 1) the only way to get the disk out of the tray is to stick your finger in the center hole of hte dvd, there is no way to grab it from the side, 2) the time delay for the display to show that the unit is turning on or off can cause you to hit the button twice and then you turnt he unit on and off and you didn't want to
Much more than I would have expected for the money. I've been away from keyboard instruments for years, and this is a great way to get back into it.  Don't let the Yamaha website fool you -- it does come packed with with a AC power brick.  I'm very impressed with it
Excellent. A pile of bills and documents was waiting for me at home after a couple of months without a shredder, and after some careful consideration, I decided to buy this one. My positive impressions:- Size is ideal for home or small office- Cross-cuts the strips for added security- You can remove the bucket and empty it without unmounting the shredding unit (unlike my older shredder which was smaller)Basically, it is real easy to use and very secure. The only way I would give it fewer stars is if it breaks on me
Pricey but nice. These new eneloops are very nice for the mere fact that I don't have to worry if my rechargeables are dead or not.  Wish they had a higher amp hour rating, but overall I am happy
Muvo TX. I am happy with the Muvo TX 1GB MP3 Player.  It works well, easy to download the MP3 files into it.  I agree with other reviewers that the battery cover is quite flimsy.  The only other trouble I have had is quicky moving to the other folders and getting everything to work, but that could be my fault since I really haven't taken that much time to use it for anything else besides what I purchased it for and that is to listen to podcasts at work.  I hooked it up to little speakers and it works great for that purpose. I would recommend it.
Epson Velvet Art Paper is Fine. I have been taking photos since I was [...] and only recently began to take this once in a blue moon hobby to heart.  I went out and bought a new digital camera, learned how to use that, and then invested in an Epson Stylus Photo R1800 printer.  Although never trained, people say I have a good eye which I believe is true, or else I wouldn't bother.  I had been printing my photos on the Epson Luster photo paper and was very happy with the results, but wanted something softer and more artsy for the photos I chose to convert to watercolors.  I read the previous review on this type of paper and decided to give it a try.  I am overwhelmed with the results.  If you want good quality artistic photos, USE THIS PAPER.  When they first print out they are somewhat disappointing, but low and behold, as the paper and ink mesh - all I can say is OMIGOD!  Tremendous.  Buy it try it.  You'll love it and you'll end up signing up for the next art fair
Fantastic music to go. You can't beat the siza and the weight, not to mention the storage capacity of the 4MB iPod. Ease of use is also wonderful. Only concern is that controls sometimes stick or freeze.Alan Safan
Helllooo MOGO. Love this mouse. This is the ultimate laptop mouse and what laptop mouses should be. The only thing they could add (now that we are all spoiled by this feature) is a scrolling pad between the right and left click buttons.
Worth every penny.. This unit has a fabulous picture.  The only improvements I'd like to see are quicker tuner switching, easier input switching, and incremental zooming
Slide scanning. Though limited to 4 slides at a time, even if in plastic or paper, excellentscan of originals. worth the process of waitng. Over over 'all in one' product
Problems with DVD player?. I rarely write reviews but I could not believe what I saw with the "24 DVD" players and it doesn't work.  All I ever use are Verbatim DVD's and I burn on both a Mac and a Windows-based unit.  The Windows DVD's play fine in my Mac and vice-versa.  Also, I have two Sony DVD players, a PS2, and my roomies Zenith DVD player, none of which have a problem playing the discs.  If you "truly" had problems with 24 DVD players, I am wondering if you just got a bad disc.  I have been burning copies of my older DVD's, this weekend alone having done 7, with not a coaster.  On my 2nd 50 pack in under a month, and only have had one problem (which was my fault anyhow).  Verbatim's, in my opinion, are the best media available, in both DVD-R and DVD DL
Can't live without it.... I just love this little MP3 player. I have about 300 songs on it and still have 4MB left. I don't think I'll ever fill it up. I just can't live without it now. It was super easy to install, works with RealPlayer and Windows Media Player.  Also works great with Belkin Tunecast for the car. Just make sure the volume on the player is turned up all the way, or the Belkin won't pick it up and turn on
THIS IS THE PACKAGE TO GET. The two packs are too expensive for SAME product
Does the job. Set up went without incident.  ULead software (now included) was powerful and easy to follow.  Created a dvd from a VHS tape in 2 hours.  No complaints.  Highly recommended
Very fast. This charger is amazing! , it is ready in 15 minutes and the batteries last too long in my digital camera.The cooler works very good keeping the batteries cool not so hot,it is not noisy ,in other works a good item .Easy buy it now
A Great Value!. Look folks, anytime you buy an electronic item of ANY kind, some have trouble while others do not. And yes, occasionally a certain item or brand seems to have more problems than others. But that is the exception rather than the rule. The adage: "you get what you pay for" is far too vague a statement to be useful in all but the rarest of circumstances, a Plasma TV selling for $300.00 for example. In the case of this product, it doesn't apply. This media card is an excellent product at a terrific price. Companies like SimpleTech don't have huge marketing budgets, but that doesn't mean their products are any worse than the bigger players. If you want a good product and a great price, this one is hard to beat. We're not talking about cancer cures here...
Great Product, I use it at work and for working out. I read some of the previous reviews and have to admit I was a little worried, I went ahead and bought the headphones anyway and have been totally happy and pleased with the product.  I had a pair of Sony headphones before, but these have been way better.  I use the headphones with my i-pod and the computer and I listen to a huge barage of music and have to say that I am impressed
Wow! Speaker sounds so good for $29.99!. Read some good reviews at Amazon.. Bought 2 pairs and tested them on my home amplifier. Plugged my Ipod in and played some music.  I couldn't believe what I'm hearing for the price I paid for.. Comparable to mid-to-high end speakers.  Good sounding highs and mid-bass for ceiling mount.  Tweeters worked so well that you can hear every detail of the music.  If you wanna go rap to house music.. just add a self-powered subwoofer! I would highly recommend this product
Good One!!. I purchased this player recently from amazon.com.This is working good until now no probs.Wish sony had madea cordless remote instead of corded one...which makes u feeltoo many wires!!The velcro that is given to stick the unit is not great..The cd player keeps falling!! This is a minor issue about thethe product, we can use another thing to stick it..On the whole good one!!
Great phone but.... The Netgear Dual Mode Cordless Phone is excellent phone with a couple minor flaws.  While the range, ease of setup, and the ability to use your Skype account without your computer are all GREAT.  Netgear forgot to allow the caller ID from your landline to be displayed without being logged into Skype.  Netgear also forgot to allow more flexibility in how voicemail is addressed.  If you do not have a per month voicemail service from your phone company on your landline and you do not purchase a SkpyeIn number people will no longer be able to leave messages.  There is no internal answering system in the unit
Exceptional Everything. I was amazed at the signal strength and aquisition time for this unit.  I use it with my Palm TX, and TomTom software.  I had problems with the original TomTom bluetooth device (without the SiRF chip) I'm so glad it broke.  The price is good for the convenience and performance.  Battery life is also really good, I use it everyday and haven't charged it for 2 weeks now.  Which reminds me..
Snazzy looking and perfectly functional. Been using this for two months now and have no problems with it. Like the looks, comfortable enough for my treks around campus, big enough to work as a lap top case/textbook toter/and diaper bag, all of which I need at this point in my life. Did think it was a little on the expensive side but overall I'm pleased with it and liked it better than anything else I found on the market. Got this on my BIL's recommendation who has the same one and also likes it
Nice and cheap. I've sold my Yamaha P120 to buy this thing...(and plus to buy Firepod and some other stuff :) )Pros:CheapLight weight and compactNo hassels setupDoes exactly what it suppose to.Cons:Keys can get scratched easily (but you can clean it and buff it out).No Knobs.Springy action.You will get used the Springy action and it becomes more natural with extended time of use though.Overall, acceptable midi controller for the money..
It's a Shure 58... of course it's great. The SM58 is pretty much the #1 choice by most people for a stage handheld. The Beta 58 is basically the same, but better. Better quality sound and better gain before feedback. It's a great mic and that's all there is to it!The only thing that Shure could improve would be to have a better quality bag with more padding, this would just protect the mic a little more when lugging it around
Great Life. I have used Energizer Batteries for many years and I have found that they work much better than Duracell or anyother battery.  These batteries are especiall great for handheld devices like walkmans and Gameboys.  the  battery life is extrodinary
Great product. This is great, not only can you use it overseas as well - the batteries are of good quality and you really can't beat the price.
awesome. I bought the armband so I could take my Zen running with me and it has been so convenient.  The Skin protects the Zen so I'm not concerned about anything getting on it.  It also has a belt clip for everyday use.  I love it!
GREAT RECEPTION & SOUND!. Though I get great reception "barefoot" when down town Little Rock, I ordered these headphones due to the problem of poor reception by the unit itself or the clip-on antenna in my neighborhood of large trees and hillsides.  Used them the first time to listen to Jon Anderson's Work In Progress Tour of The Universe on Fine Tuning while doing my nightly walk in my own neighborhood (where reception has always been poor)and I am very impressed with both the reception and the sound quality of these headphones.  Much better sound than any earbuds.  Listened to the Pat Metheny Group Live tonight on Beyond Jazz with similar impressions.  These are great.  Can't wait to hear some Alan Holdsworth on them.  Would have given them a 5 star rating if not for how bulky they are - wish they were smaller and thinner - but they are not as heavy as I thought they would be when ordering.
This phone gets my approval. With all the rave about the 6.0 dect phones, I tried another brand.  It had alot of static sounds in the background.  My 900 mghz & 2.44 cordless phones performed better.  I heard in the fall of the merger that Uniden made & how they were going to introduce a 6.o dect phone.  Knowing Unidens (& Panasonics-the 2 best phone manufactures) reputation, I decided to wait.  It was long, but well worth the wait.  Two thumbs up on this phone!!
Seems designed specifically for jogging. This case is made of nice material.  Unfortunately the Ipod fits rather loosely in the case.  Also, one of the Velcro flaps on the top of the case covers the hold button on the Ipod.  The case takes away from the Ipod's good looks and slightly hinders usage of the buttons.  It doesn't do what I wanted it to do - stay out of the way and simply protect the MP3 player.  However, the case would be great to use just for jogging as it comes with a belt and clip that hold the Ipod firmly.
Great mount. The Omni mounts are some of the top notch mounts on the market today. They are basically indestructible. The 20lb rated mounts appear to be able to hold up a horse if you drill them into a stud. The only reason I did not rate these 5 stars is actually amazons fault. There is only one mount per package, even though the description says mounts. Although these mounts are worth price even it its for one
Sony 1GB Memory Stick Pro Duo. Easy to use and download from.  Quickly captures and reproduces images in my mini-DV camcorder.  Recently used it on a one week trip to Germany and captured hundreds of high quality images at 3.0 MEG resolution.  Great investment
ipod batter booster. It works and arrived promptly. Not sure what else to say. It Doesn't quite fit the mini, but I am making it work for me.
Excellent Quality for the Price. I have to agree with the two previous reviewers. For the price, these headphones are very good.The other reviewers just don't know what they are talking about. First of all, THERE IS a noice canceling effect. But noise canceling does not eliminate all sound, it makes certain sound frequencies less obtrusive or present, that's all. You will still hear what's happening around you. Just power the unit without any music playing and you will see the effect of the noise cancelling. It's does not seem much, but it does help on a bus, in the metro or a plane to drown out a bit the ambient noise.Of course, these aren't 300$ Sennheiser or Bose headphones. The Philips perform miserably compared to those. But for God's sake, they are under 30$ !Finally, they are comfortable. Make sure you you really insert the loops BEHIND the edge of your ears not just over, fiddle with the small-medium-large settings, and there you go. The cushioning is very comfortable.Overall, considering the LOW PRICE, you can't go wrong with these.
NANO Skin. Perfect, you never want to take it off. It protects every aspects of your nano ipod!! Hughly recommended!
makes it a lot easer to play with GPS. my GPS did not fit getting wedged inbetween my dash and windshild at all so this makes using my GPS a lot easer.  directions were not great for how to remove the power plug. there is a tab in the back that slides for removing power serial conecter and then the tab to push down to remove the GPS from mount.  been in my windshid for 4 weeks not and has not come off great unit.  :)
Works great. Does just what it says it will do.  Was easy to install.
iPod Armband. I have used this item frequently on solo marathon training runs.  Works fantastic. A better buy than the Apple brand armband by far
Picture Card. Your typical memory card but for the FujiFilm camera.  They are difficult to find in local stores in our area.  Just as expected and price was comparable to what I'd seen.  Arrived quickly
Bargain Buy. Buying from Amazon was cheapest price especially with free shipping.  Stepped up for more power per channel.  Stayed in the Sony family. (Previous Sony surround, output to center speaker quit)  Dislike the speaker hook ups in back, difficult to attach speaker wires and screw down connections.  Overall happy with purchase
worth it . . absolutely. I recently added one of these to my high-end(ish) 2 channel stereo system.  The difference it nakes is astonishing.  I plug amps, pre-amp, cd player into it and ground-loop hum is completely removed.  Also, due to componants operating at correct voltage, sound is quite noticably enhanced.  Better midrange, smoother treble, blacker background, more natural voicing and better dynamics.  I did notice that the low bass got a little more polite and lost some detail . . but for me it's worth it to have such big improvements in almost all other areas.  Highly recommended.  Plus it looks cool
Good purchase!. I bought two of these phones - one for me and one for my father.  While we had to learn a few tricks in the beginning to get everything set up correctly, it has been smooth sailing ever since.  The sound quality is better than I expected from a VOIP product, very good in fact.  I highly recommend this product
Works great. We were having some issues with mold in our closet. We got the CFM-40 because it seemed smaller & quieter than others & we've been very happy with it. It extracts an amazing amount of water, we haven't figured out where it's coming from but the container fills up every couple of days! It's quiet and seems well made, and we have no mold now so we're happy
Great for your home theatre rear channels. I bought this set just for the cube speakers, which I use as wall-mounted rear surround sound speakers since they are so light.  I think they sound great.  I hooked them up as my main speakers just to test, and they sounded great as well.  Very crisp sound.  I have not noticed any "holes" in the sound as commented by other reviewers, and they are perfect for my home theatre.I can't comment on the bass module because I don't even use it, but I bet its not that great given how small and different it is from Bose's other more expensive bass modules.
A great value!. I bought this as a last-minute replacement for a 6-year old Sony DVD player that finally died.  I wasn't disappointed.  Setup was super-easy (although if you still have a regular TV, the default settings are for 16:9).  I'm using optical sound and S-Video, and the picture and sound quality are exactly what I expected - great.  Again, Sony has not let us down.  THe only reason I didn't give this 5 stars is because it takes a little while to cycle between discs
A Solution That Works. I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.
TV turntable. The turntable works very well.  It's just the right size, and rotates very smoothly
Great Navigation Tool for the money!. If you allways get lost in the car, this is a Great Navigation Tool for the money! Specially if you allready own an Axim. If money is less than a problem, Garmin makes a PDA with navigation built in that is really great
Great Deal!. this doesn't have the best sound out there, but then again who wants to spend $150 on a set of headphones?  For under $15 these are the most comfortable and best sounding headphones out there.  I like the little pouch and the cables seem to not get tangled as easily as my old set.  I just wish it had a 90 degree plug
Excellent Product. After using this product for 3 months I am yet to find something wrong with it. We have been using it with MS streets and trips. It works flawlessly. It gets a fix (cold start) in any setting - in urban canyon settings, at high speeds on the freeway, in wooded areas, inside my apartment. It even works if you keep it in the glove box of your car. We have driven through tunnels. It loses the signal a few meters into the the tunnel (not surprising) and gets a fix flawlessly with a couple of seconds of  leaving the tunnel.The software has no trouble communicating with the reciever. We have tried it with 2 different versions of MS streets and trips on three different laptops. With a basic knowledge of Bluetooth pairing the set up is a breeze.The battery life is exceptional.It comes with the complete kit a AC charger, a DC charger and a leather pouch. You can't ask for more.It's really compact (smaller than most cell phones) and not too heavy either.The other GPS reciever  that I have tried was a Delorme Eartmate. The delorme would never fixate signal when driving (cold start). We always had to pull over get a fix and then start driving. The Delorme always lost signal if you drove between 3 or 4 storey buildings. That can hardly be described as an urban canyon! It was horrible!
Nice phone, could be better. With a few drawbacks, this is a well-designed 4-line telephone. On the plus side, the base and remote handsets work well.  In particular, the remote handset buttons are much more sturdy than they were in earlier Panasonic design. Corded-handset and speakerphone quality are excellent. The major drawback is that the ring volume is the same for all 4 lines.  Previous Panasonic designs had individual-line volume settings, but not this phone.  This is important to me because only one of the 4 lines is for incoming calls, the others are for outgoing calls, and telemarketers call all lines indiscriminately.  My solution was to turn off the overall ring volume and use in parallel a separate cheap phone on the one line I use for incoming calls.  I do not use the answering system because I have voice mail, so I cannot comment on that feature
Good TV, great for the price. This TV has a lot going for it.Nice looks, good picture.  If you want to replace a 27" tube TV, this is the set for you, as a 4:3 image is 27" on this set (unstretched), and you won't damage it by watching black bars.  And of course filling the screen with movies and HDTV is gorgeous.Here are some of the many positives:+Strong Digital Tuner (brings in every digital channel in LA from a RadioShack table top antenna pointed through multiple walls!)+Amazing HDTV picture from that Digital Tuner+Many inputs means plenty of options (I have mine hooked up to my laptop via VGA, my satellite via RCA, and HDTV antenna via Coax)+Satellite hooked up over 50' RCA (composite) cable looks as clean as progressive DVD.  That means very good color decoder and scaler.+Good DVD upscaling, though I notice slight jaggies when compared to hooking up a computer set to the native resolution of the display and letting the computer do the scaling.  Considering how much more processing power a computer has, you can't fault the TV for that.  But if you have an HTPC, DVDs will look their best played through that.But there are minuses:-Red bias in color decoder means you have to turn color setting down below optimal to compensate.  Looks good, but could be better.  I may go into the service menu and see if this can be fixed manually.-Horrible Analog tuner.  Satellite sent over Channel 3, which looks great on other TV sets, looks bad on this set, but same picture sent via composite RCA looks amazing.-Fussy menus, could be more logical, functional.-No direct input addressing.-No direct Digital TV addressing.  You must use auto setup, which is time consuming, to add channels it missed if you didn't have your antenna pointed well.  Then you have to go back and delete the channels you don't want a second time.-Can't get black blacks without compressing the darks.  This is a typical LCD problem, though all the companies claim to have fixed it.  None seem to have yet.-Smart Stretch is pretty "dumb" in that it has a noticeable spot where the picture stretches.  Not fluid like the Panasonic Smart Stretch, and of course, some brands don't have it at all, but still could be improved.  After owning a Panasonic Plasma and setting up my sister's Panny Plasma and Panny LCD Projector, I know how Smart Stretch is supposed to look... ;)-Why is the remote so huge!!!  And why is it so limited in what it can operate?  You can program in Satellite tuners, for example, but not DirecTV or DishNetwork, the two largest US providers.  And why are some important buttons, like sleep, hidden behind a door and unlit?  The light button doesn't glow in the dark, and the Sleep button is unlit.  It's as if Sharp doesn't understand why a remote is lit to begin with.-Buttons on top of the set means if you have the set on top of a dresser or other tall piece of furniture, you can't see the buttons at all.  Would be better on the side of the set.But none of those minuses are worth looking elsewhere, as the Sharp outclasses all the others, especially at this price.So buy this TV for what it does best, and don't expect black blacks or a good analog tuner, and you'll be happy
a solid product. I have three of these, two at home and one at work. The black pad tends to get and/or look dirty, while the silver pads look good all the time. Very comfortable, nice support for the wrist. Could stand to have a little more mouse roaming space, but not a huge complaint. Good stuff
Saved my HD!. I recently purchased the Pacific Breeze Laptop Cooler and so far am very impressed with it.  Now this review should be taken with a grain of salt, because I have only had the cooler for a few weeks, but I feel that the results were evident immediately and the build does seem adequate.  The reason that I was in search of a cooler was due to my dangerously hot hard drive temps.  I installed Notebook Hardware Control (free temperature and power control utility) after feeling how hot my new notebook was getting and saw temps as high as 55C at my hard drive!  Worried about how this would affect the hard drive's longevity, I started looking around at coolers.I choose this cooler after reviewing several of the "mat" variety, but chose this one because of its design.  As the previous reviewers have already mentioned, this cooler elevates the notebook from the rear and blows air under the notebook.  This allows the CPU fan intake and hard drive to receive plenty of fresh air.After setting this cooler up, I was feeling pretty good about the purchase.  Qualitatively, the results are evident by a cooler notebook top and keypad, and the feel of air exiting the sides of the notebook.  Quantitatively, the notebook experienced a 5C temperature drop at my HD and at my CPU.  Now my hard drive is running at 40C-45C instead of 45-50C!I would definitely recommend this product
I don't hear a difference but these things are well built!. My system always sounded great and used to use RadioShack's gold cable's.  I got these cause they were here on amazon where I bought my new dvd player.  These cables are a lot more hefty than anything i've ever seen.  I didn't compare quality to any other cables so I don't know about sound quality but it does sound good.  If you're like me you probably want to spend more time infront of the tv than behind it
It's called the Ultra Mini for a reason!. This review pertains specifically to the Targus PAUH217U 4 Port Ultra Mini USB 2.0 Hub.The cord is about 2.5 feet long - long enough to reach from my pc, which sits on the ground, to the top of the desk. It has a cable which is split into two USB plugs - one just to transmit data, the second to power the unit. The second plug does not need to be used unless you plan on using some heavy-duty hardware, and if so what are you buying a hub called the ultra mini for anyways? If you insist on trying to run a blow dryer off the thing, then it does have an input for a separate power source, which you will have to buy separately.In short, If you have an old school machine with USB ports which are inaccessible /inconvenient to use, this little hub will give you quick access while taking up minimal space on your desk
Correction To Earlier Review. It's unfortunate that an earlier review indicated that the unit had a serious flaw -- beeps whenever there is a problem with the incoming power.  This person obviously didn't take any time to familiarize himself with the software that controls the UPS.  The notification sounds can be completely turned off with the software.I agree that I was annoyed when the unit made a loud beep in the middle of the night when there was a power problem.  Luckily, it was easy to turn this feature off.Five stars for this product, for sure.
Great Find. This player is very user friendly. It is feather light, and holds days worth of music, I think I maxed it out with 20 full albums. It will play for a day or two on a little AAA battery. Records about 50 hours of voice or radio shows. I love the radio feature. Comes with a very functional leather carrying case and the best sounding ear buds I've ever heard. Not that I'm an expert on these things, but this is one cool little player
The Trip. We purchased the Magellan GPs system to take on our cross country (Washington to Pennsylvania to Florida to Washington) trip in September, 2006.  It was very helpful in guiding us to motels, places to eat, shopping, etc.  I would recommend it to anyone.
Works fine with Compaq IJ650. I have a Compaq IJ650, which uses the Lexmark 10N0016 cartridge. I have this printer for more than 2 years and never had problem with clogged cartridges, as said in other reviews. It works fine and have a nice printing
DVD Xpress DX2. This product worked perfectly transferring to the computer and then using the included software to put several home movies on one DVD.  It also worked perfectly to transfer directly from VHSC tapes to DVD without transferring to computer.  Very simple set up and instructions.  The quality of the transferred videos was excellent!  You can also clip out parts of video seamlessly if you transfer to computer first very simply.  With the included software, you can do or add just about anything, music, frames, voice, etc.  No problems with the box getting hot or malfunctioning after over 4 hours of continuous use.
It works!. I bought this to read my Smartmedia cards and it worked very well. As an added bonus it is also a nice looking product. It is sky blue and has a clear USB cord - sort of Reminds me of an IMac. Good little inexpensive card reader Note: I did't use it for any card type other than Smartmedia
Outstanding Product - Best in Class. This is by far the best mp3 player I have owned or otherwise experienced.  The sound quality is second to none, and is fantastic with higher end headphones (I happily use the Ultimate Ears Super-Fi 5 Pro).  I previously owned the Creative Zen Vision M and several flash players and this was a significant upgrade.  I ruled out the iPod, Zune, and others because of a lack of Divx support.  I ruled out the Zen Vision W because the sound quality was significantly worse.Pros: Unparalleled sound quality, Divx compatibility, excellent battery life, very easy to use (my non-techie wife who hates most mp3 players loves it), good size (not much bigger than the Zen Vision M), nice included case, easy to transfer files (functions as a portable hard drive), can display documents, FLAC support, radio included, great sound effects features (BBE/custom EQ/etc), excellent screen.Cons: Processor could be faster, battery is not removable. Locks up once in a while, limited to 30GB (which can fill up fast).  All of the following are minor.My uses: I use this primarily as an mp3 player (65%) and to replay video (30%), and as a radio (5%).   All of those functions work well.  I have not used it as a recorder.Conclusion: if you travel significantly and want a great media companion then this is your product.  Easy to use, amazing audio and video quality, and hassle free.  At present, I cannot think of an "upgrade" to this that's available on the market (and I love to upgrade).  Not the smallest mp3 player, but really not much bigger than most full size players (I think the minor size difference is worth it - it still easily fits in a pocket)
Beautiful Phone. I was pleasantly surprised when I saw the quality of this very beautiful phone. It's a bit heavy, which I liked, and the chrome phone looks very classy on the kitchen wall. The only drawback is the low ring, doesn't seem to ring any louder. Since we are on a farm, I need to me able to hear it from outside. Otherwise, it's a good buy and Amazon offers it at a much lower price than at other online stores
great bag. I bought this for a friend who is a real estate agent.  It was a birthday present.  It was a larger than I expected.  I have to say she loved her present and I liked it so much I'm thinking of buying one for myself
Excellent for average person. I bought this item in March 2006 (cheap, don;t be afraid of refurbs). It makes excellent photolab quality pictures in about 1.5 to 2 minutes. The colors are clear and bright and you can have glossy or matte. If you are a big time photography nut, this may not be for you. If you are the average person who wants their pictures now instead of later this printer is great. Small enough to take with you on trips. I love it
Very good. A very good combination of price and quality. Long battery life. Good sound quality, almost no signal interruptions (sounds mostly like a corded phone). The only thing that really annoys me is that you can't change the ringer volume. It's too loud for me. But the volume of the sound is changeable and it's a good thing
Great PDA, GPS works well!. The 5915 is jam packed with useful applications starting with the GPS. The maps for my area (Chicago) are very current and I hear that HP and TomTom are working on a way to enable 5915 users to receive updates
Great for the price. These headphones look pretty cool and are more comfortable than the original ipod ones. They are a little weak in the bass frequencies...but the mids and highs are nice and clear for such an inexpensive set of phones. Also...no annoying covers that slip off. These will take a beating. I use them while mowing the lawn, excercising, etc. Great for the $!
DO NOT BUY THIS CARD!. If you own a Canon camera, Canon does NOT support WA (Write Acceleration) feature of Lexar's high-speed cards:http://www.lexar.com/digfilm/wa_cf.htmlCurrent camera partners supporting Write Acceleration Technology:-Kodak Professional-Nikon-Sanyo-Sigma-Pentax-OlympusOther than that, this is a FAST card, if your camera supports WA, otherwise, it may run at just standard speed and in that case why spend the extra $$$?  Look up your camera on the link before you buy
Great Sound. great sounding unit I ordered it thur amazon and they did great with shipping, I had the unit in storage as I was rebuilding my room When I hooked it up the display had dead pixels in it, I caled amazon and they exchanged it for me even though it was past the 30 days, great customer service,It still gets five stars as it has great sound Qualit
JR. Had some problems installing it.  Called tech support. With their help, I finally got it working.  No other comments.  Only had about a week
Look No Further!!!  Really!!!!!!!!!!!. I, like many other people that have written reviews here, researched the purchase of an MP3 player in great detail.  Other members of my family own iPods, and that is the direction that I was heading until I did a massive amount of research.  If you want to rip the thousands of songs that you already own on CD, this is the unit that you want.  iPod will not let you download your own songs, I did not know that until after I purchased this player (thankfully).  This unit was the highest rated unit by far that I was able to scour the internet for.  If this is your first purchase of an MP3 player (like mine) buy this one, no questions asked.  Do not worry about trying to buy $80 ear buds the sound from the ear buds that come with the player is unreal.  Crisp, clear, awsome base and I have only turned up the player to 23 on the volume it goes up to 40.  I cannot hear the home stereo that my wife is listening to or my kids that are running around the house playing.  I received this player in the mail today at 5:30 when I got home from work and by 6:35 I have transfered the 114 artists folders (about 4,000+ songs) that I had ripped on my computer last week (about 35 to 40 minutes to transfer the music to the staging folder and then to the player).I would recomend buying the cradle, it helps in standing it up on the desk or over the stereo, which I plan to do to play all my music on my outdoor speakers by the pool.Absolutley buy this unit.  I have only messed wit it for a couple of hours and I have a high performance expectation and it has met it
Good deal. The first one I ordered worked for about four days and then stopped recognizing the USB devices I was plugging into it.  Although I had considered just getting a refund, Amazon was quick to replace the card with no hassles.  The replacement card has been working fine for a couple of months now.  The USB 2 is much faster than the original USB ports that were a part of my original computer and this particular card was a reasonable price
Knock on wood, a real bargain and great performer. OK...I know...there are a few folks out there that have had bad experiences with the LaCie Porsche units.  But....For the past two years my desktop has been occupied by a LaCie d2 120gb external. Last year I added an external LaCie LightScribe DVD burner and last month I added TWO of these 250gb Porsche Firewire externals to use as a RAID unit for file archive/backup.OK, they get WARM. I don't know what some of these people are talking about these units getting "hot". Mine are stacked too. Most electronics get warm.  Hell, my Powerbook gets so hot that it's almost too hot to have on your lap for a long time. These 250gb's only get mildly warm. Even after a back up of my iTunes Library which is currently over 90gb in size.Now, I won't dismiss the bad reports entirely. Since I am using the two 250's as a RAID unit for backup, they don't need to be running all the time. So if I am not doing an actual backup, they are kept switched off.I have had many years of experience with LaCie and have NEVER known them to put their name on crap.Considering that these are LaCie brand units and have a capacity of 250gb and are firewire drives AND they cost under $150 each, how can you complain
SD256 flash card for Canon Video Camera. We needed an extra card right away and were happy that we paidfor the fastest, overnight delivery option.  The card came in time, and we used the card extensively on our trip to Australia
Works great as a nightlight too. Please don't tell Al Gore how much power this thing uses just to illuminate the fancy blue circles on the front of the drive.I've had no problems at all (aside from falling asleep with the bright blue glow filling my room). Of course, I immediately removed the pre-installed software and reformatted to NTFS.You might want to buy some sort of rubber isolation pad to put under the drive if you intend to place it on your desk or work table. It vibrates noticeably
Superb sound quality at a great price. I purchased this card for my custom-built Home Theater PC (HTPC) running Windows XP Media Center Edition 2005 and it sounds absolutely superb. M-Audio is known for their pro audio gear and the attention to quality can definitely be heard from this great card.I would give this card 5 stars if it wasn't for the fact that currently there are no Vista drivers for this card. Also, this card is OLD. I believe this card was originally released in 2003. Not only that, M-Audio hasn't released an updated driver for this for a long time. The newest driver is from 2004.Although the card does not "officially" support XP Media Center, it works perfectly fine with the drivers for regular XP. I had a bit of a problem getting the digital output to work, but their superb tech support was able to provide all the info I needed. Currently I am using the single digital out cable to my receiver and it's outputting PCM, DTS, and dolby digital audio via the digital interface without any problems.One note of caution if you're using the digital output with XP Media Center Edition: turn off the media center interface sounds (you know, the annoying little sound effects from the buttons, etc.). The digital output can only send audio in one format at a time, so the following scenario can happen:If you are playing a DVD in DTS, raw DTS audio will go through the digital output. However, if you have sound effects on in Media Center, those are generated in PCM format. XP will send the audio in PCM format via the digital output. Going back to the DVD, you'll find that you get no sound because for some reason either XP doesn't switch the format back or the card doesn't see the change.If you are planning on running Windows Vista (which I don't recommend at least for a year till the bugs are worked out), then this won't work, but it's a great sounding card for XP
It was great. It was really great and the on/off switch works good When We talk to our son we can leave it plugged in and just shut it off when we do other things
BEST CONNECTOR I'VE EVER USED!. This is a very solidly built banana connector.  Loosen the screw in the back, place wires in the exposed gap at the end of the slug, tighten, and you get a really secure connection.  Very fast and solderless!  I am going to buy more.I thought the shipping cost from Parts Express was a bit pricey, but the goods came swiftly.  Plus, a free catalogue...WOW
This is the one... No matter wich review you read, wich forum you ask, wich top lists you see, this dvd player is always in. In some cases in the #1 spot, in other case within the 10 best. That's got to be a very good sign. Top this with a very good price and brand name and you surely have a winner. This is by the way the top of the line Panasonic dvd player, followed by the S77. The S77 while is also very good is not as well constructed, polished and refined as the S97. You can't go wrong with this one
very good picture. the cable was easy to connect and once i turned on the PS2 i noticed a much crispier pictur
Trigger Finger alowa you total control of your drums. Unlike the first reviewer my experience with Trigger Finer has been a good one. At first it took me awhile to figure out how to get the device to control the drums in Impulse (Ableton Live) once I realized that each pad had to be set in order to have each tone mapped it was a breeeze. I suspect that maybe the first reviewer as well as any midi newbie might have difficulty in that respects since it is not plug in play as M Audio states....it is program and play, however once you get it programmed correctly it is effortless. The htinkg is it is soo expandable and programmable it may be to its own detriment especaiily for peolle who are not fimiliar with mapping out midi controllers
This is what you want. This is not the most powerful system available.  If you are looking for a stylish micro system, you should consider this one.  The sound is very good for a small unit.  The unit looks very contemporary and sleek.  I searched for several days trying to find the best rated micro system, and this was the one that was the highest ranked.  I bought this from Amazon for $89.99 and am very happy with it.  You can get the MCM240 refurbished on the Philips website for around $40 if you are on a tighter budget.  This one should not tip over as easy as the MCM235 or MCM240 since it has a slightly different base
Excellent Cable, a Little Short. I bought this cable to use with a Motorola Set Top Box and an HDTV.  My set top box does not have HDMI so I have to use Component Cables.  The shorter the length the better component cables work so I got 3'.  You have to get the stb so close to the TV in order to reach the back connection, 6' would have been better but I don't know if the picture would be this good.  I get excellent HD reception using these.  They are shielded from electrical interference so I get no static or ghosting.  Highly recommended, got four stars because of short length
I think it's a great deal!. I read the other reviews before ordering, and thought to myself, "Heck, for right at $30, even if they are flimsy, it's better than just stacking my DVD's on the floor!"  I'm really pleased!!! I read the one review about using the glue - so when I put mine together, I put glue in the slot for the back, and believe me, I think they are wonderful! It went together in about 15 minutes (and then I let it sit for another 45 for the glue to dry) - took me longer to sort my DVD's than to put the cases together! They are small enough to fit into that nook or cranny, but big ehough to hold a lot!  One little note, though, you can't get 5 rows of DVD's in one. (It looks like you can in the pictures - but they won't fit!) I got 4 rows of 28 DVD's per row - could have probably shoved one more in per row, but for $30, I'll just buy another one!
Great Card, Simple Installation. This is a high-performance networking card that is extremely easy to install. Bear in mind that Windows does not have the driver needed to use the card already, so you have to insert the CD that comes with it. That's as difficult as it is, so long as you don't mind cracking open your case to install it in an empty PCI slot.*** Update -  I'm up to having five of these guys, and love them. The price is great, the installation is a breeze, and they have worked flawlessly for me. Every computer in my house has one in it now
Best ever have... This EPSON product heve been "The Best Ever Have ...By EPSON" and I'm happy with this one. Image just perfect for home use , and make the musicals and all films etc etc more perfect and realistic.By Alex DeSouza/B
Excellent. I appreciate these batteries.  Now I can have charged batteries ready to go all the time
Unbelievable noise cancelling headphones. I have wanted a pair of the Bose headphones for years but could not justify the 350 dollar price tag.  I had tried the Sony 40 dollar noise cancelling  headphones  and the 90 dollar Shure in ear noise reducing headphones and was not impressed. I have just purchased and used the Sharper Image headphones which were on sale for 35 dollars, normally 70 dollars.  The fellow next to me on the plane had the Bose so I was able to do a direct comparison.  I would give the Bose a 10 in every category except cost, and the SI phones a 9 in every category except cost and value.  For cost and value this product earns a 10.  The noise reducing capability of the SI phones was outstanding and just about as good as the Bose.  You would be hard pressed to tell the difference in Noise reduction capability.  The Bose did have a slightly higher end sound quality  but the sound of the SI phones was extremely good.  If you can afford to spend 350 without batting an eye, get the Bose.  If not, then RUN and get the SI phones while they are still on sale.   Even at 70 dollars they are well worth it and they performed remarkably well on the airplane. They were extremely comfortable and I was continually impressed and delighted with this gem of a product. They are well designed and well made. I wore them for 3 hours straight on the plane with and was continually impressed. One little trick I discovered in using them on the plane was that if you manipulate the ear cups slightly, positioning them precisely over your ears, you can block out almost all of the engine sounds as they passively reduce the engine noise as well!  Final thought... a fantastic product.  Do NOT hesitate in buying these, you will not regret your purchase!
Works well; Better OSD. The product worked right away when I plugged it in.  The on screen display is functional but not the prettiest.  It also doesn't show all of the same categories as are on my iPod such as Podcasts.  They are in with all the rest of my music
Cheap & Good. These earphones are the best I ever had. I never had to try other pairs of earphone because I absolutely loved these that I keep buying it! After 6 years I buy the same one everytime. Of course I never use the winding case and it just sits there but heck it usually stores my other earphones that I brought but can't seem to throw them out because it costed money. It seems that many people are complaining about the electrical shocks from the earphones and I can answer why thats happening. It's actually static electricity. I experienced it myself a couple of times because I was wearing a wool sweater and the wool peacoat jacket that caused static electricity to form. It's actually not the earphones fault but when your wearing lots of clothes or a scarf with the earphones I suggest you switch to headphones to prevent being shocked. The bass is pretty decent when comparied to panasonic or jvc earphones. Hey for 10 bucks or less you can't except Sony to go all out and improve their cheapest model. I abuse my earphones so for 10 bucks a year I think these are the best rather than buying something thats $100 dollars or over and later regret it because it got either lost, broken or stolen.
Great Deal on Optical Cabling. These cables are a bargin -- work great and at a fraction of the cost.  I just wish I would have ordered two extra cables instead of one!  Some of the new game boxes can take advantage of the optical links to output audio to my home theater system.
Can't beat the price and quality. Great item! Must have! I got a fix from at least 6 satelites in under a minute. Extemely accurate even with only 4 sats. Works with Streets and Trips 2006, iGuidance, Street Atlas, and after some tweaking Nroute too! :D I stongly recommend this product, even if you don't travel much, this can get you out of a jam in under 2 seconds flat. Time is money, and this gps will save you a lot of both
Happy that I bought this. I love it. Freedom to write electronically anywhere. I can even convert my hand-writing to text with other softwares if I need to. And I received it on the third day of my order. TigerDirect is really fast
Nice, but not for audio books. This works well, but has a few minor issues.  I thought audio quality was quite good.  It's also fairly good at avoiding interference.However, if you stop playing with the button or turn off your car, it continues at the beginning of that file, NOT where you were.  For music, that's fine.  For audio books, that is a problem, especially if each mp3 audio file is 45 minutes long!The power connector on the end sometimes doesn't connect well and you lose power.
These bad boys is pretty nice. I was a bit apprehensive buying these speakers. Bose products tend to be over priced, easily destroyed, and ugly. These seem to be an exception to all the features I've come to hate about Bose, while keeping the one bit they (almost) always get right: sound quality. They sound great. Really great and full, not unlike the Soundsticks, but for 20 or 30 dollars less and less bulky. You'll never notice there's no subwoofer. I've heard lots of PC speakers (used to sell them); there are better stereo speakers out there, but for $99 or less, probably none so compact, pretty, and vibrant.
Very happy. I purchased this MP3 player to use while working in the yard and around the house.  I love it and am considering upgrading.  I find it very easy to use and to organize the contents.  Even after sending it through the washer and dryer, it continues to work wonderfully.
Super Wall Mount. I had very little trouble putting it up.... Make sure you use the right size drive bits to start the holes... I didn't and broke the screws... Not a big deal I went to ACE and got replacements... I like the mount especially the tilting...
Good Wheel. This wheel does the job.  It's not super fancy but you still get the driving experience. Enjoy
Works well. You can hook up two monitors to this, and if you already have a graphics card like me you can get a three-monitor system. The monitor connected to the s-video port is great, however on the DVI port (that can also connect with s-video monitors with the included adapter) the only resolutions available are 800x600 0r 1024x768. Still great for the price
Sharp looking storage. I love to keep my CD's, though they are all stored on my hard drive, but all those cases filled three boxes, I have fit them into several of these binders and they look great on my bookcase
It Works. I certainly wish it were smaller, but I guess that'd be hard to manage while retaining the feel of a normal keypad. The unit works well and adds some features that would probably be handy for spreadsheet work, like enter and backspace keys
Just what I needed!. I've been going through a phase lately where I'm trying to organize the clutter around my house... I'm just tired of the mess.  One of the main reasons why I wanted a label maker was because of the tangle of cords associated with my home theater system.  With power cords for two game consoles, cable box, TV, DVD player, a Roku SoundBridge and a wireless bridge all plugged into the same power strip it was nearly impossible to figure out what I was unplugging at any given time.  Same went for the A/V cables connecting everything.  I made double-copy labels and folded one in half around every cable to make an easy-to-read tag, so now I know what every one is for without having to trace a wire from one end to the other through the rat's nest of wires behind the entertainment center.I also used it to label all the boxes and Rubbermaid bins full of stuff in the attic storage space, and labeled some more plastic storage bins in a few closets.The PT-80 features a full QWERTY-style keyboard that is easy to use, which is nicer than some other models that arrange the buttons in alphabetical order... I can two-thumb-type out any label in a matter of seconds.  I've read some complaints about wasted tape, but I've organized three rooms with dozens of labels (many of them double-ended cable tags as I described for my entertainment center) and still haven't used up the first 26' cartridge.  The little slot in the back of the device that helps peel the label end is nice, but doesn't work on the first time, every time... usually I have to put the end in and strip it back a few times before I can peel the label from the backing.  I don't know if that experience is any different with other styles of tape, as I've only used the standard black-on-white tape.An added bonus was that this device and the tape cartridges are significantly cheaper from Amazon than at the local office supply chain stores, especially with free 2-day shipping with Amazon Prime
Memory card 2 GB. Excellent all the way around. Great storage space avalable for my digital camera. Service provided by seller was also excellent. I would highly recommend both.
Griffin I-Click. This remote works great. I use it on my motorcycle. The other remoteI had was very sporadic. This remote hasn't missed a click. Greatproduct
Great Price...Great Product!!. Got my Kingston Digital Flash card expecting it to be ok...BUT, used it over the Easter weekend for the first time and it work better than I ever expected!!!!!!!!Thank you and my family thanks you for the great photos we will share from Easter
Beautiful Sound. Even after reading all the reviews on this product I was still amazed at the sound quality and loudness this little speaker set offers.  Perfect for traveling, camping, parks, etc.I would buy it again!Oh, also comes with a set of plug adapters to use in other countries and also a pair of nice earbuds
Great Printer for the price!!!!!. I received this printer 2 days after my initial order...Amazon is just GREAT!!! This printer is a fabulous deal for the money. So many features, you can print pictures via USB jump drive, CDROM drive, camera, memory card, from a cell phone with a Bluetooth adapter. The features are many. The quality of the prints are truly 35 mm quality. You won't find a better deal anywhere!!!!!
Good quality for the money. This is a great dvd player if you want to play divx movies or mpeg files burned from your computer onto a cd-r, dvd-r, dvd+r etc. It plays just about every media format on any kind of blank cd or dvd. It also plays the the standard store bought dvds just fine. I needed it because all the dvds I made at home would receive a disc error when trying to watch them on my old Toshiba. It connected to and played fine on my 42" flat screen LCD HDTV. Photos burned onto a cd also play in a slide show without having to connect your camera - very cool. The only thing about this player I would change would be the remote control. It looks cool but is kinda clunky and has to be pointed at precisely the right spot on the player or you'll end up pushing the button numerous times with no effect. Otherwise I'm more than satisfied and will continue to use it for a long time
Almost perfect. This is the second Wacom tablet I own and the third tablet in general. The other wacom is the 9 x 12. Which, at the time, I thought was the greatest. And the Hyperpen (my first tablet for a starving artist)... well, don't. Don't buy it. Stay away. Horrid thing. Save up and get a small wacom.With the purchase of my 6 x 11 i realized that it just feels right. The size is not so large it becomes unmanageable but big enough to use with my dual 19 inch monitors. And, with proportional aspect ratio on it does not waste a lot of the tablet area.The touch stripes are useful but really not necessary. Only with it sitting in your lap pushed back from the keyboard does it really offer any usability.The 6 x 11 is just about perfect
good purchase!. Everything is so far so good, including the fast delivery. But I mainly use this machine to scan documents and books. On this, liDe 25 is not quick enough for my need.
good quality product. No sense paying big bucks for this type of cable.  The HDMI standard establishes the criteria for the cable.  Remember this is a digital standard, so don't buy high cost cables.  I have purchased other products from C-to-G and all are first clas
It works. This product works well. You can change the base part in order to fit a variety of holders. Theres room to plug in an fm transmitter on the port dock on the underside. I can even fit my ipod in this with a speck silicone case on it which is convenient
Caution. The Mini-Hub worked without a hitch, and seems robust. Just be sure the short cord is not a problem for you
Does exactly what it it supposed to do. I've been wanting a product like this for a very long time. Hotel rooms never seem to have enough outlets on their work desks (or the outlets are too close together to accomodate chargers, powerbricks, etc.) This doesn't provide a real extension cord, but it is compact and the outlets are well spaced. I now bring it on all of my out of town trips
Easy installation, sounds great, seamless with wall. The package includes a very useful template for installation and painting.  I used a spray gun to paint the grill and the speakers are virtually seamless with the wall.  Two of these speakers were used as rear channels for our surround sound system.  The tweaters were simple to point downward to direct sound towards the seating area.  Sound quality is very good.  It would be nice if they offered a 4" version
SD on the go. This is a great product for those who need to transfer files from a digital camera without the hasle of software. Its easy and quick. I use it every chance i get, and it fits in your pocket, what more can you ask for :
Cheap and no too bad. It is pretty cheap stuff.  I did not expect excellent quality, however, in my speedlite 420, it works excellently, and supposed to provide more than 300 flashes with a focal length average of 70
Excellent "batteries" *sniff*. I bought these batteries last week for the original list price of $723,440.  However, I also received 80 kilos of pure Columbian cocaine and a Ferrari, so I don't feel ripped off.Thanks J & R Music World
Things to consider if you're getting a 2GB card. I purchased the 2GB Elite Pro SD card but found out that my older SimpleTech FlashLink card reader is not able to recognize the card under WinXP SP2 with and without the most recent SimpleTech drivers. I don't have another card reader for my computer, but the pictures recorded on it by my digital camera can be viewed on my PDA so I assume that it's the card reader. Shortly afterwards, I also discovered that Kingston makes a combo kit that includes their USB 2.0 SD/MMC reader for a bit less in price than the card alone.I also noticed the ATP line of 60x and 150x SD cards. I have no experience with their products, but their SD cards are potted versus placed in a plastic shell. They tout their cards as being more rugged and waterproof. I'm very careful and have not had any flash cards fail on me, but with the rising capacities and smaller form factors, I will consider the ATP cards in the future.
Wow!. I bought this product for my Samsung SGH-D807 phone to store music files and pictures.  It was reasonably inexpensive and I have been more than satisfied.  My phone accidently got dropped in a pool of water and the phone fried, but the micro SD card stood strong.  A new phone later, and the sd card is going strong
Logitech Notebook Stand. Great product!  Less expensive than docking stations, this stand brings the notebook screen up to eye-level relieving neck strain.  It also features 3 USB ports and keyboard features not available on laptops including a number key pad.  It also folds-up and is totally portable in my notebook backpack
Pretty Good Book Thing. Sometimes I need to have a few books open at the same time, and still have clear desk space for note taking. I used to keep one in my lap, or close it with a scrap of paper in it to keep the page, or sometimes just put an open book on the floor so I could open another.  Not any more! Now I look back on those days and laugh at myself like a maniac until my face hurts because of what a total moron I was. What the crud was I thinking anyway??  This thing keeps my books open, and saves space on my desk. The little page holders fall out, but not all the time, so who cares? You're not going to loose them unless you've got a silver shag rug that's three inches deep, and it's not a big deal to pop them back in.In truth I have two of these pretty good book things
EXELENTE!!!!!!!. i already test a loot of mobo... asus, msi (my last was k8n diamond), and others... but this board looks like no other, and realy works!!! for gamers is the ultimate board... i really recomend it!
Wish I'd gone for mini-dvi to DVI. It works fine, but it gets really annoying when you're using it with a widescreen Mac and a widescreen TV. The zoom function most plasmas and LCD TVs have is 16:9 aspect ratio, whereas Macs are at 16:10 aspect ratio, so you can either cut off the top and bottom of what you're trying to display, or have massive letter-boxing. After three months, I still haven't had any glitches that were this adapter's fault.If you have HDMI or DVI on your TV or projector, don't bother with this. Go straight to DVI with a Mini-dvi to DVI adapter, then get a DVI to DVI cord or a DVI to HDMI cord
Solid ink cartridge. I've used these for years and, even though the newer cartridges are a bit better, this one still is reliable and it's good to see they are continuing to make it for the printers that need it
Good but horrible with Vista. I absolutely LOVE this product, however, don't try the networking with Vista, not unless you turn off Quick Indexing or just use the USB connection.  Works excellently with XP and Linux Mandrivia 2007!   Not a spec of trouble, quiet and simple to setup.  Pain in the $*% with Vista unless you turn off quick index.   Slow with Vista when doing a cut and paste from Vista to the unit.  Under XP I did not have this problem so evidence points to a crappy OS.  This is not the Vantec Nexstar's fault.Would I purchase another one?  Yes! In a heart beat!  Or better yet, after I've completed this review
Great TV for the price. I searched far and wide and compared many tv's.  It came down to the Panasonic Plasma TV vs. the Sony KDFE42A10.  I went with the Sony due to price; but I'm glad I did.  I can't see putting [...]in a TV.  I am really pleased with the Sony; particularly the price I paid.  It was so much cheaper here at Amazon.com than at the big box retail stores
VERY GOOD. PUT UNIT IN MY MODEL A FORD, LOVE IT. DOES EVERYTHING I NEED.
Workable for what I need. I got the Nike+ Armband and the Nike+ sensor chip (see: Nike+ Ipod Sport Kit) this past Christmas and have run with it about 15 times so far. Both work for what I need them for, so for me it works out great. I generally run 5 - 8 miles a shot, and only pause a workout when waiting to cross roads. The Armband fits my arms (13 - 14 inch) nicely (Other reviews mention it being too small, I think they're referring to the other Nike Armband, a totally different product). The Ipod fits in the pouch snugly and has a bumped out area at the bottom to accommodate the Nike+ Sensor.The issue with it completely covering the ipod screen is only a slight annoyance for me. Running the pace I run, I would not really be planning on trying to read the screen or try to change play lists. When using it in conjunction with the Nike+ Sensor, the only controls I need on the Nano are to press the center button, turn up or down the volume, hit previous or next or pause. With this armband, I have no problems working any of those controls.  The other things I like about the Armband are the fact that because it is covered and somewhat water proof, I can run in the rain and still use my Nano, also it's made of moisture-wicking material and is completely washable.
awesome!. I bought a set of these speakers for myself, and then decided to get them for my daughter too. Grest sound, and good volumn for these little speakers. They don't take up much space on the desk, so if your looking for something smaller and great sound, these are the speakers to buy! I love them..
Great little item for your flash. If you have a flash, this or a light sphere is almost a needed item to improve your creative range with your shots. Though, I highly recommend this product over the light sphere, as they both have about the same visual effect, but the light sphere costs dramatically more.This device fits easily onto your flash and holds tight. No need for ugly tape or sticky velcro pads that look tacky. This thing merges into the form of your flash and looks like it belonged there the whole time. Looks aside, what does it do?It diffuses your flash's light so you get a softer and more spread-out look to your flash. No more pictures looking like you're shining a spotlight on people. This has a more "natural soft light" look to it. I highly recommend it for indoor use, because you'll want a soft flash with it being the only light source, and the omni-bounce spreads out the light so you are better able to light up the scene and room.The only downside is that since it is softening the light, you may need to adjust your flash output. You may have to dial up your exposure (meaning slower flash recycle times and faster battery drainage). The tradeoff is irritating sometimes, but well worth it for the improved looks in your photos.
Works like a charm. I've seen these online and they are expensive.  This one works well and maintains privacy.  It fits right over your screen and 3M provides these little tabs to make it stick.  I bought it for my office where people walk behind me all the time time and it works great.  I feel like I can check my email or shop on amazon during downtime through out the workday.  This also would be excellent for laptops on airplanes and such.
Excellent Small System for Small Space. I purchased this item for my kitchen as I love to listen to cd, cd-mp3, or my ipod while I cook and/or clean.  It was the perfect choice.  While I did not mount it on the wall, it is still less bulky than most units.  It fits perfectly on the counter against the wall.  The sound is wonderful and I get all the fm stations I need!  I would highly recommend this product
VN2100 Review. I bought this to replace a much bulkier cassette recorder to record mapping and other info while hiking the vast Hawaii Volcanoes Nat'l Park.  It has exceeded my expectations for clarity, capacity and for not turning on/off accidentally.The volume is great at HQ mode, picking up footsteps in desert areas, with no static as on the cassette recorder. I use "Hold" between messages and have recorded 40 over a 12 mile/5 hour hike with no glitches.  In heavy weather, I use it in a ziplok bag, with no apparent loss in quality.I forgot to shut off and put it in a jacket pocket where it kept doing it's job, including some expletives when I deleted a waypoint on my GPS.Only nit-pick is having to re-set time/date when changing batteries.  Not important for my use.  (And I changed needlessly because I mis-read the battery life indicator).  I don't yet know battery life, and may switch to re-chargeables so as to re-charge along with the GPS..just a convenience thingie
Very happy with Sony Bravia. Did a lot of research both on-line and in local stores, looked at Sharp Aquos, Philips and Samsung (all 37", due to space constraints). Sony Bravia comes in 32" and 40", went with smaller, 32" Bravia because of clarity and color - would rather have smaller Sony quality product than larger of other brands.  Great resolution. Easy to use out of box. Have had it for two months and are very happy with product. Only "complaint" is that when put on "mute" is does not close-caption
Very well priced, sleek design, performs nicely. Noticed a slight quality improvement in cable HD channels, but no noticeable difference in audio quality.I bought this to get a decent spike/surge protector for my newly bought system (42" Panasonic plasma and a Yamaha HT).Very stylish cabinet, great looking sleek design
For people who love Home Theatre. This product is for people who really care about their home theatre, it's not really for people who just want a way to connect this to their stereo.  Although the power cord that comes with it is pretty handy since it's basically an extension cord that allows you plug the airport express in and place the actual unit away from the plug.  If all you care about is just connecting it to your stereo then just use the RCA cables that come with it.  If you are really into your home theatre I would say these cables are a definite must for connecting the airport express to i
Koss 147737 UR5 Sp Stereo Headphones Review. Good inexpensive headphones. Keep these on hand for times where additional headsets are needed or for replacements for existing running headsets. They have a pretty good life expectancy and have lasted through daily runs for months and months in all types of weather
Geforce 7600GS 512MB AGP Review. The Card was easily physically installed. And the software easily installed. As for the video editing capability of this card I can't evaluate at this time. I've only recently obtained a Hi Definitioncamera and no video has been captured as yet. Really have high expections this particular AGP card with 512MB on board memory will allow my 2.4 PT-4 with hyperthread to easily edit the Hi Definition videos. It appearedthe best value for price and the reviews I'd read mentioned great compatibility with windows based PCs. Only giving 4 stars since I haven't had an opportunity to try this cards video editing performance.
You may not need to buy a FireWire cable. So far, an excdellent hard drive. But (though Amazon specs say otherwise) it it DOES come with a FireWire cable (albeit a very short one), so you may not need to purchase an additional cable
Superior Sound. I have always considered myself a bit of an audiophile.  I appreciate and enjoy quality sound reproduction in both my music and in my movies.  The Bose Companion 5 sound system delivers sound quality well beyond my high expectations for sound.  The price tag is pretty steep, but I decided to go for the surround sound capabilities offered in the Companion 5 system to augment my 30" Apple Cinema Display for an immersive movie-going experience on my Mac.  If connected and set up as per the instructions, this sound system delivers the performance as advertised.Connection is by a simple USB plug.  After that, a quick trip to System Preferences in OS X requires a few set up changes in the sound panel and that is all there is to it.  The first time I played music from iTunes I opened my equalizer and adjusted the settings to my preferences as well as the bass settings knob on the acoustimass sub woofer.  I have owned several sets of speakers including Klipsch and I can easily attest that the Bose Companion 5 is superior to all of them.  The first movie I tried out was "Saving Private Ryan".  From the DVD options menu I selected Dolby 5.1 audio and then I cranked up the volume and watched the Normandy invasion scene.  It was simply incredible.  Several times I was turning and looking behind me because I thought my dog was knocking something over in the room; only to realize that it was the sound of bullets ricocheting behind me.  Awesome.Of all the Bose products I have owned, I have found them all to deliver superior sound as advertised.  If you can get past the sticker shock on these speakers, and make sure that you've adjusted the sound settings on your computer as well as the equalizer settings in your computer's music player and the bass settings knob on the back of the acoustimass sub woofer, I can pretty much guarantee you're going to be in for a very impressive audio experience whether it is music or movies
Great Product. Great reception, fantastic sound. The infrared capability means no hiss or other radio interference. This headset keeps peace at home. A bonus is the fantastic sound effects when used in conjunction with the surround sound of my older TV. The only down side is the slight difficulty getting the headset to connect properly to the charger, although this is easily overcome with a little experience
Great Product, Awsome Price. I have used my new sub everyday since I got it It sounds great, and is very crisp and clean sounding. The price was great, it got here in a few days after I orderd it. A MUST GET for any audio lover
Great Sounding At A Great Price. I bought this, as I had nothing to play my cassettes on anymore.  Sounds great, especially for under $100
Great compact bag with plenty of pockets. I bought this bag for my 15" Dell, I also carry a lot of folders, chargers, wireless mouse, MP3 and junk in my bag.  It's a little hard to get the laptop in the bag if it's full of folders, but other than that its very durable and a great bag.  The lumbar padding is great.  I carry it everyday, there's a pocket everywhere for anything you could imagine
Excellent Bang-for-your-buck. This television has outstanding picture quality considering it's price. You can't find a better value than this TV in this price range. My Xbox 360 looks FANTASTIC over VGA. With some older LCDs you have to worry about ghosting and lag, but I have not encountered any problems with it.Now to the complaints... Be ready to realize how bad Standard Def looks! Once you've seen things in HD, you won't be able to look at your grainy SD signals the same again. Also, the channel changing is a bit laggy (a minor annoyance.) The Menu is also a bit wonky and difficulty to navigate, but it does it's job fine. I would have like a few more controls over the picture. I like that you can update the bios via USB
Lucky. I was very lucky to find this AC Adapter,  It had to be an original Dell Latitude and I could not find it any where else but Dell who wanted a lot of money for it.I got it here on Amazon for $20.00 and am very grateful.ThanxAmazo
Great product!. I bought this case because I wanted to keep my ipod and earplugs in my purse without the earplugs being tangled or my ipod screen being scratched. This case is compact enough that it does not take up much purse real estate but provides protection for my treasured ipod. I liked it so much that I have purchased another one to give as a giftIf you are considering this product, read the seller reviews. The first seller took forever to send. When I contacted them, they told me that they were having difficulty filling my order and that I could cancel. Amazon would not let me cancel until more than 30 days after the order was placed. On the very day I was allowed to cancel. The celler decided to send the case. For the second order, I went with the seller who charged more money, but at least I will receive it within my lifetime
Excellent product. Easy opening package.  Plugged it into the TV and hooked it up to the iPod.  Nothing showed on the screen.  Read the directions and changed a setting on the iPod and it worked beautifully
prompt and as advertised. I received this product quickly, even though it was during the holidays.  The product arrived as advertised and perfectly packaged.  I would definitely buy from this vendor again
Sleek, Black, More Like Furniture Than A Monitor... Bought it for the appearance - sleek shiny piano black finish - and performance - high refresh rate, brightness, etc. (Note: Bought it from Amazon after seeing it in a chain store and a getting bait-and-switch two step from the sales help there. Ordered from Amazon - more or less same price - and had it two days later on regular no-charge shipping. Don't screw around, buy from Amazon, a class act.) Looks great, works great!Some minuses: Occasional blurring on quick action scenes in analog. (And NOT in HD.) Also it would be nice if the zoom was scalable.Other than that, no complaints, and yeah, I'd buy another, and I WOULD buy it from Amazon.
Excellent product. This product is well made and really meets the need for wall mounting my flat panel Tv to a single stud
Great Case for the Price. It is an amazing case. The pictures on this site do not do the case justice; it looks amazing and it is surprisingly durable. And it shipped pretty fast for me too, even with the free shipping(only took 2 days including the day I ordered it.) It is a great bag and I recommend it to anyone with a fairly large laptop (In my case the Toshiba G25-AV513, a pretty big lappy)
Hands down the best memory card recorder to date. I tested this along side the SanDisk V-Mate, and there is no comparison.  I have put a lot of video on my PSP before, but recordings from this player are excellent for a small screen viewer and have outdone anything I've seen before.  The sound quality is top notch too.  The only drawback is the 1990's interface, but I got beyond that right away after seeing the recordings on my PSP
A must have for Vision M owners. If you're buying a Zan Vision: M, you need this set. The process of charging through the USB cable that comes with the player is ridiculously long and annoying. Both of the chargers work beautifully. I've had absolutely no problems. The only complaint I have is that the cords on these chargers are shorter than I would like. The wall charger cord is 2 or 3 feet long which means it can't go far while it's plugged in. It is hardly long enough to put the player on my desk while it's plugged in. The car charger cord is a foot long, maybe less. It's coiled so that, theoretically, you could stretch it if you needed it to be longer, but in my experience trying to stretch it just pops it out of the lighter socket. So that's something to keep in mind when buying
This is a very good basic mouse. This rating is for the mouse itself. Having owned this mouse, I decided to get one for my eldely Aunt. Since stores no longer carry this model, I decided to get it on Amazon. The mouse itself is great basic mouse that is quite durable. The buttons click well, and the mouse wheel feels sturdy. It also fits very comfortably in the hand, and my Aunt loves it. This is her first Optical mouse, as the one she had before was a VERY OLD ball mouse which had to be cleaned every few weeks to remove lint that had built up on the inside.
Mounted my 40" Sony - No Problem. If you're considering mounting your TV, and don't want to break the bank,  I can recommend this one.  I mounted our Sony KDL-40S20L1 with no problem.  All the hardware is provided for most every brand of TV.I did sweat just a bit when hanging the TV on the bracket.  There seemed to be no more than a couple inches of adjustment left/right.  Luckily, since the bracket was near perfectly centered, the TV did not need to slide much to correct for being "near" perfect  :-)   Also, I used two mounting holes in the middle since the wall plate did not spread the 16" on either side to fasten it to another stud.  Using the one stud/two fasteners seems to be plenty strong for the job.What I did not like about the mount is time it took to turn the screws to secure the braces to the wall bracket.  They are located on the bottom of the braces and ensure the TV does not come off the bracket.  The supplied wrench is "L" shaped and the short leg is way too long to turn 360 degrees. (The good news is that your TV is only and inch or so off the wall) I spent more time turning those two screws than the entire time it took to mount the bracket or the braces.  I plan to use my Dremel to trim the leg of the "L", or cut it off completely.  I might then be able to use an electric screwdriver with that to speed up that process.Lastly, you'll need a buddy when you mount the TV.  It definitely takes two to make sure the thing gets hung safely.  Good Luck to you
don't  believe  RedDog  he is wrong  !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. My is  working good for over years now so Please buy one  &amp; try them &amp; you will see that  RedDog   was wrong!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
iflybyeyou. I have 4 of these to use with my ipac and also my mp3 player which they are full of all my music and are interchangeable with both units
Good outdoor speaker value for the money. My speakers are mounted outdoors about 30 feet from a salt water bay. They're subject to lots of moisture and wind, but are under a roof so they don't get rained on. After six months they are still working great. They're attractively shaped, came with complete mounting hardware for different types of installation, and they sound fine
Excellent Photo Quality But Cropping is Awkward. Picture sharpness is excellent, but some images print darker than they should.  Cropping is my only real complaint.  The controls are awkward and, worse, not fine enough.  It's often difficult to frame everything you want and not what you don't want because the available cropping settings are inadequate.  There's no technical reason for this limitation, Canon just didn't provide fine enough control of that feature.
Panasonic SH-FX60 Rear Wireless Upgrade Kit. This product works great, good sound, and easily hidden.  The only draw back is that the back speakers still have to be connected together by wires.  I expected them to be independent not wired together, probably should of read the fine print if there was any.  Good product hovever for the low price!!
Great Value Good for Novice. This is the 1st scanner i have used since I was a young boy listening to my dad's old BearCat unit. I find it easy to operate for casual use and the preprogramming picks up Tampa PD and HillsCounty Fire Rescue though on preset EMS, not preseit police. I am having trouble programming for trunking which is necessary to follow HillsCounty Sheriffs office, but I'm roaming the net to find tips.  Good buy, very pleased
great product!!!!!!. i saved hundreds of dollars on all my scratched cd's by using this product!!
Value. Excellent product... clear sound, crisp highs and mid range.  Base in a little light, but not in a problematic way, only need to adjust equalizer.  Best speakers I have ever owned.  Great value for the price
Good protection, smaller than most. I have had this case for about a year and a half now and it has done it's job well. I have dropped it several times and my tungsten still works fine. I usually keep it in my back pocket and I tend to sit on it, and still no problems (except that the case gets a little bent out of shape.) I've just about worn this one out and am going to replace it with the same thing. However, it looks like the  Innopocket is the exact same thing for $10 less. My biggest complaint is that it only opens to 180 degrees. But considering the alternatives, it seems to be the best thing out there for a small hard case
it is excellent. I have had another pioneer for a long time. That was great. I was leaning towards SONY or Yamaha model. But I got a good deal on it. So i bought this. I think It is just great
Lexar PD-128-231 128 MB JumpDrive Portable USB Flash Drive. This is a fantastic product.  I use it to store work on and my boss and I swap back and forth using each other's jump drives.  Great for making your business portable
Great Garmin Portable Friction Mount. I was very skeptical if this friction mount would work because I read reviews saying that it flies off the dash.I have an X-5 and the dash is curved, but the friction mount ACTUALLY works.  It stays in place even though I have stopped suddenly.In fact, I think I will get another one for my other car.
Kingston SD/2GBKR 2 GB SD Memory Card. This product is good. I haven't seen any issues with this so far...
It is not bad for this price. It is nothing fancy and not the greatest quality, but it does the job.  I think it is worth it for the price.
WOW! great item. I bought this 2 years back and still it is in great shape. Recently i forgot compact flash in my shirt pocket and went for washing and then followed by Drying. My wife found compact flash in dryer and i thought it would not work. Surprisingly it is working fine and i could see my past snapshots with out any problem.
A Solution That Works. I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.
Use the right size ear bud attachment, and BAM... Amazing sound comes from these tiny inexpensive headphones. The different size buds are very comfortable and help produce the deep bass sound once you find the pair the fit your ear.when I first got them I put the smallest buds on first and thought I had just bought the worst headphones. So I tried the largest buds and found they fit very comfortably and because of the seal they created in my ears they acted as an air tight bass box improving the sound ten fold.And just let you know I ussualy cant wear earbud headphones because they hurt my ear holes or they just don't fit righ
Last one 9 years no problems. Bought the same model again. The last one lasted 9 years on the same battery with no problems. Used for for everyday use and SCUBA diving no problems. Current one still works but needs new battery so i figured I would just get a new one
Very Satisfied. Product was just what I was looking for and at the right price.  Could not have been happier with my purchase.  I will look for this vendor again in the future
Great sounding speakers!. I was Impressed with the sound that these speakers produced in my small living room. At 100/120 RMS, these will run circles around any BOSE! Keep in mind that this is a Mid to Hi-range  Speaker, so for the Low range, you will need a Sub. (If you use these for your front speakers.)In addition, the NS-555 and -777 is essentually the same as the -333(given, larger enclosure) with 2 low-range speakers (with seperate +/- Posts).For cinema it may be best to buy 2 or 3 pair for a 6/7 channel reciever and a Sub woofer, than to spend money on the (2)555 or (2)777.
Dont pay too much for that cable. I picked up this hdmi cable after price shopping and review reading. I have bought other cables from cables to go and received good bang for my buck. This cable was no exception.
Just the best. everything looks great with this monster...power power...i cant wait to overclok it a bit to squeeze it.
Excellent speaker cables. I am a person who mainly listens to the overall music rather than spending time to pickout each and every instrument while listeing to a music album. However I should admit that after listeing to my music system using the monster cable, overall the  listening has become more enjoyable. In fact while listening to the song "HotelCalifornia" I almost felt that some unwanted sounds also have started coming through my speakers, as over year of listening, I was tuned to certain sounds and when the new cable started reproducing sounds which was previously not heard, it was a total surprise. There was a noticable improvement over my previous cable in terms of bass (earlier was Monster THX hometheater cable, biwired by me using monster banana plugs) and the postioning of vocals and lead instruments was more clear which I earlier thought was more of the imagination of the reviewer.I am very happy about this buy and would recomment the same to anybody who have a good mid-end amp/speakers
Careful with your slot!. This is a PCMCIA card. New laptops (e.g. Dell Inspiron E1705) have ExpressCard slots. This is a new standard but it is not compatible with PCMCIA slot. Before going for this card make sure you have a PCMCIA slot in your notebook, or else the card won't fit. There is no ExpressCard soundcard yet
Great Mouse- Perfect for Desktop PC or Laptop Use. I originally bought this mouse for my work laptop, thinking it was smaller than it actually is.  It's smaller than the mouse that was already provided, but bigger than a laptop mouse.  That's my mistake for not reading the specs.  Not having the red laser saves on power, and the range has been good so far.  I love the left/right scrolling function, perfect for big Excel sheets.  The back and forward buttons are nice too, although I don't use them as much.  The provided software allows you to customize buttons for specific software, and you can change the default functions as well.  Definitely a great buy
great buy. i did some shopping around on consumer reports and such before i invested in a flat screen. this really is a great tv. the picture is beautiful, the sound matches. its awesome
Monster Quality. Run my PC to my Carver pre-amp. Does a great job without losing any sound along the way
Works flawlessy. I've had it for a month.  It does what it should.  No problems easy to set up.  What I like is the tiny size compare to the previous generation of switches
Great Picture, Great Combo TV, Can't Channel Surf!. I love the picture this TV gives. Great deal for the money you pay. Unfortunately when you want to channel surf, it takes forever to change channels. I tried using the automatic channel programming mode, but it did not make channel surfing any faster. Overall I really like this TV for the fact that we mounted it on the wall and the dvd player is already connected. If you want a spacesaver at a good price this TV is definately worth it
Absolutely awesome!. We have owned this item for over a year and are still LOVING it!  The sounds is great and it is so easy to use.  We use it everyday for both radio and CD listening on average for 30-45 minutes and the batteries last surprisingly long.  Highly recommend it.  I know there are some less expensive units available, but this is worth every penny
Nothin' but love for the JBL ON STAGE II!. I LOVE LOVE LOVE my JBL ON STAGE II!!!  Size/shape is great!  Sound is outstanding!  What more do you want?!  :)  BUY IT!
Western Digital 320GB Hard Drive. A great drive at a great price.  Easy to install
It's great having three. These Motorola telephones have good looks, sound quality and range.  It's great having three phones placed around the house with only one main base. My only complaint is that they are a bit on the small side and that takes a little getting use to.  As always Amazon's price was the best
Outstanding Sound Quality--It's like getting new ears. After months and years of frustration with balky, expensive, poorly sounding sound cards from that 'creative' company, I finally gave up and did my homework.  M-Audio has been in the business for a long time, but most of there gear is specialty items.  At just the right time came just the right product.  This is an excellent sound card--the specs you can read, but hearing is believing.The difference is just incredible.  You don't know what you're missing in your music until you try out this sound card.  Absolutely no distortion, dead quiet background noise, and silky smooth, flat wide response.  Listening to a lot of jazz, blues, classical and acoustic music demands the very best of a sound system.  With the Revolution card, I can hear musical detail that just wasn't there before.  I don't need to turn up the volume (although it's a lot of fun) to hear the rhythm section and background instruments.  The splash of cymbals, the clank of a cow bell, or the strings of an acoustic bass are right there in front of you.  You'll want the best quality speakers or headphones to get the most out of this card.Great user interface / control panel.  The control panel is cleanly designed and easy to understand.  You can see the input signal strength independently of setting the output volume and  avoid overdriving the DACs.  There are a bunch of surround sound synthesis options which work very well--even with headphones.I went for the 7.1, but the 5.1 would be fine for most applications and at a (street) price 1/3 of the high-end SB cards.Well done M-Audio.  It's about time someone showed SB how to do it right
Outstanding Receiver. I purchased this item on March 15 from Amazon. We've been using it for almost a month now. My wife and I have built our HT system in our Master bedroom (16x14x10) also have 40" Samsung LCD 4095 (1080p) and Polk audio speakers (in ceiling) LC60i for front and middle speakers and RC60i for the surround speakers. I'm awaiting for Toshiba HD-XA2 that was recently ordered to complement our system and would be replacing my current infinity  subwoofer with a HSU STF-2 sub.Originally my first choice was a Pioneer VSX-1016 receiver but with lack of zone 2 and HDMI video pass-thru only. I didn't think it fit our needs. However, Onkyo TX-SR604b not only was a true bargain but it also exceeded my expectations, ease of use (very easy setup) user friendly powerful enough to drive all my polk speakers clean and crisp sound. I did'nt have any problem as far as clicking sound related to HDMI issues like few folks have mentioned on their reviews and I didn't mind running extra component cable to my TV knowing it doesn't up-convert component to HDMI. The only thing that I haven't tested it yet was the zone 2 feature. I'm planning to install my extra pair RC60i in wall speakers to our master bathroom hopefully soon so can't comment on that part yet.Overall we're very pleased with our purchased Thanks AMAZON!
as expected. the speakers are good quality and the Amazon service is great as usual. sony has always been tops for me.
perfect for video ipod. no need to spend 60 dollars or more on the flashy monster/apple cable just hook this fella up and away you g
Good Guitar. Period. I receieved my guitar in the mail early and upon opening the package, I got a better guitar than I expected, especially for the price.I paid 90 bucks for this guitar, and I feel that it didn't even cost half of what it should have. I would have paid twice that amount just for the guitar by itself.I strongly recommend this guitar to anyone starting out, and as a gift for someone else
Works, but is bulkier than the Apple charger. This will charge your Ipod without any problem. However as a travel charger it is much larger than the Apple charger, and the plug does not fold in. However it is less money, which is the main reason that I bought it. I mainly use it to charge my Ipod in the house when my laptop is not around, but for travel purposes I take the smaller  Apple charger
It's a good stuff!!. This Portable Friction Mount can stand on my dash and never fall down!Strongly recommend!
Fantastic!. I love this thing! I've been transferring files to it all day, and its just barely warm. Running a Maxtor hard drive in it and it fit great. Very small hassle, very quick to install & looks pretty sweet. 2 thumbs up
Great reception for the outdoors!. The headphone antenna certainly works much better than the internal antenna of my Tao XM2Go, though if you're thinking you can enjoy listening to portable xm around the house. You're wrong. You get the same great reception as you would from your xm car kit antenna when outdoors, but you're not gonna get any better reception indoors. They're fit very snug, maybe too snug for some people liking but the sound on them is excellent
You better have the power for this unit to work right. I tryed to use this on an older p4 1500 megahz and had a few glitiches during the recording (loss of frames).Then I broke out the wifes new laptop and had no problem at all.The S video from my old High 8 Video Cam came out perfect.  Sound was perfect too.The point is you MUST have the power.  I do not care what the manufacture put on the box.I would have given it 5 stars if the recomended computer requirements matched what I had to use to get the results.
Very good. Stand-alone CD players (not combimed with DVD players) are rare nowadays, and this is one of the better ones, especially since it plays CD-Rs. A defect, unfortunately quite typical of electronic appliances these days, is the completely unnecessary standby function that cannot be turned off
Easy to install and easy to use. Installs easily right out of the package, just plug it in your usb adapter and you're off and running.  Feels very smooth on the hand.  Smooth and comfortable
Nice Price for the Mic. If you are starting off and want a descent mic without breaking the bank this mic gets the job done. Just make sure you power it off after each use or you'll burn through batteries very quickly.
4-4-4-12 timing .. running great. Everything you expect good ram to be. Its fast, its fairly well priced,and its of upstanding quality.Vary good stuff if you plan to be using it for animation or video game stuff.Right now, its on a ASUS P5W DH DELUXE board, with 10000 RPM drive,3.2GH Intel D940, 8800GTX video card.Over all the system looks fairly great.
$249 - It's a Great Buy!. Not sure what some of the purchasers expected, but this is a fantastic navigation system for $249. Touch screen is great. We programmed all of our frequent trip addresses into the GPS and can get to them from anywhere. Excellent coverage from downtown Detroit to Up North Michigan.. No complaints... Again, for $249  a GREAT DEAL
XM connect and play. This is the only unit that will work with 2ndary purchases, ie sony, pioneer, that are xm ready.  Every place was sold out and I bought for $36 when all sold out places were $50.  ITs perfect
excellent, esp with new DVD player. Got this TV two weeks ago, and this past weekend installed a Sony DVPNS75H Single Disc Upscaling DVD Player i got for around $100 from Amazon.  True what they say, DVDs now look HD with this combo.  so if you have the sharp aquos, spend the little extra money and add the upscaling dvd player.  worth i
Easy as shit. Great router! It was a snap to setup, install, and run! Highly recommend it. Linksys tech-support is great. A monkey can install this thing. Note: I didn't mention a Caveman. Look what happened to Geico when they did
iM716 ..........current bargain amongst iem's. This is not my first InEarMonitor purchase. Prior to the iM716, I have been using Etymotics er-6i (both amped and unamped), which I had considered the absolute best-bang for the buck monitors. My background includes an interest in "hi-fi" since around 1960, and several years with guitar, string bass, piano etc....anyway..........these are the new champs in the under $250 price category, and strongly comparable to Shure E4, and Ety ER-4S. Negative reviews here reflect that some folks have little idea of how iem's are inserted/fit. Insertion is directed to the front and upwards (this is the natural direction of the ear canal). Also, don't be afraid of going too deep with them - you cannot hurt yourself with them and they demand a good seal. The iM716 is very good in presenting the details of a recording (they are derived from Etymotic drivers), but they are also very musical-sounding. My personal choice of tips for them is Shure Softflex (they fit perfectly). If you need foamies, then Comply works very well. The only questionable choice made by Altec Lansing was to put an in-line resistor module with them (giving you a choice of using them unamped from a power-weak player or switching the module to HD position for more refined sound which is best when amped (imo)(module also has a volume control). The downside for having this module is that it adds a bit of weight to the line. While I don't like this module for my usage, I can see where others could rejoice in its' inclusion.The design is very attractive and I sometimes think of getting a second pair of them, simply because they are soo cheap and comfortable to me. These iM716's are now my go-to choice for portable listening.
Stylish and useful. i like this better than the i-p's and it works great,many features and long battery life, gets recharged from the usb connection on your computer.
It is the best on the Market!!. I GOT THIS CABLE LAST WEEK TO CONNECT MY STEREO SPEAKES TO MY T.V., AND  NOW WHEN I  WATCH MOVIES THE SOUND IS INCREDIBLE, ALTHOUGH IT IS ONLY A 19  INCH T.V.  (LOL) I HIGHLY SUGGEST YOU CHOOSE THIS CABLE!!!!!
Great Stand. I bought the stand for my 50 inch plasma on Jan 2 2007.  The stand is made of high quality material.  It looks sleek and neat.  Had no problems setting it up.  The black base unti does collect a lot of dust as does anything that color.  Running the wires through the pole in the back is time consuming and frustrating, but hey that's the price we pay to hide all the cables and making it look neat.  Overall, very satasfied with the product
Sound Great. These speakers are both stylish and sound great, a nice compliment to my first Mac computer
GOOD UNIT, HOWEVER NO RESUME ON CD, REAR EARPHONES!. Just bought mine last week and just like many other consumers, I was searching for CD-MP3-AM-FM RADIO and remote.ADVANTAGES ARE:1) The ONLY smaller desktop unit that I found with CD-MP3-AM-FM RADIO and remote.2) Has sleep timer 30 minutes, 60 minutes, 90 and 120 minutes. This is handy for CD's, MP3's and the radio.3) Fairly good sound for the money.4) Easy to use remote. (I leave mine next to the unit).DISADVANTAGES ARE:1) Earphone plug in the back of the unit. When I want to plug in my earphone, it is hard to reach this and it is a poor design!2) My biggest disappointment--no resume on CD or MP3! I listen to alot of audio books and I find this a real inconveince! I have to go to the track that I think I left off or write it down! (My Panasonic MP3 CD small portable has this, why did they forget this in this one?).3) Terrible reception on AM--STATIC!4) Sound equalizer needs much improvement for the sound quality and ease of use.I bought this because it is the only AM/FM/CD/MP3/CASSETTE unit with a timer and remote that I could find! Since the AM radio is so terrible, I ended up buying the Sony ICF-M410V so I can listen to my AM talk shows. This one has a sleep timer up to 60 minutes, a clock and easy to use.Overall, I still give it a 4 because of it's many features and that it has a cassette for my older tapes. **And, I wish I would have bought it on Amazon, not at Radio Shack (they were about $25 more). Live and learn! If you are looking for a all in one with CD, MP3, CASSETTE, REMOTE AND AM-FM RADIO, this is about the only one that you will find and I looked for 3 months!UPDATE: September 18, 2006: After owning this one month, I like it better and better! I love the SLEEP feature that you can use up to 120 minutes (2 hours) either on the radio or the CD! This AUTOMATICALLY shuts the unit off. It is a great feature if you are listening to a CD that contains 40 hours of MP3's on it and you don't want it to play all night
Targus PA238U. The stand is a great height.  It is now much easier to use my laptop - no neck strain and shoulder strain from having to sit and type in an uncomfortable position.  The criticism I have is that it is difficult to get to the USB ports in the back of my laptop.  I would also like the top of the stand to be a little more vented for cooling the laptop
Better then all the fancy mousepads - buy this. This is a great product at a great price. I bought four twenty dollar  mouse pads before this, all the others really serve no purpse, the gel  packs block my way the harder surfaces dont grab that well and it is  worthless and a horrible waste of money. This mouse pad is the one im  sticking with it grabs well looks good and its under 5 bucks!! This is a  must for anyone. When it all comes down to it, all the fancy stuff serves  no purpose and wastes alot of money. Buy this product
Handy Gadget to Prevent Skipping. When my CDs started skipping I thought they has seen the last days of spinning, however this Disc Cleaner has solved all problems. You simply put the CD into the cleaner with the label side down. Then, you spray the disc cleaner to the disc surface. You only apply one even spray of cleaner. Then, you close the case and make sure the lid is totally closed.Once you have cranked the movable part of the lid about 5 times, you can remove the disc and let it dry completely. Most of the cleaner was absorbed into the cleaning pad after the recommended 5 rotations. I found that 8 or 9 rotations did the trick.The first time I used this cleaner I was a bit frustrated with it because I noticed little pieces of black foam all over my CDs. Apparently, there is a little piece of foam in the middle that looks like it belongs there and it seems glued down, but once I removed that piece of foam, all was go.This unit comes with one additional cleaning pad. I think if you are just using this to remove fingerprints, you won't have to replace the cleaning pads very often.Handy gadget to prolong disc life and restore performance to contaminated disc surfaces.~TheRebeccaReview.com
Worth the money!. I bought this to replace the standard wires that come with a PS2.  The wires that come with a PS2 are not worth a buck!  As soon as I changed the wires It was amazing!  The colors are so vivid!Cartoon games have AMAZING COLOR!  THrow your old wires in the trash & Buy Monster for game consoles!  YOu will be glad you did, if you like gaming
400 GB External Hard Drive. prety good product no problems fast shipping and fast
Great Transmitter/Charger for the money. Bought this charger after reading several other reviews, so far I haven't had to switch preset channels at all, plays clear/static free all around the Portland, OR and metro area. If you have standard size cup holders near your aux/lighter jack this transmitter should fit in nicely. I'm using a Nano with ours and the fit is good. It's great to have an all in one device, that charges as it plays
Beautiful picture and fantastic sound. I bought this set for my bedroom. I already own a Samsung 40'. There is no comparison between the two. The Toshiba has a better picture and sound quality. TO me it sounds like a stero. I beleive you won't disappointed with this purchas
KB Gear Jam Tablet- it's worth it. I bought this recently not knowing much about what was out on the market in terms of tablets, and I have some advice if you're going to buy this product.Pros: It's a shame Wacom doesn't make tablets that are 5x7 since I have found out that this is the perfect size- it's not so small that you have no room to draw properly, and it's not big enough that you have to hurt your arm  with long movements after a tiring day at work. The price- I bought this for 20 C dollars at the local Radioshack, but you can get one for much cheaper online compared to a Wacom Graphire which is 4x5 and upwards of around 50 US dollars. It's compatible with almost every graphics software and works remarkably well. Unless you're a professional graphics designer, you won't need any of the costly Wacom tablets if you've got this.Cons: When I first unpackaged it, I was tearing my hair out for two days trying to figure out how to make this work in Windows XP. For all of you out there with a similar problem, download this driver for the newer versions of Windows and relax:http://www.compgeeks.com/drivers/KBGearTablet.zipThe pen sensitivity will need to be set to your desired pressure-sensitivity first, so don't try it out before going to Control Panel and changing the settings. I find that the best setting to use for the barrel button option is Left double-click. :) Hope that helped a bit
Works As Advertised With the Exception of the Speeds. This helps my network tremeendously in terms of speed.  In other words,if you are supposed to get up to 8mbps, you will get it from your ISP.  I found that hard to do on my wireless network for some reason.  It doesn't necessarily do HD content, all that well though, but I think you have to get the more expensive one to do that. But it did allow me to hard wire my media center extenders to my network as well as my media center PC.  I have a much more secure connection now.   I do get speeds of about 40mbps most of the time, and I am reasonably satisfied with that since that is a pretty big jump in performance.
Great tool to have around the house. I really like this label maker.  I've been using it to label ski equipment and various household items.  I bought a roll of iron-on fabric tape so I can label my son's clothes for summer camp.It hooks into a PC easily with a USB cable in just a minute.  It comes with a PC application that's akin to a word-processor.  You can compose all your labels on your PC and then just select print.  Any font can be used and you can included graphics.The only downside is the cartridges of label tape are not inexpensive.  If you would like a few colors, you will have to invest in several cartridges that cost $12-20 each.  Admittedly each cartridge will print many many labels so it's only if you want a variety of colors that you would have to spend a lot on cartridges.
happy with the purchse for the price. Nice sound, I will admitt for the price, I get big sound, with quality.  Only thing is a humming, hissing sound when machine is idle. Ohtherwise, worth it.
Loudness?. First of all, these are good speakers, nice design but it has one flaw.batteries...A. it eats them up ...FASTB. if you use batteries instead of the wall plug in it comes with, it wont go as loud, and if it thinks your playing it to loud, it will start..skipping.. or something of the sort.But, it has good sound quality, and honeslty when your on the go, when do you really need it blasting?Also they are just..barley large enough that you cant put them in large jean pockets sadly, but it doesnt weigh much at all.And i really like how if i ever say..lost my Ipod somehow, it has a Cd player (walkman) hook-up so they wont become useless if i lose the ipod.( the wall hook up also comes with many different adapters )
Wish it Connected Directly. This SanDisk CF Type I/II ImageMate USB 2.0 Reader/Writer is a neat little device.  I just pull the Compact Flash card out of my camera, stick it in the ImageMate, plug the USB cable in and grab my pictures without having to mess with a camera/computer transfer or worry about draining the camera's battery.  I'm running XP SP2 and didn't need to install a thing.  I just plugged it into the USB port and XP found and recognized it.  The only reason for giving it 4 stars instead of 5 is that I wish it plugged directly into the USB port itself (like the Simple Tech BONZAI USB 2.0 CARD READER -- though that uses SD/MMC cards instead of CF) instead of having to use the separate (included) USB cable
Easy to use, lightweight. This is my first portable mp3 player and it took me about an hour to go from taking it out the box to having music on it and for me to learn how to work the controls. I did have to read the manual for a few minutes to understand what "hold" meant on the screen - but other than that - very nice little product, good price, and very easy to use
A great buy to keep my shredder in tip-top shape!. I bought this together with my Fellowes shredder, and it has kept my shredder working in perfect condition. No complaints so far
LOVE IT. Bought it for my wife and she loves it. It keeps track of where you were and restarts from there. The display is small (no fancy menus like Ipod)but works well. Sound is excellent.Be sure to install the drivers and software. The software is small, simple and EASY to use - or you can just COPY/PASTE files onto it.If you DON'T install the drivers it only works at USB 1.1 speeds and takes a LOT longer to load songs. With drivers you get full 2.0 speeds
This does what it's supposed to do. This little microphone works well for me. I've owned it since August and now it's November 3. I use it with my Olympus WS-100 to take notes which I then save to my computer and import it into Dragon Naturally Speaking version 9 Preferred which then produces a Microsoft Word document. I speak into the microphone from about 2 inches away and am really careful with my diction and pronunciation because there is just a little bit of distortion if you over drive it. But with a little work in practice it does what it's supposed to do. Oh, one side note if you do import this into Dragon be aware you will have to make corrections. Sometimes a lot of them but that's based on how you speak. Or maybe that's based on how I speak that's been my experience anyway. But that's not the fault of the microphone
Does the job as promised. This is exactly what I was looking for: not too expensive, not much hassle with the cables - they are integrated with the unit, and no need to reach for the button to switch computers - simply press "Scroll Lock" twice to go from one computer to the other.Cables are pretty long, which is good: longer that I need at the moment, but I may appreciate the extra length in the future.
Good product. The positives are: excellent sound quality and perfect reception when near transmitter.The negatives are: the headphones quickly become uncomfortable. I prefer earbuds after using these. The reception is good when nearby or in line of sight of the transmitter. You're not going to get the advertised range if the signal is going through walls.Also, I did the boiling the headphones band described in this forum to avoid cracking. It seems to have worked. No problems there, other than my daughter and her friends thought I was crazy
Up and running in 5 minutes. I just had to unpack it and plug in the cables, then set it for a cable connection and that is it. Beautiful picture
Well whuduhya expect for 25 bucks?. On first glance uppon opening this package, I was alarmed by how small they really were.  Unlike lots of headphones, these seat on the ear rather than around.  They do have three speakers per side. However, due to how close the drivers are to one another being that they're so small, the 3D sound feild leaves more to be desired as far as gaming is concerned.  Good sound quality at low volume, and great frequency response.  Bass, as you can expect, suffers at elevated volume but is good otherwise.  Having volume control on your keyboard is a blessing with these.  They are durable, have a hideously long chord, and are too easy to instal.  The part that rests on the top of your head however, is just semi-stiff plastic.  I'll probably figure out some way to pad them better, but they can be worn for long durations out of the box.Bottom line, yes they're 3D.  Yes they're cheap.  They're definitly worth the money, but if your're willing to spend an extra few bucks, I'd recomend the Z-mans Theater6's, being that their front and rear speakers are way further appart.  From what I hear about those, they "require" an amp to work to their full potential
Great Carry Case!. This is a great carry case for the Sony TX series.  I just wish it wasn't that expensive...but this is a must if have you this laptop...for protection purposes that is
Easy. Within about 12 seconds of opening the box I was listening to my IPOD on my home stereo.  Wires are well made.There may be cheaper options that work as well but these will last forever
excellent little player. The more I use this player, the more I like it.  I see at least a couple of reviews of unhappy users who have either unrealistic expectations or haven't yet learned it's features.  True, it's not the most intuitive player for advanced features, but basic features are easily picked up and if you play around with it, you can figure it out the more advanced features quite easily.  This coming from a guy who thought he was getting left behind in technology.To the person who had difficulty changing songs while running. Easily addressed in two ways.  1- Run with it in your hand, it's small and fits well in a loose griped hand. or 2- learn to set up play lists.  You really should be concentrating on looking where you are going and what's around you (especially when your hearing is somewhat impaired), not flipping through songs.I find it appropriate for it's intended use (excercise, activity), maybe not for the car or trying to DJ with it.Software is not that bad, but defenitely not the best.  It's managable, I've certainly seen worse.Maybe because I want to, but I think I can hear a slight difference between the SONY ATRAC and MP3 formats.  The Sony does sound better.Yeah, needing a computer to charge it can blow, but the battery life is very good and how often are you away from a computer.  I'll find out how good the battery life really is soon on a trip to South America.Also there are not a lot of accessories.  No car charger/transmitter for this model (that I've seen), but again, you have to consider this model's intended purpose and it definitely shines in this area.  Would you rather take a full size IPOD or this thing running/biking
Great Value / Great Product. This Backpack has been the best invention ever..... since one is always taking care of their this on a trip or walking threw the city....And also a great value for what you pay
Privacy filter is a must for managers. I use the privacy filter on both my laptop and my desktop screens and it is a great addition.I no longer have to worry about people perusing sensitive info on my computer in meetings or when working in my office.The filters also prevent me having to quickly minimize my work when someone starts looking over my shoulder.A must for managers that work with employees' personnel info
Epson T048120 Black Ink Cartridge. This item arrived in good condition during the time frame promised.  It is a quality product which works well in the computer printer.  Thank you for delivering this product as promised
Right size. I was so glad to run across this product. I always have such trouble when I travel connecting all of my devices in hotel rooms. I can easy fit all 6 of my devices with their big AC plugs into it. Wish it came in black like the "Outlets to go power Strip 4" does...oh well.
Very good, high-powered stereo receiver. The fad today is for multi-channel audio/video receivers. But most people stiill listen to music with just two speakers and, consequently, only need a good stereo receiver. In fact, a sound stereo system featuring a good stereo receiver, such as this Onkyo, and an excellent pair of speakers will sound better than a typical multi-channel system which usually features several mediocre speakers. Unless you can afford a good multi-channel receiver and several good speakers you will get better sound by sticking with good stereo equipment. The Onkyo TX-8522 is a very good stereo receiver with a wide range of inputs and controls, including a remote control. With 100 watts per channel power it is capable of driving virtually any speakers to deafening levels (which is NOT good for your ears) even if you are inclined to apply significant bass boost. Although the TX-8522 is very reasonably priced, if you would prefer a less expensive receiver, consider the 50 watts per channel Onkyo TX-8211
Outstanding bargain. I am using these speakers with a very low watt Sonic Impact T-Amp.  The speakers respond wonderfully.  With the T-Amp they fill a medium sized room with really nice sound--very clean, very nice reponse across the frequency range.  I have not used them for really loud rock music, so I can't comment on that aspect, but they exceeded my expectations by a lot
Great phone... We purchased this because it expands up to 8 handsets, which is fantastic. Some people have had sound issues. We don't. It's very clear, no static of any kind. It's great that it's got the volume button on the side of the handset. The speaker is also clear, no static and loud enough (volume is adjustable).We're not into ringtones, but I wish it had a simple, regular ringtone. I hate the musical ones.We do like that you can set up a different ring tone for different people. That way you know who's calling without looking at the phone. You can also record your own sound.We like that you can check your messages from the handset or remotely.The base itself takes 50 entries into the directory; however, the handsets take 100 (that's strange). It keeps up to 10 redial numbers.The bad thing about the phone is that you cannot enter the directory into one handset and then send it to the others. If you have a lot of entries, like we do, this is a real pain.Another drawback is when you get a call, and you answer it, the rest of the handsets don't recognize that you answered that call. They will still show it as a missed call. This is annoying.Other than the little quirks (which we can live with), we love it. It's a sturdy phone, color screen, you can change the screensavers, adjust the screen contrast and it's got a mute button, which is great.
Great (as long as you don't live in California!). The funny thing about the MIC... there's a warning in the box that says it contains lead which is *believed to* cause cancer in the State of California (I'm not making this up!)    I have no idea what makes lead particularly more toxic in California than anywhere else, but my advice to anyone who buys it... do not EAT the microphone.As for the package... I'm new to podcasting.  (Actually I got it as much for the audio interface and to be able to do some voice overs for a project I'm working on as for Podcasting.)   I wound up getting the "kit" because... it would have actually been more expensive to get the mic then the audio interface. (You can't just plug most mic's directly into the computer... )    So by the time you get the Mic and the Interface, you're actually spending more, even without the software.I have had some minor configuration problems - - but all in all, everything seems pretty simple, and the instructions get to the point...  hence its useful, hence the * * * * * - - as to the opinions of more experienced users... let's see what they have to say whether its a good deal of not
Nice Ipod charger. I had no problems with this Ipod charger.  It charges rapidly and quickly and it doesn't over charge.  I carry it will me everywhere
Works well-- what's not to like?. I purchased this unit after reading reviews of a close cousin to this recorder, its predecessor, which is apparently very picky about the specific -r, -rw or dvd ram disk you purchase for recording media.  I've had no issues in this regard.  I followed the purchase recommendations in the manual for blank media, and the recorder has worked well for me.  Even when recording to 1-16 X DVD -R's, something I thought might cause a hick-up, I found no problem.I have this unit hooked up to a Panasonic Plasma TV.  I use it as the tuner for my non-high-def cable signal.  I have an alternate input for a television antenna.  This whole system plugs into a Bose surround sound home theater system. Since the DVD recordings cannot be in high def anyhow, using the Toshiba DVD recorder for a cable box works out well.   Were it not for this DVD player, I'd have to reprogram the Panasonic HD tuner for cable stations when I wanted to switch from the high def antenna input to standard cable. (I don't want to pay for high def cable service, otherwise this would be an option as well.)One issue I have run into, that was mystyifying at the time, is that if I have a disk ready to record in the dvd player, and I turn to the History channel here in Detroit, the copy protect mechanism in the DVD recorder messes up the reception.  If I simply open the disk carrier, so that recording is impossible, the signal clears immediately.  This is the only channel that I have this problem on.  I believe there is some sort of digital protection on this particular cable channel that the Toshiba responds to by distorting the signal so it cannot be recorded.I use this recorder to record many shows I like.  Unfortunately, I cannot record the history channel shows, for reasons discussed above.Other than this glitch, I really like this recorder.  The image it produces for my 1080i plasma when playing DVDs is outstanding-- as good and maybe better than a much more expensive unit from Bose.  The HDMI and optical output is nice to have, and the price is outstanding
Nice Cable - Works Great. After upgrading my computer's video to one of the high end card and upgrading my Monitor to a nice flat LCD (Norcent), I realized Standard VGA connection simply not doing the job.   I am running Windows Vista Ultimate and display was getting analog connection (with a lot of visible lines).   I went to some of the local stores and realized they are nothing but trying to rip people off.   I got this from Amazon and right away my connection changed from Analog to Digital and awesome display.   I simply love it.  I probably would have loved it even more if the connectors were gold plated.   But the way it is, does its job (very well, I should add)
Listening Enjoyment!. Great sound quality, got these to block out noisy co-worker, works wonderfully!  Love the color and style, very comfortable
Awesome!. Being a metalhead myself, I very much thought it might of overpowered the music (the phones that is.) I read very many reviews on these headphones, and thought it was right to buy these. They were compared to Shure, and Bose. but being a metal head, If you love metal, and/or rock, these headphones OWN especially the double bass and the heavy guitar riffs. If you love rap, I acquired some to see what these headphones could deliver, and it was amazing.5/5
great radio. I initially bought a black one and loved it soo much that I went and bought a white one. I have it hooked up by aux port to a mac mini and small wall mounted 19" lcd. Looks great and can listen to internet radio at night plus surf the web with a classy sound interface. The white colour and fit (I have it stacked on top)  also matched the mac mini perfectly so don't be afraid. All in all it's a great radio with good sound for a small bed room
good, but a little pricey. The tape was good but it was around 10 dollars and some places sold it for 8
Pleased. I like the solid feeling and the positive action of the stick. The twist is a little on the stiff side but not unmanagable. The twelve buttons are nice to have
Works Great on Vista. I bought this to watch and record tv on my laptop.  I had a hard time finding the correct download for Vista OS but their TS was very helpful and once I got it installed it worked great!  The HDTV channels look fantastic!  The remote works fine, and it has been easy to use.  Like one of the other reviews, I have 2 gb dual core processor so that may help.  I have not tried to burn a DVD with it, but that wasn't my primary reason to purchase.  The included antena works great.  Before you buy, you can go to the Pinnacle website, and do a search on your zipcode to see what channels have good strength in your area.  That may help in your decision. Enjoy
Does what it says. IT's a USB hub. All I ask is that it works. It does.
Volume is too high. I really enjoy this product.  I bought it because of the great reviews.  The worst thing I can say about this is the volume you set the Ipod to wake up to.  10 is the lowest you can go and when your in a dead sleep it can be very startling.  I am also having trouble hooking up the clock to my TV so I can watch my ipod video.  I think I might just need to troubleshoot it so I can't say for sure that that is a problem.  Other than those two things, I love my Iluv
GREAT plug-n-play product. This KVM works exactly as described.  I was a little concerned when I read the online manual because it says that the Mouse and KB USB ports are component specific.  I'm using a wireless mouse/KB combo from Logitech - it works flawlessly.  This KVM also supports the higher screen resolutions that a competing (top brand) product doesn't.  I also like that this KVM switches the audio (most don't) - therefore I can enjoy my high end speakers with both computers.  Overall it is technically excellent and available at a very competitive price
You can even bring this to the library. Forget about photocopies forever! This baby is small, thin enough to fit in a backpack and bring it with your laptop to libraries for research. USB powered make this scanner great for dorm rooms for the simple reason your computer runs it, NO POWER CORD!!! This is great for web work and for Graphic design and Illustration and even photo-manipulation. I am happy I purchased this
Great bag, very few faults. I bought this bag for my widescreen HP notebook and it fits perfectly.  There is plenty of room for the computer, the cord in the supplied cord pouch, a mouse and still have lots of room left over.  There are numerous pockets for discs, and a special seperate pocket for a jump drive or an MP3 player.  The only fault I can find, and this is a small one, is that the strap pad could be a little wider and more padded.  Other than that small issue this is a great bag at a great price, and stylish as well
Wacom Intuos3 9X12 USB Tablet. This is an awesome tablet! It has great pressure sensitivity and the pen allows for fantastic freehand drawing in programs like illustrator, photoshop and painter. The pen is a more natural feeling tool to use in these applications than a mouse. The size of the tablet allows you to get into greater detail without having to zoom in all the time.
Great TV for the Money !!!. I purchased this TV for our bedroom and also to use as a PC monitor. It blows away my current PC monitor. Great for gaming. I'm very satified with this set. Highly recomended. It has just about every connection you can think of other than a DVI.
DEPENDABLE DVD. When I first got my Sony dvd burner I had numerous failure with burns. I tried several different brands of blanks with the same problem, big stacks of failed burns. When I called Sony to complain they suggested I use Verbatim. I did and in at least 150 burns I have no failures.  So naturally I'm hooked on Verbatim.  It must be the best
Hearing a pleasure. The earphones are giving a fantastic reproduction of classical and modern music, block out entirely the ambient sound (particularly useful for me as a frequent flyer), just need to be careful when walking around with them, you do not hear even a telephone ringing next to you.
Even I could use this product correctly. I'm anything but "handy."  This product was very easy to install--clear, concise directions in English, good pictograms and a sturdy, quality product.  I'd recommend this product..
Great system, but requires an investment. The Nike+iPod system works great and without a hitch, but to join the club, you need a $150 iPod nano, this kit, and unless you have just the right shoes, either some new Nike's or a third party accessory to tie the sensor up to your shoe. This kit is very durable; once, the sensor shot out of my shoe and landed in the snow. I didn't realize it for like 5 minutes. When I came back, I just popped it back in and kept running. The thing's really well built. While the kit works, I would've liked the Nike software on my computer instead of on the internet, and I would've liked better battery performance from my nano while I'm running with the kit. The receiver eats batteries for breakfast
Great drive, flawless for several months of use!!. If have the 40gb unit and work just fine, then I upgrade to the 100gb, even better, more space and flawless. Fast and reliable. Also a quite unit
Best Radio Value. My bedside radio requirements were: Front firing speaker, AM and FM external antenna inputs, aux input.  This radio pulls in my regular stations without have to rotate the radio or attach my Terk tunable AM loop. The rotating volume knob adjusts in very small increments to more closely resemble an analog control.  Press on the knob to toggle between bass, treble, and volume without have to look at the display or navigate menus.  The bass and treble control generously adjusts from -7 to +7.  Dial that tone in and turn up the volume. This radio sounds excellent!  The bass is ported in the back of the flawless black lacquer case and it will deliver more clear treble than you want. I wasn't purchasing the radio as a clock or alarm but the radio is worth buying even if you still need to use a separate clock (LED's are better in the dark anyway).
Worth the Money...MINOR drawbacks. I have owned this system since March...the sound is wonderful...definetly a great value for the money...the bass could be just a little stronger and the rear speakers aren't used as much as I thought they would be, but it is the best sound you will find for this kind of money...music sounds great, dvd is fine for the most part, no serious problems but progressive scan does act up from time to time, recycling the power corrects the problem...it will also plays cd's that I burn off my computer which is more than my kizillion dollar sony will do...and unless you are a sound snob, this system will work fine for you...and if you are a sound snob, why are you even considering this one...go for the bose system for 800.00 cause this one can't compar
Port Computer Case. This is my 2nd Port product and I have been impressed with both
Great Product and good buy. I purchased thisTV in January 2007. It replaced a 20 year old 27" SONY . Boy, have I come into the modern TV age with a bang.This TV has a terrific picture. I can't speak to the set up as my son did it for me but he did not seem to have any problems and made very few adjustments.The delivery was smooth and uneventful except that it was delivered at 6:30 AM. I guess that is better than waiting all day.The price came down $50.00 the next week and Amazon gave me a credit.All in all a fantastic experience as always with Amazo
Good enough for the money. It does everything I expected to do. Easy manual and set up. Great sound. I am keeping it
Good buy. Ive had this fridge for about 3 yrs now- i got this when i was 17 or 18 and it still works great and is worth the money. Its perfect for teenager or college students dorm. Ive had this in the bedroom since then and i have gotten compliments on it and how cool it was and its good to store some drinks and you can have a decent amount of food or other things in there but it is perfect size for the bedroom but inside it is small to medium storage capacity- but for its smallness it is very powerful and keeps drinks and other things ice cold and also comes with a little freezer compartment which is also very powerful- id say it can hold about a case of drinks or case and half and some room for food- its better for storing drinks. But overall good little fridge with lots of power and nice silver design
Built like a tank and works flawlessly. I've had this drive for 9 months now and it's still working just like the first day.  I put it in my pants' pockets along with coins and keys.  No mechanical failures so far.  I use it to store personal info and to transfer files between home and work computers.  Initially I had to download the latest driver from Memorex Web site to make it work as advertised.  Highly recommended
surprising good. I have a pair of v-moda bass buds - and they are awesome, although a bit expensive... but the skullcandy buds come a close second - and I have gone through DOZENS of buds!  The only complaint my family has (we all experience this) - is that the buds make our ears tickle sometimes.  The volume control on the cord is PERFECT for using at work because I can listen at my "rather loud" volume until someone comes in and then I can reduce volume instantly and easily.  Sound quality is awesome!  If it were possible I would give these a 4.5 stars
Quite good. Good sound and relative comfortable for in-ear headphones.  The great advantage of these headphones is that they are very well made and you actually have to try to break them thus making them an excellent choice for running with your ipod.  The price is quite low/fair for the quality and sound
Price is unbeatable. I own a Sony MiniDV Handycam. I was having a difficult time capturing video footage with a USB cable. The image was so pixelated - even in the little capturing box. So, a friend recommended this product to me and so far so good. The transferred footage is crystal clear. I have yet to try all of the other features of this product - but so far, it suits my needs.
Older kid. The walkman is easy to use with enough memory for my meager uses.  The sound is excellent, but I use an older set of Sony head phones rather then the ear pieces that came with the set.The unit recharges very quickly and again for my uses last a long time.It is quite small and the only disadvantage I've found is there is no clip or arrangement to carry it except a pocket
No issues. Using this digital cable between a Vista PC and NEC monitor. No issues
Great product!. After going through at least 4 CD player/boom boxes for my daughter (including 2 of the Fisher Price "Tough" ones, the Mickey Mouse one, and the Barbie Karaoke one), we bought this one.  None of the others lasted even 6 months, and they were all picky about certain CD's.  We've had this one for about 2 years and never had a problem.  It has been used every single day--usually multiple times.  It reads all of my daughter's CDs (which tend to get scratched and dirty), and she has been able to operate it since she got it at 2 years old.  Now my 21-month-old has figured it out as well, and we plan to buy another one for her this year
I gotta say... wow!. I have owned a pair of Etymotic ER6is and a pair of Shure's E2s, which are both very good quality earbuds, but I have to say, this is by far the best pair of in-ear-monitors I have ever owned. You really can hear the difference between earbuds with single drivers and these dual driver monitors. The lows and highs don't interfere with each other, which may may be difficult to understand, but you will when you hear them. No matter how low the bass, the highs are still constant and unaffected... and vice versa. However, in my opinion, the difference in audio quality between these earbuds and pair less in price (like Shure E2Cs, for example) are, what some may consider, subtle. But, for the true audiophile, this difference is just enough to justify spending so much on a pair of buds. I took these through a few brief tests when I got them, playing several mp3s that were rather bass heavy and have been known to produce poor sound on previously owned earbuds... and I smiled. The UEs played the bass clearly and the highs were bright and uninterrupted, the way they were meant to be heard. As for the construction and quality of materials, they could use some work. The cord is a tad bit cheap and I'm curious to see how long it lasts before shorting out, but that brings me to another absolutely genius idea they have created. A user replaceable cord. Everyone knows, cords short out. There is no headphone that will not short out. My guess is, the drivers will last quite some time, but no matter what, the cord will short out. Well, for $20, you can get a brand new cord. The old one simply unplugs from the buds... but don't worry about that just yet, because they have a very generous 2 year warranty. What more could you ask for? In short, I recommend buying these earbuds. They are the best I've ever owned, and if you have very picky ears, they'll appreciate them
Great deal. I was so unsure about buying a tv card, but ireally wanted one, so i was researching them for a few months and finally got the courage to buy this one.  Let me tell you it does everything i had expected, i have windows Vista home premium and MCE picked it up right away, didnt even use the disk.  Works flawless for me, definitely would recommend
Sounds good, great value. This JBL 12" subwoofer is a fine product, and a great value when purchased through Amazon.  The price was about 40% lower compared to what they were asking for it at Best Buy, all I had to do was wait a few days for it to arrive.  Plus there is no additional cost for sales tax, which where I live is nearly 8%.  This pushes my total savings up to 48%, nearly half price!  There was no additional cost for shipping, either.  This was my first Amazon shopping experience, and I'm quite satisfied.  I may continue to shop at Best Buy, but I doubt I will purchase from them anymore when I can get the exact same thing on Amazon for so much less.  Best Buy:  $430(price) + $34(tax) = $464(total).  I paid $240 total for the exact same thing new-in-the-box from Amazon.  Heck, if you really insist on spending that much then get 2 from Amazon instead of 1 from Best Buy and have twice the power to annoy your neighbors!
Great quality. I just received this for Christmas and so far I am impressed.  The case feels very sturdy with easy access to all the side buttons and expansion ports when open or closed.  The padded interior gives a nice snug fit while not scratching the Axim.  I haven't tried the belt clip yet since I probably won't be using it but it's a nice feature to have
Pleased with the purchase. I bought this for my 15 year old grandson, as a Christmas gift, and he has been pleased with it. I have not used it, but it has been invaluable for him
Works great but expensive. I recommend this product. Does the job but one can of course get away with a cheap adapter. I like it uncluttered though like this
Top marks for the Pantone Eye-One Display2. I read many reviews before deciding which product to purchase for monitor calibration.Before starting the calibration process I checked for product updates and found that one existed. The software update was a cinch.I'm pleased with the simplicity of this product and the results I've seen on my LCD monitor and my laptop display.If you're searching for a monitor calibration hardware/software product I'd strongly suggest looking at the Pantone Eye-One Display2
May be just what you're looking for. These earphones are cute and worth the money for:1. Replacements for iPod earphones2. Back-up earphones3. Cute earphones =)They tangle easily but that can be avoided by wrapping them around your iPod.They're cheap enough carry around anywhere but valuable enough to give good sound.I'm 100% satisfied =DP.S. They might be too big for a smaller ear, but that can't really be avoided with any other earphone.P.P.S. Go for it.Buy them. =
A Great Training Device for Bikers. I think the last reviewer said it best. Garmin set out to make a bike computer that blows away the competition. And they succeeded. As long as you understand that this is not your typical GPS device, with detailed maps whose primary function is to let you know where you are and keep you from getting lost, you will not be disappointed. The device gives you all the great features that you would expect from a high end bike computer; And then it gives you a whole bunch more.By using GPS you can keep track of where you went and use that data later to compare with previous rides. You can also map out your rides in detail after they are complete with Google Earth. The included training center software is good, but not great. The Motion Based website is a great addition (Though the EDGE is not compatible with the website yet) and between the two you should be able to analyze your data to your hearts content.It is an excellent training device and is very accurate. It acquires satellites very quickly and seems to keep track even in narrow canyons and pretty dense forests. It can also be used while hiking. It is very customizable and allows you to read as much or as little data as you want and you can set up that data any way you like.I first attempted to gather data like this with a Forerunner 201. That was a mess. That device provided one frustration after the other. Garmin appears to really have looked at the negative reviews that followed their initial Forerunner devices and really created a fantastic device that is truly created with the biker, not a runner, in mind.So any complaints? Just a few minor ones. The bike mount that comes with it is pretty cheesy. It is held on with zip ties. For $250 dollars I would like to see a little more. The bike mount you can purchase (for about $15) for the Forerunner is so much better. I hope they eventually upgrade that. The Flap that covers the USB cable port on the back of the unit is a pain as well. It is very hard to seat it properly. A little bit of patience and perseverance and you do eventually get it right. Other than that the device is great and highly recommended.
Just what we wanted. My brother and I were looking to replace our mother's broken CD player.  We wanted something that looked and sounded good and that was also easy to use.  Finding something with the last attribute, simplicity of use, without giving up the first two attributes was the hard part.  The Tivoli CD player was ideal:  One CD only, play-pause-stop, forward-back, that's it, and that is all that is necessary - and it is very attractive and sounds great.  It was the perfect gift - she loves it
Dymo Label Printer a huge help. I love this product. It is easy to use and very flexible with regard to what you can do with it
THESE WIRELESS SPEAKERS ARE GREAT FOR MY ELDERLY MOM!!!. Purchased these speakers for my 88-year old mother so she wouldn't disturb her neighbors with the volume up so loud on her TV.  They are WONDERFUL!  She LOVES THEM!! (And so do her neighbors!)  Also, they're apparently easy to install because an 80+ year old neighbor installed them for her.  So glad I bought them!  Highly recommended!!!
User friendly, works great. I bought this presenter right before a big presentation, and without opening the manual was able to use it.  I used it on a MAC, and all I had to do was plug it in.  Nice product
Excellent R G B Cables. The Monster Cable THX V100 CV-8 Component Video Cables are excellent connectors for DVD to Component inputs on HD and RGB (Red, Green, Blue component) capability TV sets. These cables are durable and deliver the best possible signal to your set. Any TV with Component inputs is going to give you a noticeably better picture than with Composite or S-Video inputs but the edge with these cables is their high-density double shielding and heavy gold plated RCA connectors, delivering a cleaner sand purer signal.
Logitech does a superb job with the Harmony 880. I was a bit skeptical about this purchase, although I previously owned one of the first Harmony remotes in pre-Logitech days and was very pleased with it. Some of the reviews were a bit off-putting, particularly about the 890 with its RF option, so I went for the 880 and I am glad I did. Despite comments from others the on-line programming was superb - all my components were already in the database.  Certainly I was very familiar with the process having programmed my first remote through 3 evolutions of components before selling it with the total package.  In any event the process was hassle free and I  now have a fully integrated control for my Replay TV, Cable box, TV, Receiver, DVD and VCR just as I had hoped for. The control process is seamless, and provided you realize that the remote is sending a stream of IR commands and needs to be kept pointed at the system until the remote tells you the command is complete all works great.  (The fact the remote tells you to keep pointing at the system is a great improvement over my prior unit.)  My only slight critique is that the remote does NOT have a similar prompt when you switch off so you can inadvertently move the remote too quickly and leave something on that should be off.  However the Help process can quickly resolve this when you switch on again.  The rechargeable batteries are a good innovation too - I have had no problem locating the unit on the charging base.  Overall I thoroughly recommend the 880.
Comfortable. This earphone is very comfortable. I had to get one because my cat chewed up my original earphone that came with my MP3 player. But I'm glad I bought it because it's way comfortable than the one I was using before. It doesn't hurt your ears even after wearing for a long time, and it stays put well too. The sound quality is okay; it doesn't blow you away or anything, but you don't really notice it's so bad either. Most of all it's cheap. It's a good deal
Not sure if it's worth the money?  Read on. If you're like me, you are probably wondering if these little cables are actually worth the money. I was using cheap thin wired connections before, and my receiver would have LOTS of background noise and buzzing, so I thought I'd go ahead and give these things a shot. Afterall, I listen to MP3's all the time on my computer through my high end receiver. I'll tell you what, these things work great, and are worth the extra money. Now keep in mind, I'm an audiophile who is very picky about sounds. So for the casual listener who doesn't mind occasional background hissing or lack of crystal clear sound transfer from your computer to your receiver, you might be able to find a cheaper connection. But once again, I think the extra $$ is well worth it and I HIGHLY recomend these. Your only concern here is an economical one. As far as the product is concerned, these things are top notch.  Get the 20 feet if you have to go across the a long wall or room to connect your computer to the receiver, otherwise the 10 ft should suffice
Antec Sonata II. Great sturdy case. Well thought out design. Quiet. I call it my black Ferrari! The fantastic reviews of this product online say it all!the con: power supply went dead on me after 2-3 months. What do you expect when most cases don't even come with a power supply? Nevertheless, until I receive my new power supply, my adventures in Half Life 2 are on permanent hold
Dog loved it.... These are great in ear buds that have some noise canceling properties. They are great to use out doors when doing chores around the house. In fact these ordered replaced the original pair, because my pug Mimi decided to play with them and chewed the buds. She's fine but the buds were ruined! One thing I found out the hard way, is not to wear them on airlines when the plane is landing or taking off. The pressure differences will effect your ears. Great product...
Awesome for running. I bought these in hopes of better head phones while running because my ear buds just wouldn't stick in my big ears, they are nice and snug on your head when you apply them too. The design is just great. I've read that they are delicate so I am trying to be careful when I remove them from my head or place them some where.I rate this product 5 stars
UFO-Shaped Bounary Mike a hit with me. I have been happy with the ATR97 for years.  It captures voice very well.  It is compact, and unobtrusive.The one weakness is that there is no light to indicate that the unit is on, therefore it is possible to leave the unit on without knowing it, and run the battery down.  And then there's no way to know if your battery is run-down except by the terrible or non-existent recordings that result.But, overall it is a stylish boundary microphone.  I also like it because it resembles a UFO, or more accurately our domestic military industrial complex's "ARV - Alien Reproduction Vehicle."  Enjoy
WOW, THIS IS UNBELIEVEABLE.... All what I can say is WOW, I have a P4 3.2 Prescott which is known to be an extremely hot processor, now with this beast my idle became 45c and under load is 59c and that when the Zalman fan is running at the lowest settings 1300cc to 1600cc; on my previous Intel stock fan I used to get 55c idle and 78c under load.....However I gave this baby 4 stars because installation was extremely difficult, and I mean really a pain process where actually I bleed my fingers.And just to be accurate I used Arctic Silver Grease.If your processor is too hot like mine, get this and you won't regret it, and Oh, did I tell you that the PC is too quiet now that I can hear myself mumbling!!!!And also Amazon ROCKS !!! I choose free shipping which is suppose to be 3 to 5 days but Amazon got it on my door steps the SECOND DAY!!!! THANKS AMAZON......
TE SACAN DEL APURO. NORMALMENTE COMPRO DISCOS MEMOREX, LOS COMPRE YA QUE TENIAN BUEN PRECIO, AUNQUE NO ERA LA PRIMERA VEZ QUE LO HACIA.TODOS SE QUEMARON SATISFACTORIAMENTE, LAS VELOCIDADES PARA QUEMAR REALMENTE DEPENDEN DEL QUEMADOR
Excellent option to avoid camera cables. I bought this reader because I wanted to avoid having my camera and all its cable attached to my pc to download the pictures; and with this reader I could leave my camera (and its cables) in its case and just download the picture with the memory card, I recomend this product....
Review of Sony WM-FX197 Walkman. I've had this product for about a month, and I'm very pleased with it. I work in a store and I thought that there would be a static problem. The reception is quite good and very little static. The volume doesn't go quite as loud as my previous Walkman. The belt clip is a major asset for me. The batteries usually last for about 60hrs. The headphones are more than adequate. I didn't see a need to shell out more money for options that I wouldn't even use anyway.I thought the price was reasonable. It would of been nice if this product came with rechargeable batteries and a charger
Works Great :). I use this on my MacBook. Works flawlessly to hookup a TV via svideo. OSX handles this supremely well by remembering any video settings that I use when i have it hooked up. Plug it in and video switches to tv settings, unplug it and its back to normal. I use this with dual view mode so that my desktop stays the same always on the macbook, and i just get extra desktop space when I plug the tv in.The quality is quite suprising for s-video, very good.100% must have for anyone that has a nice tv :
Nice, basic  phone for the price. I use this phone in my office and I don't have a lot of desk space, so the slim design works out well, but is a very basic phone. Other nice features are that I can sit the phone in a standing position and can see the incoming calls, and a light flashes if I have voicemail through my phone company, BellSouth.  My only complaint is that the I wish the LCD lit up when incoming calls came in.  If the room is dark, you can't see the caller ID.
perfect addition to myfi. This headset is perfect. good sound and surprisingly good antenae reception. makes portable MyFi a delight to hav
3D Mapsend Topo Software. Works great on the Explorist 400. Has most of the new hairline roads so I can navigate myself while driving. Works well to see the elevation of the land while flying
Nice controller but compatibility issues. I bought two of these, actually, for two different Macs in an attempt to run Zuma with them.  They're really nice controllers, they feel great and there are quite a few buttons for different functions.  Yet finding configurable drivers for them was a pain.  We tried GamePad Companion but it made the device jerky and uncontrollable, especially when shooting.It's too bad someone can't make one that is easy to configure for the Mac users who actually enjoy gaming
Can't live without it.... I just love this little MP3 player. I have about 300 songs on it and still have 4MB left. I don't think I'll ever fill it up. I just can't live without it now. It was super easy to install, works with RealPlayer and Windows Media Player.  Also works great with Belkin Tunecast for the car. Just make sure the volume on the player is turned up all the way, or the Belkin won't pick it up and turn on
its great. the headset has a great sound for any use, either if its for gaming, chatting, or listening to music, the sound is excellent, i would recommend this product to everyone
Read the fine print... ...they're out of stock until April 1st.  Curses!  Now I'll have to buy the cheapo $600,000 grocery-store-brand batteries
You need this if you value your data!. I did some research on CDs and DVDs for my job, and I discovered that your average commercial-quality CD or DVD will only hold data for 20 years at most, and much less if they aren't handled with great care.  Data on hard drives will degrade over time as well, so you can't depend on that for long term data storage.  Think photos of your kids here, folks.  Have you backed up your photos lately, and are you sure that backup will still be good in 10 years?These babies are rated to hold data for over 100 years!  They have a special, inert chemical dye, and the reflective layer is 100% pure gold.  Seriously, the layer is thin enough to see through.  The technology has been around for a relatively long time, so it is mature.  I think every DVD burner you can buy supports it, and it has gone through all kinds of tests to prove that it actually works.There are a couple of other companies that second-source the technology, but these are the guys who invented it.  It's easy, it's cheap, and it the longest lasting backup media for your really important data that you can buy.  What's to think about?  Buy it already
If you really need floppy discs. Occasionally I just have to use them, but Macs no longer come with a floppy disc drive This fits the bill and requires no software - just plug in to the USB porrt and its ready to use. It's a bit slow, but perhaps that's just the floppies and they were always slow, it's hard to remember once you get used to the speed of CDs. When I finally use up all my old discs (not long now!) I wan't miss them
Great help!. Lets me know when my tires need air just by the color. Very useful for a busy mom of two
Works great. Better than the gold plated RCA cables from Radio Shack. What more can you ask for? I see no reason not to recommend them highly
Good fan. My original case fan was incredibly loud.  It doesn't pay to go too cheap on the case fans.  I'm not a 'modder' and don't spend time making the computer case look pretty, but I wanted a fan that would run quiet and help contribute to the overall process of keeping the case cool.  This fan seems to do both just fine for my needs.  The blue light it emits is a nice gimmick too.  The fan shipped to me quickly and without any troubles.  I would recommend this fan
Printer Cartridge. I have used the H/P 15 & 23 for my Deskjet 812C for several years, The quality has always been goo
thanks love it booya. thanks for buying me this i really appreciate this i expect that this guitar would be like a toy but I'm wrong it is so awesome so go buy this toy  and go rock and roll with your parent
Work even with very old Philips. I had been having trouble with multiple uses of my Memorex DA RW, but these work great, even with a 5+ year old unit.
Works perfectly. After reading the pair of "doesn't work" reviews from the same person, I decided to try it anyway, figuring that Amazon would do an easy refund if it really didn't work (also, I've had good experiences with other Sonnet products in the past).It works just fine for me. I've used it to connect an iPod and an iSight to the Firewire800 port on my Powerbook, both work fine. It seems a decent value and I'm happy with it
Very nice speakers. I read all of reviews and bought the item prior to the March 5th posting. And, based on those reviews, agree these are very good speakers for the money.  I bought these to use in my cube at work and they are perfect for that.  These are personal speakers and are not meant to fill the house with sound.  The packaging is beautiful, everything fits and works as intended, and I would recommend them to anyone, especially at the reduced price
Great Phone. I was a bit skeptical to purchase this phone based on the negative reviews. I am however liking it a whole lot. The menu is easy to navigate, the buttons are soft touch and the speaker phone is great. The design is also extra slick and looks very attractive.There could have been some nicer ring tones though
Fuji 1GB xD Picture card. This card seems to give the same excellent photos as my other Fuji cards. Love the huge number of photos I can take. Very handy when traveling outside the US with no access to back up
Easy to use but one minor complaint. I found the docking station to be very easy to use. It's great for recording TV or movies onto your player to watch later and the AVI format allows you to store lots of stuff. You can also set a timer to record TV shows like you would on a traditional VCR or DVR. The recorder even comes with it's own universal remote to use on your cable box or TV (I admit I haven't quite figured it out yet). Also, the station charges your player while you record so it won't die on you in the middle of recording a show. Apparently it will record up to 2 gig before making a new file which means it shouldn't break up your DVDs into more than one file. The station automatically formats protected media into special locked files. My only complaint is that copy protected files can't be played back on a TV or computer which can be annoying if you want to enjoy your saved DVDs on a normal sized screen. And it's tricky to rename those files on the computer because you can't open them to see what's what if they are protected. What does it mean? You aren't going to be able to share the movie watching experience on many files because of the protection. However, it's great for recording for personal use and you can even use it to entertain the kids in the car. I threw a couple of Spongebob's on my player via the station and my son was absorbed for the 40 minute ride to my parents. If you want to get the most out of your player you should buy this product
As good as it gets!. I brought this produce from Amazon and will keep going for this till I get hooked on to Blue-ray at some point in time... This is supposed to be one of the best DVD media's around and has lived up to its reputation
Fantastic quality and price!. These headphones are a great bargain for the size and sound quality. I take these to the gym every day and they easily collapse to fit in the pocket of my sweatshirt.  They are easy to snap into a comfortable position, they stay put, and have great sound quality to keep me going through my workout. I was looking for lightweight, foldable headphones that would allow me to hear the bass in my favorite songs, and these definitely do the job at a reasonable price!  Highly recommend!
This is not a color printer yet they don't say it in their marketing and advertise it as a full-function all-in-one. This machine works great except the fact it's not a color printer. I read the whole product description on 5 sites and at least a dozen reviews while comparison shopping for the best price and it was not indicated on any that it is a black and white. The ad says it is full-function printer and I think the color function is an important one. So I'm going to lose a chunk of money (on selling it and the shipping cost) and a bunch of time.I'm more thorough than almost anyone I know. They need to put that in the central description.Besides the fact it's not color, the machine is easy to operate, easy to set-up, a nice compact size, easy to see and press buttons, easy menus, and a nice look etc
Good reader. No problem with it... A little bit expensive but I had no problems with it... ;
HD ant. TV. It is good than I am expected.Save money for me over satalite disk or cable TV . My TV now can get most of the local chanel
Garmin C340 Charger. Received charger in 3 days. It was a Factory Fresh Garmin Unit.  No Instructions included , but it worked fine. It is something that you really need as the USB PORT CABLE CHARGER from your computer is slow as can be. It is a Needed Accessory
Perfect. The mount fit my Flat Panel perfectly and also included lots of mounting accessories to fit any type of screen. As for the mount itself it was extremely sturdy.  Well worth the price.  Best of all it was made in the USA
2-pack costs slightly more, but shipping is free. The 2-pack is currently $1.84 more than buying 2 cartridges separately, but free shipping is offered only on the 2-pack.I am satisfied with the ink quality, but the cartridge seems to run out quickly, hence the 4 out of 5 stars
Printer Compatible to Windows XP X64 Edition. One of the few rare and cheap printers that has support for Windows XP X64 Edition, as well as VistaThe printer works well and does it's job.Good job HP for developing printer driver support for x6
an excellent product. Although I give this product two thumbs up.  For those of us with parkinson's like tremors I'd say be prepared for a little difficulty at first but once you're use to it, it'll work fine
Excellent scans, a tad too slow. I used this scanner for about 150 frames of 35mm and 6 or so slides.  The scan times are a bit too long, but, the results are worth the wait.  The Digital ICE 4 suite of apps does a remarkable job of elminating scratches and worn out spots.  It has the slide & 35mm film mount adapters included, comes with Nikon Scan, Nikon View and manuals.  Nikon Scan could be more intuitive, but like all Nikon menus (including their cameras), they think differently than I do at least, so it took me a while to figure out all the different options.  The software found it slightly hard to remember my settings - it was a bit complicated for a scanner, but it is a near-professional scanner, so well .. not much room to complain.  On the whole, this scanner is worth the trouble - holds value well, and gives you excellent scans
great mouse. I got this mouse a few months ago and it works great.  It is a good size and shape.  The battery life also is good.  I would definately recommend this mouse to a notebook use
Canopus ADVC110. I got it to archive DVR'd material. Next I'm gonna try and use it to get all my audio cassettes and LP's into my MP3 library. It works like it should. Directions are a bit confusing, mostly because of the British terminology. But it could be a bit simpler. The dip switches and their settings leave a bit to  be desired. More plug n play would be better. Again tho, not a bad product for the price
SONY displays rock this planet. Whether you have a VIAO notebook, or a SONY plasma TV or a flat panel, or even a CRT, SONY offers one of the most striking and crystal clear images in this world. It'll cost you a lot more than brands like ACER, VIEWSONIC, or DELL, but mind you, SONY has been making TV's for a lot longer than any of these companies, so their technologies carry over to all of their displays.can't go wrong with this Japanese marvel of a company
works great!. Works great for me.  Set it up in minutes.  I hookedup my home desktop, and my work laptop via docking station.The only thing I do not like about it is that the USB ports for the keyboard/mouse are on the front.  I would have preferred they are on the back to be neater.  I have a wireless keyboard/mouse - so no need to even see the USB cable that goes to the receiver.Unlike the other user who indicated it does not work with multifunction/media keyboard - everything works fine for me.  Ie media, volume, favorite buttons.I use the hot keys to switch.  I might look into changing them as it says you can do in the book.I love how you can (but don't have to)seperately control the keyboard, usb devices, and sound through the use of the hot keys.  It works great.
Don't leave home without it!!. I've had this unit for about 6 mo. and I'm extreemly pleased, well worth the $550 I paid on Amazon. I've taken local and long distance trips, in car, van and motorhome. Very easy to use right out of the box, easy to see in the motorhome at distances greater then in a car, even with my sixty year old eyes. We live about 30 miles from Fort Worth and occasionally go into the city, we have used it to find banks, stores and places to eat. On a recent trip to Phoenix, AZ the guidance was especially helpful, I really appreciated the early warning to navigate the freeway interchanges, when to get in the left lane for left exit or how far to next change. On the trip it was helpful to find places to eat. On business trip to Houston I find the ETA info helpful to plan meetings. The remote is helpful in the motorhome, but I knocked off one star becouse of funky power cord connection, and no FM modulator.
Does the job for casual performance. I bought this mic because I wanted to make a homemade karaoke system.  A mic, music devocalizer, and nice speakers does the trick.  I couldn't get two mics to work together but I'm working on that.  As for quality, it is somewhat quiet but you can always turn up your volume for that.  Plus, many people don't realize that PCs don't run mic sound through the speakers on default.  You go to the Volume Control Panel for that and check the box Microphone.  The only two problems I see with this are it's sensitivity for bass (even knocking the cord around gets picked up) and that you have to hold it close to your mouth (maybe a result of mediocre uni-directional engineering).  Either way, it works for random fun nights of singing with friends but I doubt people doing real recording would trust this thing
Excellent product. I've owned this item for almost a full year and I am extremely pleased with it. It's so nice being able to carry around my laptop and my books in the same bag. The side pockets are kind of useless for them being so small, but I guess I'll be able to find a purpose for them.
Flawless installation; excellent performance. I'll admit after reading some of these reviews I was a little weary of purchasing this unit, but I got it for $32, so couldn't pass it up.  I was replacing a LinkSys BEFW11S4 (wireless B).In a nutshell, I followed the instructions to connect the hardware, popped the CD in my "hard wired" desktop PC, took a couple of minutes to step through the setup screens (which are totally simple to navigate), enabling WEP along the way.  When I was done, I fired up my laptop (which has built in wireless-G card).  Network was detected immediately... all I had to do was type in the WEP key (which was generated from my passphrase entered during the setup) and viola!  Connected at 54 Mbps!!Awesome.  The setup procedure could NOT have been any easier.  I would recommend this device to anyone that already has a cable/dsl router (with a free port) and simply wants to add (or upgrade) wireless-G connectivity in their home.
Networking made easy!. This product is so excellent that I now own 3 of them and am heartily recommending them to all my friends who are networking-challenged.  I have one connected to my XBox 360 so that I can stream music, video and pictures from my computer.  I mainly use it to view my pictures on large screen.  Of course, I can also be on XBox live for games.The other adapter is installed near my ReplayTV for sharing video online.  I can't recommend this product enough
good deal. these batteries are as good as any and well priced to
Very good but it has little problems. I got this card last month and I've been using it heavily. Its been great. Its sturdy and can has great range. There are a few problems though.#1 There is no case for the card.#2 The included browser only lasts for 30 days and its horrible. Luckily I had NetFront 3.1#3 Memory Stick LAN software will occasionally error, but a soft reset will fix it.Otherwise its a great little expansion card
it's great, but has one small problem. It works great!  I really like it.  There is one small problem though.  The lid is REALLY hard to take off!  I've had it now for about a month and have gotten lots of use out of it and it has loosened up a little, but not much.  There has got to be a way to make a lid that stays on, but isn't quite so hard to remove when a person wants to use it.  I appreciate being provided with a forum to voice my opinion
iPoddish. My wife opened this from the package for me and the first thing she said is how "iPoddish" it seemed for a radio. Strapless, you must pocket this when walking. I wouldn't call this an exercise radio. It's more for travelling, mobility, etc. The internal AM/FM antenna is good for lacking telescopic function of bigger radios. The included earphone speakers far exceeded my expectations. Nothing cheap about them. Another plus: You only need one triple-A battery and this tiny radio, about the size of a lighter, is easy on power. Sleek, high-performing, including 5 presets each for AM/FM/TV, defaulted to shut off after 90 minutes to save batteries, and costing under $39 on Amazon, the DT-180 is a great choice for a "pocket receiver.
Excellent Price ($50) And easy to use. I loved the price on this one.  Also, having the USB Cord come out of it helps this drive to fit in any USB slot, no matter what is plugged in around it.It felt a little slow transferring data, but I'm pretty impatient.  It's also a bit on the big side.  I have already recommended this drive to several people
It definitely works... and its cheap. Look, for a bargain-basement product, what do you expect?  First, you expect it to work, and I can confirm it definitely does work.When plugged in to USB, it signals XP correctly.  The driver software is very tolerant.  You can install it at any time and there is never a resource conflict or problems with the system recognizing the device.  So installation is a 5 minute process.Next comes the capture and initial encoding.  Well, the software is a bit lame as far as features and GUI.  Typical.  But it absolutely saves in MPEG2 / DVD format just as you'd need it to for making DVDs of all your Dish Network or PS2 or VHS content.The frame rate is full on 30 fps.  It takes an SVIDEO or standard RCA video signal.  Both are just fine in quality.  The resolutions are not that great... but its passable for DVD when you crank it up.  Don't think you can encode some Blu-Ray quality MPEG with this though.As far as the overall durability of the product, I've literally left mine plugged into the wall and running for about 1 year straight.  It gets hot, but its never so much as flickered or needed reset.Bottom line?  This thing is like a kids toy- its cheesy but tough as nails.  Get it for your first analog signal MPEG encoder.  Its a good value.
All one needs. I have purchased this DVD player to replace an older version of Sony DVD player that started to have problems playing DVDs (especially the scratched ones). Besides that I wanted to have a capability to play other formats (including photo discs, etc.). I think this was the right choice for the money. The DVD player handles every task as expected. Sony didn't disappoint
Really good product but not an IPOD. Great machine, the battery life of 12 hours is BS....it will last 12 hours if you have maybe 12 songs on it....if you are like me and have a libray of music then an IPOD is the way to go
Looking good so far... I really like this tv so far.  It is really good when higher def. shows are being played and quite awesome when watching a DVD.  In fact, it makes me want to spring for HD cable now.  It also set up with my current entertainment center a lot easier than my last tv set.  I would have given it a 5, but I haven't tested ALL the features out yet since just setting it up a couple days ago after my new entertainment center arrived for it to sit on.  But everything looks great so far.  The only problem I can say is that standard tv transmissions don't look so great on a HDTV
good ink on ink. Better packaging, cheaper than buying separately, HP- quality, and delivery in just a few days... anything better than that
Excellent mount. Easy to install 100% compatible. Much more convinient then the one that came with GPS
I LIKE, YES i DO!. OK, THIS IS IT IN MY OPINION: I WAS HESITANT TO BUY AS I AM GETTING VISTA PREMIUM SOON, (COMPATABILITY ISSUES), CHECKED IT OUT AND ITS FIND WITH VISTA, ALSO THE PRICE WAS HALF WHAT WAS LISTED, WHAT TYPE OF MANGELED JUNK WAS I TO RECEIVE? NONE, THIS THING CAME IN PERFECT CONDITION W/ ALL THINGS LISTED.THEN I THOUGTH THAT SOFTWARE WOULD BE OUT OF DATE, CORRECT! GO TO WINDOWS VISTA ADVISOR DOWNLOAD AND RUN IT, IT WILL POINT YOU TO THE CORRECT AND CURRANT DRIVERS ON ALL YOUR INSTALLED HARDWARE, IF NEED BE (A NICE LITTLE EXTRA GOODIE MICROSOFT HAS).ALSO SEEMS A BIT WEIRD ON HOW TO CONFIGURE DEVICE, BUT I FIGURE MAYBE ITS ME AND MY COMPREHENTION,(AS YOU CAN SEE I CANT SPELL TOO) SO I WONT FAULT IT FOR THAT.ALL IN ALL ITS A NEAT DESKTOP SET AND IM ENJOYING ITS MASSIVE AMOUNTS OF FEATURES, ALL FOR ABOUT 40 DOLLARS, I'M HAPPY
Mustek pl607 portable dvd player. This has a nice size screen. It only has 3 buttons.Play pause and stop so if you like a dvd player without alot of pizazz this is it. I was trying to figure out how you picked the different scenes and you had to push the stop button. I just found this out by trial. There was a few times during the dvd that it would turn into digital. This would only last a second or two. At first I thought it was the dvd but its done it on all three of them. The volume control is on the side, as well as the power button. It could have a little higher volume but it was sufficient for me
Awesome Speakers. I purchased these speakers in order to be able to have some music on an upcoming vacation, and boy was I happy. the speakers fold up into a very compact size and even come with it's own case.  The extra adapter plugs allowed us to it in French Polynesia to charge our ipod, and since the speakers work with 220 voltage I did not even have to get a converter.  Outside of the hotel room we used batteries for power without any problems.  Most importantly the sound quality is great!!!
Always a need for a cassette player!. In spite of my computerized life, I still needed this cassette player for language learning tapes, my old favorite cassettes, especially those of my children speaking their first words. Now that's quite a lot from this little gadget . . .a true buddy it is.  So happy it was still available in this nano-world of ours!
Better then I expected. I had to replace the stock earphones that shipped with my Creative ZEN Vision M. After alot of looking around I found the Aurvana ZEN earphones and ordered a set.I am very happy with the performance for the size of these earphones and they block outside noise well.If you are looking for great BASS performance get some good to great Headphones because earphones just aren't big enough to pull off great BASS responce and never will be.With listening devices size can matter alot.If you want something that works well with a portable like an MP3 player or a laptop I would consider these to be a good choice
A great receiver. I recently assembled my first stereo component system (having had mostly single piece stereos for the last 35 years). I thought I might find "suggested systems" on the web, however, I ended up researching and price comparing for a month or so before my system was completed. Here is what I bought and some comments:1. The receiver is an Onkyo TX8222 with a "tape monitor function" which you need to be able to use an Equalizer plus to hear what you are recording. Although it has just 50 watts per channel, I have never had the volume over a third of the way up. The components below are all connected to it. From my research, Onkyo has a very good reputation.2. I already have an 8 year old Pioneer CD File type player which holds 101 CDs. It still works great. If it ever goes, I will probably get another with a larger capacity.3. A Teac W-600R Dual Full-Logic Cassette Combo. It has two tape decks, is reasonably priced and works fine.4. A Panasonic Technics SLBD20D Turntable. I found good reviews and this is a simple but solid turntable.5. SONY SS-MB350H Bookshelf Speakers (These are a Consumer Reports "Best Buy"). These speakers really are too big for a bookshelf and deliver very nice sound. I have them connected to the "A" speaker output of the receiver.6. SONY SA-WM250 100-Watt Active Subwoofer. I like bass and the addition of this subwoofer connected to the "B" speaker output of the receiver really enhances the sound.7. A Technical Pro EQ-5150 graphic equalizer. This is a nice unit and lets you fine tune your music. By connecting it through the tape monitoring loop, you can select any input source to your receiver and adjust the sound. This equalizer has 4 inputs labeled DVD, TAPE, TUNER, and AUX. There are two output connections. An equalizer really tops off a system.You also need something to hold all these components. You may want to look at an OSullivan Black TV VCR Stand - 20222. It has glass doors, three drawers, and adjustable shelves. I put my turntable on top and the other components inside. Try to buy it locally since shipping is otherwise prohibitive. I put caster wheels on it for mobility since it is quite heavy. I also cut a thin plywood backing with larger access holes for the back with access covers that attach with Velcro. I painted the plywood black. The wheels and larger access holes are a real life-saver as you connect all your components.For phonograph record storage I bought a Sauder TV/VCR Cart, Black 401082. I had to drill some higher shelf pin holes to accommodate the records. I also cut a plywood back which I painted black (much better than the black cardboard that comes with it) This unit has wheels and is a cheap way to store records.In summary, the above items have really made for a nice system and all the components work well together. The sound is incredible especially compared to the aged single piece system I previously had. My wife noticed the difference right away. I bought several of the components at Amazon and some at other sites when the price was better. The furniture I bought locally.
HP C6180 All-in-One. So far, I find this to be a very user friendly product. Having the small monitor screen on the unit makes it easy to operate and the results are above expectations
Casio Fx-115ms plus. great calculator, integrates, derives, solves, only problem is figuring out how to do this.  But best calculator for the Fundamentals of Engineering Test
All the memory you need but SanDisk is cheaper. This product works well enough and has an extensive amount of memory.  It is more than enough unless you take an insane amount of pictures or you want to take a 50 min video, in which case I recommend you just buy a digital camcorder.  If you are thinking about getting the 512 or bigger i would not recommend it because you will probably find that you simply dont need that much space.  However, if I could do it all over again I would buy the SanDisk which works just as well for half the price
sony  shortwave radio. got a great price from amazon on this feature-packed little radio.. did my research, this is my first swl radio in about 20 years...It's just taking a little time to learn the ins and outs of this radio..
RF Extender Works and Can Save You Money. I really like this RF Extender. I've used it on the H890 remote as well as the new H1000 remote. All I can say is that it really works. You do have to hook it up to your computer and program it separately from your remote. It has its own firmware. It's easy to do though. I haven't encountered any problems yet setting one up. I'm a professional A/V designer and installer. This is the new way to go. I've installed many hardwired remote IR systems in the past by Xantech and Russound. Those systems cost upwards of $125 on there own. Why not pay a little more and get a great universal remote to boot (H890 for around $250). It comes with a power adapter and IR blasters that plug into this unit then stick on the components you want to control. You can use a flashlight to shine on the face of those source components to help you in locating the IR receiver windows on your cable box/receiver/DVD player etc. (look for a round hole or LED shaped device) Anyways, this is a great product in my opinion
Great Card. The card is great, solid perfomer better than the ASUS counterpart as it is more stable. The only problem I had was with the CD that came with it, had a problem reading it on 4 different drives but the 5th worked. I recommend this card to all.although the 8800 has some issues under vista with certain applications/games, but on XP it runs great. I have connected it to 2 Viewsonic 22" HD Viewdock LCD, had a problem setting the display to be 1600x1050 on both screens at sametime, this was fixed by getting the latest nvidia driver.enjoy it, as it is a great car
100% perfect burns & durable. I got 20 of 20 perfect burns using these disks and Toast 7 on a G4 Powerbook with a SuperDrive.  I was cautious and only burned at 2X.  I'm using them to back up the original children's movies we have, since they take a beating. I've had them a month now, with a three year old handling them, and despite scratches, they are holding up well.  If they remain readable for more than a year, they will be the best disks I've ever bought
Magnificent!!!. Must say that the item was better than I expected. Thanks to the seller and will buy again!!!
It's Cheap And It Works. I was looking for a wireless card for an old IBM ThinkPad 390X running Windows 98SE. I considered the Linksys, a Belkin and a Netgear and after reading positive and negative reviews of all of them, defaulted to my standard: buy the cheapest one that'll work. I had quite a time getting the driver to install and that's my major complaint. Maybe that's the fault of Windows 98, who knows. The driver installation process kept hanging up because one or another DLL file was not found. I finally had to do some online research on this and also downloaded the driver and some other software from Linksys. I finally got the drivers installed and the card actually works fine. I would hesitate to recommend this to someone with an old machine who isn't very computer savvy, but it's a cheap solution that worked out okay for my needs
My early experiences. I bought the pen scanner because I have an application that requires scanning a lot of plain text to my PC. I am a two-finger typist so my hope is to use the product to avoid the typing. So far, the product meets my simple expectations: Scan-and-store and scan-to-PC. I have not yet encountered errors in scanned text. Customer service has also been excellent. I placed two calls to Wizcom's tech support and someone got back to me in less than 20 minutes. In both cases, the errors were on my side: First, I thought the installation CD-ROM was defective but it turned out that I had to reboot my PC in order to read the enclosed CD-ROM. I have had this type of problem with other CD-ROM applications. Second, I was unable to scan text to my PC in a notepad file as instructed in the manual. I repeatedly got the message "Error sending data to PC" and panicked, thinking that the product was a scam. It turned out the plug to my Pen (not the USB plug to PC) was not fully inserted. Once corrected, it works just as expected. I feel a great relief that I don't have the hassle to return the pen. I am satisfied with the product.
Epson Printer C64 Inkjet Cartridge. Epson maintains a high quality ink and cartridge design.  The inks don't fade or clog up the printer nozzles.  I caution those that use after-market refill cartridges that are not Epson Brand....My last printer was ruined by using a clone brand in an attempt to save a few bucks
Great Choice. I did a good deal of research before I chose this mount.  I was not disappointed!  With help from my 11 year old son, we had no problem assembling and mounting this puppy.  The lag bolts are more than adequate for mounting to the wall.  Final mounting is solid, and the articulating arm and screen-tilt feature make this ultimately flexible for viewing from anywhere in the room.  I mounted this in a corner, and get plenty of clearance for maneuverability.  Recommended this mount to a buddy...he ordered it and is very happy with it
Big & Fast!. Perhaps the ultimate addition to a good camera. I used my camera with a SanDisk Pro Duo (the blue one...) and while most times it was fine, when I needed to take pictures in quick succession - it let me down. The Ultra II is noticably faster. You will not regret buying this
JUST LOVE IT. I love my Street Pilot 2720. I work in Law Enforcement. The cruiser that is assigned to me don't have much. Instead of using the bean bag  holder I  fashion with velcro sticky back tape to my two cars plus my Cruiser. I use it 5 days  a week to check on about 10 to 20 houses daily.Plus locating abandon vehicles. I just type in the address and the street pilot does the rest. Before then I have to look in the the street map I haven't missed an address since thanks to street pilot 2720.
Perfect. This is the first DVD recorder I purchased. I used the quick set up guide and I was off to the races. The quality of my recordings are crisp and clear. The nero software is user friendly and makes recording dvds easy. I'm totally satisfied with my purchase plus I'm recieving a [...]rebate to top it off
Works great with all my devices. My remote went out on my Series one Sony SVR-2000 Tivo box and a replacement remote was $99 new and $78 used. Forget that. This remote works with my TIVO, Sony TV, Phillips Stereo, General Instrument cable box, Sony DVD player, and even my JVC VCR. Setup took 2 minutes for 6 devices!!! Best money I ever spent
Unbeatable Size and Performance for &lt;$150. I have, and have had, lots of SW radios including a number of Sonys.  This is one of their many gems.  Great perfomance, lots of memories and snazzy look. Good for travel (certainly not as compact as the SW100, of course).  A great radio to consider if you only want one shortwave radio, and don't want to spend very much. Good for listening, and good for DXing while traveling.  Look no further
Mintek portable DVD player. This DVD player is workaholic.The resone I gave it 4 stars, because after long use the hing for the screen brook off
Not bad at all. I purchased this keypad for the purpose of gaming and performing live electronic music, not data entry.It just arrived today, I opened the box, plugged it in and popped up metapad to try it out. So far, I'm quite pleased. However, the pressure required to press the keys is about four times what is needed on a normal laptop keyboard, and about twice what is needed on my klunky, classic desktop keyboard.That said, I still love it. I wouldn't want to spend 2 hours punching numbers into a spreadsheet with it, but I'm confident it will perform quite well for my intended purposes. But, I am hoping that it breaks in a bit with use. Also, the flat, ribbon style, retracting cable works like a charm, and it's exactly the size and weight I'd hoped (I'll post a customer picture soon).This thing is going to be great plugged into my laptop at shows, and I'm looking forward to playing my favorite space sim with a joystick in each hand and this thing just in reach without a full keyboard in the way. =
Why I still like this PDA. I bought this model in 2001 and still use it every day. It is reliable and has lots of software built in. I've added List Pro and Pocket Quicken. The only problems I've had are that the screen has gotten badly scratched, and I can't get the Compact Flash Jacket to read my digital photos
Great for cameras. I bought this for my digital camera because my other batteries didn't last very long. These work great and last for a long time.
Good, but.... It seems to run well and cool, no doubt because of its well thought out packaging.  Seagate has a reputation of producing good drives.I bought this as a portable "master drive" to use among two or more computers.  Why carry more than you have to?I thought that, to save space, I would get a few retractable USB cables to avoid the necessity of always carrying more of a clutter of cables.Surprise!!!  The Seagate uses an extremely special purpose USB cable to connect to its usb receptacle.  None of my other cables will work with it.  Firstly, the receptacle is so far recessed into the drive casing that an ordinary usb cable cannot reach into it.  Secondly, if you cut away some of the plastic surrounding the male end of the cable, it will fit into the receptacle but (Surprise!) it will not work.  Why? I do not know.  I tried several other cables that worked with other drives and devices but none worked with the Seagate.I tried searching for similar cables on the internet but, after searching exhaustively, found nothing.  You have to contact Seagate and buy another of its special purpose cables ($9.25 + tax/shipping each).The pretext of the odd Y shaped cable is that some computers will need a second usb jack for additional power.  Of course, this is rare and it strikes me as simply a profit enhancement dodge.Result: 8% higher cost and more cable clutter
What is all the fuss about??. I almost didn't purchase this CD player because of all the bad reviews it had been getting, but I decided to go for it! I am glad I did, I am very happy with this Sony Walkman! I use it for walking, listening to meditating CDs, audio books, everything and have not had one single problem with it. I am so glad I did not let the few negative reviews sway my decision! As mentioned in another review, I love that if you have to stop playing whatever your listening to it will pick up on the same track when you press play again, it also fits in my back pocket so I can walk around the house listening to anything while doing chores, the earpieces fit well, there is absolutley nothing wrong with this walkman! Those of you who seemed to have this walkman break in 2-3 weeks must not take care of your things. I love it, the price was great, so don't let the negative reviews stop you on this purchase!
Worked as expected -- pleased with purchase. The Reader worked as advertised.  I'm very pleased with the purchase..
You get what you pay for !!!. Set-up is easy and comes with a LOT of great software!! For under $10 (when I bought it) it is WELL worth the money - just remembering that ALL video capture devices will 'drag' your system when in use. Easy to 'snap' a photo and record video to your hard drive. Good 6foot cord so it can be placed most anywhere. Works very well in a 'hub.' Great 360degree turning radius and decent vertical adjustment. The picture quality is OK for most uses like online chat. It LOSES a 'star' for one issue: the main component is NOT going to hold to the base as it is all plastic; easy solution - get some super-strength glue to keep the capture mechanism attached to its base !
The Best Hard drive  for the buck. I have used These Seagate Drives for almost 2 years now. They work nicely for editing movies, and I like the combo Firewire and USB2.0 interface. I trust these cheaper Seagate than the expensive LACIE (we bought a box full of lacie D2, they ALL fail in 6 months) or store brand drives. Hard drives are prone to failure. But Seagate has served my company well.using : Seagate 750GB, 500GB, 400GB. daisy chained....
Effective Inkjet cartridge. I bought many inkjet cartridges for my printer.  I've recently had some that leaked.  But the cartridges I bought are effective in my printer, the cartridge doesn't leak, the ink doesn't run.  This is where I will buy my ink cartridges from now on
FujiFilm xD picture card. This Fujifilm 256 MB xD picture card,type M is small and compact.This card works very well.With my puticular camera it holds 129 pictures in the cameras highest resolution
This Product Does Work. I had a rare DVD disc that had developed a tangle of faint cracks, making later tracks unplayable.I used the advice given in an earlier review to use two drops of the repair fluid (aluminum oxide) for the initial cycle and single drops thereafter.  This was good advice and made some improvements, but there was persistent stalling and break-up in some tracks.The unit works by having an electric motor spin two cylinders, each of which rubs an annulus-shaped surface against the CD or DVD. The set comes with each repair surface attached to a flat disc with three prongs, mounted into a clear plastic base.  The buffing surface comes only on its disc-tripod.  To go between repair and buffing, one must use an enclosed small plastic brush-crowbar to pry open the surface between the disc-tripod and the clear plastic base.  This is not mentioned in the instructions.Also not mentioned is that one may buff more than once.  I ended up buffing four times.  This was probably more than necessary.  Sometimes one may put on too much of the repair fluid, which may find itself spread unevenly or left in small clumps.  The result is that areas of the DVD that had played all right before now break up because of irregularities or waves in the fluid coating itself.  My final cycle involved two larger drops, followed by using the repair cycle without putting any extra fluid on.  This may have smoothed the coating without the more severe action a buffing would have given.Now the disc works all right throughout.  There is some loss of picture sharpness, but it's acceptable.Along the way, I sent the customer service rep at Aleratec two e-mails seeking advice.  The responses were fast, courteous, and helpful.The product does work but needs more complete instructions and suggestions.  Skill rises with practice.   Be patient at first.
there it is. The price was right, it arrived on time, it works in my mp3 player, all good!  I should buy another one
Came quick, and priced right. How much packaging and instruction do you really need for a microSD card?  It came quickly, safely packaged in a plastic clamshell, without a lot of fancy colorful instructions, I plugged it in, and it worked perfectly.  Great buy
The Samsung 214T is an Outstanding LCD Monitor. Like one of the earlier reviewers, this is my first LCD monitor and I couldn't be more pleased.  My old monitor was a Mitsubishi flat-screen Diamond 200, and while I'm still satisified with it, the 214T simply blows it away.  At 21.3" the display seems gigantic and the picture and quality have to be seen, to be believed.  I'm running it under Linux, using an Nvidia GeForce 6200 and its drawing time is incredibly fast.  Thanks to the 8ms gray-to-gray response time, I haven't seen any ghosting or smearing, even when playing Quake.  One caveat though, whether you run this under Linux or Window you'll want to make sure you're running the latest video drivers.  If you're running under Linux make sure your video card supports the 1600x1200 resolution *and* that the card's pixel clock can run at the recommended 162 MHz rate.  Otherwise, you may see the dreaded ghosting etc., (by the way, this is true for any LCD, not just the 214T).In addition, the text quality at the recommended 1600x1200 resolution is superb.  The blacks seem darker than most of the LCD monitors I've seen (likely due to the 900:1 contrast ratio).  I do a lot of writing, so this was important.  If you do a lot of online reading or writing, then this feature will definitely save you eye strain.Finally, I ordered it from TigerDirect (via Amazon of course) and I was very happy with the service.  It arrived a day early, in the original packaging and there were no dead pixels.  I haven't tried the analog connection, but the DVI digital connection works perfectly.  All-in-all, I am very satisfied.  This is one of the few products I own that really deserves the 5-star rating.  And considering that just a few years ago, 15" LCDs were going for over a $1000, at this price it's a steal
Pricey, but for a Good Reason. This is a great card to use for your 8 megapixel digital camera. I have the OLYMPUS C8080, and at the highest-quality camera settings, I can get 254 color shots from this card. SimpleTech is my favorite brand, because I've never had any of their cards fail on me, even after repeated washings. Oops.This CF Card is totally dependable. SimpleTech is pricey, but you're paying for quality, which is cheaper in the long run.
As expected. It comes in the retail packaging and a little clear plastic case which holds both the card and the regular SD adapter. I got it for my LG CU500 phone and so far no problems at all
...some advice for the backplate during installation. This is a very, very good cooler.  I run ~15 degrees celsius cooler, under load, versus the stock AMD hsf combo.Measure the dimensions of the area in your case above and to the sides of your CPU.  This thing is HUGE.  In a full desktop case, I could only install this after completely disassembling the machine, and then cramming everything back together by flexing the motherboard and the heatpipes more than I should have.Not only is the setup wide, it's very tall.  My case cover barely slides over the top of the fan.During installation, follow all of the packagted instructions, except for the step that tells you to remove the backing from the motherboard side of the retaining bracket.  If you don't expose the sticky side of the pad, you'll be able to reuse this heatsink
best review for a piece of luggage!. I have a large laptop Toshiba qosimo and had no luck locally to find a case to carry it in. The description of the Targus case was accurate to the letter and accomidated my laptop, allowing me to take it on trips. For luggage, it totally fulfilled my objectives. I easily recommend it to others with wide laptop computers.
Great Value!. Everything you need to go on the road with your iPod.  Car Charger, headphone splitter, cassette adaptor (I'm not convinced that the FM Transmitters are very good yet), extra ear buds, USB & firewire Cables.  All in a sleek- not cheezy carry pack.  At least an $80 value for less than $55.  You can't go wrong.If you travel at all and would like to use your iPod more when you travel- this is for you
3 weeks into this bag. Bag is holding up great vs commuting on buses, by car and also being used for a tote while volunteering as a naturalist at the local parks. I can verify that it is mud, fresh water, salt water, blackberry bramble and dog proof and has left my laptop functional and clean at the end of each day. Even dropped the bag once and the computer was fine. Oh and the bag got punted while standing on the bus and everything was fine as well.  No sign of the seam ruptures noted by an earlier reviewer - there has been much abuse..
USB wireless adapter with external antenna. This adapter was purchased to provide an external antenna connection. for my notebook computer.  It performs as advertised. I connect a Cantenna, high gain external antenna, for an experiment to see how far my son and I can get are notebooks to communicate with each other in case of an emergency.  We are both Amateur Radio Operators and channels 1 to 6 are in the Amateur band, where we can use up to 100 watts of output power.I must disable the internal wireless in the notebook when using the Hawking adapter and disable the Hawking adapter when using the internal wireless, which makes sense to me. Eventually I want to get an 2.4 GHz for more distance communications
It's a Sony. I have had no problems with this unit or software that was bundled with it. Plug-n-Play, yes it was!
Great Product. The 7200 system is great, very easy to use, a breeze to set uo, both software wise, and physically in the car.  Day to day operations are also goof proof.  The mount supplied is very handy when you want to remove the unit from view. An excellent buy
Perfect TV. The ordering, the shipping and the TV itself was a nice experience.  I've had the TV for over a month now and it has been a nice experience
Great Fan. I liked the looks of this fan, read the other reviews and decided to try it. The fan is not noisy at all which is what I wanted because I watch TV in the room it is in. But I also wanted it to cool the room quickly. The ionizer is plus because it also takes care of the smells from the kitchen that carry into this room. The remote is a plus! Easy to assemble, easy to use, has a remote, is quite, and helps with odors
easy to install and no problems. Just installed one on my Dell 4100 running ME.  The driver installation process was the shortest that I have encountered.  It was just a few seconds.  Now, I do not have to crawl under the table to change out USB cables.  Great product.  Ebay's prices seem to be similar to Amazon's
Great item!. This docking station is small, light, and terrific...has many ports and sits behind the notebook, not under it...Was able to plug in my old HP 5M laser printer!
Excelente antena wireless. Comprela con confianza que es un excelente producto. Yo he comprado varias para mi uso personal y para varios de mis amigos. Los cuales han quedado satisfechos al igual que yo
Retro Charm, Sturdy, Fully Functional. if you're looking for an old fashioned phone without the dialing action, this one fills the bill. great sound quality, nice weight, good button response, and so far, no glitches. it even has flash & redial buttons cleverly disguised in the center of the keypad. no caller id lcd or phone number memory, but that would really spoil the retro charm. we use an antiquated ameritech caller id machine with it, and the two get along fine
Niccccceee. this thing is nice, i would have gave it 5 stars but when i received it, it had a scratch on it, but i was too lazy to return it. but honestly this is worth the money. the case has scrathes all over but it still looks nice and my ipod still looks ne
Good media, questionable customer service by seller. The DVD+R media is the best for data archiving and error correction and Taiyo Yuden makes the best media so does that mean that Taiyo Yuden is the best of the best?  Maybe, all I know is the media works great in all my drives without any problems with a drive recognizing the media.This review is mainly about the media but I do want to insert a side note. The picture of the DVD+R media shown is inaccurate. The picture shows the media in a cake box spindle and what I received was a tape wrapped spindle with no cover. I contacted the seller and was told that there was an error in the picture but that they would ship out a cake box to me immediately. One month later and I am still waiting. Not a HUGE deal but, I kinda expected the cake box storage and as such I now have to find another way of storing the empty DVD's.Still a great value and a great product
good program can be improved. I have used Microsoft streets and trip, and then I bought this program. In some respect it is better and in other respects it is not. This program was designed for the stand alone gps system where as the Microsoft s&t is a general purpose program with lots of commands and options. The Map system is better in Microsoft, but the guidance system is better with Iguidance. It has 3d views, better voice and better user interface. All in all it is worth buying if you have a laptop or a pda and a gps receiver it gives you a cheaper way to solve your gps problems.I have used Pharos, Holux and Globalsat's Gps receiver. Of the three I like to Globalsats bt-253 the best. It does not lose signals whereas Pharos seems to lose the signals. It may be a little more accurate because of the number of satallites that it can get being a 20 channel one. As far as map accuracy and uptodateness of maps, I really don't know about areas other than mine. It seems to be very uptodate in the Sanfrancisco east bay area
Thinking of Buying Another One!. I'd been using an older model Panasonic Velcroed to my treadmill. It had served the purpose for a while but, as I'd inherited it from my 14-year-old stepson, it had seen better days. It skipped more and more and I never could remember how to operate the hidden controls.I decided to buy a new one and did a lot of research. In the end I agonized over whether I should buy another Panasonic or a Sony. I finally picked this one for a couple of reasons: 1.) I have the matching cassette deck and it has performed flawlessly and 2.) I like being able to see the controls.Well, I've had the S2 for a few weeks now and it is absolutely wonderful. It hasn't skipped even once no matter what kind of CDs I've loaded it with. The controls are easy to use, even when going full-tilt boogie on the treadmill. I highly recommend this puppy. In fact, I'm thinking another one is in my future
